He’s suffered defeat already.) where he crossed from east to west and from west to east. 
(He deserves a beating. 
A real lion cub can roar the lion’s roar.) Xuedou added the comment, “Completely exposed.” (Wrong. 
At first too high; in the end too low. 
When one realizes one’s fault one should reform, but how many people can?) So he went back to meet Guishan for­ mally. 
It’s already his second defeat. 
Danger!) As Guishan sat there, (He watches this fellow with cold eyes. 
It takes this kind of man to grab a tiger’s whiskers.) Deshan held up his mat and said, “Teacher!” (He changes heads, switches faces; he stirs up waves where there’s no wind.) Guishan reached for his whisk, (Only he could do this; he sets his strategy in motion from within his tent. 
Surely he silences everyone in the world.) whereupon Deshan shouted and left. 
(This is the understanding of a wild fox spirit. 
He’s one of those who can grab the clouds and grasp the fog, and he is outstanding among them.) Xuedou added the comment, “Completely exposed.” (Wrong. 
Check!) Deshan turned his back on the teaching hall, put on his san­ dals, and left. 
He won the hat on his head but lost the shoes on his feet. 
He’s already lost his life.) That evening Guishan asked the head monk, “Where is that newcomer? 
” (He lost his interest in the east and loses his principle in the west. 
His eyes look southeast, but his mind is in the northwest.) The monk answered, “At that time he turned his back on the teaching hall, put on his sandals, and left. 
” (The sacred tortoise drags his tail; he deserves a beating. 
How many blows to the back of the head would this kind of person need?) Guishan said, “Hereafter that lad will go to the summit of a soli­ tary peak, build himself a grass hut, and scold the Buddhas and revile the patriarchs.” (He draws his bow after the thief is gone. 
No one in the world can leap out of this.) Xuedou added the comment, “ This is adding frost to snow.” Commentary Three times I added the word “check.” Do you understand? 
Some­ times I use a blade of grass as the sixteen-foot golden body of the Buddha; sometimes I use the sixteen-foot golden body as a blade of grass. 
Originally Deshan was a scholar-monk, expounding the Diamond Sutra in western China. 
According to that teaching, in the process of the knowledge attained after adamantine concentration, one studies the majestic conduct of the Buddhas for a thousand eons and studies the refined practices of the Buddhas for ten thousand eons before finally fulfilling Buddhahood. 
On the other hand, the 143c southern Chan folk at this time were saying that the mind itself is the Buddha. 
So Deshan became incensed and went south with some commentaries on his back to destroy this crew of Chan devils. 
When he got to Hunan, he met a woman selling pastry by the roadside; he put down his commentaries to buy some refreshment to lighten his mind. 
If you can answer it, I’ll give you some pastry; if not, you’ll have to buy it somewhere else.” Deshan agreed. 
The woman said, “ The Diamond Sutra says, ‘Past mind can’t be grasped; present mind can’t be grasped; future mind can t be grasped.’ Which mind does the learned monk desire to lighten?” Deshan was speechless. 
The woman directed him to call on Longtan. 
During the night Deshan went to Longtan’s room and stayed until late. 
Deshan was then greatly enlightened. 
” Then he burned the commentaries. 
Later, hearing Guishan’s teaching was flourishing, Deshan went to meet him as an adept. 
What did he mean? 
In the Buddha Dharma there are not so many complications; where can you bring intellectual views to bear? 
Since there is noth­ ing extraordinary or mysterious, how will you understand Deshan’s walking back and forth? 
What was his meaning? 
Old Guishan did not bother with Deshan; anyone but Guishan would have been crushed by him. 
See how the old adept Guishan meets him; he just sits there and observes the outcome. 
Xuedou adds the comment “Completely exposed.” This is like an iron spike. 
This is called an added comment; though it goes for both sides, it does not remain on either side. 
How will you under­ stand his statement, “Completely exposed”? 
Where does the expo­ sure take place? 
As Guishan sat there, Deshan lifted up his mat and said, “Teacher!” Guishan reached for his whisk; Deshan then shouted and left. 
How extraordinary! 
Many say Guishan was afraid of him. What has this to do with it? 
Guishan was not flustered at all. 
So it is said, “One whose wisdom surpasses a bird can catch a bird, one whose wisdom surpasses a beast can catch a beast, and one whose wisdom surpasses a man can catch a man. 
It is as high as the sky, as broad as the earth. 
If Guishan did not have the ability to silence everyone on earth, at that time it would have been very difficult for him to test Deshan. 
Were he not the enlightened teacher of fifteen hundred people, at this point he would have been at a loss. 
But Guishan was setting strategy in motion from within his tent that would secure victory over a thousand miles. 
Deshan turned his back on the teaching hall and left. 
Did Deshan win or lose? 
Acting as he did, did Guishan win or lose? 
He was like a bystander judging those two.” i44b Afterwards, Guishan was unhurried; when evening came he finally asked the head monk, “Where is that newcomer who just came?” The head monk replied, “At that time, he turned his back on the teaching hall and left.” Guishan said, “Hereafter that lad will go up to the summit of a solitary peak, build himself a grass hut, and scold the Buddhas and revile the patriarchs. 
Guishan was not being kindhearted; in the future Deshan could scold the Buddhas and revile the patriarchs, pum­ mel the wind, and beat the rain, yet he would still never get out of that cave. 
Deshan’s whole lifetim e’s methods have been seen through by Guishan. 
Or should we say that when the marsh is wide it can hide a mountain, that reason can subdue a leopard? 
Xuedou knows the point of this story, so he can dare to settle the case for them by further saying, “ This is adding frost to snow.” Once again he offers it up for people to see. 
If you do see, I’ll allow that you’re a fellow student of Guishan, Deshan, and Xuedou. 
If you don’t see, beware of vainly producing intellectual interpretations. 
Verse One “completely exposed”; A second “completely exposed”; “Adding frost to snow” —Deshan’s had a dangerous fall. 
The General of the Flying Cavalry enters the enemy camp; (Danger! 
No need to bother slashing again at the general of a defeated army. 
He loses his life.) How many could regain their safety? 
Though you may exhaust all the strategems of supernatural powers, what is the use?) But Guishan doesn’t let him go. 
On the summit of the solitary peak, he sits among the weeds— (After all. 
To take him in tow isn’t out of the ordinary. 
But why is he sitting among the weeds?) Tsk! (Understand? 
Two blades cut each other. 
Two by two, three by three, they walk the old road. 
Singing and clapping go together. 
I strike!) Commentary When Xuedou composed verses on one hundred stories, in each case he burned incense and offered it up; thus his verses have cir­ culated widely throughout the land. 
He also mastered literary com­ position. 
When he had penetrated the stories and become easily conversant with them, only then could he set his brush to paper. 
Why so? 
It is easy to distinguish dragons from snakes; it is hard to fool a Chan practitioner. 
Having penetrated this story, Xuedou puts down three comments at those impenetrable, misleading places, then picks them up to make his verse. 
“Adding frost to snow” —almost a dangerous fall. 
What is Deshan like? 
He is like Li Guang, an expert archer, whom the emperor commissioned as the General of the Flying Cavalry. 
As Li was weak from his wounds, they tied him prone between two horses. 
Li played dead but stealthily ob­ served that there was a Hun near him riding a good mount. 
Li sud­ denly sprang up and leaped on the horse, throwing off the Hun and seizing his bow and arrows. 
Whipping the horse, he galloped south; shooting at his pursuers, he made good his escape. 
This man had the ability to wrest life from the midst of death; Xuedou alludes to this in the verse to make a comparison with Deshan, who reentered the hall to meet Guishan, and was able to leap out again as before. 
Only if you have the ability to kill a man without blinking an eye can you become a Buddha right where you are. 
Someone who can fulfill Buddhahood on the spot naturally kills people without blinking an eye, thus having a share of freedom and independence. 
They totally lack the slightest continuity. 
“How many could regain their safety? 
/ Deshan hurriedly runs past.” Deshan shouted and left; this is like Li Guang’s strategy after being captured, seizing a bow to shoot his guard, making good his escape from enemy territory. 
Deshan turned away and left. 
” Guishan said, “Hereaf­ ter that lad will go to the summit of a solitary peak, build himself a grass hut, and scold the Buddhas and revile the patriarchs.” When did he ever let him go? 
At this point, why does Xuedou say, “On the summit of the solitary peak, he sits among the weeds, ” and then add an excla­ mation? 
Study for thirty more years. 
Xuefeng’s Grain of Rice Introduction Whoever would uphold the teaching of Chan must be a brave spirit; only with the ability to kill a man without blinking an eye can one become a Buddha on the spot. 
Therefore illumination and func­ tion are simultaneous, and wrapping up and opening out are equally expressed. 
It was this way yesterday; the matter couldn’t be avoided. 
It is this way today too; faults fill the skies. 
Without clear eyes, lying in the mouth of a tiger, one cannot avoid losing one’s life. 
Story Xuefeng said to his group, (One blind man leading a crowd of the blind. 
It’s not beyond him.) “Pick up the whole world, and it’s as big as a grain of rice.” (What technique is this? 
I myself have never sported devil eyes.) “ Throw it down before you.” (I’m afraid it can’t be thrown down. 
Take what’s coming to you and get out. 
Better not slight the people.) “I’ll beat the drum to call everyone to look.” (Blind! 
The beat of the drum is for the three armies.) Commentary i45a Changqing asked Yunmen, “In speaking like this, is there any place Xuefeng wasn’t able to appear?” Yunmen said, “Yes.” Chang­ qing asked, “How so?” Yunmen said, “One can’t always be making wild foxy interpretations. 
Where the king’s rule is a little more strict, it’s not permitted to plunder the open markets.” Dagui Zhe said, “I’ll add more mud to dirt for you.” He raised his staff and said, “Look! 
Xuefeng has defecated right in front of you. 
Come now, why don’t you even recognize the smell of dung?” Xuefeng said, “Pick up the whole world, and it’s as big as a grain of rice.” There was something extraordinary in the way this ancient guided people for their benefit. 
Touzi thrice and going to Dongshan nine times. 
Wherever he went, he would serve as rice steward, just for the sake of penetrating this matter. 
When he arrived at Dongshan, he served as rice steward; one day Dongshan asked him, “What are you doing?” Xuefeng said, “Cleaning rice. 
As soon as he got there, Xuefeng asked, “ Does the student have any share in this matter handed down from time immemo­ rial as the fundamental vehicle?” Deshan hit him and said, “What are you saying?” Through this Xuefeng had an insight. 
” Suddenly Xuefeng was greatly enlightened; he bowed and said to Yantou, “Brother, today I’ve at last realized the Way.” People these days only say that the ancients made up special creations for people of the future to rely on as fixed rules. 
To say this is just slandering those ancients; this is called spilling the blood of Buddha. 
The ancients weren’t like people today with spurious 145b shallow talk; otherwise, how could they have used a single word or half a phrase for a whole lifetime? 
When it came to upholding the source teaching and perpetuating the life of the Buddhas, they would utter a word or half a phrase that spontaneously silenced every­ one on earth. 
There’s nowhere for you to produce a train of thought, to make intellectual interpretations, or to rationalize. 
Whenever he utters a word or half a phrase, he’s not making a living in the ghost cave of mental patterns, conceptual consciousness, and calculating thought. 
His actions were all like this. 
One day Xuefeng said, “On South Mountain there’s a turtlenosed snake; you should take a good look at it.” Then Changqing came forward and said, “If so, there are a lot of people here who’ll lose their lives.” Another time Xuefeng said, “The whole earth is one eye of a monk; where will you defecate?” Another time, he said, “I have met with you at Wangzhou Pavilion; I have also met with you in the Black Rock Range; and I have also met with you in front of the community hall.” Now Baofu asked Ehu, “ Leaving aside ‘in front of the community hall,’ what about the meetings at Wangzhou Pa­ vilion and Black Rock Range?” Ehu hurried back to his room. 
Xue­ feng was always bringing up this kind of talk to instruct his group. 
As for “Pick up the whole world, and it’s as big as a grain of rice” —at this point, can you figure it out by means of intellectual discrimination? 
Here you must smash through the net, at once abandon gain and loss, right and wrong, to be completely free and untrammeled; you then naturally pass through his snare, and then you will see what he’s doing. 
Tell me, where is Xuefeng’s meaning? 
People often make up intellectual interpretations and say, “Mind is the master of myriad things; the whole world is all at once in my hand.” Luckily this has no connection. 
Here you must be truly genuine and see all the way through as soon as you hear it brought up, penetrating the bone through to the marrow, yet without falling into feeling, thought, conception, or imagination. 
If you are a genuine pilgrim, you will see that in acting this way Xuefeng was already indulging to help others. 
(Smash the mirror and I’ll meet with you; you must smash it to understand.) He beats the drum for you to come look, but you don’t see; (He sticks you in the eye. 
Don’t take it lightly. 
Ignoramuses—what is there that is hard to see?) When spring arrives, for whom do the hundred flowers bloom? (Things don’t overlap. 
He appears in a cave of entanglements.) Commentary Naturally Xuedou sees the ancient; he only needs to go to his life­ line, and in one spurt he produces a verse for him. 
“An ox head disappears; / A horse head emerges.” Tell me, what is he saying? 
If you see all the way through to the bottom, it is like eating break­ fast in the morning and lunch at midday—just being ordinary. 
Out of compassion, Xuedou shatters with one hammer blow at the outset, and cuts through with a single statement. 
He is indeed strict, like a spark, a lightning flash. 
He doesn’t reveal his sword point; there’s no place for you to fix onto. 
Can you search it out in your conceptual faculty? 
In the third line, instead Xuedou opens a pathway and dis­ plays a bit of formal style—already he’s fallen into the weeds. 
In the fourth line, he falls further into the weeds. 
If you produce words on top of words, phrases on top of phrases, ideas on top of ideas, making up explanations and interpretations, you will not only bog me down, but you’ll also turn away from Xuedou. 
He never made up principles to bind people. 
“In the mirror of Chan, absolutely no dust.” Quite a few people say that a stilled mind is the mirror itself. 
Xuedou has spoken clearly; it’s just that people do not see. 
Therefore, being such a dotard, he says, “ He beats the drum for you to come look, but you don’t see.” Do the ignorant see? 
“When spring comes, for whom do the hundred flowers bloom?” One could say he’s opening the doors and windows, throwing them wide open all at once for you. 
Story Yunmen said, “I don’t ask about before the fifteenth day;” (Half south of the river, half north of the river. 
We don’t keep old calen­ dar dates here.) “try to say something about after the fifteenth day.” (Inevitably it will go from dawn to sunset; just don’t say that the next day is the sixteenth. 
The days and months seem to flow by.) He answered himself, “Every day is a good day.” (He’s gathered it in. 
Though the frog jumps, it can’t get out of the bas­ ket. 
Whose house has no bright moon and clear breeze? 
But do you know it? 
The sea god knows its value but not its price.) Commentary Yunmen first studied with Muzhou. 
Muzhou was swift as light­ ning, so it was difficult to approach him. 
When Yunmen went to see Muzhou, on the third time, as soon as he knocked on the door, Muzhou said, “W ho’s there?” Yunmen gave his name. 
As Muzhou opened the door, Yunmen bounded in; Muzhou held him fast and said, “Speak!” Yunmen hesitated, and was ejected; he still had one foot inside when Muzhou slammed the door, breaking Yunmen’s leg. 
As Yunmen cried out in pain, he suddenly was greatly enlightened. 
Later, his teaching style was like that of Muzhou. 
After his enlightenment, Yunmen stayed in the home of the ministry president Chen Cao for three years. 
Later Muzhou directed Yunmen to go to Xuefeng. 
There Yun­ men came forth and asked Xuefeng, “What is the Buddha? 
” Xue­ feng said, “Don’t talk in your sleep.” Yunmen bowed. 
He stayed there for three years. 
One day Xuefeng asked, “What is your perception?” Yunmen said, “ My perception doesn’t differ in the slightest from that of all the sages since time immemorial.” For twenty years Lingshu did not appoint a head monk. 
People called Lingshu the Knowing Sage Chan Master, since he knew of past and future events. 
Once King Liu of south China was going to mobilize his army, and he intended to go ask Lingshu whether conditions were aus­ picious or not. 
Knowing of this beforehand, Lingshu sat down and calmly passed away. 
The king said angrily, “Since when was the master ill?” The attendant answered, “ The master hadn’t been ill. 
He just entrusted a box to me to present to Your Majesty when you arrived.” King Liu opened the box and took out a card which said, “The enlightened one is the head monk.” Understanding the message, the king dismissed his soldiers and invited Yunmen to teach at Lingshu monastery. 
Only later did he live at Yunmen. 
“ Is the fruit of the spiritual tree ripe yet?” Yun­ men said, “When have you ever heard it was unripe?” One day King Liu summoned Yunmen to spend the summer in the palace. 
One of the palace functionaries wrote a verse and posted it: 
Only cultivation of great wisdom is Chan; Silence, not clamor, is in order for the Chan school. 
Myriad kinds of clever talk are not as good as reality; They lose to Yunmen’s total not speaking. 
Yunmen usually liked to teach three-word Chan: observing, “Reflect!” “Ha!” He also taught one word Chan: 
a monk asked, “When you kill your parents, you repent before the Buddha; when you kill the Buddha, where do you turn to repent? 
” Yunmen said, “Exposed.” Another asked, “What is the treasury of the eye of the true Dharma?” Yunmen said, “ Universal.” There was simply no room for discussion. 
When he uttered a phrase, it was like an iron spike. 
Later Yunmen produced four sages: 
Dongshan Shouchu, Zhimen Shiguan, Deshan Yuanmi, and Xianglin Dengyuan. 
Xianglin served as Yunmen’s attendant for eighteen years; whenever Yunmen dealt with him, he would just call, “Attendant Yuan!” Xianglin would answer, “Yes?” Yun­ men would say, “What is it?” It went on like this for eighteen years, when one day Xianglin finally awakened. 
Yunmen said, “I won’t call you anymore.” In Yunmen’s usual dealings with people, he would often use the methods of Muzhou; though it was hard to approach him, he had the ability to liberate people. 
“I don’t ask about before the fifteenth day; try to say something about after the fifteenth day.” He cuts off all distinctions and doesn’t let ei­ ther ordinary or holy pass. 
He answered himself, “Every day is a good day.” The words “before the fifteenth day” already cut off distinctions; “after the fifteenth” also cuts off distinctions. 
The fact is that Yunmen did not say that the next day is the sixteenth. 
Later people merely followed his words to produce interpretations; but what relevance has this? 
Yunmen established a protean style; he surely had ways to benefit people. 
Having spoken some words, he then answered himself: 
“Every day is a good day.” These words pervade all time and settle everything at once. 
When I talk like this, I too am following his words to produce interpretations. 
Killing others is not as good as killing yourself. 
As soon as you make up a principle, you fall into a pit. 
Three statements are inherent in each statement of Yunmen; since the basic teaching of his school is like this, when Yunmen utters a phrase it must be returned to the source. 
This affair has no multitude of argu­ ments and propositions, though those who have not yet penetrated wish it were like that. 
If you do penetrate, then you will immedi­ ately see the essential meaning of Yunmen. 
Verse He throws away one, (Seven openings, eight holes. 
Where has it gone? 
He lets up a bit.) Picks up seven. 
Above, below, and in the four quarters, no comparison. 
Above is the sky, below the earth. 
East, west, south, north; what comparison is there? 
Nevertheless, the staff is in my hand.) Placidly walking along, he treads down the sound of the flowing stream. (Don’t ask what’s right at your feet. 
It’s difficult to investigate it thoroughly. 
He’s gone into a nest of complications.) His relaxed gaze descries the tracks of flying birds. (In the eye there is no such happening. 
A wild foxy view; as before, he’s just inside the same old den.) The grasses grow thick; (He pulls the arrow out of the back of his head. 
What’s going on here? 
He’s fallen into equanimity.) The mists overhang. (He hasn’t come out of this nest yet. 
Beneath his feet clouds arise.) Around Subhuti’s cliff, the flowers make a mess; (Where is he! 
He’s been completely exposed.) I snap my fingers; how lamentable is Sunyata! (The four quarters and eight directions, the whole cosmos; inside Sunyata’s nostrils, try to say something. 
Where is Sunyata?) Don’t make a move! (What about your previous words? 
When you move, then what?) If you move, thirty blows! 
first he takes the adamantine sword and brings it down once; then he reveals a bit of formal style. 
Though it’s like this, ulti­ mately there are not two understandings. 
“He throws away one, / Picks up seven.” People often make an understanding based on the numbers and say, “‘He throws away one’ refers to ‘before the fifteenth day.’ ” Having abruptly put down two lines and sealed it up, Xuedou then instead reveals it for people to see; “He throws away one, / Picks up seven.” Avoid turning to the words for your sustenance. 
What soup is there in a cracker? 
People often fall back into conceptualization. 
You must gain understanding before the word arises; then the great func­ tion will become manifest and you will naturally see it. 
“All things being void of essence, they cannot be conveyed by words; I would rather not teach but quickly enter Nirvana.” When he got to this point, even the Buddha couldn’t find a way to open his mouth. 
But by virtue of the power of skill in means, after he had taught the five mendicants he went to three hundred sixty assemblies and ex­ pounded the teachings for his age. 
All these were just expedients. 
For this reason he had taken off his regal garments and put on rags. 
He had no choice but to turn toward the shallows within the sphere of the secondary in order to lead his various disciples. 
But tell me, what is the supreme statement? 
Here Xuedou re­ veals a bit of the meaning to let people see. 
Just don’t see that there are any Buddhas above, don’t see that there are sentient beings below; don’t see that there are mountains, rivers, and earth without, and don’t see that there is perception and cognition within. 
Then you will be like one who has died the great death and re­ turned to life. 
With oppositions united in a whole, though you bring them up one by one, you’ll no longer have different views. 
Then you will see the meaning of the saying, “ He throws away one, / Picks up seven; / Above, below, and in the four quar­ ters, no comparison. 
” If you pass through at these lines, then and there above, below, and in the four quarters there is no compari­ son. 
The myriad forms and appearances—plants, animals, people— everything everywhere completely manifests the way of your own house. 
Thus the saying: 
In myriad forms one body alone is revealed; Only by spontaneous acceptance will one be near. 
In past years I mistakenly searched on the road; Now I see it as ice within fire. 
“In the heavens and on earth, I alone am the honored one. 
” Many people pursue the branches and don’t seek the root. 
First get the root right, then naturally everything will follow. 
“ Placidly walking along, he treads down the sound of the flow­ ing stream.” As he goes along placidly, he can tread down and cut off even the roar of a torrent. 
“His relaxed gaze descries the tracks of flying birds. 
” At a glance it is as if tracing out even the tracks of flying birds. 
When you get here, you will not consider it difficult to blow out the fires under the cauldrons of hell, or to shatter sword forests and knife mountains with a shout. 
Because of his compassion, at this point Xuedou feared that people would settle down in the realm of unconcern, so he went on to say, “ The grasses grow thick; / The mists overhang,” thus cov­ ering everything. 
Tell me, whose world is this? 
Can it be called “Every day is a good day”? 
Fortunately there’s no connection. 
In fact, “ Placidly walking along, he treads down the sound of the flowing stream” isn’t it; “His relaxed gaze descries the tracks of flying birds” isn’t it either; nor is “ The grasses grow thick,” nor “ The mists overhang.” But even something entirely different would just be “Around Subhuti’s cliff, the flowers make a mess.” It is still necessary to go beyond the Other Side. 
147a As Subhuti was sitting in silent meditation in a cliffside cave, the gods showered flowers in praise. 
Subhuti said, “Flowers are showering from the sky; whose doing is this?” A god said, “I am Indra, king of gods.” Subhuti said, “Why are you offering praise?” Indra said, “I esteem your skill in expounding transcendent wis­ dom.” Subhuti said, “I have not spoken a word about wisdom; why praise?” Indra said, “You have not spoken, and I have not heard. 
No speaking, no hearing—this is true wisdom.” And again he caused the earth to tremble and showered flowers. 
The rain has passed; the clouds are shrinking; Dawn has halfway broken through; The multiple peaks are like a drawing of blue-green rocky crags. 
Subhuti did not know how to sit on a cliff; He brought on heavenly flowers and quaking of the earth. 
When the king of gods is shaking the earth and showering flowers, where will you go to hide? 
Xuedou also said: I fear Subhuti won’t be able to escape; Even beyond the cosmos, all is filled to the brim. 
What end will he know to his frantic turmoil? 
From all sides the pure wind tugs at his clothes. 
Though you be clean and naked, bare and purified, totally with­ out affliction, this is still not the ultimate. 
In the end, though, what is? 
“I snap my fingers; how lamentable is Sunyata! 
” The Sanskrit word Sunyata means the spirit of emptiness. 
Space is her body; she has no physical body to be conscious of contact. 
When the Buddha’s light shines forth, then she manifests her body. 
When you get to be like Sunyata, then Xuedou will rightly snap his fingers in lament. 
” What’s it like when you move? 
Sleeping with your eyes open under the bright sun in the blue sky. 
Introduction The sages have not transmitted the statement before sound; if you have never seen it personally, it’s as if it were worlds away. 
Thus it is said, “ The sky can’t cover it; the earth can’t support it; space can’t contain it; sun and moon can’t illumine it.” Where there is no Buddha and you alone are called the Honored One, for the first time you’ve gotten somewhere. 
Do you understand? 
No one knows the sweating horses of the past; they only want to emphasize the achievement that crowns the age. 
Story Huichao asked Fayan, (What does he say? 
Wearing handcuffs, he hands over his own indictment.) “Huichao asks the teacher, what is the Buddha?” Fayan said, “You are Huichao.” (He comes out according to the pattern. 
Iron scrap stuffing. 
He fends him off with a counterattack.) Commentary 147b Chan Master Fayan had this ability to get through to people and make simultaneous contact, and he knew the use of this ability; thus he could answer like this. 
This is what is called passing beyond sound and form, achieving the great freedom, granting or taking away as the occasion requires, where killing or enlivening rests with oneself. 
He is indeed extraordinary. 
Nevertheless, people all over who deliberate about this story are many, and those who make intellectual interpretations are not few. 
They do not realize that whenever the ancients uttered a word or half a phrase, it was like sparks, like lightning, directly opening up a single straight path. 
People of later times just made up interpretations based on the words. 
Some say, “Huichao is himself the Buddha; that is why Fayan answered thus.” Some say, “It’s like riding an ox in search of an ox. 
” Some say, “The asking is it. 
” What relevance has any of this? 
If you want to see Fayan’s whole potential, you must be one who doesn’t turn around even when struck, one with teeth like sword trees and a mouth like a bowl of blood, who knows outside the words what they refer to; then you will have a small portion of realization. 
If one by one they make intellectual interpretations, everyone on earth would be an exterminator of the Buddha’s race. 
As for Chan student Huichao’s awakening here, he was constantly engrossed in penetrating investigation; therefore under the im­ pact of one word his mind opened up. 
Can you say something m ore?” Ce said, “ The fire god is in the province of fire; he is seeking fire with fire. 
Likewise, I am a Buddha, yet I went on searching for a Buddha.” Fayan said, “Sure enough, you have misunderstood.” Ce left in a huff and went away. 
These days there are those who just put a glare in their eyes and interpret that as understanding. 
In the Fayan succession this is called “arrow points meeting.” They don’t employ the five positions of ruler and minister, or the four propositions; they simply talk of arrow points meeting. 
But if you ponder over the words, to the end you will search without finding. 
147c As a public teacher, Fayan had five hundred disciples. 
At that time Buddhism flourished. 
Now the future National Teacher Deshao had spent a long time with Sushan, and he considered himself to have understood Sushan. 
So he gathered Sushan’s writ­ ings and had a portrait of him, symbolizing succession, and led a band of followers around. 
When they went to Fayan’s community, he himself did not go to encounter the teacher but just had his followers go along with the others for encounters with the teacher. 
One day when Fayan addressed the assembly, a monk asked, “What is one drop from the fount of Chan?” Fayan said, “One drop from the fountain of Chan. 
” The monk withdrew, dumbfounded; but Deshao, who was present, was suddenly enlightened when he heard this. 
Later he became a public teacher, as one of Fayan’s successors. 
The summit of the peak of the mystic crossing Is not human society; Outside the mind there are no things— Green mountains fill the eyes. 
Fayan gave his approval and said, “This one verse alone can per­ petuate my school. 
In the future kings and lords will honor you. 
I am not equal to you. 
” Observe those ancients; when they awaken like this, what truth is this? 
Thus when Huichao asked Fayan, “What is the Buddha? 
The pattern is already showing.) Partridges are calling deep in the flowers. (What’s the use of this chatter? 
Blown by the wind into a different tune. 
Is there such a thing?) At the three-tiered Dragon Gate, where the waves are high, fish become dragons, (Traverse this one road. 
Don’t fool the great congregation. 
Tread on the dragon’s head.) Yet fools still go on scooping up the evening pond water. (Leaning on fences, groping along walls; next to the gate, standing by the door; what use is this for a Chan practitioner? 
The points of the ancients that are hard to get your teeth into, hard to chew, hard to penetrate, and hard to see, impenetrable riddles, he produces in verse to let people see. 
This is indeed extraordinary. 
Xuedou knew Fayan’s key device, and he also knew where Huichao was at. 
Still, lest people in the future mistakenly make intellectual interpretations of Fayan’s words, he came out with this verse. 
This monk’s asking like this, Fayan’s answering like this— this is “In the river country the spring wind isn’t blowing; / Deep in the flowers partridges are calling.” These two lines are just one line. 
But say, where is Xuedou’s meaning? 
In Jiangxi and Jiangnan many people make a two-part inter­ pretation: 
they say “In the river country the spring wind isn’t blow­ ing” is used to versify “You are Huichao,” and that this scene—even if the spring wind doesn’t blow, still “deep in the flowers partridges are calling” —is used to compare the endless haggling over these words everywhere to the partridges crying deep in the flowers. 
Do you want to have no seam or gap? 
Clearly I tell you, his speech is true, his words are true; they cover heaven and earth. 
Xuedou is extremely compassionate in the third and fourth lines; all at once he explains completely for people. 
Chan Master Huichao’s great awakening is like fish becoming dragons where the waves are high at the three-tiered Dragon Gate, while fools still go on dragging through evening pond water. 
The ancient sage King Yu cut the Dragon Gate, making a three-level passage for the Yellow River. 
Nowadays, on the third day of the third month, when the peach blossoms bloom, influenced by heaven and earth, if there are fish that can get through the Dragon Gate, horns sprout on their heads, they raise their bristling tails, catch hold of the clouds, and fly away. 
Those who cannot leap through fail and fall back. 
Fools who gnaw on words are, as it were, scooping out evening pond water looking for fish, not realizing that the fish have al­ ready turned into dragons. 
Master Baiduan wrote a verse on this story: 
A copper coin Buys a fried cake; He gobbles it down into his belly And then no longer feels hunger. 
This verse is very good, only it’s too crude. 
Xuedou’s verse is very clever, and he doesn’t cut his hand on the sharp point. 
Librarian Qing used to like to ask people, “What is ‘Fish turn into dragons at the three-tiered Dragon Gate, where the waves are high’ ? 
” For me, it’s not necessary, but now I’m asking you: 
having turned into dragons, where are they now? 
Introduction If you understand, you can make use of it on the road, like a dragon reaching water, like a tiger in the mountains. 
If you don’t under­ stand, then worldly truth prevails, and you are like a ram caught in a fence, like a fool watching over a stump waiting for a rabbit. 
Sometimes a saying is like a lion crouching on the ground; some­ times a saying is like a diamond sword; sometimes a saying cuts off the tongues of everyone on earth; and sometimes a saying fol­ lows the waves and goes along with the currents. 
If you make use of it on the road, when you meet with one who knows you distinguish what’s appropriate to the occasion, you know what’s right and wrong, and together you witness each other’s illumination. 
Where worldly truth prevails, one who has the single eye can occupy the ten directions and stand like a mile-high wall. 
Therefore it is said that when the great function appears it does not keep to fixed patterns. 
Sometimes we take a blade of grass and use it as the sixteen-foot golden body of the Buddha; sometimes we take the sixteen-foot golden body and use it as a blade of grass. 
But tell me, what principle does this depend on? 
Do you really know? 
Story At the end of a summer retreat Cuiyan said to the group, “All summer I’ve been talking to you;” (If you open your mouth, how can you know it to be so?) “see if my eyebrows are still there.” (All he’s achieved is that his eyes have fallen out too, along with his nostrils, which he’s already lost. 
He enters hell like an arrow shot.) Baofu said, “ The thief’s heart is cowardly.” (Obviously. 
This is a thief recognizing a thief.) Changqing said, “Grown.” (His tongue falls to the ground; he meets error with error. 
No one in the world can leap out. 
Overcome.) Commentary The ancients had morning study and evening inquiry. 
But tell me, in the whole Buddhist Canon with its five thousand forty-eight volumes, in which there is talk of mind and nature, of sudden and gradual, is there such an event? 
They’re all this kind of occasion, but among them this story of Cui­ yan is outstanding. 
When the ancients let down a hook, ” it was never an empty gesture; they invariably had a reason, to benefit people. 
Many misunderstand and say, “Under the bright sun in the blue sky, Cuiyan spoke aimless talk, producing concern where there was none; at the end of the summer he spoke of his own faults and examined himself first to avoid others’ criticism.” Fortunately this has nothing to do with it. 
The appearance in the world of the succes­ sive generations of teaching adepts would have been entirely with­ out benefit if they hadn’t reached out to instruct people. 
What would have been the purpose? 
When you get here, if you can see all the way through, then you will know that the ancients had the method of driving off a plowman’s ox and snatching away a hun­ gry man’s food. 
People today, when questioned, immediately chew on the words, making a living on Cuiyan’s eyebrows. 
If there is nothing extraordinary about these words of Cuiyan, why then would these three—Yunmen, Baofu, and Changqing—have replied to him so profusely? 
Baofu said, “ The thief’s heart is cowardly.” How much intel­ lectual interpretation these words have provoked lately! 
What does Baofu mean? 
You must avoid searching for that ancient one in his words. 
If you give rise to feelings and arouse thoughts, your eyes are snatched away. 
But this has nothing to do with it. 
They don’t know that Changqing brings out his own understanding when he says, “Grown.” Each has expressed himself. 
Now I ask you, where is the growth? 
If you can break through views of the ordinary cur­ rent and cut off gain and loss, right and wrong, then you will see where Changqing responded to Cuiyan. 
Great master Yunmen often taught with oneword Chan, though in the one word the three statements were always present. 
This then is the way to make a statement. 
Since the meaning is not there, tell me, where is it? 
If you are clear-eyed, with the ability to illumine heaven and earth, it will be crystal clear immediately. 
For his single word “barrier” and the words of the other three, Xuedou has strung them together on one verse. 
Verse Cuiyan teaches the followers; For a thousand years, no reply. 
(In a thousand or ten thousand, still there’s one or a half. 
He divides a tally.) The word “barrier” answers him back; (Didn’t you believe what I said? 
Indeed extraordinary. 
Only such a person can understand such talk.) He loses his money and suffers punishment. 
Xuedou too has done quite a bit of this. 
I’d strike while he’s still talking.) Decrepit old Baofu— (Fellow travelers on the same path, still acting this way. 
Two, three.) Censure and praise are impossible to apply. (Letting go, holding still. 
Who is born the same and dies the same? 
Don’t slander him. Luckily there’s no connection.) Talkative Cuiyan Is clearly a thief. 
The clear jewel has no flaws; Who can distinguish true from false? (Many are just false. 
I myself have never had the eye. 
Bodhidharma can.) Changqing knows; (A spirit recognizing a spirit; only he could do this. 
Yet he still hasn’t gotten a half.) His eyebrows have grown. (Where? 
From head to foot there isn’t a single blade of grass.) Commentary How could Xuedou be called a teacher if he hadn’t been this com­ passionate, making a verse to enable people to see? 
Since later students became attached to their words and increasingly con­ ceive intellectual interpretations, therefore they do not see the ancients’ message. 
Though one acts like this, one would still have to have really arrived in this realm. 
Xuedou says, “For a thousand ages there is no reply.” Cuiyan just said, “See if my eyebrows are still there.” What’s so extraordi­ nary that there’s no reply for a thousand ages? 
You must realize that when the ancients uttered a word or half a phrase, it wasn’t blurted out; one must have the eye to judge heaven and earth before this is possible. 
When Xuedou writes something it’s like a diamond sword, like a lion crouching on the ground, like sparks, like lightning. 
Had he not the eye on the forehead, how could he have seen what Cuiyan was getting at? 
This lesson that Cuiyan gave the people was such that “for a thousand ages there is no reply.” It goes beyond Deshan’s staff and Linji’s shout. 
But where is Xuedou’s meaning for us? 
How will you understand his statement, “For a thousand ages there is no reply”? 
“The word ‘barrier’ answers him back; / He loses his money and suffers punishment. 
” What is the meaning of this? 
Even if you have the eye to pass through this barrier, when you get here you must be most thoroughgoing before you are done. 
Tell me, is it Cuiyan who loses his money and suffers punishment, or is it Xuedou, or is it Yunmen? 
“Decrepit old Baofu— / Censure and praise are impossible to apply.” Does he censure himself? 
Where does Baofu censure? 
Where does Baofu praise? 
“ Talkative Cuiyan / Is clearly a thief.” What has he stolen, that Xuedou says he’s a thief? 
You must avoid being whirled around following after the stream of his words; when you get here you must have your own accomplishment before you’ll understand. 
“ The clear jewel has no flaws.” Xuedou says that Cuiyan is like a clear jewel without any flaws. 
“Who can distinguish true from false?” It can be said that rarely is there anyone who can make this distinction. 
Only at the very end does he say, “Changqing knows; / His eyebrows have grown.” Tell me, where have they grown? 
Look quickly! 
Zhaozhou’s Four Gates Introduction When a clear mirror is on its stand, beautiful and ugly are distin­ guished by themselves. 
With a sharp sword in hand, one can kill or bring life, to fit the occasion. 
In the midst of death one finds life; in the midst of life one finds death. 
If you haven’t the eye to penetrate barriers, if you haven’t room to turn around, at this point obvi­ ously you won’t know what to do. 
What is the barrier-penetrating eye, what is room to turn around in? 
Story A monk asked Zhaozhou, “What is Zhaozhou? 
There are thorns in the soft mud. 
If it’s not south of the river, then it’s north of the river.) Zhaozhou replied, “East gate, west gate, south gate, north gate.” (Open. 
I strike!) Commentary Chan study is to understand yourself clearly; avoid picking and choosing among verbal formulations. 
In the Chan founder’s coming from the West for the sole transmis­ sion of the mind seal, directly pointing to the mind for perception of essence and attainment of Buddhahood, where were there any such complications? 
When you penetrate through to libera­ tion, this can be compared to a dragon reaching water or a tiger at home in the mountains. 
To have seen but not yet penetrated, or to have penetrated but not yet become illumined—among the experienced worthies of the past this called for seeking more instruction. 
When one who has investigated for a long time asks for more in­ struction, this would be giving a ladder to a thief. 
In reality this matter is not in words; thus Yunmen said, “If this matter were in words, are there no words in the Canon? 
” Within Fenyang’s eighteen categories of question, the one in this story is called a question to examine the host, and it is also called a seeking-out question. 
The monk’s question is indeed ex­ traordinary; anyone but Zhaozhou would have found it hard to reply. 
The monk asked “What is Zhaozhou?” A true adept, Zhao­ zhou immediately replied, “East gate, west gate, south gate, north gate. 
” The monk said, “I wasn’t asking about that Zhaozhou. 
” Zhao­ zhou said, “What Zhaozhou were you asking about?” Later people said this was no-thing Chan, cheating quite a few people. 
When the monk asked about Zhaozhou, Zhaozhou answered, “East gate, west gate, south gate, north gate, ” so people thought Zhaozhou was just answering about the city after which he was named. 
If you understand in this fash­ ion, then any rustic from a village of three families understands more about Buddhism than you do. 
It’s like comparing a fish eye to a bright pearl; in appearance they are similar, but actually they are not the same. 
Tell me, is there something or is there nothing? 
149c Fushan said, “At the very last word one finally reaches the impenetrable barrier.” The inner essence of pointing out the Way is not in words and explanations. 
“In ten days, one breeze; in five days, one rain. 
In the peaceful countryside they enjoy their tasks, drumming full bellies and singing hallelujah.” This is called the time of great peace. 
When I call this having no concerns, it is not a matter of covering your eyes and saying you have no concerns. 
You must penetrate through the barrier, emerge from the forest of brambles, clean and naked, bare and untrammeled; it’s up to you. 
” This is vain talk; I call this claiming attainment without having at­ tained, claiming realization without having realized. 
As they haven’t made a penetrating investigation, when they hear talk of mind or essence, of the mysterious and abstruse, they say it is just mad talk and there really isn’t anything to be concerned with. 
This could be called the blind leading the blind. 
They still don’t know that before the Chan founder came people did not call the sky earth or call mountains rivers; why did the founder still come from the West? 
And when you see through, then as ever sky is sky, earth is earth, mountains are mountains, rivers are rivers. 
An ancient said, “Mind is the sense, things are the objects; both elements are like flaws on a mirror. 
” When you get to this realm you will naturally be clean and naked, bare and untram­ meled. 
Yet speaking in terms of the ultimate principle, even this is not yet the place of peace and security. 
They seem to be right, yet they’re all wrong. 
This monk asked this way; Zhaozhou answered this way; tell me, how will you look for them? 
This way won’t do, not this way won’t do either; ultimately, how is it? 
One day while Zhaozhou was sitting, his attendant reported to him, “The king has come. 
Chan Master Huanglong Human commented on this, saying, “The attendant only knew how to announce a guest, he did not know that he himself was in the imperial city. 
Zhaozhou went into the weeds to look for the man, heedless of getting his whole body soaked in muddy water. 
” Do you know the truth of this? 
Look into Xuedou’s verse. 
Verse In their words they show their ability in direct confrontation; (Echoing. 
When fish swim through, the water is disturbed. 
Better not slander Zhaozhou.) The adamantine eye is completely void of dust. 
Why search the sky and grope over the earth?) East, west, south, north—the gates face each other; (They’re open. 
Where are there so many gates? 
If you turn your back on Zhaozhou city, where will you go?) An endless series of hammer blows can’t smash them open. (It’s just that your revolving hammer is insufficient. They’re open.) Commentary Zhaozhou faces situations like a diamond sword: 
if you hem and haw, he cuts your head right off; time and again he will go on to snatch your eyes right away. 
Nevertheless, this monk dares to grab the tiger’s whiskers and pose a question. 
It’s like giving rise to something where there’s nothing; yet nonetheless in his words there is ability. 
Once the monk had shown his ability, Zhaozhou did not turn away from the question; thus he too showed his abil­ ity in answering. 
It wasn’t that he acted thus out of whimsy; be­ cause he had penetrated, he naturally fit in the same groove with the monk, as if it were all arranged. 
He said, “ Tell me, is this sparrow in my hand dead or alive?” The Buddha straddled the threshold and said, “You tell me, am I going out or coming in?” The outsider was speech­ less; he then bowed. 
This story is just like the one here; ever since then the bloodline of the ancients has been unbroken. 
Thus it is said, “The question is in the answer, the answer is in the question.” Since Xuedou can see through things like this, he says, “In their words they show their ability in direct confrontation.” There is skill in the monk’s words, which seem to bear two meanings; he seems to ask about the man and also about the place. 
Without stirring at all, Zhaozhou immediately replies, “East gate, west gate, south gate, north gate.” “ The adamantine eye is completely void of dust.” This praises Zhaozhou snatching away both subject and object, showing his ability in his words, giving an answer. 
This is called having abil­ ity and perspective. 
The moment the monk turns around, Zhaozhou sees through his innermost heart. 
If he couldn’t do this, it would have been difficult for Zhaozhou to parry the monk’s question. 
The adamantine eye illumines and sees everywhere without obstruc­ tion. 
It can not only make out clearly a tiny hair a thousand miles away but also determine what is false and decide what is true, distinguish gain and loss, discern what’s appropriate to the occa­ sion, and recognize right and wrong. 
Xuedou says, “East, west, south, north—the gates face each other; an endless series of hammer blows can’t smash them open.” Since the hammer blows continue without limit, why can’t they smash the gate open? 
It’s that Xuedou’s vision is like this. 
How will you get these gates open? 
Please examine this thoroughly. 
Introduction So, so; not so, not so. 
In battle, each occupies a pivotal position. 
So it is said, “Turn upward, and even Sakyamuni, Maitreya, Manjusrl, Samantabhadra, the myriad sages, and all the adepts in the world all gasp and fall silent. 
Still he does know how to act like this.) Muzhou said, “ I’ve been shouted at by you once.” (A trap to fell a tiger. 
He seems to be right but actually isn’t. 
I’m afraid he has a dragon’s head but a snake’s tail.) Muzhou said, “After three or four shouts, then what?” (A wave against the current. 
There’s never been any­ one who could come forth. 
Muzhou hit him and said, (If we let Muzhou carry out his mandate to the full, all the plants and trees on earth would be cut into three pieces.) “You phony! 
” Commentary 150b Whoever would uphold and establish the teaching of the source must have the eye of a true teacher of the source and must have the functional ability of a true teacher of the source. 
Muzhou’s mental acuity is like lightning. 
He liked to put scholars to the test; he would usually utter a word or half a phrase like a thicket of brambles that can’t be stepped on or touched. 
As soon as he saw a monk coming, he would say, “The issue is obvious; I’ll give you a thrashing. 
This monk was also well polished and prepared, but neverthe­ less he had a dragon’s head but a snake’s tail. 
At the time anyone but Muzhou would have been thrown into confusion by this monk. 
The old fellow wasn’t flustered at all; calmly he replied, “I’ve been shouted at by you once. 
” He seems to take that shout and put it to one side, and he also seems to test him; he leans over to watch him. 
Again the monk shouted; he seems to be right, but isn’t really—he was taken in tow by Muzhou, who asked, “After three or four shouts, then what? 
” After all the monk was speechless. 
Muzhou then hit him and called him a phony. 
The aim of testing people is to know them intimately the minute they speak. 
Too bad this monk was speechless, provoking Muzhou to call him a phony. 
If it had been any of you who had been asked by Muzhou, “After three or four shouts, then what?” how should you have replied in order to avoid his calling you a phony? 
Here if you can discern survival and destruction and dis­ tinguish right and wrong, if your feet tread the real ground, then who is concerned with “After three or four shouts, then what?” But since this monk was speechless, his case was decided by old Muzhou on the basis of the facts. 
Verse Two shouts and a third shout; (The sound of thunder is tremendous, but there isn’t a single drop of rain. 
How can you ride a tiger’s head? 
Many people have understood in this way, and there are still those who entertain this view.) Both of them would turn out to be blind. 
Why only two? 
Take what’s due you and get out.) Who is blind? 
(When you look, it’s not that it isn’t there, but if you stare at it you’ll go blind. 
If you set your eyes to look, you are grabbing empty space with both hands. 
Sometimes a shout is like a crouching lion, sometimes a shout is like a diamond sword. 
” Xinghua said, “ I see all of you shouting in the east hall and shouting in the west hall. 
I have never set out real pearls for you inside the royal curtains. 
As for you all here, what are you doing when you just go on with wild random shouting?” Linji said, “I’ve heard you all imitate my shouting. 
But I ask you, if a monk comes from the east hall and another monk comes from the west hall, and they both shout at once, which one is the guest and which one is the host? 
If you can’t distinguish host and guest, then you must not imitate me any more.” Therefore Xuedou says in his verse, “Adepts recognize the op­ portune moment to change.” Although the monk in the case was taken in by Muzhou, he still could perceive the opportune moment to change. 
Tell me, where did he do this? 
” This is where the teachers silenced everyone in the world. 
If you recognize the opportune moment to change, then when something is raised, you immediately know what it comes down to. 
Let them shout twenty or thirty times, or even go on shouting until king­ dom come, and call this riding the tiger’s head—if you understand in this way, it’s because you don’t know Muzhou. 
Even if you want to see the monk, you’re still too far away. 
To ride a tiger’s head one must have a sword in hand and versatility too. 
Xuedou says, if you call this riding the tiger’s head, “The two of them would both turn out blind.” Xuedou is like a long sword leaning against the sky, stern and awesome in full majesty. 
Xuedou goes on to say, “Who is blind?” Tell me, is it the guest who’s blind, or is it the host? 
Or are the guest and host both blind 66Notice on Overcoming Demons at once? 
” This is the living point where Xuedou finishes the verse all at once. 
Yet why does he say, “I bring it out for everyone to see”? 
How will you see it? 
Open your eyes and you can; shut your eyes and you can too. 
Is there anyone who can avoid it? 
Notice on Overcoming Demons 151a by Chan Master Wuai of Jiashan appended by Huifang I have heard that the road of the three vehicles is wide and that the realm of reality is boundless. 
When the ocean of wisdom is calm and clear, the ten directions are secure and peaceful. 
At this time an army of demons arises to invade the mind field. 
Since the six brigands are strong, the mind king is startled. 
In the morning they produce a hundredfold weirdness; in the evening they pro­ duce a thousandfold perversion. 
The road of enlightenment is cut off and made impassable. 
They destroy Nirvana and ruin the three treasures; the jewels of nondoing are stolen away, and the spiri­ tual wealth of the great treasury is plundered. 
Material passions block the sun, and the fire of desire spans the sky. 
They ravage the citadel of the Dharma and burn the realm of sanctity. 
Having seen such violence, I feared that Buddhism would be hard to preserve, so I discussed the matter with the six perfec­ tions, to eliminate it together. 
I sent essential emptiness as a se­ cret emissary to spy on the demon army and saw that it was garrisoned in the mountains of the five clusters with over eightyfour thousand troops. 
Finally I activated the heroic soldiers of the eighteen elements, with the emptiness of substance as their com­ mon battle cry. 
Everyone has the power of nonobstruction; everyone has the ability to be brave and strong. 
The straightforward mind is the achievement of seeing essence; one right gets rid of the confusion of a hundred wrongs. 
Putting on the armor of steadfastness, hold­ ing the lance of concentration, with the arrows of knowledge, the bow of meditation, and the radiant sword of wisdom, they train in the school of the Great Vehicle; they encamp in the mountains of tranquillity. 
They fly their flag on the ridge of the three insights and line up along the eightfold right path. 
Sending great aware­ ness as a general who captures enemies alive, they roam the four quarters looking for the tracks of errant thought. 
Cutting off the traces of ignorance, they also enable the king of compassion to break through the blockade of the three poisons. 
The commander of forbearance attacks the citadel of anger, the army of diligence gets rid of the troublemaker of pride, and the soldiers of joy and equanimity capture the thieves of stinginess and greed. 
While on patrol, the demon army arises up in full force, its murderous atmosphere striking the very skies. 
At this time the eyes do not look upon form, the ears do not listen to sound, the nose does not smell odors, the tongue does not discern flavors, the body does not sense feelings, and the mind does not cling to objects. 
Proceeding ahead singlemindedly, not retreating thought after thought, suddenly I find that the demon army has been overwhelmingly defeated and that the six brigands have completely lost. 
The slaughter knows no bounds, and there is a clean sweep. 
I capture errant thought and ignorance alive, take them to the place of Nirvana, and cut them into three pieces with the sword of wisdom. 
The forest of afflictions is then cut down, and the mountains of others and self turn to dust. 
The net of folly and attachment burns when it meets the fire of knowledge; the forest of erroneous views is withered by the wind of wisdom. 
Inwardly and outwardly flawless, open and clear, the mind king sits in the throne room of joy, and true thusness climbs the tower of emanci­ pation. 
Inherent essence roams in the halls of nonobstruction, and the three bodies sit on the seat of objective emptiness. 
Henceforth the reality realm is peaceful and quiet, forever free from noise and dust. 
Together we cross the river of birth and death, reaching the shore of enlightenment as one. 
Once the demon army has retreated, we should announce it on high together. 
Introduction The great capacity of the enlightened is under one’s control; the lifeline of humans and gods is subject to one’s direction. 
With a casual saying one astounds the crowd and stirs the masses; with one device, one perspective, one smashes chains and knocks off fetters. 
Tell me, who has ever been like this? 
Are there any who know where such a one is at? 
Story Huangbo said to his group, (Drawing water, one is limited by the size of the container. 
He swallows all in one gulp. 
No one in the world can leap clear.) “All of you are gobblers of dregs; if you go on traveling around this way,” (You said it! 
You’ll wear out your shoes. 
He overturns the heaven and shakes the earth.) “where will you have Today?” (What’s the use of Today? 
He certainly astounds the crowd and stirs up the community.) “ Do you know that there are no Chan teachers in all of China?” (I hadn’t realized. 
He swallows all in one gulp. 
He’s a fellow with a dragon’s head but a snake’s tail.) Commentary Huangbo was seven feet tall; on his forehead was a lump like a round pearl. 
He understood Chan by nature. 
Tiantai, he met a monk on the way. 
They talked and laughed together like old acquaintances. 
Huangbo looked him over carefully; the light in his eyes was piercing and his appearance was extremely unusual. 
As they traveled along together, when they came to a swollen valley stream, Huangbo stopped there. 
The monk tried to take Huangbo across with him, but Huangbo told him to cross over himself. 
The monk gathered up his robes and walked on the water as though on land. 
” The monk said in admiration, “You are a true vessel of the teaching of the Great Vehicle.” As his words ended, he disappeared. 
Majestic! 
Where do you come from?” Huangbo said, “Magnifi­ cent, majestic, I’ve come from the mountains.” Baizhang said, “What have you come for?” Huangbo said, “Not for anything else.” i 5ic Baizhang saw him to have profound capacity. 
The next day Huangbo took leave of Baizhang. 
Tell me, did Huangbo know this when he asked or not?” Huangbo asked, “What did he say when he was alive?” Baizhang then re­ lated the circumstances of his second encounter with Mazu: 
“When Mazu saw me approach, he raised his whisk. 
Mazu drew himself up and gave a shout that left me deaf for three days.” Huangbo unconsciously stuck out his tongue in awe. 
Baizhang said, “After this, won’t you be a successor of Mazu?” Huangbo said, “No. 
Today, through your recital, I’ve gotten to see Mazu’s great capacity and great function; if I were to succeed Mazu, in the future I would be bereft of descendants. 
” Baizhang said, “It is so. 
If your view equals the teacher, you have less than half the teacher’s virtue; only when your wisdom goes beyond the teacher are you worthy to pass on the transmission. 
You must see for yourself how father and son act in that house before you begin to understand. 
Huangbo was an informal friend of prime minister Pei Xiu. 
When Pei was commander of Wanling, he invited the master to come to the district capital. 
He showed the master a composition expressing his understanding. 
The master took it and put it down without even opening it. 
He’s inherited the mind seal from a great adept; There’s a round pearl on his brow, his body’s seven feet tall. 
He hung up his staff and stayed ten years by the river Shu; Today his floating coracle has crossed the banks of the Zhang. 
Eight thousand dragons and elephants follow his giant strides; Over myriad miles fragrant flowers join his excellent cause. 
I hope to serve the master as his disciple; I do not know to whom he will entrust the teaching. 
The master made no sign of being pleased, but said: 
My mind is like the boundlessness of the ocean, My mouth spews red lotuses to nurse a sick body. 
I myself have a pair of hands with nothing to do; I have never received an idle person. 
When Linji was in his group, Muzhou was the head monk. 
Why don’t you go question the teacher?” Linji said, “What should I ask?” Muzhou said, “Why not ask what the essential mean­ ing of Buddhism is?” Linji then went and asked Huangbo; three times he was beaten and driven out. 
He took leave, saying to the head monk, “I have been bidden to ask the question three times, and have been beaten and driven out. 
” Dayu said, “Huangbo was so kind, he exerted himself to the utmost for you; why do you go on speaking of fault or no fault?” Suddenly enlightened, Linji said, “ Huangbo’s Buddhism is no big deal.” Dayu grabbed him and said, “You just said you were at fault, and now you say Buddhism is no big deal.” Linji hit Dayu in the ribs thrice; Dayu pushed him away and said, “Your teacher is Huangbo; it’s none of my business.” One day Huangbo said to his group, “The great master Farong of Ox Head Mountain spoke horizontally and vertically, but he still didn’t know the key of transcendence. 
These days Chan fol­ lowers after Shitou and Mazu speak of Chan and Tao volumi­ nously.” But why did Huangbo talk like this? 
It was because of this that he said, “You are all gobblers of dregs; if you travel around like this, you’ll be laughed at. 
As soon as you hear of a place with eight hundred or a thousand people, you immediately go there. 
It won’t do just to seek out the hubbub; if you always take things easy here, then where else would there be this matter of Today?” In the Tang dynasty they used to revile people by calling them gobblers of dregs, so many people say Huangbo was reviling the people. 
Those with eyes see for themselves what he was getting at. 
There was a Chan man in the group who didn’t fear for his life, so he could come forth this way from the crowd to question Huangbo: 
“What about those who order followers and lead communities?” He makes a good point, too. 
As soon as I speak this way, I’ve already lost my head. 
Where are your nostrils? 
Verse His cold severe solitary mien does not take pride in itself; (He himself doesn’t know he has it. 
He too is a cloud­ dwelling saint.) 152b Solemnly dwelling in the sea of the world, he distinguishes dragons and snakes. 
(It is necessary to distinguish initiate and outsider, and to distinguish absolute and relative.) The emperor has been lightly handled; (What emperor are you talking about? However great, he too must get up from the ground; and even higher, there’s still the sky—what about that?) Three times he personally felt those claws and fangs at work. 
It’s not yet anything extraordinary; it’s still a minor skill. 
When his great capacity and great function become manifest, the mountains, rivers, and earth, the whole world, will be at Huangbo’s place begging for their lives.) Commentary This verse by Xuedou seems just like a eulogy on a portrait of Huangbo, yet you mustn’t understand it as such. 
Xuedou clearly says, “ His cold severe solitary mien does not take pride in itself.” When Huangbo instructed the group this way, he wasn’t contesting with others or asserting himself, displaying himself, or boasting of himself. 
If you understand what happened here, you are free in all direc­ tions; sometimes you stand alone on a solitary peak, sometimes you stretch out in the bustling marketplace. 
How could you onesidedly stick to one corner? 
The more you abandon, the more you aren’t at rest; the more you seek, the more you don’t see; the more you take on, the more you sink down. 
An ancient said, “Without wings, fly through the sky; with fame, you become known through­ out the world. 
Xuedou says, “Solemnly dwelling in the sea of the world, he distinguishes dragons and snakes.” Is it a dragon or a snake? 
As soon as anyone comes in through the door, he poses a test; this is called the eye to distinguish dragons and snakes, the ability to capture tigers and rhinos. 
Xuedou also said, “Judging dragons and snakes—how is that eye correct? 
Capturing tigers and rhinos— that skill is not complete.” Xuedou also says, “ The emperor has been lightly handled; / Three times he personally felt those claws and fangs at work.” Huangbo is not just acting bad right here; he’s always been thus. 
As for this emperor, the Tang dynasty emperor Xianzong had two sons, Muzong and Xuanzong. 
The one referred to here is Xuanzong. 
When Xuanzong was thirteen, though young he was acute. 
He used to like to sit in the lotus posture. 
During the reign of Muzong, once when morning audience was over, Xuanzong play­ fully sat on the imperial throne and pretended to salute the court. 
One of the ministers saw this and thought Xuanzong was demented, so he reported it to Muzong. 
Seeing Xuanzong, Muzong praised him: 
“My younger brother is indeed a valiant son of our clan.” Muzong died in 824, leaving three sons—Jingzong, Wenzong, and Wuzong. 
Jingzong succeeded to the throne and reigned for two years until the inner court removed him. 
Wenzong succeeded him and reigned for fourteen years. 
When Wuzong came to the throne, he always spoke of Xuanzong as an imbecile. 
One day, filled with hatred for Xuanzong because he had long ago playfully climbed up on his father’s throne, he finally had Xuanzong beaten almost to death, thrown out into the back yard, and drenched with filthy water to revive him. 
After this Xuanzong went into hiding in the community of Chan Master Xiangyan. 
Later he had his head shaved as a novice, but did not receive full ordination. 
Lu, Xiangyan made up a poem about a waterfall: 
Piercing clouds, penetrating rock, never declining the work; When the land is distant, you know how high is the place it appears. 
Having intoned these two lines, Xiangyan remained silent in thought; he wanted to draw Xuanzong out to see what he was like. 
Eventually it must return to the ocean as waves. 
Now Xiangyan realized that Xuanzong was no ordinary man, and he silently acknowledged him. 
Huangbo was there serving as head monk. 
One day as Huangbo was paying respects to a Buddha image, Xuanzong saw him and asked, “ If you don’t seek from the Buddha, don’t seek from the Dharma, and don’t seek from the Sangha, what are you seeking by bowing?” Huangbo replied, “I don’t seek from the Buddha, the Dharma, or the Sangha—I always pay respects this way.” Xuanzong said, “What’s the use of paying respects?” Immediately Huangbo slapped him. 
Xuanzong said, “Too coarse.” Huangbo said, “Where is this to talk of coarse and fine?” and slapped him again. 
Later, when Xuanzong succeeded to the throne, he gave Huangbo the title Coarse Acting Monk. 
When prime min­ ister Pei Xiu was at court later, he proposed that Huangbo be given the title Duanji Chanshi, Boundless Chan Master. 
Xuedou know where his bloodline came from, so he could use it cleverly. 
Right now is there anyone to use those claws and fangs? 
Introduction The sword that kills, the sword that gives life: 
this is the standard way of antiquity and the essential pivot for today too. 
If you dis­ cuss killing, you don’t harm a single hair; if you discuss giving life, you lose your life. 
So it is said, “The sages have not transmitted the single transcendental path; students toil over appearances like monkeys grasping at reflections. 
Let those with eyes try to discern. 
Story A monk asked Dongshan, “What is the Buddha?” (Iron brambles; no one on earth can leap clear.) Dongshan said, “Three pounds of flax.” Commentary So many people misunderstand this story. 
It is really hard to chew, since there’s no place to sink your teeth into. 
Because it is flavorless. 
The ancients had quite a few answers to the question of what the Buddha is. 
” He indeed cut off the tongues of the ancients. 
Many people base their understanding on the words and say that Dongshan was in the storehouse at the time weighing out flax when the monk questioned him, and that is why he answered this way. 
Some say that when Dongshan is asked about east he answers about west. 
Some say that since you are a Buddha and yet you still go around asking about a Buddha, Dongshan answers this in a roundabout way. 
And there’s yet another type of dead people who say that the three pounds of flax is itself the Buddha. 
If you seek from Dongshan’s words this way, you can search until kingdom come and still never see it even in a dream. 
Not realizing the intent of the ancients, people just search in their words; what grasp have they? 
An ancient said, “Basically the Way has no words for it, but we use words to illustrate the Way. 
Once you see the Way, the words are forgotten.” To get to this point, you must first go back to your own original state. 
This three pounds of flax is like the single track of the high­ way to the Capital; as you go, nothing is not it. 
This story is the same as Yunmen’s “Cake,” undeniably difficult to understand. 
My teacher Wuzu made a verse on it: 
The cheap-selling board-carrying fellow Weighs it out, three pounds of flax. 
With a hundred thousand years of unsold goods, He has no place to put it all. 
You must clean it all up; when defiling feelings, conceptual think­ ing, and comparisons of gain and loss and right and wrong are all cleared away at once, then you will spontaneously understand. 
Verse The sun hurries; (In the left eye, half a pound. 
Lay down in flames of fire.) The moon is swift. (In the right eye, eight ounces. 
He makes his nest in the palace of Heng O, the Moon Lady.) Has there ever been carelessness in a good response? 
To see Dongshan as laying out facts according to the situation (Mistakenly sticking by the zero point of the scale. 
It’s just you who see things this way.) Is like a lame tortoise and a blind turtle entering an empty valley. (Take your due and get out. 
In the same pit there’s no different dirt. 
Who killed your hawk?) Flowery groves, clusters of brocade; (A double case; he handles all crimes on the same indictment. 
As before, they’re the same.) Bamboo of the south, wood of the north, (There is also a third level. A quadruple case. 
He puts a head on top of his head.) So I think of Changqing and Officer Lu; (A leper drags his companions along with him. 
I am this way, and Xuedou is this way too.) He knew how to say he should laugh, not cry. 
Commentary Xuedou can see all the way through, so he immediately says, “The sun hurries; / The moon is swift.” This is of the same kind as Dongshan’s reply “Three pounds of flax. 
” The sun rises, the moon sets; every day it’s like this. 
People often make up intellectual interpretations and just say the sun is the left eye and the moon is the right eye; when questioned, they glare and say, “Here!” What connection is there? 
If you understand in this way, the Chan school will disappear. 
That is why it is said, “Setting out a hook in the four seas is just to fish out terrible dragons; the mysterious device outside convention is for seeking those who know the self.” Xuedou is one who has left the mundane; how could he make up this sort of interpretation? 
Xuedou easily reveals a little some­ thing to let you see where barriers are broken and hinges are smashed; there he adds a footnote saying, “Has there ever been carelessness in a good response?” Dongshan does not reply lightly; he is like a bell when struck, like a valley echoing. 
At once Xuedou has brought out his heart and presented it to you. 
Presented face to face, it’s not a matter of multiplicity; Dragons and snakes are easily distinguished, but Chan practitioners are hard to deceive. 
The golden hammer’s shadow moves, the jewel sword’s light is cold; They strike directly; be quick to look! 
After a while he said, “Some day I’ll go where there are no human hearths and build a hut; I won’t store any rice or plant any vegetables. 
” Dongshan then left. 
Later, when he worked as a teacher to deal with people’s various potentials, the words “three pounds of flax” were understood everywhere merely as a reply to the ques­ tion about the Buddha; people just make their reasoning in terms of the Buddha. 
Xuedou says that to understand Dongshan’s reply as expressing facts in accordance with the situation is like a lame tortoise or a blind turtle going into an empty valley; when will they ever find a way out? 
“Flowery groves, clusters of brocade.” When a monk asked Fude Xian, “What is the mind of the ancient Buddhas?” He replied, “Flowery groves, clusters of brocade.” The monk also asked Mingjiao, “What is the inner meaning o f‘three pounds of flax’? 
” Mingjiao said, “Bamboo of the south, wood of the north.” The monk came back and recounted this to Dongshan, who said, “I won’t explain this just for you, but for the whole community.” Later he entered the hall and said, “Words do not express facts; speech does not accord with the situation. 
Those who accept words are lost; those who linger over sayings are deluded. 
” To smash people’s intellectual views, Xuedou purposely draws these together on a single thread to produce his verse. 
They don’t realize that “bamboo of the south, wood of the north” and “three pounds of flax” are just like “daddy” and “papa.” When the ancients answered with a turn of words, their intention was definitely not like this. 
It’s just like Xuedou’s saying, “The sun hurries; / The moon is swift” —it’s just as broad. 
It’s just that gold and brass are hard to tell apart; similar written characters get mixed up. 
“So I think of Changqing and Officer Lu; / He knew how to say he should laugh, not cry.” To discuss the verse itself, the first three lines by themselves have already completed the verse. 
It’s just that he is extremely compassion­ ate; therefore he does this. 
When Officer Lu Xuan was Inspector of Xuanzhou, he studied with Nanquan. 
When Nanquan passed on, Lu heard the sound of mourning, so he went to the temple for the funeral. 
He laughed aloud. 
The temple director said, “The late master was your teacher; why aren’t you crying?” Lu said, “If you can speak appropriately, I’ll cry.” The temple director had nothing to say. 
Lu gave a loud lament, “Alas! 
Our late teacher is long gone!” Later Changqing heard of this and said, “The officer should have laughed, not cried.” Xuedou borrows the essence of this meaning to say that if you make up these kinds of intellectual interpretations, this calls for laughter, not crying. 
This is so, but at the very end there’s a single word that is in fact easy to misunderstand, when he goes on to say “Ha! 
” Has Xuedou washed clean? 
The School of Kanadeva Introduction Clouds are frozen over the great plain, but the world is not hid­ den. 
When snow covers the white flowers, it’s hard to distinguish the outlines. 
Its coldness is cold as snow and ice; its fineness is fine as flour. 
Its depths are hard for even the Buddha’s eye to peer into; its secrets are impossible for demons and outsiders to fathom. 
Tell me, whose business is this? 
Story A monk asked Baling, “What is the school of Kanadeva?” (A white horse enters white flowers. 
Check!) Baling said, “Piling snow in a silver bowl.” (He chokes you. 
A profuse outburst.) Commentary People often misunderstand this story and say this is a heretical school. 
What’s the connection? 
The fifteenth patriarch Kanadeva was indeed once an outsider, but when he met the fourteenth pa­ triarch Nagarjuna, who presented a bowl of water to him, he put a needle into the bowl. 
Nagarjuna recognized his capacity, trans­ mitted the enlightened mind teaching to him, and invested him as the fifteenth patriarch. 
If you have not been able to comprehend it, you can’t avoid defeat. 
What about it? 
If you say words are it, this is off the mark; if you say words are not it, this too is off the mark. 
Where does Mazu’s meaning lie? 
” Dasui raised his whisk and said, “ManjusrI and Samantabhadra are both here.” The monk drew a circle and presented it to Dasui; then he threw it behind him. 
Dasui said, “Attendant, bring tea for this monk. 
” He also said, “The red flag is in my hand.” In doctrinal disputes in India the winner held a red flag, while the loser turned his clothes inside out and departed through a side door. 
Those who wanted to hold debates in India were re­ quired to obtain royal permission. 
Bells and drums would be sounded in the great temples and afterwards the debates began. 
In Kanadeva’s day heretics had impounded the bell and drum in the Buddhist temple in a persecution. 
Now Kanadeva knew that Buddhism was in trouble, so he made use of his supernormal pow­ ers to go up the bell tower and ring the bell, for he wanted to drive out the heretics. 
Soon one of the heretics called out, “Who is up in the tower ringing the bell?” Kanadeva answered, “A deva.” The heretic asked, “Who is the deva?” Kanadeva said, “I.” The heretic said, “Who is T ? 
” Kanadeva said, “‘You’ is a dog.” The heretic asked, “Who is the dog?” Kanadeva said, “ The dog is ‘you.’ ” After seven go-rounds like this, the heretic realized he was beaten, so he submitted and opened the door of the bell tower, whereupon Kanadeva came down 154b holding a red flag. 
At such times Kanadeva would hold a red flag in his hand, and the defeated one would stand beneath the flag. 
Among the heretics, to have their heads cut off was gen­ erally the punishment for defeat, but now Kanadeva put a stop to this; he only required his defeated adversaries to shave their heads and enter the Buddhist path. 
Therefore the school of Kanadeva flourished greatly. 
Later on Xuedou uses this in his verse. 
When he was traveling he always sewed sitting mats. 
He had attained deep realization under Yunmen; thus he was outstanding. 
Later he be­ came a teacher, a spiritual heir of Yunmen. 
First he lived at Bal­ ing. 
He didn’t compose a document of succession to the teaching but just used three turning words to offer up to Yunmen: “What is the Way? 
One with clear eyes falls into a well.” “What is the ra­ zor-sharp sword? 
Each branch of coral upholds the moon. 
” “What is the school of Kanadeva? 
Piling snow in a silver bowl.” Yunmen said, “Later on, on the anniversary of my death, just recite these three turning words, and you will have repaid my kindness in full. 
” Thereafter, as it turned out, he did not hold ceremonial feasts on the anniversary of the death of his teacher Yunmen but followed Yunmen’s will and just brought up these sayings. 
Though people all over have given answers to this question about the school of Kanadeva, they have mostly answered in terms of events. 
Then too, without revealing a trace of his sharp point, he takes on enemies from all sides, and blow by blow finds a way out. 
He has the skill to fell tigers; he strips off human sentimental views. 
As for the matter of uniformity, to get here you must have penetrated all the way through on your own, but after all you must meet another before you are done. 
Therefore it is said, “When Daowu brandished his scepter, one who was his equal would understand; when Shikong bent his bow, an adept would tacitly comprehend.” For this truth, if you have no certain transmission from a teacher, what can you use to carry on the esoteric conversation? 
Verse Old Baling (A thousand soldiers are easy to get, but one general is hard to find. 
Talkative teacher!) Is truly something else, (What truth is this? 
Have you even dreamed of the peak experience?) He knows to say, “Piling snow in a silver bowl.” (The frog can’t jump out of the basket. A double case. 
Quite a few people will lose their lives.) The heretics must know for themselves; (You’re included too, but do you know? 
All are buried in the same pit.) If you don’t know, ask the moon in the sky. (It’s farther than far. 
Take what’s due you and get out. 
Address your plea to the sky.) The school of Kanadeva, Kanadeva’s school, Beneath the red flag, arouses the pure wind. 
Just cut off your heads and arms, and I’ll speak a phrase for you.) Commentary “Old Baling / Is truly something else.” Xuedou has ample praise for him. 
“All words are the Buddha’s teaching.” When I talk like this, what’s the reason? 
Xuedou subtly reveals a little of his meaning when he says it’s just that Baling is truly something else. 
Afterwards he opens up and says, “He knows to say, ‘Piling snow in a silver bowl.’ ” Xuedou goes on to provide you with further footnotes: 
If you don’t know, ask the moon in the sky. 
An ancient once gave this answer to this question: 
“Ask the moon in the sky. 
” i54c Xuedou’s eulogy finished, at the end there must be a living road, a phrase where the lion rears. 
He raises it higher for you and says, “ The school of Kanadeva, Kanadeva’s school, / Beneath the red flag, arouses the pure wind.” Baling said he piled snow in a silver bowl; why then does Xuedou speak of rousing the pure wind beneath the red flag? 
Do you know that Xuedou kills people without using a sword? Story A monk asked Yunmen, “What are the teachings of a whole life­ tim e?” (Even now they’re still not finished. 
The professor does not understand; he’s in a cave of complications.) Yunmen said, “An appropriate statement.” (An iron hammerhead with no hole. 
A rat gnawing on raw ginger.) Commentary Members of the Chan school, if you want to know the meaning of the Buddha nature, you must observe times and conditions. 
This is called the special transmission outside doctrine, the sole com­ munication of the mind seal, directly pointing to the mind for the perception of the essence and the realization of enlightenment. 
For forty-nine years Sâkyamuni Buddha stayed in the world; at three hundred sixty assemblies he expounded the sudden and gradual, the temporary and the true teachings. 
These are what are called the teachings of a whole lifetime. 
The monk picked this out to ask, “What are the teachings of a whole lifetime?” Why didn’t Yunmen explain for him in full detail, but instead say, “An appropriate statement”? 
Yunmen ordinarily included three statements in one state­ ment. 
These are called the statement that contains the universe, the statement that follows the waves, and the statement that cuts off all streams. 
He lets go and gathers in, naturally extraordinary, like cutting nails or shearing iron. 
What connection is there? 
Not only do they not understand, they go to hell as fast as an arrow. 
Therefore it is said, “Even to shatter one’s bones and crush one’s body is not sufficient recompense; when a single statement is understood, you transcend ten billion.” Extraordinary indeed— “What are the teachings of a whole lifetime?” just boils down to his saying, “An appropriate statement.” If you can grasp this im­ mediately, you can go home and sit in peace. 
If not, listen humbly to the verdict. 
Verse An appropriate statement; (Leaping with life. 
The words are still in our ears. 
It’s not merely like a mile-high wall. 
Is there any such thing?) He wedges a stake into the iron hammerhead with no hole. (He misunderstands the words. 
Old Yunmen too is washing a lump of dirt in mud; Xuedou too is just pasting on ornaments.) Under the Jambu Tree I laugh— (This fellow has never been anywhere. 
Only those on the same road would know. 
How many could there be who know?) Last night the black dragon had its horn wrenched off. (It’s not just the black dragon that gets twisted and broken. 
Has anyone seen? 
Do you have proof? 
Dumb!) Exceptional, exceptional— (Ample praise; it takes Xuedou to do this. 
Where is he exceptional?) Old Yunmen got one horn. (Where is it? 
Even Deshan and Linji must fall back three thousand miles. 
Again, what about that other horn? 
/ How utterly unique!” Xuedou can­ not praise him enough. 
It is like a precipitous cliff ten miles high. 
Then, too, it is like a million-man battle line; there is no place for you to get in. 
No one on earth can do anything about it. 
And Yunmen answered this way, much like “wedging a stake into the iron hammerhead with no hole.” Xuedou employs lan­ guage so artfully. 
“Under the Jambu Tree I laugh” —In the Scrip­ ture on Creation o f the World it says, “South of Sumeru a crystal tree shines over the continent Jambu, making all in between a clear blue. 
This continent takes its name from this great tree; hence it is called Jambudvipa. 
This tree is seven thousand leagues high; beneath it are the golden mounds of the Jambu altar, which is twenty leagues high. 
Since gold is produced from beneath the tree, it is called the Jambu Tree.” Thus Xuedou says of himself that he is under the Jambu Tree laughing. 
What is he laughing at? 
He’s laughing at the black dragon that got its horn wrenched off last night. 
All he can do is look up respectfully and praise Yunmen. 
It’s like breaking off one of the black dragon’s horns. 
At this point, if there were no such thing, how could he have spoken as he did? 
“Exceptional, exceptional— / Old Yunmen got one horn.” Why doesn’t Xuedou say he got them both? 
How is it that he just got one horn? 
Introduction The sword that kills, the sword that enlivens; the customary rule of time immemorial is still the pivotal essential for today. 
Tell me, right now which is the killing sword and which the enlivening sword? 
Fall back three thousand miles.) Yunmen said, “An upside-down statement.” (They come out even. 
Truth comes out of the convict’s mouth; he can’t be let go. 
This is a question to i55b demonstrate understanding, and it can also be called a question with a concealed barb. 
Anyone but Yunmen would have no way to cope with this monk. 
Yunmen possesses such ability that he can­ not but reply once the question is raised. 
An expert teach­ ing master is like a mirror: 
An ancient said, “If you want to attain intimate understand­ ing, don’t use a question to ask a question. 
Because the question is in the answer, and the answer is in the question.” Since when have the sages ever had anything to give people? 
Where is there Chan or the Way that can be given to you? 
If you don’t do hellish deeds, naturally you will not bring on hellish results. 
If you don’t create heavenly conditions, naturally you won’t receive heav­ enly rewards. 
Whatever you do, you experience the results yourself. 
Yunmen clearly tells you, “When we discuss this affair, it’s not in the words. 
Were it in the words, doesn’t the Canon contain words? 
Tell me, where is the confusion? 
This is why it is said, “The teaching is carried out according to facts; the banner of the teaching is set up according to the situation. 
” “When it’s not the present potential and not the present situ­ ation, what is it?” is just worth a nod. 
Someone with eyes couldn’t be fooled one bit. 
Since the point of the question was abstruse, the answer too had to be thus. 
In fact Yunmen is riding the thief’s horse in pursuit of the thief. 
Some people mistakenly say, “ Basically these are words of a host, but it was a guest who spoke them; therefore Yunmen said, ‘An upside-down statement.’ ” What is the rush? 
This monk asked well: 
“When it’s not the present potential and not the present situation, what is it?” Why didn’t Yunmen answer him with some other words? 
Still, to say “An upside-down statement” at this point is to gouge a wound in healthy flesh. 
“The emergence of tracks of words is the source from which divergent opinions are born. 
” Suppose there were no words; have the pillars and lamps here ever had any words? 
If you don’t under­ stand at this point, you still need to turn over before you will know where the ultimate point of this is. 
Dividing one token, (Part on your side, part on my side. 
Half south of the river, half north of the river. 
Walking together hand in hand.) Dying with you, being born with you, to give you certainty. (Washing a lump of dirt in mud. 
For what reason? 
He greatly diminishes these people’s grandeur. 
The ignorant are plentiful.) Thirty-three people entered the tiger’s den. (One can only know for oneself. 
A band of wild fox spirits.) Distinctly outstanding— The moon in the churning rushing water. 
Xuedou has always had the technique of letting go; he dares to enter the mud and water for your sake, to die and be born together with you. 
This is the reason Xuedou praises Yunmen this way. 
These days, however, people spin out intellectual interpreta­ tions based on his words. 
” If Yunmen were not someone whose whole capacity had pen­ etrated through to liberation, how could he die with you and be born with you? 
Why can he do this? 
Because he is free from the many leaking points of gain and loss, right and wrong. 
emo­ tional leakage, leakage of views, and verbal leakage. 
If there is leakage of views, the potential does not leave its position and falls into a sea of poison. 
With emotional leakage, knowledge always turns toward and against, and one’s view is biased. 
You should know these three kinds of leakage for yourself. 
” There are also three mysteries; the mystery within the essence, the mystery within the expression, and the mystery within the mys­ tery. 
When the ancients came into this realm, their whole capac­ ity was fully used: 
if you happened to be born, they would be born together with you; if you happened to die, they would die with you. 
They stretched out in the tiger’s mouth; letting go, they would follow your lead for a thousand miles. 
The Buddha held up a flower, and Kasyapa alone broke into a smile— the others did not know what he meant. 
Thus Xuedou says that the eighty-four thousand were not worthy successors. 
“Thirty-three people entered the tiger’s den. 
” Ananda asked Kasyapa, “The Buddha bequeathed to you his golden robe; what special teaching did he transmit besides?” Kasyapa said, “Ananda.” Ananda said, “Y es?” Kasyapa said, “ Take down the banner in front of the gate.” Ananda was enlightened at this. 
Thereafter transmission continued person to person in India and China, through thirty-three patriarchs. 
All of them had the ability to enter the tiger’s den. 
The ancients said, if you don’t enter the tiger’s den, how can you catch a tiger cub? 
Yunmen is this kind of person, able to accompany people through birth and death. 
To help people, a Chan teacher must be like this, making you break open and letting you grab the tiger’s whiskers. 
Those on the solitary peak the teacher rescues and sends into the wild weeds; those fallen into the wild weeds the teacher rescues and puts on the solitary peak. 
If you enter a boiling cauldron or a fiery furnace, the teacher also enters the boiling cauldron and fiery furnace. 
Spiritual light undimmed, Ages of good advice. 
Once it comes through this door, Don’t keep intellectual understanding. 
“Distinctly outstanding—The moon in the churning rushing wa­ ter.” Xuedou unfailingly has a way to manifest in being, and also the skill to bring people to life. 
He has picked this out to get people to awaken to their own living potential. 
Don’t follow another’s words; if your follow them, that indeed would be the moon in the churning rushing water. 
Right now, how will you find peace? 
I leave it up to you. 
Introduction The Way has no byroads; one who stands on it is utterly alone. 
Truth is not seeing or hearing; words and thoughts are far removed from it. 
If you can penetrate through the forest of thorns and untie the bonds of the enlightened state, you attain the land of inner peace, where the gods have no way to offer flowers, where outsiders have no door to spy through. 
Then you work all day without ever work­ ing, talk all day without ever talking; then you can unfold the device of breaking in and breaking out, and use the double-edged sword that kills and brings life, with freedom and independence. 
Even if you are thus, you must also know that within the me­ dium of provisional expedients, there is lifting up with one hand and pressing down with one hand. 
Yet this still amounts only to a little bit. 
As for the fundamental matter, this has nothing to do with it. 
Story A monk asked Jingqing, “I am breaking out; I ask the teacher to break in.” (Why raise waves where there’s no wind? 
He buys the hat to fit the head. 
He meets error with error. 
Every­ one can’t be this way.) The monk said, “If I weren’t alive, I’d be laughed at by people.” (He drags others into it. 
Take what’s coming to you and get out. 
He can’t be let go.) Commentary Jingqing was a successor of Xuefeng, and a contemporary of the likes of Benren, Xuansha, Sushan, and Taiyuan Fu. 
First he met Xuefeng and understood the message. 
He was skilled at teaching according to the potentialities of his listeners. 
Therefore he questioned like this: 
“I am breaking out; I ask the teacher to break in.” In the Cao-Dong line this is called using phenomena to illustrate one’s condition. 
When the chick breaks out and the mother breaks in, they are naturally perfectly simultaneous. 
Jingqing too does well; we could say his fists and feet are coordi­ nated, his mind and eye illumine each other. 
He answered by say­ ing, “Can you live?” The monk too does well; he also knows how to change with the circumstances. 
In this one sentence of Jingqing’s there is guest and host, illumination and function, killing and enliv­ ening. 
The monk said, “If I weren’t alive, I’d be laughed at by people. 
” Jingqing said, “You too are a man in the weeds.” Everyone goes into the mud and water, but Jingqing is indeed severe. 
Since the monk understood enough to question in this way, why did Jingqing nevertheless say he was a man in the weeds? 
Because the eye of an adept must be this way, like sparks, like lightning. 
Whether you can reach it or not, you won’t avoid losing your life. 
If you are this way, then you see Jingqing calling him a man in the weeds. 
Therefore Nanyuan said, “Everywhere they only have the per­ ception to break in and out simultaneously, but not the ability. 
Later that monk went to Yunmen’s community, where he brought up this conversation. 
A monk said to him, “Did Nanyuan’s staff break?” The first monk was greatly awakened at this. 
But tell me, where is the meaning? 
156c The monk returned to see Nanyuan, but since Nanyuan had passed on, he saw Fengxue instead. 
As soon as he bowed, Fengxue said, “Aren’t you the one who was asking our late teacher about simultaneous breaking in and out?” The monk said he was. 
Feng­ xue said, “What was your understanding at that time?” The monk said, “At first it was as if I were walking in the light of a lamp.” Fengxue said, “You’ve understood.” What principle is this? 
The monk just said, “At first it was as if I were walking in the light of a lamp” — why did Fengxue immediately tell him he’d understood? 
Later Cuiyan commented, “Though Nanyuan put his plan into operation from within his tent, nevertheless the country is big, the people few, and those who know are rare.” Fengxue commented, “At the time Nanyuan should have hit him right across the back the minute he opened his mouth, to see what he would do.” If you see this story, you see where the monk and Jingqing met. 
How would you avoid Jingqing calling you someone in the weeds? 
Verse The ancient Buddhas had a family tradition; (The words are still in our ears. 
Don’t slander old Sakyamuni Buddha.) Responsive preaching comes to scornful detraction. 
Eight blows pays for thirteen. 
What about you? 
Once again he receives a blow; All the Chan practitioners in the world name and describe it in vain. 
If there is, that one too is in the weeds. 
From time immemorial, the darkness is boundless; it is everywhere, but no one understands.) Commentary With the one line “The ancient Buddhas had a family tradition,” Xuedou has completed his verse. 
Whoever comes forth simply won’t be able to approach. 
If you do approach, you’re ten thousand miles away. 
As soon as you come forth you’ve fallen into the weeds. 
So devices of breaking in and out are all in the family tradition of the ancient Buddhas. 
If you can attain to this Way, you’ll be able to knock down a mountain fortress with a blow of your fist and topple a clifftop temple with a single kick. 
It’s like a bonfire; approach and it will burn off your face. 
It’s like a sharp sword; fool around with it and you lose your life. 
Only those who have penetrated through to the great liberation can be like this. 
Otherwise, if you miss the source and get stuck on the words, you surely won’t be able to grasp this kind of talk. 
“Responsive preaching comes to scornful detraction. 
” This is “One guest, one host, one question, one answer.” Right in the ask­ ing and answering there’s the scornful detraction. 
It’s called “re­ sponsive preaching coming to scornful detraction.” Xuedou has deep knowledge of this matter, so he can complete his verse in only two lines. 
Neither is aware of the other. 
At the moment of breaking in and breaking out, who is it that breaks in and out together? 
“The chick breaks out, the hen breaks in —when the chick awakens, there is no shell. 
On the same path, chanting in har­ mony, through the marvelous mystery, walking alone.” Nonetheless Xuedou comes down into the weeds and creates complications by saying, “A peck.” This one word praises Jingqing’s answer, “Can you live?” “ He awakens” praises the monk’s reply, “ If I weren’t alive, I’d be laughed at by people.” Why then does Xuedou go on to say, “He’s still in the shell”? 
Jingqing said, “You too are a man in the weeds.” Xuedou says, “Once again he receives a blow.” This difficult part is it; when Jingqing says, “You too are a man in the weeds, ” can this be called snatching the man’s eyes away? 
This has nothing to do with it. 
When I talk like this, I too am a man in the weeds. 
“All the Chan practitioners in the world name and describe it in vain.” Who doesn’t name and describe? 
At this point, Xuedou himself cannot name or describe it, yet he drags in others, the Chan practitioners of the world. 
Now tell me, how did Jingqing help this monk? 
No one in the world can leap out. 
Introduction Cut through nails, shear through iron; then you can be a genuine Chan master. 
If you run away from arrows and avoid swords, how can you possibly be an adept? 
Where even a needle cannot enter, I leave aside for now; tell me, what’s it like when the waves flood the skies? 
Story A monk asked Xianglin, “What is the living meaning of Chan?” (There have been many people with doubts about this; there is still news of this around.) Xianglin said, “Sitting for a long time, one becomes weary.” (When a fish swims through, the water is disturbed; when a bird flies by, feathers fall. 
Better shut that dog’s mouth. 
This is difficult to penetrate.) Commentary Xianglin says, “Sitting for a long time, one becomes weary.” Un­ derstand? 
If you do understand, you can put down your shield and spear on the hundred grasses. 
If not, listen humbly to the verdict. 
When Yunmen was teaching in south China, Xianglin came to him from west China. 
He was contemporary with Ehu and Jingqing. 
He first went to Baoci, then later came to Yunmen, whom he attended for eighteen years. 
He stayed with Yunmen for eighteen years; time and again Yunmen would call to him, then when he responded, Yunmen would say, “What is it?” Then no matter how much Xianglin spoke to present his understanding and exercise his mind, he never reached accord. 
One day, though, he suddenly said he understood. 
Later Xianglin returned to western China. 
Master Zhimen was originally from eastern China but made a special trip west to see Xianglin, of whose teaching he had heard so much. 
Zhimen was Xuedou’s teacher. 
Though Yunmen taught innumerable people, Xianglin’s stream flourished most of all among the wayfarers of that generation. 
He taught for forty years, living until the age of eighty. 
” Ordinarily he would say, “Whenever you go traveling to search for teachers, you must bring along the eye to distinguish initiate from superficialist, to tell shallow from deep. 
Only Xianglin, in this story, has silenced everyone on earth; there is no place for you to calculate or ratio­ nalize. 
“What is the living meaning of Chan?” “Sitting for a long time, one becomes weary.” These could be called flavorless words, which choke people and leave no place to breathe out. 
If you would see, just see immediately. 
If you don’t see, avoid entertaining in­ tellectual interpretations. 
Xianglin had encountered an adept, so he possessed Yunmen’s technique and harmonious mastery of the three statements. 
People often misunderstand and say, “ The Chan founder came to China and sat facing a wall for nine years; isn’t this sitting for a long time and becoming weary?” What is there to hold onto? 
They don’t see that Xianglin had attained the realm of great independence and had his feet on the ground of reality; without so many theories and views of Buddhism, he could meet the situation and act accord­ ingly. 
As it is said, “The teaching is carried on according to facts; the banner of the teaching is set up according to the situation. 
” Xuedou uses this wind to fan the fire, and from his position as a bystander points out one or a half. 
Verse One, two, a thousand, ten thousand; (Why not practice accordingly? 
Very plentiful; why are they congregating into a crowd?) Strip off the blinders; unload the saddle bags. (From now on you must be purified, clean, and at ease. 
Can you rest yet?) Turning to the left, turning to the right, following up behind; (You still can’t let yourself go. Reflections upon reflections, echoes upon echoes. 
I strike!) Zihu had to hit Iron Grindstone Liu. 
He draws his bow after the thief has gone, so I strike. 
Danger!) Commentary i57c Xuedou strikes directly, like sparks, like lightning; he pushes it out for you to see, which you can do only if you understand imme­ diately as soon as you hear it mentioned. 
If you can directly and immediately under­ stand in this way, then you are indeed extraordinary. 
“One, two, a thousand, ten thousand; / Strip off the blinders; unload the saddle bags.” Purified, clean, and at ease, they are not stained by birth and death; they are not bound by emotional in­ terpretations of sanctity and profanity. 
Above, there’s nothing to look to for support; below, there’s no personal self. 
They’re just like Xianglin and Xuedou; how could there be just a thousand or ten thousand? 
In fact all the people in the world, each and every one, are all like this. 
The past and future Buddhas are all like this too. 
If you make up intellectual understandings of the words, then this is like “Zihu had to hit Iron Grindstone Liu.” In fact, as soon as such interpretations are raised, Xuedou strikes while you are still speaking. 
Zihu studied under Nanquan, along with Zhaozhou and Tiger Cen. 
At that time Iron Grindstone Liu had set up a hut on Mt. 
One day Zihu came to see her. 
Answering the monk who asked about the living meaning of Chan, Xianglin said, “Sitting for a long time, one becomes weary. 
” If you understand this way, you are “turning to the left, turning to the right, following up behind.” But tell me, what is Xuedou’s meaning in such a verse? 
Story Emperor Taizong asked National Teacher Huizhong, “What will you need after a hundred years?” (He scratches before it itches. 
As it turns out, he’ll create a model and draw a likeness; though great and vener­ able, he acts this w ay—he shouldn’t point to the east as the west.) The teacher said, “Build a seamless monument for m e.” (It can’t be grasped.) The emperor said, “Tell me, what would the monu­ ment look like?” The teacher was silent; after a while he asked, “Understand? 
” (Confined in prison, one increases in wisdom. 
After all he points to the east as the west and takes the south for the north. 
All he can do is frown.) The emperor said, “I don’t understand.” (Lucky he doesn’t understand; had he pressed further at this time and made the teacher gulp a mouthful of frost, he’d have gotten somewhere.) The teacher said, “I have a succes­ sor, Danyuan, who knows all about this. 
Please summon him and ask him.” (He’s lucky the emperor didn’t overturn his meditation seat; why didn’t he give some of his own provisions? 
Don’t confuse the man. 
He let the initiative go.) After the National Teacher passed on, (What a pity! 
After all the emperor will mistakenly go by the zero point of the scale.) the emperor summoned Danyuan and asked him what the meaning of this was. 
(The son takes up the father’s work. 
He too falls into the second level, into the third level.) Danyuan said, “South of Xiang, north of Tan; (This too can’t be grasped. 
Two by two, three by three—what are you doing? 
Half open, half closed.) [Xuedou commented, “A single hand does not make random sound. (The blind leading the blind. 
After all he is following the words to produce interpretations. 
(Above is the sky, below is the earth. 
I’ve had no such news. 
This too is creating a model and drawing a likeness.) Beneath the shadowless tree, the community ferry­ boat; [Xuedou commented, “ The sea calm, the rivers are clear. (Vast waves flood the skies. 
This still only amounts to a little bit.) within the crystal palace, there’s no one who knows.” [Xuedou commented, “He’s raised it up. (He draws his bow after the thief has gone. 
The words are still in our ears.) Commentary Suzong and Daizong were descendants of Xuanzong. 
When they were princes, they were fond of meditation. 
When Suzong came to the throne, National Teacher Huizhong was living on White Cliff Mountain. 
Though he did not come down from the mountain for more than forty years, word of his practice of the Way reached the imperial precincts. 
In 761 the emperor Suzong sent an emissary to summon Huizhong to the palace. 
The emperor regarded him as his teacher and honored him greatly. 
Huizhong lectured the emperor on the supreme Way; then when he left court, the emperor per­ sonally escorted him. 
The courtiers were angry at this and wanted to make their displeasure known to the emperor. 
But the teacher, who could read minds, went to the emperor first and said, “In the presence of Indra, I have seen countless emperors, evanescent as a flash of lightning. 
” The emperor respected him even more after this. 
There was a certain Chan master, once the traveling compan­ ion of the National Teacher; the latter asked the emperor to sum­ mon him to court. 
But this master did not rise to three imperial summonses, and used to criticize the National Teacher for addic­ tion to fame and fortune and for liking the company of people. 
Huizhong was National Teacher under two emperors, father and son. 
Both emperors studied meditation. 
According to the Trans­ mission o f the Lamp, Daizong asked the question in this story; Suzong asked about the Ten Body Controller. 
When the National Teacher’s life was over and he was about to enter Nirvana, he took leave of Daizong, who asked him what he would need after death. 
It should have been enough to build a monument; why did he say to build a seamless monument? 
Many say that the National Teacher’s not speaking is itself what the monument is like. 
If you understand in this way, the whole Chan school will be wiped off the face of the earth. 
If you say keeping silent is it, then mutes too must understand Chan. 
An outsider asked the Buddha, “I don’t ask about the spoken or the unspoken.” The Buddha remained silent. 
The outsider bowed and said in praise, “The Buddha’s great compassion has dispersed the clouds of my delusions and afforded me insight. 
My teacher Wuzu said of the seamless monument, “In front, pearls and agate; in back, agate and pearls; on the east are Avalokitesvara and Mahasthamaprapta; on the west are Manjusri and Samantabhadra. 
Now tell me, is this “I don’t understand” the same as Emperor Wu’s “I don’t know”? 
They seem the same, but actually they’re not. 
The National Teacher said, “I have a successor, Danyuan, who knows all about this. 
Please summon him and ask him about it.” Putting aside Taizong’s not understanding for the moment, did Danyuan understand? 
All that was needed was to say, “What would the monument be like” —no one in the world can do anything about it. 
Wuzu commented, “You are teacher of a whole nation; why don’t you speak instead of deferring to your disciple?” After the National Teacher died, the emperor summoned Danyuan to ask about the meaning of this. 
South of Xiang, north of Tan; Within there’s gold filling the whole country. 
Beneath the shadowless tree, the community ferryboat; In the crystal palace, there’s no one who knows. 
i58 c Danyuan was the National Teacher’s attendant. 
After he had be­ come a teacher himself, Yangshan came to see him. 
Danyuan’s words were severe, his nature harsh and unapproachable. 
It was impossible to stay there, so Yangshan went to Chan master Xingkong. 
” Xingkong then called to Yangshan, “Novice, drag this corpse out of here.” Later Yangshan took this up with Danyuan and asked, “How can one get the man out of the w ell?” Danyuan said, “Tsk! 
Who is in the w ell?” Yangshan didn’t understand; later he asked Guishan, who immediately called Yangshan by name. 
He said, “At Danyuan’s I attained the essence, at Guishan’s I attained the function. 
” As for this little verse of Danyuan’s, it has led many people into false interpretations. 
Therein is the seamless monument, so the verse says there’s gold within, filling the country. 
‘Beneath the shadowless tree, the community ferryboat’ is the interchange between the teacher and the emperor. 
The emperor didn’t understand, so the verse says, ‘Inside the crystal palace there’s no one who knows.’ ” Also, some say the first line means south of Xiang province and north of Tan province; “In between there’s gold filling the country” they say praises the emperor. 
As for Xuedou’s four comments, how will you understand them? 
People today don’t know the ancient’s meaning. 
How do you un­ derstand “south of Xiang, north of Tan”? 
How do you understand “within there’s gold filling the nation”? 
How do you understand “beneath the shadowless tree, the community ferryboat”? 
How do you understand “within the crystal palace, there’s no one who knows”? 
If you can see thus, you will be joyful and happy all your life. 
“South of Xiang, north of Tan.” Xuedou says, “A single hand does not make a random sound.” He couldn’t but explain for you. 
“ Inside the crystal palace, there’s no one who knows.” Xuedou says, “He’s raised it.” He has explained for you all at once, but nevertheless it’s hard to see. 
Having clearly made all his comments, afterward he simply eulogizes the seamless monument. 
A clear pool does not admit the blue dragon’s coils. 
Great waves, vast, gigantic. 
Where will the blue dragon coil? 
Here it just cannot be found.) Layers upon layers, Shadows upon shadows— (The whole body is an eye. 
You fall into sevens and eights. 
Two by two, three by three, walking the old road; turning to the left, turning to the right, following up behind.) For ever and ever it is shown to people. 
How will blind people see? 
Can you catch a glimpse?) Commentary 159a Right off Xuedou says, “ The seamless monument—to see it is hard.” Though it stands uniquely revealed with nothing hidden, when you want to see it, it’s hard to see. 
Xuedou is very compassionate, and tells you more: 
“A clear pool does not admit the blue dragon’s coils.” Wuzu said, “In Xuedou’s whole volume of poems on old stories, I just like the line, ‘A clear pool does not admit the blue dragon’s coils.’ ” Yet this is still a little. 
Has it not been said, “ Reclining dragons are not to be seen in stagnant water. 
Where they are not, there’s moonlight and the ripples are settled; where they are, waves arise without wind.” Also it is said, “Reclining dragons always fear the blue pool’s clarity.” As for Xuedou, even if huge waves flooded the sky, he still would not coil up in there. 
Getting to this, Xuedou’s verse is finished. 
Afterwards he ap­ plies a little bit of eye and carves a seamless monument. 
Follow­ ing up behind he says, “ Layers upon layers, / Shadows upon shadows— / For ever and ever it is shown to people.” How will you look upon it? 
Where is it right now? 
Even if you see it clearly, don’t make the mistake of sticking by the zero point of the scale. 
Introduction When a single particle arises, the whole earth is contained therein; when a single flower blooms, the world emerges. 
So it is said, “It’s like cutting a skein of thread; when one strand is cut all are cut. 
It’s like dying a skein of thread; when one strand is dyed, all are dyed. 
” This very moment you should cut off all com­ plications. 
Bring out your own family jewels and respond every­ where, high and low, before and after, without missing. 
Each and every one will be fully manifest. 
Story Whenever anything was asked, Master Judi would just raise one finger. 
(This old fellow too would silence everyone on earth. 
When it’s warm, all heaven and earth are warm; when it’s cold, all heaven and earth are cold. 
He snatches away the tongues of everyone on earth.) Commentary If you understand at the finger, you turn away from Judi; if you don’t understand at the finger, it’s like cast iron. 
So it is said, “As soon as a single particle arises, the whole earth is contained therein; when a single flower blooms, the world comes into being. 
If you know, it’s not worth taking hold of; if not, it blocks you completely. 
Master Judi was from eastern China. 
When he was living in a hermitage, a nun named Shiji came to his hut. 
When she got there she went straight in; without taking off her hat she walked around his meditation seat thrice holding her staff. 
“ If you can speak,” she said, “I’ll take off my hat.” She questioned him three times, but Judi had no reply. 
Then as she was leaving, Judi said, “It’s late—would you stay the night?” The nun said, “If you can speak I’ll stay.” Again Judi had no reply. 
The nun then walked out. 
He meant to leave his hermitage to go in search of a teacher, but that night, after he had prepared his bindle, the spirit of the moun­ tain told him, “You don’t have to leave; tomorrow a living saint will come and teach you. 
” As it turned out, the next day Master Tianlong actually came. 
Judi welcomed him and gave a full account of the previous events. 
Tianlong just lifted up one finger to show him; suddenly Judi was greatly enlightened. 
Later, whenever anything was asked, he just raised a finger. 
Changqing said, “Delicious food is not for the satisfied one to eat.” Xuansha said, “Had I seen him then, I’d have broken the finger off. 
” Xuanjue said, “When Xuansha spoke this way, what did he m ean?” Yunju Xi said, “When Xuansha spoke this way, was he agreeing with Judi or not? 
If he agreed, why did he speak of breaking off the finger? 
If not, where was Judi’s error? 
” Caoshan said, “Judi’s realization was crude; he only recognized one device, one perspective. 
Why was his realization crude? 
If he wasn’t enlightened, how could he say he used one-finger Chan all his life without exhausting it? 
Where is Caoshan’s meaning?” At that time, Judi actually didn’t understand. 
If you understand it as a finger, you definitely won’t see the ancient’s meaning. 
This kind of Chan is easy to approach but hard to under­ stand. 
People these days who just hold up a finger or a fist as soon as they’re questioned are just fooling around. 
It is necessary to pierce the bone, penetrate the marrow, and see all the way through. 
At Judi’s hermitage there was a servant boy. 
While he was away from the hermitage he was asked what method his master used to teach people; the boy held up a finger. 
When he returned, he told the master of this. 
Judi cut off the boy’s finger with a knife. 
As the boy ran out screaming, Judi called to him; when the boy looked back, Judi raised his finger, at which the boy opened up to understanding. 
Tell me, what truth did he see? 
When nearing death, Judi said, “I attained Tianlong’s one finger Chan and have used it all my life without exhausting it. 
Do you want to understand? 
Mingjiao later asked Guotai Shen, “An ancient said Judi just recited a three-line spell and thereby became more famous than anyone else. 
How can you quote the three-line spell for someone?” Shen raised a finger. 
Minjiao said, “If not for today, how could I know this borderlands traveler?” What does this mean? 
The Earthbeater would just hit the ground once whenever anything was asked. 
Once someone hid his staff and then asked, “What is the Buddha?” He just opened his mouth wide. 
These methods too were used for a whole lifetime without being exhausted. 
He transmitted only the mind seal, to instruct those on the paths of illusion. 
Those who attain it do so regardless of ignorance or knowledge, worldli­ ness or holiness. 
Anyone with power will immediately rest right this moment and abruptly still all entanglements, thus passing beyond the stream of birth and death and going far beyond the usual patterns. 
Even if you have family and estate, it is attained naturally, without ambition.” All his life, to every question Wuye would say, “ Don’t think falsely. 
” Generally people these days are not this way; they just in­ dulge in conceptual and emotional interpretations and don’t un­ derstand the essential point of the ancients. 
Why did he just employ one finger? 
You must realize that here is where Judi helps people so profoundly and intimately. 
Go back to Yuanming’s saying, “When it’s cold, all throughout heaven and earth is cold; when it’s warm, all throughout heaven and earth is warm. 
” Mountains, rivers, and earth, myriad forms and appear­ ances, above and below, are one solitary sheer unity; where will you find one finger Chan? 
Verse For his appropriate teaching, I deeply admire old Judi; (A leper drags along his companions. 
Only those on the same path know. 
(Two, three—there’s still one more. 
He too should be struck dead.) Having cast a piece of driftwood onto the ocean, (It’s all this. 
So it is, but it’s too inaccessible. 
Worn out sandals; what use does it have?) Together in the night waves, we take in blind turtles. 
When we take them in, what are they good for? 
We act according to what is imperative. 
I’ll drive them toward a world where there is no Buddha. 
He especially likes to make up verses for obscure and unusual stories. 
Thus he says, “For his appropriate teaching I deeply admire old Judi. 
Since the universe began, who else has there ever been? 
Had it been anyone else, inevitably he’d have been inconsistent; only Judi just used one finger till he died. 
People often interpret this wrongly and say, “Mountains, riv­ ers, and earth are empty; people are empty; the Dharma is empty too. 
Even if the universe were emptied out all at once, it’s just this one, old Judi.” This has nothing to do with it. 
“Having cast a piece of driftwood onto the ocean.” Nowadays they call this the ocean of birth and death. 
Within the ocean of doing, beings appear and disappear without understanding them­ selves, without hope of getting out. 
Old Judi extends his mercy to take people in; in the ocean of birth and death he uses one figure to rescue others. 
It’s like setting down a piece of driftwood to res­ cue a blind turtle. 
He enables all beings to reach the other shore. 
“ Together in the night we take in blind turtles.” The Lotus Sutra says, “It’s like a one-eyed turtle sticking its nose through a hole in a floating board—it won’t sink and drown.” When a great teacher receives someone who is like a dragon or a tiger, he directs him to a world where there is a Buddha to act in turn as guest and host, and to a world where there is no Buddha to occupy the essen­ tial way across. 
Having taken in a blind turtle, what use is it? 
Introduction Piled in mountains, heaped in ranges, up against walls, pressed against barriers, if you linger in thought, holding back your po­ tential, you’ll be bitterly cramped. 
Or else, someone may appear and overturn the ocean, kick over the polar mountain, scatter the white clouds with shouts, break up space, and straightaway with one device, one object, silence everyone on earth, so that there is no way for you to approach. 
Story i 60b Longya asked Cuiwei, “What is the living meaning of Chan?” (It’s an old tale known everywhere, but still he wants to put it to the test.) Cuiwei said, “Pass me the meditation brace.” (What will he use the meditation brace for? 
Just about let go. 
Danger!) Longya gave Cuiwei the brace; (He can’t hold onto it. 
Given a fine steed, he doesn’t know how to ride it. 
What a pity that he doesn’t take charge right away.) Cuiwei took it and hit him. 
(Got him! 
They’re buried in the same pit.) Longya handed Linji the cushion; (As before, he can’t hold onto it; as before, he’s not very clever. 
(Got him! What a pity to be hitting this kind of dead man. 
Linji comes out of the same pattern as Cuiwei.) Longya said, “Hit me if you will, but there’s no meaning of Chan.” (Obvi­ ously. 
He draws his bow after the thief is gone.) C om m en ta ry Master Cuiyan Zhi said, “It was so at that time, but do Chan prac­ titioners these days still have blood under their skin?” Guishan Zhe said, “Cuiwei and Linji can be called genuine Chan masters. 
Longya was pulling out the weeds seeking the Way, like everyone; and indeed he can serve as a model for people of later times. 
After he became a teacher, a monk asked, ‘Did you agree with those two adepts at that tim e?’ Longya said, I agreed, as far as agreement goes; it’s just that there’s no meaning of Chan. 
Longya looks carefully in front and behind, and dispenses medi­ cine to suit the disease. 
I, however, am not this way; when asked whether Longya had agreed with the two adepts, whether he un­ derstood or not, I would have brought my staff down across the questioner’s back. 
This not only supports Cuiwei and Linji, but also doesn’t turn away from the questioner.” Shimen Cong said, “Longya is still all right if there’s no one to press him, but when he’s pressed by a Chan practitioner he loses one eye.” Xuedou said, “Linji and Cuiwei only knew how to hold still, not how to let go. 
Once he’s clear, he’s clear; why then is there no meaning of Chan? 
Understand? 
On the staff there is an eye bright as the sun; to tell whether gold is real, see it in fire. 
Linji and Cuiwei may have beaten the wind and hit the rain, startled heaven and shaken the earth, but they have never really hit a clear-eyed person. 
160c When the ancients studied Chan, they suffered some pains; having established powerful resolve, they would traverse moun­ tains and rivers to call on adepts. 
First Longya met Cuiwei and Linji; later he saw Deshan. 
There he asked, “How is it when a student holding a sharp sword tries to take the teacher’s head?” Deshan stretched out his neck and uttered a grunt. 
Longya said, “The teacher’s head has fallen. 
” Deshan smiled and said nothing. 
Next Longya went to Dongshan. 
Then he burned incense and bowed in the direction of Deshan to repent. 
When he heard this, Deshan said, “Old Dongshan can’t tell good from bad; this fellow has been dead so long, what’s the use of saving him? 
Let him wander over the earth carrying my head.” Longya was basically intelligent and acute. 
We can say that his words were not spoken in vain, that his effort was not expended haphazardly; they issued from this doing his work. 
When Wuxie went to see Shitou, he had told himself that he would stay if there was accord at the first word, but otherwise would leave. 
Shitou just sat there; Wuxie left. 
Shitou knew that Wuxie was a vessel of truth, so he had extended his teaching to him; but Wuxie didn’t understand and left. 
When Magu came to Changqing, he walked around the medi­ tation seat thrice, shook his staff, and stood there. 
Changqing said, “Right, right.” He also went to Nanquan, and again circled thrice, shook his staff, and stood there. 
Nanquan said, “Wrong, wrong. 
” Nanquan said, “Changqing is right; it is you who are wrong.” Inevitably the ancients had to take up this one matter and penetrate it. 
People today, when questioned, are found not to have made the slightest effort; they’re this way today, and they’ll be this way tomorrow too. 
If you just keep on like this, you will never have a day of completion. 
Observe Longya coming out with one question, on the living meaning of Chan. 
And it won’t do to say Longya didn’t understand, for why then would he pass the brace to Cuiwei? 
He didn’t go to the living water to act, but went into dead water for sustenance. 
Acting as master throughout, he said, “ Hit me if you will, but there’s no meaning of Chan.” Longya also called on Linji and asked the same question. 
Linji said, “Pass me the cushion.” When Longya gave it to him, he took it and hit him. 
You must realize that each word, each phrase of the ancients was not uttered at random. 
Later, when Longya was teaching, a monk asked, “Did you agree with those two adepts back then?” Longya said, “As far as agreement goes, I agreed, but there is no meaning of Chan. 
” There are thorns in the soft mud. 
If you understand this way, you fall into the realm of noth­ ingness. 
Therefore Yuanmi said, “You must study the living word, not the dead word. 
If you can understand at the living word, you will never forget it; if you understand at the dead word, you won’t even be able to save yourself. 
” When Longya spoke this way, he had undeniably done his best. 
An ancient said, “Continuity is very difficult.” The ancients did not speak at random; before and after mutually illuminating, with both temporal and real, with both perception and function, guest and host were clear, interchanging vertically and horizontally. 
If you want to discern the inside story, since Longya was not ignorant of the fundamental vehicle, how could he have fallen into second place? 
At the time when the two adepts asked for the brace and cushion, Longya could not but have known their intention. 
Even so, nonetheless his use of it was too extreme. 
Longya asked this way, and the two elders answered this way; why then is there no meaning of Chan? 
When you get here you must know there’s something else extraordinary. 
Verse In Dragon Tusk Mountain the dragon has no eyes; (Blind. 
Other people may be fooled — This is washing dirt in mud. 
Everyone on earth knows.) When has stagnant water ever displayed the ancient 161b way? (Should it suddenly come to life, nothing can be done. 
He drags in everyone on earth so that they can’t come forth.) If you can’t use the meditation brace and cushion, (Who would you have say this? 
What do you want to do with the brace and cushion? 
Ignoramus, don’t entertain such views.) Commentary Xuedou settles the case according to the facts. 
Though he versifies this way, tell me, where is his meaning? 
Where does the dragon lack eyes? 
Where is he in stagnant water? 
At this point you need the power to transform and pass through. 
That is why it is said, “In a clear pool there’s no place for the blue dragon to coil.” Has there ever been a fierce dragon in stagnant water? 
Haven’t you heard it said, “Stagnant water cannot conceal a dragon”? 
If it is a live dragon, it must go where huge waves flood the skies. 
This is to say that Longya went into stagnant water and was hit by the others. 
Clearly Longya has been given a fine steed; it’s just that he doesn’t know how to ride it, that he is unable to make use of it. 
Lu is the sixth patriarch; this is wrong. 
Xuedou has called himself Mr. Lu before, in a verse called “Anonymous Bequest”: 
I saw its picture that year and loved Dongting; In the waves, seventy-two peaks of blue. 
Now, resting on high, I think back to what was before; To the picture I’ve added Mr. 
Lu leaning against a wall. 
Xuedou wanted to walk on Longya’s head, but he still feared that people would misunderstand, so he made up another verse to cut away people’s doubtful interpretations. 
Verse Since this old fellow couldn’t yet put an end to it, again he makes a verse; (Obviously. 
How many people would know? 
He knew himself that he had gotten only a half; luckily he has a final word.) Once Mr. Lu has accepted them, why depend on them? (Even if you search the whole world, such a person is hard to find. 
Who would you have comprehend your words?) Sitting, leaning—cease taking these to continue the lamp of Chan. 
He sits under the black mountain. 
He’s fallen into a ghost cave.) It’s worth replying: the evening clouds, returning, have not yet come together; (One, a half. 
Bring it up and already you’re wrong. 
After all he can’t get out.) Distant mountains without end, layer upon layer of blue. (They block your eyes and ears. 
Sunk in a deep pit. 
Study for thirty more years.) Commentary “Once Mr. 
Lu has accepted them, why depend on them?” What is there to depend on? 
Then what more need is there for some­ thing to rely on? 
Whether sitting or leaning (on the brace), it’s not worth considering it the principle of Buddhism. 
That is why Xuedou says, “Sitting, leaning—cease taking these to continue the lamp of Chan.” At once Xuedou has brought it up completely; he has room to turn around, and at the end he reveals this scene where there’s a bit of a nice place. 
the evening clouds, returning, have not yet come to­ gether.” Where is Xuedou’s meaning? 
When the evening clouds have returned and are about to join together but have not yet done so, how is it then? 
“ Distant mountains without end, layer upon layer of blue.” As before he’s gone into a ghost cave. 
“Dis­ tant mountains without end, layer upon layer of blue.” Tell me, is this Manjusri’s realm? 
Is it Samantabhadra’s realm? 
Is it Avalokitesvara’s realm? 
When you get here, whose affair is this? 161c21. 
Lotus Flower, Lotus Leaves Introduction Setting up the banner of the teaching, establishing the essential message —this is adding flowers to brocade. 
If you can discern the statement outside of patterns, then when one part is raised you understand the rest. 
Story A monk asked Zhimen, “How is it when the lotus flower has not yet emerged from the water?” (The hook is in an unsuspected place. 
Washing dirt in mud. 
How did he get this news?) Zhimen said, “A lotus flower.” (One, two, three, four, five, six, seven. 
He stumps everyone on earth.) The monk said, “What about after it has emerged from the water?” (Don’t go in a ghost cave to live. 
Two heads, three faces. 
He kills everyone on earth with laughter.) Commentary In treating people according to potential, Zhimen has attained a little; when it comes to cutting off all streams, he’s a million miles away. 
If you can see thus, I’ll grant you’ve gained access. 
None­ theless, if you say it’s the same, you confuse Buddha nature and cloud thusness. 
If you say it’s different, mind and objects are not yet forgotten, and you descend to travel the road of intellectual interpretation—when will you ever cease? 
Tell me, what does the ancient mean? 
In reality there aren’t so many things. 
So Touzi said, “Just don’t stick to names and words, classification and phrasing. 
There is then no multiplicity of gradations of differences; you take in all things, but all things won’t be able to take you in. 
Fundamentally there is no gain or loss, no illusions or dreams, no multiplicity of names. 
Since you ask questions, therefore I say something. 
If you didn’t ask, what could you have me say that would be right? 
All concerns are what you take up—none of it is any of my business.” An ancient said, “ If you want to know the meaning of the Bud­ dha nature, you must observe time and condition.” Yunmen cited this story: 
a monk asked Lingyun, “ How was it before the Buddha appeared in the world?” Lingyun raised his whisk. 
Yunmen said, “The first time he hit, the second time he missed.” He also said, “With­ out speaking of appearing or not appearing, where would there be the time of his asking?” With each answer to each question the ancients accorded with the time and situation without a multitude of concerns. 
If you pursue words and follow phrases, there will never be any connec­ tion. 
If in words you can penetrate through words, if in meanings you can pass through meanings, if within devices you can pen­ etrate the devices, and if you make yourself free, only then will you see the point of Zhimen’s answer. 
There is no right or wrong, no gain or loss, no born or not born. 
” Here the ancients laid down one path where there’s an entrance and an exit. 
One who hasn’t yet understood gropes and clings; if you make him let go, then he goes into a state of wild desolation. 
This monk asked, “ How is it when the lotus flower has not yet emerged from the water?” Zhimen said, “A lotus flower. 
Haven’t you heard how Yantou said, “I always appreciate it when nothing has been said—that is getting somewhere.” i 62b Where Zhimen revealed his mind, he was already leaking. 
Students these days don’t wake up to the ancient’s meaning, they just go on talking theoretically of “emerged from the water” and not yet emerged from the water.” What connection is there? 
A monk asked Zhimen, “What is the body of wisdom?” He said, “An oyster swallowing the moon.” The monk asked, “What is the functioning of wisdom? 
” Zhimen said, “A rabbit becomes pregnant.” See him responding like this; no one on earth can search out the stream of his words. 
If someone asked me how it is when the lotus flower hasn’t emerged from the water, I would just answer, “ The pillars and lamps.” Is this the same as the lotus flower or different? 
And don’t mistakenly stick by the zero point of the scale. 
Lotus flower, lotus leaves—he reports for you to know; (Doting kindness. 
An obvious issue. 
Its pattern is already revealed.) How can emerging from the water compare to before emergence? (Washing dirt in mud. 
Dividing them is all right, but you can’t lump them together.) North of the river, south of the river, ask Old Wang; (Where is the master? 
Why ask Old Master Wang? 
You’re just wearing out your shoes.) Foxy doubt after foxy doubt. (I bury them in one pit. 
It’s you who doubt. 
You won’t avoid feelings of doubt without respite. 
Xuedou was Zhimen’s true successor; he saw well Zhimen’s most hidden, most subtle point and said directly, “Lotus flower, lotus leaves—he reports for you to know; / How can emerging from the water compare to before emergence?” Here he wants people to understand directly. 
I say, how is it when it hasn’t emerged?—the pillars and lamps. 
What about after it’s emerged—the staff upholds the sun and moon, underfoot how muddy and deep! But don’t mistakenly abide by the zero point of the scale. 
What limit is there to people these days chewing over the words and phrases of others? 
Tell me, when it emerges from the water, what time is this? 
Before emergence, what time is this? 
If you can see to this point, I’ll allow that you’ve seen Zhimen personally. 
Xuedou says, if you don’t see, “North of the river, south of the river, ask Old Wang.” Xuedou means that you should just go north and south to ask adepts about “emerged from the water” and “not emerged from the water.” If you add two phrases south of the river, add two phrases north of the river, add one load upon an­ other load, creating doubts over and over, just tell me, when will you be free of doubt? 
You’re like wild foxes, full of doubt, walking on river ice. 
They listen for the sound of the water; if there is no sound, they can cross the river. 
If students have “foxy doubt after foxy doubt,” when will they attain peace? 
Introduction Reality is infinitely vast, yet minute as an atomic particle. 
Whether to hold on or let go is not up to another; whether to roll up or roll out is up to oneself. 
If you want to free what is stuck and loose what is bound, you simply must cut away the traces and swallow the sounds. 
All people occupy the essential crossing point; each towers like a mile-high wall. 
Tell me, whose realm is this? 
Story 162c Xuefeng said to the assembly, “On South Mountain there’s a turtle­ nosed snake. 
Indeed it causes people to doubt.) All of you must take a good look.” (Aha! 
A case of overindulgence.) Changqing said, “In the hall today there certainly are people losing their lives. 
” (A man from the land of brig­ ands escorts a bandit. 
He judges others on the basis of himself.) A monk related this to Xuansha. (There’s no different dirt in the same pit. 
When the manservant sees the maidservant, he takes care. 
Those with the same disease sympathize with each other.) Xuansha said, “Only Changqing can be like this. 
Nonetheless, I do not concur.” (He doesn’t avoid forming a wild fox spirit view. 
What news is this? 
His poison breath afflicts others.) The monk asked, “What about you?” Xuansha said, “Why use ‘South Mountain’? 
Only this wild fox spirit has attained a little. 
He’s lost his life and doesn’t even realize it.) Yunmen threw his staff down in front of Xuefeng and made a gesture of fright. 
One son has intimately attained. 
All of them are doing mental gymnastics. 
All of you try to discern this.) Commentary If you spread it out evenly, I let you spread it out evenly; if you break it up, I let you break it up. 
Xuefeng traveled with Yantou and Qinshan. 
In all, he went to Touzi thrice and Dongshan nine times. 
One day he went with Yantou to visit Qinshan. 
On the way, they were snowed in on Tortoise Mountain. 
Day after day Yantou just slept, while Xuefeng constantly sat in meditation. 
Yantou yelled at him and said, “Get some sleep! 
Every day you’re on the meditation seat, just like a clay statue in a village. 
He prostrated himself, crying out again and again, “Today on Tor­ toise Mountain I’ve finally achieved enlightenment!” Later Xuefeng lived on Elephant Bone Mountain in Fukien. 
Human life, so fleeting, is but a brief instant; How can you dwell for long in the evanescent world? 
At thirty-two, I emerged from the mountains; Now over forty, I return to Fukien. 
I humbly report to the scarlet and purple clad nobles who fill the court; The king of death has no awe of the golden emblems of rank you wear. 
Usually Xuefeng would teach by saying, “In every respect cover the universe.” He talked no more of mystery or marvel, nor of mind or nature. 
He appeared striking, unique, like a great fiery mass; approach and he burns off your face. 
Like a sharp sword, fool around with him and you lose your life. 
If you linger in thought, holding back your potential, you lose contact. 
Baizhang asked Huangbo, “Where are you coming from ?” Huangbo said, “I’ve been at the foot of the mountain picking mush­ rooms.” Baizhang said, “See any tigers?” Huangbo roared like a tiger. 
Baizhang picked up an axe and made a chopping gesture; Huangbo slapped him. 
Baizhang chuckled and went back and told the group, “There’s a tiger on the mountain; all of you should watch out for him. 
Today I myself got bitten.” Whenever Zhaozhou saw a monk, right away he would say, Have you ever been here?” Whether the monk said he had or hadn’t, Zhaozhou would say, “Go have some tea. 
” The temple over­ seer asked, “You always ask monks if they’ve been here or not, then always tell them to go have tea. 
” On the gate at Zihu was a sign that said, “At Zihu there’s a dog. 
These stories are just like Xuefeng’s saying, “On South Moun­ tain there’s a turtle-nosed snake; all of you should watch it care­ fully.” At such a time, how would you reply? 
See how Xuefeng teaches this way, without speaking to you of practice or understanding. 
Can you figure him out by means of intellectual discrimination? 
This is why an ancient said, “On hearing words, you must understand the source; don’t set up pri­ vate rules.” Words must have that which is beyond patterns; state­ ments must penetrate the barrier. 
If your words are no more than clichés you fall into a sea of poison. 
Xuefeng’s teaching this way can be called flavorless talk that chokes people. 
What about “On South Mountain there’s a turtle-nosed snake”? 
Here you must have the allpervasive eye to understand. 
Beating the drum, strumming the lute, Two men of understanding meet. 
Yunmen is able to harmonize — Changqing knows how to follow his vagaries. 
The ancient song has no rhyme. 
South Mountains’ turtle-nosed snake; Who knows this meaning? 
Truly it’s Xuansha. 
When Changqing replied as he did, what was his meaning? 
To get here you must be like lightning to reach. 
If there’s anything you can’t clear away, you can’t reach his depths. 
It’s a pity that people mostly make intellectual interpretations of Changqing’s words. 
They say, “As soon as something is heard in the hall, this is losing one’s life.” Some say, “Fundamentally there’s nothing at all; to say this kind of thing out of the blue makes people doubt. 
People hear him say there’s a turtle-nosed snake on South Mountain and immediately doubt.” If you understand in such ways, you have no contact; you just go on living on the words. 
Later a monk related this to Xuansha. 
” Observe how in Xuansha’s words there is a place where he manifests his being. 
He said, “Why use ‘South Mountain’? 
” If it hadn’t been Xuansha, it would have been very difficult to reply. 
When Xuefeng speaks this way, “On South Mountain there’s a turtle-nosed snake,” tell me, where is it? 
To get here you must be a transcendent person; only then will you be able to understand such talk. 
An ancient said, “Xuansha the fisherman doesn’t like South Mountain; he likes the turtle-nosed snake.” Then we get to Yunmen; he threw his staff down in front of Xuefeng, making a gesture of fright. 
Yunmen has the ability to handle snakes and doesn’t run afoul of the sharp point. 
He strikes home in light and strikes home in darkness too. 
As he helps people it’s always like doing a sword dance; sometimes he flies onto people’s 163c eyebrows and eyelashes, sometimes he flies three thousand miles away and snatches people’s heads. 
His throwing down his staff and making a gesture of fright—isn’t this giving play to his spirit? 
Doesn’t he lose his life too? 
Verse Elephant Bone Cliff is so high no one reaches it; (A thousand, ten thousand, search but cannot find. 
It’s not your realm.) Those who get there must be master snake handlers. (This is a spirit recognizing a spirit, a thief recognizing a thief. 
Why gather in crowds? 
Still, you must be of the same group to make it.) Changqing and Xuansha can’t do anything— (Their crimes are listed on the same indictment. 
They passed up the first move.) How many lose their lives? (A crime is not judged twice. 
He drags in common people.) Yunmen knows; (He’s still just attained a little. 
This old guy has just one eye. 
The old guy is just being clever.) Again he searches the weeds— (He’s fallen in the weeds; what’s the use? 
I strike!) South, north, east, west; no place to search. 
Suddenly he thrusts out his staff And throws it down before Xuefeng, its mouth wide open. 
Even if it swallows a thousand, ten thousand, what is accomplished? 
No one on earth can find it.) The gaping mouth is like a lightning flash; Raise your eyebrows and you won’t see. 
Search all over the land for such a person, and still it’s hard to find one. 
Right now where is it?) Right now it’s hidden here on this mountain; (Where’s it gone? 
Even the great Xuedou acts this way too. 
Today I have been bitten.) Those who come, one by one observe expedient methods. 
He’s shot an arrow.) Xuedou shouted and said, “Look right where you are!” (He draws his bow after the thief has gone. 
Secondary, tertiary. 
Repeated words are not worth listening to.) Commentary “Elephant Bone Cliff is so high no one reaches it; / Those who get there must be master snake handlers.” Elephant Bone Cliff is Xuefeng’s mountain. 
Still, this turtle-nosed snake is unavoidably hard to handle; you must know how to handle it before you can do so. 
Conversely, if you don’t know how to handle it, you’ll be bitten by the snake. 
Wuzu said, “With this turtle-nosed snake; you must have the abil­ ity not to get your hands or legs bitten. 
When Xuedou says that they couldn’t handle it, people often say they couldn’t do anything about it, so Xuedou only praises Yunmen. 
But this has nothing to do with it. 
They don’t know that there is no gain or loss in the ability of these three men; it’s just that there is far and near. 
Now I ask you, where is it that Changqing and Xuansha couldn’t manage? 
i64a “How many lose their lives?” This praises Changqing’s saying, “In the hall today there certainly are people who lose their lives. 
” To get here, first you must be thoroughly versed in snake handling. 
Xuedou says, “Yunmen knows; / Again he searches the weeds.” Since Yunmen knew the meaning of Xuefeng’s saying, “On South Mountain there’s a turtle-nosed snake, ” therefore “Again he searches through the weeds. 
He says, “South, north, east, west; no place to search.” You tell me where the snake is. 
“Suddenly he thrusts out his staff.” All along the snake has been right here. 
But don’t go to the staff for sustenance. 
Yunmen threw his staff down in front of Xuefeng with a gesture of fright; thus he used his staff as the snake. 
Once, though, he said, “ The staff has changed into a dragon and swal­ lowed the universe; where are mountains, rivers, and earth to be found?” Just this one staff—sometimes it’s a dragon, sometimes it’s a snake. 
Why is it like this? 
Only when you get here will you know, as an ancient said, “Mind revolves along with myriad phe­ nomena; the turning point is truly mysterious.” The verse says, “He throws it down before Xuefeng, its mouth open wide. 
/ The gaping mouth is like a lightning flash.” Xuedou has extra talent; he picks up Yunmen’s poisonous snake and says this gaping mouth is like a flash of lightning—hesitate and you lose your life. 
“ Raise your eyebrows and you won’t see.” Where has it gone? 
His verse finished, Xuedou must go to a living place to help others; he takes Xuefeng’s snake and picks it up and sports with it himself. 
Indeed he kills and brings life in accord with the occasion. 
Do you want to see? 
He says, “Right now it’s hidden here on this mountain; / Those who come, one by one observe expedient meth­ ods.” Xuedou is still too subtle; he doesn’t say “Use it right away,” but instead shouts and says, “Look right where you are.” Since ancient times how many people have picked up the snake and sported with it? 
Tell me, has the snake ever wounded anyone or not? 
the Peak of Wonder Introduction Jewels are tested with fire, and gold is tested with a stone; a sword is tested with a hair, and water is tested with a pole. 
Story Once when Baofu and Changqing were walking in the mountains, Baofu pointed and said, i 6 4 b Right here is the peak of wonder. 
” (He raises a pile of bones on level ground. 
Just avoid speaking of it. 
Dig a hole and bury it deep.) Chang­ qing said, “Indeed it is. 
What a pity.” (If you don’t have iron eyes, you 11probably be confused. 
Those with the same illness sympathize with each other. 
Both are buried in the same pit.) Xuedou said, “What is the purpose of roaming the mountains together today?” (Xuedou indeed diminishes people’s worth. 
Here’s another cloud-dwelling saint.) Later this dialogue was quoted to Jingqing. 
(There’s good, there’s bad.) Jingqing said, “If not for Changqing, you would have seen skulls covering the fields.” (Only those on the same road know. 
The earth is so vast and desolate it kills people with sadness. 
When the manservant sees the maidservant, he takes care. 
Even if Linji and Deshan appeared, they too would have to take a beating.) Commentary Baofu, Changqing, and Jingqing were all heirs of Xuefeng; these three attained alike, realized alike, saw alike, heard alike, picked up alike, used alike. 
Going in and out, they parleyed back and forth, one after the other. 
As they were of the same lineage, as soon as one raised something the others knew what it came down to. 
In Xuefeng’s group it was these three who always engaged in questioning and answering. 
When Baofu acted thus, he wanted to test whether Changqing had eyes or not. 
What a pity.” But what did he mean by this? 
You can’t always go on this way. 
Rare are those who are completely free, though there are those who seem so. 
Xuedou said, “What is the purpose of roaming the mountains together today?” What does this refer to? 
He also said, “Hundreds and thousands of years hence, I don’t say there will be none, just that they will be few.” Xuedou knows how to point to himself. 
This is like Huangbo’s saying, “I don’t say there is no Chan, just that there are no teachers.” Xuedou is also indeed strict in speaking thus. 
This is called an added com­ ment; it comes down on both sides yet doesn’t remain on either side. 
Later this was quoted to Jingqing. 
He said, “If not for Chang­ qing, you would have seen skulls covering the fields. 
” A monk asked Zhaozhou, “What is the lone summit of the peak of wonder? 
” In a scripture it says the monk MeghasrI always stayed on the lone summit of the peak of wonder; he never came down from the mountain. 
Sudhana went to see him and searched for seven days without finding him. 
Then one day they met on a separate peak. 
When he had seen him, Meghasri explained for Sudhana that the world is a moment of thought, and that the wisdom and illumina­ tion of all Buddhas is the door to truth that appears everywhere. 
Given that Meghasri never came down from the mountain, why did they meet on a separate peak? 
You may say that Meghasri must have come down from the mountain, yet the scripture says he never did, that he was always on the solitary summit of the peak of wonder. 
The lone summit of the peak of wonder Is the teaching of uniform equanimity. 
Where there’s no gain and no loss, No affirmation and no negation, There it stands alone revealed; Therefore Sudhana couldn’t see him. 
When you get to the point of merging with nature, it’s like the eye not seeing itself, the ear not hearing itself, the finger not feeling itself, a sword not cutting itself, fire not burning itself, water not washing itself. 
So it is said, “ The Buddhas have not appeared in the world, nor is there any Nirvana. 
They manifest such things as expedient means to rescue beings.” But tell me, in the end, how will you avoid Jingqing and Xuedou talking as they did? 
Had they been unable to clap in unison then, that would have been why “the skulls of all the people on earth cover the fields.” Changqing comes up with this testimony, and both Baofu and Changqing use it this way. 
Afterwards Xuedou comes out with a verse more brilliant yet. 
Verse On the lone summit of the peak of wonder, weeds grow profusely; (You lose your body too. 
The weeds are already several yards deep right where you stand.) Clearly it is brought up—to be given to whom? 
No one on earth knows. 
A dry turd; what is it good for? 
You got your nostrils but lost your mouth.) If not for Changqing discerning the real point, (Wrong! Watch the arrow? 
He’s caught the thief without even realizing it.) Skulls would cover the ground, but how many people would know? (They won’t live again. They’re extremely numerous. 
You got the nostrils but lost the mouth.) Commentary “On the lone summit of the peak of wonder, weeds grow profusely.” If you roll around in the weeds, when will you ever have done? 
“Clearly it is brought up—to be given to whom?” Where is the clarity? 
This praises Baofu saying, “Right here is the summit of the peak of wonder. 
” “If not for Changqing discerning the real point. 
” What truth did Changqing see that he could say, “So it is. 
As for “Skulls would cover the ground, but how many people would know?” —do you people know? 
G uishan and Iron Grindstone Liu Introduction Stand on the summit of the highest peak, and demons and outsid­ ers cannot know you; walk on the bottom of the deepest sea, and even the Buddha’s eye cannot catch the sight of you. 
Even if your eyes are like shooting stars and your intellect like lightning, still you won’t avoid being like the sacred tortoise dragging its tail. 
Story Iron Grindstone Liu went to Guishan. (Surely it’ll be hard to stay there. 
This old lady doesn’t keep to her place.) Guishan said, “Old cow, so you’ve come! 
” (Check! 
Tai; are you going?” (The arrow is not shot to no purpose. 
In China they beat the drum; in Korea they dance. 
The letting go was too fast; the gathering in is too slow.) Guishan lay down; (The arrow struck home. 
Where do you see Guishan? 
Who realizes that in the far-off misty waves there is another more ex­ cellent realm of thought?) Liu immediately left. (She’s gone. 
She saw the opportunity and acted.) Commentary The nun Iron Grindstone Liu was like sparks, like lightning; hesi­ tate and you lose your life. 
In the path of Chan, if you get to the most essential point, where are there so many things? 
This meet­ ing of adepts is like seeing horns on the other side of the wall and immediately knowing there’s an ox there, like seeing smoke on the other side of a mountain and immediately knowing there’s a fire. 
When pushed they move, when pressed they turn about. 
On my left flank five words will be written: 
‘A Guishan monk, me.’ Would it be right then to call it a Guishan monk, or would it be right to call it a buffalo?” When people these days are questioned about this, they are stumped and can’t explain. 
Iron Grindstone Liu had studied for a long time; her active edge was sharp and dangerous. 
People called her “Iron Grindstone” Liu. 
She built a hut a few miles from Guishan. 
One day she went to see Guishan. 
When he saw her, he said, “Old cow, so you’ve come.” She said, “ Tomorrow there’s a communal feast on Mt. 
Tai; are you going?” Guishan lay down, and Liu left. 
Look—through­ out they seemed to be conversing, but this is not Chan. 
Can it be understood by calling it no-thing? 
Guishan is over six hundred miles from Mt. 
Tai; how did Liu want to have Guishan go to the feast? 
What did she mean? 
People now can be poked thrice and not turn their heads, but this woman couldn’t be fooled one bit. 
By no means is this an emo­ tional view based on mundane truth; like a clear mirror, like a jewel in the hand, when a foreigner comes a foreigner is reflected, and when a native comes a native is reflected. 
It’s because she knows there is something transcendent that she acts like this. 
Right now you are content to understand this as no-thing. 
Master Wuzu said, “Don’t take something as no-thing; time and again no-thing is reified into something. 
In the Gui-Yang tradition this is called merg­ ing of perspectives. 
As the grass stirs in the wind, one compre­ hends the whole picture—this is called a body-block expression, the meaning is conveyed but the words obstruct. 
Verse Once riding an iron horse she entered the fortress; (An adept accustomed to battle. 
Beyond the borders is the general’s place. 
She’s fully equipped.) The edict comes down reporting the six states are cleared. (A dog carries the amnesty in its mouth. 
In the heart of the realm is the emperor’s place. 
What about the sea being calm, the rivers clear?) Still holding the golden whip, she questions the returning traveler; (W hat’s the news? Two people are supported by a single staff. 
They call to each other, going together and coming together.) In the depths of the night, who will go along to walk the royal road? 
Tell me, why go?) Commentary Xuedou’s verses are universally considered the best of their kind. 
Among the hundred verses this one is the most logical, the most marvelously arrayed and clearly set out. 
“Once riding an iron horse she entered the fortress. 
” This refers to Iron Grindstone Liu coming as she did to Guishan. 
“The edict comes down, reporting that the six states are cleared.” This refers to the way Guishan questioned her. 
“Still holding the golden whip, she questions the returning traveler.” This refers to Liu saying, “Tomorrow there’s a feast on Mt. 
” “In the depths of the night, who will go along to walk the royal road?” This refers to Guishan lying down and Liu leaving. 
Xuedou has such ability: 
where they hurry he eulogizes their hurrying, and where they are easygoing he eulogizes their ease. 
Standing on the summit of the highest peak, Unknown to demons and outsiders; Walking on the bottom of the deepest sea, Unseen even by the Buddha’s eyes. 
The meaning of Xuedou’s verse is most excellent. 
Had he not the same attainment, the same realization, how could he be capable of this—“Once riding an iron horse she entered the fortress. 
” But say, what meaning was realized? 
A monk asked Fengxue, “When Guishan said, ‘Old cow, so you’ve come,’ what did he m ean?” Fengxue said, “In the depths of the white clouds the golden dragon leaps.” The monk asked, “When Iron Grindstone Liu said, ‘Tomorrow there’s a communal feast on Mt. 
Tai; are you going?’ what did she mean?” Fengxue said, “ In the heart of the blue waves the jade rabbit bolts. 
” The monk asked, “When Guishan lay down, what did he mean?” Fengxue said, “Old and worn out, decrepit and lazy, days without concern; lying idly deep in sleep, facing the green mountains. 
” This is the same mean­ ing as Xuedou’s. 
If your words do not startle the crowd, you fall into the streams of the commonplace. 
If you can distinguish initiate from noninitiate instantly and can decide between killing and enliven­ ing in a flash, then you can occupy the ten directions and tower like a mile-high wall. 
But do you know such a time exists? 
Story The hermit of Lotus Blossom Peak held up his staff and showed it to his group, saying, (Look! 
He has one eye on his forehead. 
Still, this is a cliché for people these days.) “When the ancients got here, why didn’t they consent to stay here?” (You can’t drive stakes into space. 
The hermit provisionally sets up a magic city.) There was no answer, (A thousand, myriad, extremely many. 
They’ve attained a little, though. 
What a pity! 
Swift falcons on a roost.) so he him­ self replied, “ Because they did not gain strength on the road.” (If you discern this on the road, you’ll still be struggling for half a month’s journey. 
Even if you gain strength, what’s it good for? 
How could there be none at all?) He also said, “In the end, how is it?” (Myriad people are sitting right here. 
Among a myriad, one or two will understand.) Again he answered himself, “ My staff across my shoulder, I pay no heed to people; I go straight into the myriad peaks.” (Still he deserves a beating, because he only sees one side. 
If you see jowls on the back of his head, don’t go along with him.) Commentary Can you judge the hermit? 
His feet still aren’t on the ground. 
He lived in a hut on Lotus Blossom Peak on Mt. Tiantai. 
They would impart a turning word, to repay their debt to the enlightened ones and transmit the stamp of the awakened mind. 
As soon as he saw a monk coming, the hermit would hold up his staff and say, “When the ancients got here, why didn’t they con­ sent to stay here?” For over twenty years, no one could answer. 
If you know his snare, it isn’t worth taking hold of. 
Now tell me, why did he ask this question for twenty years? 
Since this is the action of a Chan master, why did he just keep to one peg? 
If you can see here, naturally you won’t be running in the dust of sense objects. 
During the course of twenty years, there were quite a few people who presented their views to the hermit, trying all their clever devices. 
Moreover, though this matter is not in words, if not for words it couldn’t be distinguished. 
As it is said, “There is basically no word for the Way, but we use words to reveal the Way. 
The ancient spoke a word for no other purpose than to see whether or not you know what is. 
When did he ever lose the essential? 
The ancient Shitou said, “ Hearing words, understand the source; don’t set up private rules. 
” When people these days bump into it, they think that’s enough. 
When they come before an adept, the adept uses the three essential seals—sealing space, sealing water, sealing mud—to test them. 
If you don’t meet such a person, keep it to yourself for the time being. 
Now I ask you: 
the staff is something Chan monks ordinarily use; why does the hermit say they didn’t gain strength on the road? 
Why does he say that when the ancients got here they didn’t consent to stay? 
In truth, though gold dust is precious, in the eyes it blinds. 
When Shandao was laicized in the persecution of 845, he would show his staff to people and say, “All the Buddhas of the past are thus; all the Buddhas of the future are thus; all the Buddhas of the present are thus. 
” i66b One day Xuefeng held up his staff before his group and said, “ This one is just for people of medium and low faculties.” A monk came forward and asked, “If you should meet someone of the high­ est potential, then what?” Xeufeng picked up his staff and left. 
” A monk asked, “How would you do it? 
” Yunmen hit him. 
Whenever you study and question, there aren’t so many things. 
Outside you see mountains, rivers, and earth there; within you see perception and cognition there; above you see Buddhas to seek; below you see beings to save: 
you must simply spit them all out at once, and afterwards fuse all into one at all times. 
Then, though you be on the tip of a hair, it’s as broad as the universe; though you be in a boiling cauldron or furnace coals, it’s like being in the land of peace and happiness; though you dwell amid jewels and treasures, it’s like being in a thatch hut. 
And tell me, what place is he pointing to as his whereabouts? Undeniably, there are eyes in his words, but his meaning is outside the words. 
He gets up by himself, falls down by himself; he lets go by himself, gathers up by himself. 
Once when met a monk on the road, he raised his staff and said, “What’s this?” The monk said, “I don’t know.” Yanyang said, “You don’t even recognize a staff?” Then he poked the ground with his staff, saying, “Recognize this?” The monk said, “No.” Yanyang said, “You don’t even recognize a hole in the ground?” Then he put the staff across his shoulder and said, “Understand?” The monk said, “No.” Yanyang said, “My staff across my shoulder, I pay no heed to people—I go straight into the myriad peaks.” When the ancients got here, why didn’t they agree to stay here? 
Who, confronting the situation, Brings it up without deception? 
Such a person is rare; He destroys the lofty peaks, Melts down the mysterious subtlety. 
Even I don’t know where he’s gone— Along with the white clouds and flowing streams. 
Why did I say, “If you see jowls on the back of his head, don’t go along with him ”? 
As soon as you make a comparative judgment, you make your living in the ghost cave of the mountain of dark­ ness. 
If you can see all the way through and trust completely, naturally no one can trap you or do anything to you. 
When pushed or pressed, you will kill or give life spontaneously. 
Xuedou understood the hermit’s meaning when he said, “I go straight into the myriad peaks.” At that point he begins to make his verse. 
If you want to know the point, look at Xuedou’s verse. 
Verse Dust and sand in his eyes, dirt in his ears, (Blocked up with tons of it. 
There are other such people.) He doesn’t consent to stay in the myriad peaks. 
With the lightning flash mind, if you vainly toil tarrying in thought, when you look to the left a thousand lives have gone by, when you look to the right, ten thousand eons.) Suddenly raising my eyebrows to look—where has he gone? 
All along he’s just been right here. 
Have you cut off the hermit’s footsteps? 
Though like this, it’s still necessary to get to this realm to realize it. 
Immediately he says, “Dust and sand in his eyes, dirt in his ears.” This one line eulogizes the hermit of Lotus Blos­ som Peak. 
When Chan practitioners get here, they have nothing above to look to, no personal selves below; they are like simple­ tons. 
Nanquan said, “Among people of the Way, those like simple­ tons are hard to come by.” Chanyue wrote, “I often recall Nanquan’s fine words; such simpletons are indeed rare.” Fadeng said, “Who knows the meaning of this? 
It makes me think back to Nanquan.” Nanquan also said, “The seven hundred eminent monks at the fifth patriarch’s place all understood Buddhism; only workman Lu didn’t understand Buddhism. 
He just understood the Way, and that is why he became the new patriarch.” Tell me, how far apart are Buddhism and the Way? 
Xuedou brought up this saying of Nanquan’s and said, “Sand can’t get in their eyes, water can’t get in their ears; if there are people who trust totally and can hold fast, they aren’t deceived by others. 
For them, what a bunch of meaningless noises are the ver­ bal teachings of the Buddhas and patriarchs! 
So I invite you to hang up your bowl and bag, break your traveling staff, and just become free wayfarers.” Xuedou also said, “ The polar mountain can be put in their eyes, the water of the ocean can be put in their ears. 
There are some people who accept others’ haggling discussions and the verbal teachings of the Buddhas and patriarchs like a dragon reaching water, like a tiger taking to the mountains. 
They must pick up their bowls and bags and put their staffs across their shoulders. 
They too are free wayfarers. 
” Among these three kinds of free wayfarers, if you would choose one to be your teacher, the correct choice is this kind of cast iron person. 
Whether they encounter evils or wonders, to them what they face is all like a dream. 
They don’t know there are the six senses, they don’t know there is sunrise and sunset. 
But even if you get to this realm, you must not cling to the cold ashes of a dead fire; you must not plunge into the flood of darkness. 
You still must have a way to turn around. 
As in the ancient saying, Don t cling to the greenness of the strange plants on the cold cliff. 
If you obliterate the white clouds, the source is not marvelous. 
But what is being called “the myriad peaks”? 
Hence this verse. 
But tell me, where does he go? 
Does anyone know? 
“Suddenly raising my eyebrows to look—where has he gone?” Why doesn’t Xuedou know where he’s gone either? 
where is it now? 
If you can see, you’re studying with the hermit of Lotus Blossom Peak. 
Story A monk asked Baizhang, “What is extraordinary?” (There’s an echo in the words. 
He flabbergasts people. 
Though he has eyes, he’s never seen.) Baizhang said, Sitting alone on the mountain.” (His awesome majestic air extends over the whole land. 
The one standing and the one sitting are both defeated.) The monk bowed; (A clever monk. 
There still is such a person who wants to see such a thing.) Baizhang then hit him. 
The imperative is not carried out vainly.) Commentary 167a He has the eye to face situations unconcerned with danger or death. 
So it is said, “ How can you catch tiger cubs without entering a tiger’s lair?” Baizhang was like a tiger with wings. 
Nor does this monk avoid life and death; he dares to grab the tiger’s whiskers and ask what is extraordinary. 
This monk too has eyes. 
Baizhang immediately took up the burden with him and said, “Sitting alone on the mountain.” The monk bowed. 
Chan practitioners must be able to discern the meaning before the question. 
This monk’s bow was not the same as an ordinary bow; he had to have eyes to do it. 
Though they knew each other, they acted like they didn’t. 
When the monk asked what was special and Baizhang told him sitting alone on the mountain, the monk bowed and Baizhang hit him; see how when they let go they both do so at once, and when they gather back they wipe away the tracks and obliterate the traces. 
But what did the monk mean by bowing? 
If it was good, why did Baizhang hit him? 
If it was not good, what was wrong? 
Here you must be able to tell right from wrong, distinguish ini­ tiate from outsider, and stand on the summits of a thousand peaks, to begin to understand. 
The monk’s bow was like grabbing the tiger’s whiskers; he was just contending for a pivotal position. 
Anyone else wouldn t have been able to handle the monk. 
The monk met mind with mind, con­ veyed intention with intention—that is why he bowed. 
Nanquan said, “Last night at midnight Manjusri and Samantabhadra came up with views of the Buddha and the Dharma. 
I gave them each a beating and sentenced them to be hemmed in by twin iron mountains. 
” Then Zhaozhou said, “Who should take your beat­ ing?” Nanquan said, “Where was my fault?” Zhaozhou bowed. 
Chan masters do not idly observe how the other takes action. 
The moment they are in charge of the situation and bring it into play, they are naturally lively. 
But tell me, what about when letting go? 
Look at Xuedou’s verse. 
Verse In the realm of the patriarchs gallops the heavenly colt. (Such a one is bom once in five hundred years. 
Among myriad people there’s one or a half. 
The son takes up the father’s work.) Among expedients rolling out and rolling up are not the same path— (Already so before the words. 
(He came head on, turning left and right. 
Do you see where Baizhang helps people?) How laughable—a man comes to grab the tiger’s whiskers. 
Where there’s a great reward, there must be a valiant man. 
The heavenly colt runs a thousand miles a day, runs back and forth, up and down, gallops as if flying; so it is called a heav­ enly colt. 
He is well able to gallop; only thus can we see how free he is. 
This is because he attained Mazu’s great ability and great function. 
If it turns, it must go both ways.” And if it can’t be turned, what’s the use? 
Even great people must know something of changing with circumstances. 
People these days just offer their true feelings and play into the hands of another. 
What end will there be? 
Xuedou says, “ How laughable—a man comes to grab the tiger’s whiskers.” Baizhang was like a tiger—how laughable that this monk went to grab the tiger’s whiskers. 
in the Autumn Wind Introduction Answering ten when one is asked, understanding the whole when part is mentioned, loosing the falcon on seeing the rabbit, using the wind to fan the flame, not sparing any effort—leaving this aside for the moment, how is it when entering the tiger’s lair? 
Story A monk asked Yunmen, “ How is it when the tree withers and the leaves fall?” (What season is this? 
When the family breaks up, the people perish; when the people perish, the family breaks up.) Yun­ men said, “The body exposed in the autumn wind. 
He cuts nails and shears through iron. 
Clean and naked, bare and purified. 
Walking with even steps through the blue sky.) Commentary If you can comprehend here, you begin to see how Yunmen helped people. 
Otherwise, if not, as before you’ll be calling a deer a horse; you are blind and deaf. 
Who arrives at this realm? 
Do you think Yunmen answered the monk’s question, or do you think he was harmonizing with him? 
If you say he answered his question, you are wrongly sticking to the zero point of the scale. 
Since it’s not this way, ultimately how is it? 
If you can see all the way through, Chan monks’ nostrils are not worth a pinch. 
In general, to uphold the Chan vehicle, you must take up the burden with your entire being and not spare any effort; you must stretch out in the tiger’s mouth and allow others to pull you back and forth and drag you down. 
If you’re not like this, how will you be able to help people? 
This monk posed a question that was indeed rigorous. 
If you look at him in ordinary terms, he just seems to be a monk involved in idle concerns. 
If you go by the traditions of Chan monks, when you go to his lifeline to look, he undeniably has a subtle point. 
But say, when the tree withers and the leaves fall, whose realm is this? 
In Fenyang’s eighteen questions, this is called a question to test the host, and also called a question using things. 
Since the ques­ tion had an eye, Yunmen’s answer too was straight to the point. 
An ancient said, “To attain intimacy, don’t ask with a question.” If you really know someone, you know the point as soon as it’s men­ tioned. 
If you look to the vein of Yunmen’s words, you’ve immedi­ ately gone wrong. 
Yunmen liked to ride the thief’s horse to pursue the thief in this way. 
Once a monk asked him, “What is that which is not within the reach of thought?” He said, “ Impossible for cognition to fathom.” This monk asked, “How is it when the tree withers and the leaves fall?” Yunmen said, “ The body exposed in the autumn wind. 
” In his words he unfailingly seizes control of the essential bridge and doesn’t let ordinary or holy through. 
You must under­ stand how Yunmen raises one corner and illuminates the other three, raises three corners and illuminates the other one. 
If you seek in his three statements, you’re pulling an arrow out of the back of your head. 
In a single statement of his, three statements are always present: 
There is spontaneous accord. 
But which of the three state­ ments does Yunmen use to receive people? 
Try to discern this. 
Verse Since the question has the source, (Profoundly discerning oncoming winds, the arrow is not shot in vain.) The answer too is in the same place. 
Yunmen is like a bell waiting to be struck. 
His efforts are not made at random.) Three statements should be distinguished. (Above, between, below. 
First you must comprehend outside the three statements.) An arrow point flies far into the void. (On target. 
Gone by. 
The arrow flies 168a past the next country.) Over the great plains—chilling wind blasts howling, wailing, (Throughout the skies, all over the earth. 
Do you feel your hair standing on end? 
He’s let go.) In the eternal sky—intermittent misty rains. 
(The winds are great, the waters vast. 
Above your heads, boundless vastness; below your feet, boundless vastness.) Haven’t you seen the traveler sitting so long at Shaolin, who hasn’t returned? 
The Yellow River flows turbid from its source.) Tranquil up on Bear Ear Mountain, a single gathering. 
(You can see whether your eyes are open or closed. 
Living in a ghost cave. 
You’re blind and deaf. 
Who arrives at this realm? 
I’ll still knock out your gap teeth.) Commentary An ancient said, “When you hear words, understand the source; don’t set up private rules.” The ancients’ words were not empty talk. 
So it is said, “ To ask about this affair you must have some knowledge of right and wrong. 
If you don’t know noble from base behavior, if you can’t recognize pure and defiled, if you let your­ self speak at random, what will be the gain?” Whenever one speaks, it must be like clamps, like tongs, it must have hooks and chains, it must have unbroken continuity. 
This monk’s question had the source meaning; Yunmen’s answer was also thus. 
Yunmen always taught people with three statements; this is his ultimate pattern. 
“ Three statements should be distin­ guished.” Three statements are always present in each statement of Yunmen’s. 
If you can distinguish them, you penetrate beyond the three statements. 
“An arrow point flies far into the void.” He shot it so far you must look quickly to see it. 
If you can see it clearly, you can open out the universe in a single statement. 
Is this mystery, or marvel? 
An ancient said, “The truth of things not hidden—it has always been revealed.” The monk asked, “How is it when the tree withers and the leaves fall?” Yunmen said, “The body exposed in the autumn wind.” Xuedou’s intent was just to create a single environment. 
What’s in front of your eyes right now, the whistling wind, is either the southeast wind or the northwest wind. 
If you go on interpreting it as Chan or the Way, this has nothing to do with it. 
“Haven’t you seen the traveler sitting so long at Shaolin, who hasn’t returned?” Before he returned to India, Bodhidharma sat facing a wall for nine years, utterly silent. 
But say, is this “the tree withers, the leaves fall”? 
If here all past and present fools and sages, sky, earth, and the whole world are all fused into one, then you will see how Yunmen and Xuedou really helped people. 
“ Tranquil up on Bear Ear Mountain, a single gathering.” Bear Ear Mountain is Shaolin. 
Before and behind, mountains are clus­ tered thickly by the thousands. 
Where will you see? 
Do you see where Xuedou helps people? 
Even if you do, this is still the sacred tortoise dragging its tail, leaving traces. 
Never Been Spoken Story Nanquan went to see Master Nirvana. 
Nirvana asked, “Is there a truth the sages have never spoken?” (The master should know. 
It stands like a wall ten miles high. 
Does he feel his teeth falling out?) Nanquan said, “There is.” (He’s fallen into the weeds. 
Even if he goes wrong his whole life, you shouldn’t speak this way to him.) Nanquan said, “I am just thus. 
What about you?” (Luckily he has a place to turn around. 
With the long he’s long, with the short he’s short. 
He hides his body but reveals his shadow. 
He acts totally dead. 
There are thorns in the soft mud. 
Though he acts like this, how could he fool me?) Nanquan said, “I don’t understand.” (He can only act this way. 
Lucky he doesn t understand. 
Luckily this guy is just this way.) Nirvana said, “I’ve already spoken too much for you.” (He adds frost to snow. 
Why a dragon s head but a snake’s tail?) Commentary When you get here, no need for “it’s mind” or “it’s not mind,” or for “not mind” or “not not mind.” Even when you haven’t a single eyebrow hair, you’ve still attained just a little. 
This Master Nirvana used to live at Baizhang; he had the monks clear fields for him, while he expounded the great doctrine for them. 
At this time Nanquan had already seen Mazu, but he was going around to various masters for absolute certainty. 
He said, “Is there a truth the sages have never spoken?” Had it been me, I would have covered my ears and left. 
See this old guy’s scene of embarrassment. 
I would have simply brought my staff down across his back to get him to feel. 
Though it was like this, tell me, where is it spoken? 
According to Nanquan’s view, it’s not mind, not Buddha, not a thing, it’s never been spoken. 
What about you? 
” Nanquan then said his “I don’t understand.” He said he didn’t understand while actually he did understand; this is not really not understanding. 
If both were adepts, they were like clear mirrors. 
If you have eyes, you’ll judge them clearly. 
Verse Patriarchs and Buddhas never helped people. (Each guards his own territory. 
If you keep even a single word in your mind, you go to hell like an arrow shot.) Chan practitioners present and past run neck and neck. 
(Having worn out your sandals, break your staff and hang up your bowl and bag.) When clear mirrors are set up, the range of images differs. 
Come smash the mirror and I’ll meet with you.) One by one facing south to see the northern dipper, (Do you see me astride the Buddha hall going out through the mountain gate? 
In Korea they’ve gone up to the hall; in China they haven’t beaten the drum.) The dipper handle is hanging down, But there’s no place to seek. 
Too bad! 
The cup falls to the ground; the saucer shatters to pieces.) When you pick up the nose you lose the mouth. 
After all, it’s so, so I strike!) Commentary Sakyamuni Buddha appeared in the world and in forty-nine years never said a single word. 
Now it fills the voluminous Canon—how can it not be speaking? 
As Xiushan said, “The Buddhas have not appeared in the world: 
fortynine years of talk. 
Bodhidharma didn’t come from India: 
Shaolin has a wondrous secret.” It’s also said, “The Buddhas have not ap­ peared in the world, nor is there any teaching to be given to people. 
I always say, though I were to add a phrase sweet as honey, when properly viewed it’s poison. 
“Chan practitioners present and past run neck and neck.” Ev­ erywhere they go they ask questions about is and is not, about Buddhas and patriarchs, about transcendence and accommoda­ tion. 
Though they act like this, if they haven’t arrived at this realm, they can’t do without this questioning. 
i69a “When clear mirrors are set up, the range of images differs. 
” With just this one line you can distinguish clearly. 
” The great teacher Shenxiu said, “The body is the tree of enlightenment; the mind like a clear mirror. 
When Xuedou talks this way, is he inside or outside the gate? 
Each of you has an ancient mirror. 
All the myriad forms— long, short, square, round—each and every one appears in it. 
If you go to the longness or shortness to understand, in the end you’ll never be able to find it. 
This is why Xuedou said, “When clear mirrors are set up, the range of images differs. 
” Instead you must “all face south and see the northern dipper.” When you’re facing south, why are you nevertheless to look at the northern dipper? 
These two lines refer to Nirvana’s confrontation. 
Fearing people would misunderstand, he turned around and picked it up himself, saying, “ The dipper handle is hanging down right now before your eyes: 
/ Where else will you go to look for it? 
/ As soon as you pick up the nose you lose the mouth.” Xuedou has picked up the nose and lost the mouth. 
Introduction When fish swim through the water is disturbed; when birds fly by feathers fall. 
Clearly discriminating host and guest, penetratingly distinguishing initiate and outsider, one is like a clear mirror, like a bright pearl. 
The sound is obvious; the form is evident. 
But why is it so? 
Story A monk asked Dasui, “The conflagration at the end of an eon sweeps through and the universe is totally destroyed; is This One destroyed or not?” (What thing is “ This One”? 
No one on earth can get hold of this phrase. 
He scratches in advance, anticipating the itch.) Dasui said, “It is destroyed.” (An iron hammer head with no hole is thrown down in front of him. 
He’s lost his nostrils. 
Before he speaks he’s already thoroughly exposed.) The monk said, “If so, then this goes along with it.” (Immeasurably great people are whirled around in the stream of words. 
After all he misunder­ stands.) Dasui said, “It goes along with it.” (The first arrow was still light; the second arrow was deep. 
Just this is what so many people cannot find. 
When the water rises the boats ride high, with a lot of clay the Buddha image is big. 
If you say it goes along with it, where is it? 
I hit.) Commentary Master Dasui studied with more than sixty teachers. 
Once he was keeper of the fire in Guishan’s community. 
One day Guishan asked him, “You have been here several years, yet you still don’t know how to pose a question, so I can see what’s what with you.” Dasui said, “What would you have me ask?” Guishan said, “Since you don’t understand, ask what the Buddha is.” Dasui covered Gui­ shan’s mouth with his hand. 
Only later did he become a public teacher. 
A monk asked him, “The conflagration at the end of an eon sweeps through and the universe is totally destroyed. 
Is This One destroyed or n ot?” This monk just came up with a question based on an idea in the scriptures. 
Scriptures say there are eons of formation, sub­ sistence, destruction, and emptiness; when the age of cataclysm occurs, the destruction reaches to the third meditation heaven. 
Basically the monk did not know the point of this statement. 
Tell me, what is “This One”? 
People often make intellectual interpretations and say it is the fundamental nature of beings. 
If you say that it goes along with it, where is it? 
If you say it doesn’t go along with it, then what? 
Haven’t you heard it said that to attain intimacy you should ask with a question? 
Since the monk didn’t understand what Dasui said, he had this matter on his mind. 
He took this question to Touzi, who asked him where he came from. 
The monk recounted his conversation with Dasui; Touzi burned incense, bowed, and said, “Dasui is a Buddha—hurry back to him! 
” The monk returned, but Dasui had already passed on. 
Later a monk at court said of this, “Clearly there is no other truth—who says the southerner Huineng was approved? 
The one phrase ‘it goes along with it’ makes a monk run over a thousand mountains. 
A cold cricket cries in the piled leaves; by night a ghost bows to the lamp before a crypt. 
The humming stops outside the lonely window; he wanders back and forth, unable to overcome his regret.” Later Xuedou used these lines in making his verse. 
Right now, you should not think it is destroyed, and you should not think it is not destroyed. 
In the end, how will you understand? 
Look quickly! 
Verse In the light of the eonic fire he poses his question— The monk still lingers within the double barrier. 
A hundred layers, a thousand levels.) How touching—for a single phrase “going along with that, ” (All the monks in the world make this sort of judgment. 
It’s not even worth it for a thousand, ten thousand sayings. 
What’s hard about stopping him in his tracks?) Busily he traveled out and back alone, ten thousand miles. (His active consciousness is very chaotic. 
He’s just wearing out his sandals.) Commentary 169c Xuedou takes charge of the situation and comes out with his verse; in his words there’s a place where he manifests his being. 
“In the light of the eonic fire he poses his question—/ The monk still lingers within the double barrier.” From the first the monk’s question was concerned with whether it is destroyed or not destroyed—this is the double barrier. 
“ How touch­ ing—for a single phrase, ‘going along with that,’ / Busily he trav­ eled out and back alone, ten thousand miles.” This refers to the monk taking the question to Touzi, then returning again to Dasui— this can be called being busy for ten thousand miles. 
Story A monk asked Zhaozhou, “I hear you’ve seen Nanquan in person; is that so?” (A thousand hearings are not as good as one seeing. 
A confrontation. Everyone has a pair of eyebrows.) Zhaozhou said, “Zhen province produces big radishes.” (He holds up the sky and supports the earth. 
He cuts nails and shears through iron. 
The arrow flies past the next country. 
If you see jowls behind his head, don’t travel with him.) Commentary This monk too is one who has studied for a long time; to be sure, there s an eye in his question. 
But he could not do anything to Zhaozhou, an adept, whose immediate reply was, “Zhen province produces big radishes.” This can be called flavorless talk that chokes people. 
Old Zhaozhou is like a thief who steals in broad daylight. 
As soon as you speak, he plucks your eyes out. 
Otherwise, if you linger in thought, holding back your potential, you won’t avoid losing your life. 
In judging this story, the wild sage Cheng called it “asking about the east, answering about the west.” He said that Zhaozhou didn’t answer, didn’t climb into the trap. 
If you understand this way, how will you get it? 
If you understand this way, you haven’t seen it even in dreams; moreover, you’re dragging Zhaozhou down. 
Some say, “Zhen province has always produced big radishes, as everyone knows; Zhaozhou saw Nanquan, and everyone knows this too. 
That’s why, when the monk still asked whether Zhaozhou had seen Nanquan, Zhaozhou said, ‘Zhenzhou produces big rad­ ishes.’ ” But this has nothing to do with it. 
Zhaozhou has his own road through the skies. 
A monk asked Jiufeng, “I hear you saw Yanshou in person; is this true?” Jiufeng said, “ Is the wheat in front of the mountain ripe yet?” This matches what Zhaozhou said to the monk; both are like holeless iron hammerheads. 
Zhaozhou is a free man. 
If you question him carelessly, he snatches your eyes out. 
If you know what is, you’ll chew it care­ fully and swallow it. 
If you don’t know what is, you’ll be like swal­ lowing a date whole. 
Verse Zhen province produces big radishes— (Everyone knows. 
Each time it’s brought up it’s new.) All the Chan practitioners in the world seize upon this as a principle; (Nevertheless, it isn’t so. 
Who has a use for these idle words, this long-winded speech?) They only know it as extending from past to present; (Half open, half closed. 
In ancient times it wasn’t so; now it isn’t so either.) How can they discern that the swan is white and the crow is black? 
W hat’s long is long of itself, what’s short is short of itself; those who can recognize this are rare. 
It’s none other; Xuedou himself is wearing 170a fetters, giving evidence of his crime.) He has taken Chan practitioners by the nose. 
Commentary “Zhen province produces big radishes. 
” If you seize upon this as the ultimate principle, you’ve already gone wrong. 
People all know that this answer of Zhaozhou’s is an expression of the ultimate principle, though in the end they don’t know where the ultimate principle is. 
That’s why Xuedou says, “All the Chan practitioners in the world seize upon this as a principle; / They only know it as extending from past to present. 
/ How can they discern that the swan is white and the crow is black?” Though they know that people past and present have answered this way, when have they ever been able to distin­ guish the expert from the naive? 
Xuedou says to understand re­ ally you must discern the swan’s whiteness and the crow’s blackness in a flash. 
“Thief! / He has taken Chan practitioners by the nose.” All the Buddhas of past, present, and future are thieves too; the suc­ cessive generations of patriarchs are thieves too. 
They were able to snatch people’s eyes. 
As for the skill not to blunder, I only ap­ prove Zhaozhou. 
“Zhen province produces big radishes. 
” His Ringed Staff Introduction Move and a shadow appears; notice and ice forms. 
Yet if you don’t move and don’t notice, you will not avoid entering a wild fox den. 
If you can penetrate thoroughly, trust completely, without any blind­ ing obstruction, you’ll be like a dragon finding water, like a tiger taking to the mountains. 
Let go, and even rubble radiates light; hold still, and even real gold loses its color. 
The ancients’ stories could not but be roundabout, but tell me, what were they discussing? 
Story Magu, carrying his ringed staff, went to Changqing. 
He circled the meditation seat thrice, shook his staff once, and stood there. 
Cor­ rect.” (He’s washing dirt in mud. 
What talk is this? 
A donkey-tethering stake.) Xuedou added a word, saying, “Wrong.” Magu also went to Nanquan, circled the seat thrice, shook his staff, and stood there. 
(As before he’s washing dirt in mud; again he carries on. 
But though the frog leaps it can’t get out of the bas­ ket.) Nanquan said, “ Incorrect. 
Incorrect.” (Why not accept it? 
He kills the man without blinking an eye. 
What talk is this?) Xuedou added a word, saying “Wrong.” Magu then said, “Changqing said correct; why do you say incor­ rect?” (Where is the master? 
When one kills, one must see blood; when one helps, one should do one’s utmost. 
How many people has he deceived?) “ This is what is turned about by the power of the wind; in the end it breaks down.” (After all Magu is trapped by Nanquan. 
The people of old would stay if there was mutual agreement in a single word, and would leave otherwise. 
See how Magu went to Changqing, circled the seat thrice, shook his staff, and stood there. 
Changqing said, “Correct. 
Correct.” To use the sword that kills, the sword that gives life, one must be a true adept. 
Why does Xuedou say “W rong”? 
Where is he wrong? 
Changqing said correct; where is he correct? 
Xuedou seems to be sitting there reading the judgment. 
Magu, carrying this word “correct, ” then went to see Nanquan. 
As before he circled the seat thrice, shook his staff, and stood there. 
Incorrect.” To use the sword that kills, the sword that gives life, one must be a true adept. 
Xuedou says “Wrong.” Changqing said correct, Nanquan said incorrect; are these the same or different? 
If you attain understanding at Changqing’s saying, you will not even be able to save yourself; if you attain understanding at Nanquan’s saying, you can be the teacher of Buddhas and patriarchs. 
Even so, Chan practitioners must accept it for themselves before they will under­ stand, not just take other people’s verbal explanations. 
If one is a thoroughly competent adept, who has attained great liberation, one must have a life apart. 
One who has not forgotten mind and objects will certainly be stuck over these two sides. 
If you want to understand clearly past and present, and silence everyone in the world, first you must clearly apprehend these two “wrongs.” Xuedou’s verse later only deals with these two wrongs. 
If you have blood under your skin, you will naturally not go to the words and phrases to create interpretations; you will not go to a donkey-tethering stake to make up theories. 
Some people say that Xuedou utters these two “wrongs” on behalf of Magu, but what connection is there? 
The librarian Qing said, “Holding his staff, circling the seat, ‘correct’ and ‘incorrect’ are both wrong. 
The reality of it does not lie herein.” Have you not read how Yongjia came to Caoqi and saw the sixth patriarch? 
He circled the seat thrice, shook his staff, and stood there. 
This one did not say correct or incor­ rect; both correct and incorrect are donkey-tethering stakes. 
Only Xuedou, pronouncing two “wrongs,” has thus attained something. 
Magu said, “Changqing said correct; why do you say incor­ rect?” Nanquan didn’t spare any effort; he indulged considerably and said, “Changqing is correct; it’s you who are incorrect.” One might say Nanquan released a falcon on seeing a rabbit. 
The matter of hair, nails, teeth, skin, flesh, sinews, bone, marrow, and brains all returns to earth. 
Saliva, tears, pus, and blood all return to water. 
Warm breath returns to fire, and movement returns to wind. 
When these four elements separate, where could this illusory body be?” When Magu circled the seat holding his staff, already this was what is turned about by the power of wind and eventually breaks down. 
When you get here, you must be made of cast iron in order to realize it. 
171a The scholar Zhang Zhuo called on Chan Master Xitang and asked, “ Do the mountains, rivers, and earth exist or not? 
A compe­ tent Chan teacher always wants to melt sticking points, remove bonds, and eliminate fixations for people; one should not just hold to one side but be comprehensive. 
See how Yangshan went to Zhongyi to thank him for ordina­ tion. 
When Zongyi saw him coming, he beat his hand on his chair and said, “Wa wa.” Yangshan then stood to the east, then stood to the west, then stood in the middle. 
After that, once he had finished giving thanks, he retreated and stood there. 
Zhongyi said, “Where did you get this concentration? 
” Yangshan said, “I took it off the seal of Caoqi.” Zhongyi said, “Who did Caoqi receive with this concentra­ tion?” Yangshan said, “Yongjia.” Then Yangshan asked Zhongyi, “Where did you get this concentration?” Zhongyi said, “At Mazu’s place.” Isn’t such conversation by people who understand the whole from the part, who see the root and follow the branches? 
Longya said, “Those who penetrate the study must pass be­ yond Buddhas and patriarchs. 
Rivers and lakes do not intend to obstruct people, it’s just that people now can’t cross them, so the rivers and lakes become barriers. 
Though the Buddhas and patri­ archs do not intend to deceive people, it’s just that people now cannot pass beyond them, so Buddhas and patriarchs after all de­ ceive people, and you cannot say they don’t. 
If one can pass be­ yond the Buddhas and patriarchs, one surpasses them. 
Still one must completely realize the intent of the Buddhas and patriarchs; only then can one be equal to the transcendent people of old. 
If you have not been able to pass through, if you study the Buddhas and patriarchs, you’ll never have any hope of attainment.” The monk also asked, “ How can I avoid being deceived by the Buddhas and patriarchs?” Longya said, “You must be enlightened your­ self.” When you get here, you must be like this. 
When you help people, you should do your utmost for them; when you kill people, you must see their blood. 
This is acting according to the imperative. 
“In heaven and on earth, I am the sole honored one. 
(A pair of holeless hammerheads; even the Great Compassionate One with a thousand hands cannot lift them. 
If you take them away, you’ll get a thrashing.) Then the waves are calm in the four seas; (No one in the world dares to move. 
East, west, south, north, all have the same family style. 
Recently there has been much rain.) The hundred rivers return to the ocean tide. 
(Clean and naked, peace and tranquillity in one’s own house is realized; the sea being at rest, the rivers are clear.) The standard of the ancient rod is lofty, with twelve gates; (How does it compare to this one? 
There is no eye on the staff. 
Avoid making a living on the staff.) In each gate is a road, empty and desolate. 
It belies your everyday life. 
If you look, you’ll go blind.) Not desolate— (After all. 
Luckily there’s a place to turn around. 
Already blind—so I strike!) The adept should seek medicine without disease. (Once having died you won’t come back to life again. 
Why are you fast asleep all day long? 
Why search through the heavens and grope over the earth?) Commentary This verse resembles the case of Deshan seeing Guishan: 
first Xuedou adds two turning words, piercing it through on one string; then he produces his verse. 
“ This ‘wrong’ and that ‘wrong’— / It is important not to take them away.” Xuedou means that the “wrong” here and the “wrong” there should not be taken away; you’re mis­ taken if you take them away. 
It is necessary to add this double “wrong” like this, and thus at once you find “The waves are calm in the four seas; / The hundred rivers return to the ocean tide. 
” How pure the wind, how bright the moon! 
If you gain understand­ ing at these two “wrongs,” you will no longer have the slightest concern. 
Mountains are mountains, rivers are rivers, what is long is itself long, what is short is itself short; one breeze in five days, one rainfall in ten days. 
That is why he said, “The waves are calm in the four seas; / The hundred rivers return to the ocean tide.” The latter part eulogizes Magu carrying his staff: 
“ The stan­ dard of the ancient rod is lofty, with twelve gates.” The people of old used a whip for a rod; Chan monks use the staff as a rod. 
The “ancient rod” is the staff; the pure wind is higher than the twelve vermilion gates of the jewel lake of an ancient goddess. 
If you can understand this twofold “wrong, ” then your staff will emit light; even the ancient rod can’t be put to use. 
“In each gate there is a road, empty and desolate.” Though there is a road, it is just that it’s empty. 
Even if you are an adept, when you have no illness, still you must seek a bit of medicine to take. 
Elder Ding Stands Motionless Introduction The ten directions cut off, a thousand eyes abruptly open; when one saying cuts off all streams, myriad impulses cease. 
Are there any who will die together and be born together? 
The issue is at hand, but if you cannot clear it up, please look at the ancients’ complications. 
Story Elder Ding asked Linji, “What is the meaning of Buddhism?” (So many people are at a loss when they get here. 
There is still this. 
Why is he so feebleminded?) Linji got off his seat, grabbed Ding, slapped him, then pushed him away. 
(Today he caught him. He’s very kind. 
No one in the world can leap clear.) Ding stood there motionless. (He’s already fallen into the ghost cave. 
He’s already stumbled past. 
He can’t avoid losing his nostrils.) A monk stand­ ing by said, “Elder Ding, why don’t you bow ?” (On neutral ground there is one who can see through it all; Ding gets his power. 
When someone dies in the eastern house, someone in the western house helps in the mourning.) Just as Ding bowed, (He uses diligence to make up for incompetence.) he suddenly was greatly enlightened. (Like finding a lamp in the dark, like a pauper finding a jewel. 
He adds error to error. 
Tell me, what did he see, that he bowed?) Commentary See how he was; directly leaving, directly entering, directly going, directly coming—this is indeed the true school of Linji, to have such dynamic function. 
If you can go all the way through, then you can overturn the sky and make it into earth, attaining the use of the endowment yourself. 
Elder Ding was such a man; slapped by Linji, as he bowed and rose he immediately understood the ultimate. 
He was a northerner, very simple and direct. 
Subsequently he used the ability of Linji completely, his sharpness unavoidably coming through. 
One day on the road he met Yantou, Xuefeng, and Qinshan. 
Yantou asked where he came from; Ding said Linji. 
Ding recounted this story. 
Qinshan said, “Why did he not say, ‘Not a true person of no station’? 
” Ding grabbed him and said, “How far apart are a true person of no station and not a true person of no station? 
Speak quickly! 
” Qinshan did not speak; his face turned pale. 
” Also, once as Ding was resting on a bridge, he met three pro­ fessor monks. 
One asked, “What is the meaning of the saying, ‘Where the river of Chan is deep, you must plumb the very bot­ tom’? 
Ding said, “If not for you two, I’d have let him plumb the very bottom.” Observe such methods of his. 
These are all the dynamic function of Linji. 
Also look at Xuedou’s verse. 
Verse Huangbo’s entire ability continues in his footsteps; (The Yellow River is muddy from the very source. 
The son inherits the father’s work.) Brought forth, why should it remain at ease? (Where is it? 
What can be done about the fact that there is such a person? 
Can someone without feet or hands attain that?) The great spirit lifted its hand without much ado (It scares people to death. Don’t brag so much. 
Striking once with a whisk, I won’t test any further.) And split apart Flower Mountain’s ten million layers. 
Commentary “Huangbo’s entire ability continues in his footsteps; brought forth, why should it remain at ease?” Only Linji alone continued in the footsteps of Huangbo’s great ability and great function. 
Once it is brought forth, it does not admit of any attempt to discuss it; if you dally, you fall right into the realm of ignorance. 
The Surangama Sutra says, “Just as when I put my finger on it, the ocean seal emits light; if you arouse your minds even mo­ mentarily, anxiety over the material world will come up first.” “ The great spirit lifted its hand without much ado / And split apart Flower Mountain’s ten million layers.” The great spirit of the Yellow River had great powers; with its hand it broke open Flower Mountain and let the water run through. 
Elder Ding’s feel­ ing of doubt was like a massive mountain; struck once by Linji, at once he found it had shattered and dissolved. 
Zifu’s Circle Introduction He does not discriminate east from west, nor south from north, morning to evening, evening to morning; but can you say he is asleep? 
Sometimes he calls south north; but is he mindful or mind­ less? 
If you can pass through here, for the first time you will know the ultimate, and then you will know how the ancients were so or not so. 
Tell me, what time is this? 
Story Chen Cao went to see Zifu. 
When Zifu saw him coming, he im­ mediately drew a circle. 
(This is a spirit recognizing a spirit, a thief recognizing a thief. 
If he were not relaxed and at ease, how could he discern this fellow? 
This old thief!) Zifu thereupon closed the door. (A thief does not break into a poor man’s house. 
He has already entered the other’s cage.) Xuedou said, “Chen Cao has just one eye.” (Xuedou has an eye on his forehead. 
But what does he mean? 
He should give him another circle. 
Chen Cao has a dragon’s head but a snake’s tail; he should have given Zifu such a reply that he would have had no gate to advance through and no road to retreat upon. 
But what further pressure could he bring to bear?) Commentary Ministry president Chen Cao was a contemporary of Pei Xiu and Li Ao. 
Whenever he saw a monk come, he would first invite him to a meal and would give him three hundred cash, wishing thereby to test the monk. 
What is the meaning of the teachings?” Chen was speechless. 
Yunmen said, “I hear you’ve read the Lotus Sutra; is this true?” Chen said it was. 
A real monk abandons scriptures and treatises to enter a Chan com­ munity, and can do nothing even after ten or twenty years; so how could you, ministry president, be able to understand?” Chen bowed and apologized. 
Also one day when Chen was up in a tower with a group of officials, they saw several monks coming. 
The monks raised their heads. 
One day he went to see Zifu, who drew a circle on seeing him approach. 
Zifu was an adept in the Gui-Yang line and always liked to use objects to deal with people. 
This kind of story is called discerning the target without words, concealing ability within a phrase. 
Xuedou says, “Chen Cao has just one eye.” Xuedou may be said to have the eye on the fore­ head. 
But what does he mean? 
Zifu should have produced another circle; but if he always acted like this, how could a Chan practitio­ ner benefit others? 
Verse Round and round the jewel turns, ringing like jade— (He tries to stir the Yellow River with a three foot pole. 
Made of cast iron.) Horses carry it; asses bear it; load it on an iron ship; (Why do you need so many for? 
What limit is there? 
If one is a real unconcerned traveler, one has no use for it. 
But you must be a traveler without concern before you will get it.) When fishing for a tortoise, he lets down a cage-trap. 
If it is a frog, what is the use of it? 
What’s to be done about prawns, mussels, snails, and oysters? 
It is necessary to hook a tortoise.) No Chan practitioner in the world can jump out. 
All are buried in the same pit. 
Can you manage to jump out yourself?) 172c Commentary “Round and round the jewel turns, ringing like jade— / Horses carry it; asses bear it; load it on an iron ship.” The beginning of Xuedou’s poem just eulogizes the circle. 
If you can merge with it, you’ll be like a tiger with horns. 
This bit requires you to break through your limitations, to end mental machinations; discard gain and loss, right and wrong, all at once, do not make your under­ standing in terms of principle anymore, and do not understand it as a mysterious wonder. 
Ultimately, how to understand? 
This must be carried by horses, borne by asses, loaded on an iron ship. 
Anyplace else it cannot be imparted; it must be shared with an unconcerned traveler of sea and mountain. 
Here you must not be affected by things or nothing, by unpleasant feel­ ings or pleasing situations, or by Buddhas or patriarchs; only then can you take it up properly. 
If there is any Chan to seek, any mea­ sure of profane or holy feelings, you will surely not be able to fully attain mastery. 
In fishing for tortoises, only a cage will do. 
That is why Fengxue said, “Used to fishing for whales, I scour the ocean but am disap­ pointed by a frog crawling in the mud.” He also said, “O great tortoise, do not carry away the three mountains! 
I want to walk on the summit of the isle of immortals.” Xuedou also said, “No Chan practitioners in the world can leap out.” If one is a great tortoise, one will not entertain the view of a Chan practitioner; if one is a Chan practitioner, one will not entertain the view of a great tortoise. 
L Story Yangshan asked a monk, “Where have you just come from ?” (Ev­ eryone in the world is the same. 
Still it is necessary to ask. 
This is using the wind to fan the fire. 
He will inevitably construe it in the ordinary way.) The monk said, “Mt. 
” (A truthful person is hard to find.) Yangshan said, “ Did you visit Five Elders Peak?” (He naturally swings his arms as he walks. 
How could he have ever passed it by?) The monk said, “I didn’t get there.” (Take a step. 
Honest speech is better than a red face. 
He seems to be at a loss.) Yangshan said, “You never visited the mountain at all.” (Too much ado! 
What is the old guy’s hurry?) Yunmen said, “These words were all because of com­ passion; thus they had a conversation in the weeds. 
” (The sword that kills, the sword that gives life. 
Two, three. 
If you want to know the mountain road, you must be one who travels on it.) Commentary 173a The point of testing people is to know them intimately as soon as they speak. 
An ancient said, “Immeasurably great people are turned about in the stream of speech.” If you are one who has the eye on the forehead, as soon as it is being brought up you know the point. 
See their question and answer; each is distinctly clear. 
Why did Yunmen say these words were all for compassion, so they had a conversation in the weeds? 
When the ancients got here, they were like a clear mirror, reflecting whatever comes just as it is; nothing could get past their scrutiny. 
How was it that there was a conversation in the weeds because of compassion? 
This monk had come from Mt. Lu; why did Yangshan say he had never visited the mountain? 
One day Guishan asked Yangshan, “When there are monks com­ ing from various places, what do you use to test them?” Yangshan said he had a way, and Guishan asked him to show it. 
When he said, “ Did you get to Five Elders Peak?” if that monk had been a real man, he would simply have said, “Disaster. 
In­ stead he said, “I didn’t get there.” Since the monk was not an adept, why did Yangshan not act according to the rule, so as to avoid the many complications that subsequently appeared? 
Instead he said, “You never visited the mountain.” That is why Yunmen said, “These words were all because of compassion, thus they had a con­ versation in the weeds.” Were it talk outside the weeds, it would not be like this. 
Verse Leaving the weeds, entering the weeds; (Above and below, vast expanse. 
Half open, half closed. 
He is so and I am so too.) Who knows how to seek them out? 
He puts another head on top of his head.) Red sun, clear and bright. (It’s broken through. 
As soon as you lift your eyes you miss it.) Looking to the left, there are no flaws; (Blind! 
As before, there’s nothing the matter. 
He traveled so swiftly; Ten years he couldn’t return And forgot the road by which he came. 
Better not act so lost.) Commentary “Leaving the weeds, entering the weeds; / Who knows how to seek them out?” Xuedou after all knows where they are; when he gets there, he upholds with one hand and pushed down with the other. 
“White clouds, layer upon layer; / Red sun, clear and bright. 
” This 173b is much like “Grasses in profusion, mist overhanging.” At this point there is nothing at all profane or holy. 
The whole world has never concealed It; each particular cannot cover It. 
This is called the realm of no mind; when cold it doesn’t feel cold, and when hot it doesn’t feel hot—the whole thing is one great door of libera­ tion. 
“Looking to the left, there are no flaws; / Looking to the right, already old.” Master Lazy Can dwelt in seclusion in a stone grotto on Mt. 
The emissary went to his grotto and made the announce­ ment, “The emperor has summoned you; rise and give thanks for his favor.” Just then Can poked into his ox-dung fire, took out a yam and ate it; his nose ran, dripping from his chin. 
The emissary laughed and said, “I suggest you wipe off that snot.” Can said, “What leisure do I have to wipe snot for a worldly man?” After all he never went to the capital. 
The emissary returned and reported this; Suzong praised him highly. 
Someone so pure and calm, so clear and direct as this, is not at the disposal of others; he just holds still, as though made of cast iron. 
It is just like the case of Shandao, who after being laicized never again became a monk; people called him “the stone grotto worker.” When he treaded the pestle, he forgot the movement of his feet. 
A monk asked Linji, “What is the meaning of the stone grotto worker’s forgetting the movement of his feet?” Linji said, “Sunken in a deep pit.” Fayan’s verse on Perfect Nature reads: 
When reason is exhausted, feelings and thoughts are forgotten; How could there be any adequate comparison? 
Wherever I go there’s the frosty night’s moon; It falls as it may into the valley ahead. 
The fruits ripe, they are heavy with monkeys; The mountains go on so long, it seems I’ve lost my way. 
As I look up, there is some light remaining— Actually this is west of my dwelling place. 
Xuedou said, “ Have you not seen the man of Cold Mountain? 
/ He traveled so swiftly; / For ten years he couldn’t return / And forgot the road by which he came.” In one of the Cold Mountain Man s poems it says, “If you want a place to rest your body, / You can preserve it long on Cold Mountain. 
The gentle wind blows in the dense pines; / Heard from nearby the sound is even better. 
For ten years he couldn’t return / And forgot the road by which he came.” Yongjia also said, “ Mind is the sense, phenomena the ob­ jects; both are like flaws in a mirror. 
When the defilement of the flaws is gone, only then does the light appear; when mind and phenomena are both forgotten, nature is identical to reality. 
When you get here, be like a simpleton, and you will see this story. 
Manjusrl and Wuzhuo Introduction Determining dragons and snakes, distinguishing jewels and stones, separating the initiate and the naive, to settle all uncer­ tainty; if you haven’t an eye on your forehead and a talisman at your side, time and again you will miss the point. 
Right now see­ ing and hearing are not obscured, sound and form are purely real. 
Tell me, is it black, is it white, is it crooked, is it straight? 
Why should he hoist it onto his eyebrows? 
There is nothing outside the great vastness; why is there nevertheless a south?) Manjusrl said, “How is Buddhism faring in the south?” (If he asked someone else, a disaster would happen. 
It still lingers on his teeth and lips.) Wuzhuo said, “Monks of the last age have little regard for discipline.” (A truthful person is hard to find.) Manjusrl said, “ How large are the congregations?” (At that moment I would immediately give him a shout. 
With one nudge he pushes him over.) Wuzhuo said, “Some three hundred, some live hundred.” (They are all wild fox spirits. 
After all he’s let slip.) Wuzhuo asked Manjusrl, “How is Buddhism faring here?” (He asks back; he turns the spear around and comes back with it.) Manjusrl said, “Ordinary people and sages dwell together, dragons and snakes intermingle.” (He’s suffered quite a loss. 
In fact he’s frantic.) Wuzhuo said, “ How large are the congre­ gations?” Manjusrl said, “In front three by three, in back three by three. 
Tell me, how many are they? 
Even the Great Com­ passionate One with a thousand hands could not count them all.) Commentary When Wuzhuo was visiting Mt. 
Wutai, he came to a wild, isolated place. 
There Manjusri produced a temple to take him in for the night. 
He asked where he came from, and Wuzhuo said the south. 
Manjusri said, “What do they usually use to drink tea?” Wuzhuo was speechless. 
Finally he left, and Manjusri had a servant boy see him to the gate. 
When they got to the gate, Wuzhuo asked the boy, “Just now he said, ‘In front three by three, in back three by three’ —how many is this?” The boy said, “O Worthy!” Wuzhuo said, “Yes?” The boy said, “How many is this?” Wuzhuo also asked what temple this was. 
The boy pointed beyond the statue of the thunderbolt bearer; when Wuzhuo turned his head, the magical temple and the boy had vanished—it was just an empty valley. 
Later that place was called the Thunderbolt Cave. 
A monk asked Fengxue, “What is the master of Wutai?” He said, “One statement did not settle Wuzhuo’s question; to this day he is still a monk who sleeps in the fields.” If you want to penetrate the peaceful equanimity of actual truth, so that your feet tread on the real earth, get attainment at Wuzhuo’s words; then naturally you may stay in a boiling caul­ dron or in the coals of a furnace without feeling hot and may stay on ice without feeling cold. 
If you want to go through to use solitary sternness, like an adamantine diamond sword, get attainment at Manjusri’s words; then naturally water cannot wet, wind cannot penetrate. 
Some say Wuzhuo’s answers were wrong, while in Manjusri’s answers there is both snake and dragon, both ordinary and sage. 
What bearing does this have on it? 
Can you clearly discern three by three in front, three by three in back? 
The first arrow was still light; the second arrow went deep. 
Tell me, how many is this? 
If you can pass through here, then a thousand or ten thousand statements are only one statement. 
If at this one statement you can cut off and hold still, in the next moment you will reach this realm. 
Verse The thousand peaks twist and turn, the color of indigo; Who says Manjusri was conversing with him? (Even if it were Samantabhadra, I wouldn’t pay any attention. 
He’s already stumbled past.) It’s laughable, “ How many the people?” on Wutai; (What is he laughing at? 
It’s already there before saying it.) In front three by three, in back three by three. (Please observe it right where you are. 
There are thorns in the soft mud. 
The tea bowl falls to the ground; the saucer breaks in seven pieces.) Commentary “The thousand peaks twist and turn, blue as indigo; / Who says Manjusri was conversing with him ?” Some say Xuedou is just re­ iterating it without versifying it. 
It is like when a monk asked Fayan, “What is a drop of water from the source of the Chan stream?” Fayan said, “A drop of water from the source of the Chan stream.” And a monk asked Huijiao, “ How does fundamental purity give rise to mountains, rivers, and earth?” Huijiao said, “ How does fun­ damental purity give rise to mountains, rivers, and earth?” You cannot say either that these are just repetitions. 
Mingzhao also versified the meaning of this, with the ability to cover heaven and earth: 
Unable to open the enlightened eye at his words, Wuzhuo turned and saw only the blue mountain crags. 
“Extending throughout the world, the beautiful temple” refers to the magical temple nestled in the weeds. 
This is what is called having ability to carry out both provisional and real together. 
The Manjusri filling the eyes is talking; if you don’t know how to open the enlightened eye at his words, when you turn your head you’ll only see the blue mountain crags. 
At such a time, could you call it the realm of Manjusri, Samantabhadra, or Avalokitesvara? 
In es­ sence it is not this principle. 
Xuedou just changes Mingzhao’s us­ age; instead he has a needle and thread—“ Ten thousand peaks twist and turn, blue as indigo.” He does not damage the point or hurt his hand. 
Within the phrase there is the provisional, there is the real; there is principle, there is phenomena. 
Who says Manjusri was conversing with him? 
They talked all night, but he didn’t know it was Manjusri. 
Later Wuzhuo stayed on Mt. 
Every time Manjusri appeared over the rice pot, Wuzhuo hit him with the ladle. 
Still, this is drawing the bow after the thief is gone. 
This time, as soon as he said, “How is Buddhism faring in the south?” he should have hit him on the spine; then he would have gotten somewhere. 
“ It’s laughable, ‘How many the people?’ on Wutai.” There is a sword in Xuedou’s laughter. 
If you can understand what he’s laugh­ ing about, you will see the saying, “In front three by three, in back three by three.” mb36. 
On return­ ing, when he got to the gate, (Today, one day. 
He has only fallen into the weeds; at first he was falling into the weeds, later he was still falling into the weeds.) the head monk asked, “Where have you been?” (He still wants to try the old guy. 
He’s suffered quite a loss. 
Had he gone anywhere, he couldn’t avoid falling into the weeds. 
They drag each other into a pit of fire.) Changsha said, “First I went pursuing the fragrant grasses; then I returned following the falling flowers.” (He’s let slip quite a bit. 
All along he’s just been sitting in a forest of thorns.) The monk said, “ How very much like the sense of springtime.” (He comes following along, adding error to error; one hand holds up, one hand presses down.) Changsha said, “It is even cooler than the autumn dew dripping on the lo­ tuses.” (He adds mud to dirt. 
The first arrow was light; the second arrow went deep. 
What end will there ever be?) Xuedou added, “Thanks for your reply.” (A bunch of people playing with a mud ball. 
The three have their crimes listed on the same indictment.) Commentary Changsha was a spiritual heir of Nanquan, a contemporary of Zhaozhou and Zihu. 
if anyone asked about scrip­ ture, he would explain scripture; if someone wanted a verse, he would produce a verse. 
Yangshan was usually considered foremost in intellect. 
Once as he was enjoying the moon along with Changsha, he pointed at the moon and said, “Everyone has this; it’s just that they can’t use it.” Changsha said, “Quite true. 
” Hence people later called Changsha “The Tiger. 
” One day as Changsha returned from a stroll in the mountains, the head monk, one of his disciples, asked, “Where have you been?” Changsha said, “Roaming in the mountains.” The monk asked, “Where did you g o?” Changsha said, “First I went following the fragrant grasses; then I returned pursuing the falling flowers.” Only one who occupies the universe can be like this. 
The ancients, in their comings and goings, never failed to be mindful of this matter. 
See how the host and guest shift positions together; con­ fronting the situation directly, neither defers to the other. 
Since he was roaming in the mountains, why did the monk ask where he went? 
Had he been one of today’s Chan followers, he would have said, “I came to the inn on Mt. 
This too falls on both sides but ultimately does not remain on either side. 
Once a scholar, Zhang Zhuo, having read the Sutra o f the Thousand Names o f the Buddha, asked, “Of the hundreds and thousands of Buddhas, I have only heard their names; what lands do they dwell in, and do they teach or not? 
Verse The earth is clear of dust— (Open up the doors and windows—who is under the eaves? 
None can miss this. 
The world is at peace.) Whose eyes do not open? (One must radiate great light from the forehead before this is possible. 
Why scatter dirt and sand?) First he went following the fragrant grasses, (He’s slipped quite a bit. 
It’s not just one instance of falling into the weeds. 
Luckily it happens he already said this before.) Then he returned pursuing the falling flowers. (Everywhere is completely real. 
Luckily he came back. 
Under his feet the mud is three feet deep.) A weary crane alights on an evergreen tree; (Accompanying him left and right, he adds a phrase. 
Still there are so many idle concerns?) A mad monkey cries on an ancient terrace. 
It is impossible either to add a phrase or to take one away.) Changsha’s boundless meaning— (I strike. 
What does the final phrase say? 
Bury them all in one pit. 
He’s fallen into a ghost cave.) Tch! 
(A man in the weeds. 
This is drawing the bow after the thief is gone. 
At this point, mental machinations must come to an end, and conscious knowledge forgotten, so that you have no leaking at all over the mountains, rivers, earth, plants, people, and animals. 
If you are not thus, the ancients called that still remaining in an aesthetic realm. 
You must further realize that there is a time when the whole thing is brought up, the single opening upward; only then can you sit in peace.” If you can pass through, then as before mountains are mountains, rivers are riv­ ers; each abides in its own state, each occupies its own body. 
You will be as though blind. 
The cock crows in the early morning; Sadly I see as I rise how worn out I am; I haven’t a kilt or a shirt, Just the semblance of a robe. 
My loincloth has no seat, my pants no opening— On my head are three or five pecks of grey ashes. 
If one can truly reach this realm, whose eyes would not open? 
Though you go through upsets and spills, all places are this realm, all places are this time. 
“The ten directions are without walls, the four quarters without gates.” That is why he said, First I went following the fragrant grasses; then I returned pursuing the fall­ ing flowers.” Skillful indeed, Xuedou just adds a phrase to his left and a phrase to his right, just like a poem. 
“A weary crane alights on an evergreen tree; / A mad monkey cries on an ancient terrace. 
” When Xuedou has drawn it out this far, he realizes how he has indulged himself; suddenly he says, “Changsha’s boundless meaning— / Tch!” This was like having a dream but suddenly awakening. 
Changsha’s bound­ less meaning —dig out the ground and bury it deeper. 
There’s Nothing in the World Introduction It’s futile to linger in thought over action like a lightning bolt; when thunder fills the sky, you will hardly have time to cover your ears. 
To unfurl the red flag of victory over your head, whirl twin swords behind your ears—if not for a discerning eye and a familiar hand, how could anyone succeed? 
Some people lower their heads and linger in thought, trying to figure it out with their in­ tellect; they hardly realize they are seeing countless ghosts in front of their skulls. 
Story Panshan said, “There is nothing in the world; (Once the arrow has left the bowstring, it has no power to come back. 
The moon’s bright­ ness shines, revealing the night traveler. 
One who knows the law fears it. 
He ought to have been hit before he finished talk­ ing.) where can mind be found?” (Best not fool people. 
It’s not worth bringing up again. 
Examine for yourself. 
He himself had one succes­ sor, Puhua. 
When Panshan was about to pass on, he said to his group, “Is there anyone who can depict my true likeness?” They all drew likenesses and presented them, but Panshan scolded ev­ ery one. 
Puhua came forth and said, “I can depict it.” Panshan said, “Why not show m e?” Puhua turned a somersault and left. 
Pan­ shan said, “Later on this guy will appear crazy to teach others.” One day he said, “There is nothing in the world; where can mind be found? 
The polar star does not move; it is quiet and still, with no tracks. 
Once it is presented face to face, there is nothing else.” Xuedou takes up two lines and eulogizes them; this is raw gold, a jewel in the rough. 
Have you not heard it said that curing illness does not take a donkey load of medicine? 
Just because he was wearing fetters, giving evidence of his crime. 
An ancient said, “When you hear mention of the statement beyond sound, do not seek it in your mind.” What did he mean? 
Just like a rushing stream crossing a sword; thunder peals, a comet flies _ if you dally and seek it in thought, even though a thousand Buddhas appeared in the world you would grope around without finding. 
But if you have deeply entered the inner sanctum, pierced the bone to the marrow, seen all the way through, then Panshan will have suffered a loss. 
If you are muddy and wet, revolving in a pile of sound and form, you have still never seen Panshan even in a dream. 
Let go naturally; there is neither going nor abiding in essence.” If here you say there is neither Buddha nor Dharma, still you have gone into a ghost cave. 
The ancients called this the deep pit of liberation. 
Originally it was a good cause, but it brings on a bad result. 
That is why it is said that an uncontrived, unconcerned person is still oppressed by golden chains. 
Still, you must have penetrated all the way to the bottom before you will realize it. 
If you can say what cannot be said, do what cannot be done, this is called the turning point. 
There is nothing in the world; where can mind be found? 
If you make an intellectual interpreta­ tion, you will just die at his words. 
See for yourself. 
I strike and say, “What is this?”) The white clouds form a canopy; (Adding a head to a head. 
A thousand layers, myriad layers.) The flowing spring makes a lute— (Hear it? 
They come along together. 
Each hearing is enough to lament.) One tune, two tunes; no one understands. (It is not in A or B, not D or E. 
He is going by a side road. 
All notes and tones are distinctly clear. 
Take what’s yours and go. 
When you listen you go deaf.) When the rain has passed, the autumn water is deep in the evening pond. (The thunder is so swift there’s no time to cover the ears. 
After all he’s muddy and wet. 
Where is he? 
Immediately I strike.) Commentary “There is nothing in the world; / Where can mind be found? 
” Xuedou makes a verse that resembles the Flower Ornament Cosmos. 
Xuedou drapes two phrases around Panshan, saying, “The white clouds form a canopy; / The flowing spring makes a lute.” When Su Dongpo, the imperial scholar, saw Zhaojiao, he wrote: 
The sound of the valley stream is the eternal tongue; Are not the colors of the mountains the pure body? 
Last night, eighty-four thousand verses; How could I quote them to others another day? 
Xuedou borrows the flowing spring to make a vast tongue; so he says, “One tune, two tunes; no one understands.” Jiufeng said, “Do you know life? 
The flowing spring is life, profound stillness is the body. 
Thousands of ripples arising at once is the way of Manjusri; one continuous clear sky is the realm of Samantabhadra. 
” “ The flowing spring makes a lute/ One tune, two tunes; no one understands the harmony of this tune requires you to be a connoisseur before you can appreciate it. 
If you are not such a person, it is useless to take the trouble to incline an ear to it. 
If you see after the indications are distinct, you fall into conceptualization. 
Xuedou is very compassionate and goes on to say to you that it is like “When the rain has passed, the autumn water is deep in the evening pond. 
” This verse has been discussed and judged by some­ one who praised Xuedou for having the talent of an imperial scholar. 
“The rain passed, the autumn water is deep in the evening pond.” Still you must look quickly; if you tarry in doubt, you will look without seeing. 
If we discuss the sudden, it doesn’t leave a hint of a trace, a thousand sages cannot find it. 
To a quick person, one word; to a quick horse, one stroke of the whip. 
Story Fengxue said in a lecture at the government headquarters in Ying prefecture, The Chan mind seal is formed like the workings of the iron ox:” (Ten thousand people cannot budge it. 
Where is the impenetrable difficulty? 
The seal of the three essentials opens, without running afoul of the point.) “when taken away, the impression remains;” “when left there, the impression is ruined. 
Immediately I strike.) “But if neither removed nor left there,” “is sealing right or is not sealing right?” (Everyone in the world appears and disappears. 
The design is already showing. 
But I ask that you turn over the meditation seat and disperse the assembly with shouts.) A certain elder Lupi then came forth and said, “I have the workings of the iron ox: 
Nevertheless, he’s unusual.) “please do not im­ press the seal. 
” Fengxue said, “Accustomed to scouring the oceans fishing for whales, I re­ gret to find instead a frog crawling in the mud.” (Like a falcon catching a pigeon. 
The jewel net extends throughout space. 
The wonder horse runs a thousand miles.) Lupi stood there thinking. (What a pity. 
Still, there’s a place for him to come forth; what a pity to let it go.) Fengxue shouted and said, “Elder, why do you not speak further?” (He captures the flag and steals the drum. 
The boiling turmoil has come.) Lupi hesitated. (Three times he has died. 
A double case.) Fengxue hit him with his whisk. (Well struck. 
This order requires such a person to carry it out.) Fengxue said, “Do you still remember the words? 
Try to quote them.” (What is the need? 
He adds frost to snow.) As Lupi was about to speak, (Once having died, he won’t come to life again. 
He runs afoul of Fengxue.) Fengxue hit him again with the whisk. 
The governor said, “ The Buddhist law and the royal law are the same.” (Clearly. 
After all they’ve been seen through by a bystander.) Fengxue said, “What principle have you seen?” (A good rejoinder; he turns the spear around and comes back with it.) The governor said, “When you do not settle what is to be settled, you bring on disorder. 
Still you must realize the bystander has eyes. 
When someone in the eastern house dies, someone of the western house helps in the mourning.) Fengxue thereupon stepped down from his seat. (He adds error to error. 
Seeing the situation, he adjusts. 
Now the task of study is completed.) Commentary Fengxue was an adept in the Linji line. 
When Linji was in Huang bo’s community, once as he was planting pine trees, Huangbo said to him, “Why plant so many pine trees here, deep in the moun­ tains?” Linji said, “For one thing, to provide scenery for the mon­ astery; second, to make a signpost for people of later generations.” Then he hoed the ground. 
Huangbo said, “With you my school will flourish in the world.” Dagui Zhe said, “Linji in his way seemed to invite trouble in a peaceful area; nevertheless, only when immutable in the face of danger can one be called a real man. 
When Huangbo said, W ith you my school will flourish in the world,’ he seemed to be so fond of his child that he was unaware of being unseemly. 
“As Linji entered the hall, the head monks of both halls simultaneously shouted. 
A monk asked Linji, ‘Are there guest and host?’ Linji said, ‘Guest and host are evi­ dent.’ ” Fengxue asked about the meaning of this; Xuefeng said, “In the past I went with Yantou and Qinshan to see Linji; on the way we heard he had already passed on. 
If you want to under­ stand his talk about guest and host, you should visit adepts in the stream of his school.” 176b One day he finally saw Nanyuan. 
” Once he saw Jingqing, who asked him, “Where have you come from ?” Fengxue said, “From the east.” Jingqing said, “And did you cross the little river?” Fengxue said, “ The great ship sails alone through the sky; there are no little rivers to cross. 
” Jingqing said, “Birds cannot fly across a mirror lake and a picture mountain; have you not merely overheard another’s remark?” Fengxue said, “Even the sea fears the power of a warship; sails flying through the sky, it crosses the five lakes. 
” Fengxue said, “If I leave, I lose. 
” Then he went out; when he got to the teaching hall, he said to himself, “Big man, the case is not yet finished; how can you quit?” Then he went back to the abbot’s room. 
” Fengxue said, “Xuedou actually lies east of Baogai.” Jingqing said, “ If you don’t chase the lost goat, crazy interpretations cease. 
Instead you come here and recite poems.” Fengxue said, “When you meet a swordsman on the road, you should show your sword; do not offer poetry to one who is not a poet.” Jingqing said, “Put the poetry away now and try to use your sword a little.” Fengxue said, “A decapitated man carried the sword away.” Jingqing said, “You not only violate the method of the teaching; you also show your own fatheadedness.” Fengxue said, “ Unless I violate the method J38. 
The Workings of the Iron Ox of teaching, how could I understand the mind of the ancient Bud­ dhas?” Fengxue said, “Again you grant your allowance; now what do you have?” Jingqing said, “ This monk cannot distinguish beans from wheat. 
I have only heard of ending without finishing; how can you finish by forcing an end?” Fengxue said, “ The immense billows rise a thousand fathoms; the clear waves are not other than water.” Jingqing said, “When one phrase cuts off the flow, myriad impulses cease.” Fengxue thereupon bowed. 
Now sit and have tea.” When Fengxue first came to Nanyuan, he entered the door without bowing. 
Nanyuan said, “When you enter the door, you should discern the host.” Fengxue said, “I ask the teacher to make a definite distinction.” Nanyuan slapped his knee with his left hand. 
Nanyuan slapped his knee with his right hand. 
Nanyuan raised his left hand and said, “This one I concede to you.” Then he raised his right hand and said, “ But what about this one?” Fengxue said, “Blind!” Nanyuan then raised his staff. 
Fengxue said, “What are you doing? 
” See how an excellent student is naturally sharp. 
Even Nanyuan couldn’t handle him. 
The next day, Nanyuan just posed an ordi­ nary question: 
He worked as the gardener in Nanyuan’s community. 
One day Nanyuan came to the garden and asked, “How do they assess the staff in the south?” He said, “ They make a special assessment. 
How do they assess it here?” Nanyuan raised his staff and said, “Under the staff, acceptance of birthlessness; facing the situation without deferring to a teacher. 
” At this Fengxue was greatly enlightened. 
At this time the five dynasties were divided and at war. 
The governor of Ying prefecture invited Fengxue to pass the summer there. 
The school of Linji flourished at this time. 
Whenever he questioned and answered, or gave out pointers, invariably his words were sharp and fresh, colorful and ornate, always with a point. 
One day the governor requested Fengxue to teach the assem­ bly. 
He said, “The Chan mind seal is formed like the workings of the iron ox. 
Removed, the impression remains; left, the impres­ sion is ruined. 
But if you neither take it away nor keep it there, is it right to use the seal or n ot?” Why is it not like the workings of a stone man or a wooden horse, only like the workings of an iron ox? 
There is no way for you to move it. 
As soon as you go the seal remains; as soon as you stop, the seal is broken, causing you to shatter into fragments. 
But if you neither go nor stay, should you use the seal or not? 
See how he gives out indications; you might say there is bait on the hook. 
Elder Lupi, who was in the audience, was also an adept in the Linji line. 
“I have the workings of an iron ox; I ask you not to impress the seal. 
Fengxue was an adept; he immediately replied, “Accustomed to scouring the oceans fishing for whales, I regret to find instead a frog crawling in the mud.” And there is an echo in the words. 
Yunmen said, “ Trailing a hook in the four seas, just fishing for a terrible dragon; the mysterious device beyond con­ vention is to seek out those who understand the self.” In the ocean, twelve buffalo carcasses are used as bait for the hooks; instead he has just snagged a frog. 
But there is nothing mysterious or wonderful in these words; and neither is there any rationalization. 
An ancient said, “It is easy to see in the phenom­ ena; if you try to figure it out in your mind, you will lose contact. 
“Seeing it, if you don’t take it, it will be hard to find again even in a thousand years.” What a pity. 
That is why it is said, “Even if you can explain a thousand scrip­ tures and commentaries, it is hard to utter a statement appropri­ ate to the moment.” The fact is that Lupi was searching for a good saying to an­ swer Fengxue; he didn’t want to carry out the order, and suffered Fengxue’s unilateral use of the ability to take over. 
He was unre­ mittingly pressed back and simply couldn’t do anything. 
As a prov­ erb says, “When an army is defeated, it can’t be swept up with a straw broom.” In the very beginning it is still necessary to seek a tactic to oppose the adversary, but if you wait till you’ve come up with one, your head will have fallen to the ground. 
The governor too had studied a long time with Fengxue; he knew to say, “The Buddhist law and the royal law are the same.” Fengxue said, “What have you seen? 
He knew how to explain the Dharma according to the situation; if it did not ac­ cord with the situation, it would just be false talk. 
He thereupon left the seat. 
Verse Having caught Lupi, he makes him mount the iron ox; (Among myriad people he still wants to show his skill. 
The general of a beaten army needn’t be decapitated a second time.) The spear and armor of the three profundities have never been easily opposed. (The one whose move it is is confused. 
He accepts disaster as if receiving good fortune and accepts submission as if encountering opposition.) By the castle of the King of Chu, the tidal water— (What tidal water are you talking about? 
Vastly extensive, it fills heaven and earth. 
Even were it the four seas, he would still reverse their flow.) Shouting once, he caused its flow to turn back. (This one shout not only cuts off your tongue; oh! 
it startles the iron ox into a run and frightens the colossus to death.) Commentary mb Xuedou knew Fengxue to have such a style, so he eulogized him by saying, “Having caught Lupi, he mounts him on the iron ox; / The spear and armor of the three profundities have never been easily opposed. 
” In the Linji tradition there are three profundities and three essentials: 
within any one statement there must be in­ herent three profundities; in one profundity there must be inherent three essentials. 
Expedients do not go against the ability to cut off the streams.” The monk asked, “What is the tertiary statement?” Linji said, “Just observe the playing of the puppet on the stage; the pulling of the strings depends on the person behind the scenes.” In one statement of Fengxue, he is immediately equipped with the spear and armor of the three profundities; fully equipped, he is not easy to oppose. 
Were he not so, how could he have handled Lupi? 
Finally Xuedou wants to bring out the active edge of the Linji line. 
Introduction One who can take action on the road is like a tiger in the moun­ tains; one immersed in worldly understanding is like a monkey in a cage. 
If you want to know the meaning of the Buddha nature, observe time and conditions. 
If you want to smelt pure gold that has been refined a hundred times, you need the forge and bellows of a master. 
Tell me, when the great function appears, what can be used to test it? 
Story A monk asked Yunmen, “What is the pure body of reality?” (He sees the sixteen-foot gold body of the Buddha in a heap of dust. 
Mottled and mixed up; what is it?) Yunmen said, “A flowering hedge.” (If the point of the question is not real, the answer comes across crude. 
The bent does not hide the straight.) The monk asked, “What is it like when one goes on just so?” Yunmen said, “A golden-haired lion.” (He is both praising and cen­ suring; two faces, one die. 
He meets error with error—what is go­ ing on in his mind?) Commentary Do you know the point of these questions and answers? 
If you do, the two speakers are alike without a single tongue. 
If you don’t, you won’t avoid being fatheaded. 
Yunmen was not the same as others. 
Some people say he was answering at random; but if you understand it this way, then tell me where Yunmen is. 
This was a household affair; don’t try to figure it out from outside. 
” He speaks immediately where life springs forth; if you try to deliberate and seek it in thought, immediately you have fallen into the secondary. 
Yongjia said, “When the body of reality awakens fully, there is not a single thing; the inherent nature of the original source is the natural real Buddha. 
” Yunmen tested this monk; the monk was also a member of his household and was a longtime student. 
He knew the business of the household, so he went on to say, “What is it like to go on just so?” Yunmen said, “A golden-haired lion.” But tell me, is this agree­ ing or not? 
Is this praising or censuring? 
Yantou said, “If you en­ gage in battle, each individual stands in a pivotal position.” It is also said, “Study the living word, not the dead word. 
If you under­ stand the living word you will never forget; if you understand at the dead word, you will be unable to save yourself. 
” Another monk asked Yunmen, “Is it true that the Buddha Dharma is like the moon in the water?” Yunmen said, “ There is no way through the clear waves.” The monk went on, “ How did you manage?” Yunmen said, “Where does this second question come from ?” The monk said, “How is it when going on just so?” Yunmen said, “Further complications block the mountain path. 
” You must realize that this matter is not in words; like sparks, like lightning, whether you reach it or not, you still will not avoid losing your life. 
Verse A flowering hedge; Don’t be fatheaded! 
He still talks about principle.) “ Then just be so” — How pointless! (Take what’s coming to you and get out. 
Clearly. You should not mistakenly blame Yunmen.) A golden haired lion—everyone look! (He lets out one or a half. Still they are dogs. 
Yunmen is also a man from the land of thieves escorting a thief.) Commentary Xuedou sizes up the audience to give his order; making the harpstrings vibrate, he distinguishes the tune. 
With each phrase he continues the judgment. 
This verse is not at variance with the form for quoting the ancients. 
In the water there is no moon; the moon is in the sky. 
This is like the marks being on the balance arm, not on the scale pan. 
But tell me, which is the balance? 
If you can discern it clearly, you will not turn away from Xuedou. 
When that ancient got to this point, he was indeed compas­ sionate. 
“It’s not here, it’s over there.” But tell me, what place is that “over there”? 
This finishes the eulogiz­ ing of the first statements; afterward he versifies the monk’s say­ ing, “What is it like when one goes on just so?” Xuedou says this monk still has no point. 
Tell me, is this meeting in light or meet­ ing in darkness? 
“A golden-haired lion— everyone look!” Do you see the golden-haired lion? 
Introduction i78a Cease and desist; then an iron tree blooms with flowers. 
But tell me, where is his error? 
Story Talking with Nanquan, Officer Lu Xuan said, “Master Sengzhao said, ‘Heaven and earth and I have the same root, myriad things and I are one body.’ This is quite marvelous.” (He’s living in a ghost cave. 
A picture of a cake cannot satisfy hunger. 
This is also haggling in the weeds.) Nanquan pointed to a flower in the gar­ den. 
For scriptures there are teachers of scriptures, for treatises there are teachers of treatises—it’s no business of a Chan monk. 
A powerful man in that instance would have uttered a pivotal word and not only cut off Nanquan but thereby caused all the Chan practitioners to show some en­ ergy.) He called to the officer and said, “People these days see this flower as a dream.” (When the embroidered ducks are done, you may look at them, but do not give the golden needle away to any­ one. 
Don’t talk in your sleep. 
You have drawn the golden oriole down from the willow branch.) Commentary Officer Lu Xuan studied for a long time with Nanquan. 
When he was young he was fond of Taoist literature. 
Later, as he was copying the old translation of the Vimalakirti Sutra, he had an enlightenment. 
Therefore he compiled Buddhist sutras and composed four discourses. 
What Taoism says is that heaven and earth are great, and so are we; we are alike born in emptiness. 
Taoism just discusses equal­ izing things; Sengzhao said that nature all returns to self. 
Have you not seen how his discourse says, “ The ultimate person is empty, without form; yet none of the myriad things are not one’s own doing. 
Only a sage.” Though there are spirits and humans, the wise and the sage, and each is distinct, yet all have one nature and one substance. 
An ancient said, “The whole world is just oneself; when cold, it is cold everywhere; when hot, it is hot everywhere. 
In terms of exist­ ence, all exists; in terms of nonexistence, nothing exists. 
When affirmed, all is; when denied, all is not.” Fayan said, “It, It, It; I, I, I; south, north, east, west, everything is all right. 
All right or not, only for me there is nothing not all right.” Thus it was said, “In the universe I alone am honorable. 
Later he composed the Merging o f Difference and Unity, which also does not go beyond this meaning. 
Which body do they have in common? 
How could there be such a thing? 
If you say the mean­ ing of the doctrines is ultimate, why did Buddha raise the flower, why did Bodhidharma come from India? 
It is also like one in a dream; though he wants to awaken, he cannot; called by another, he awakens. 
If Nanquan’s eye were not true, he would surely have been befuddled by Lu. 
If the action of your eyes is alive, you will experience it like the most superb savor; if you are dead, you will turn it into poison. 
When you get here, you must understand on your own. 
Have you not heard it said, “The single transcending road has not been transmitted by the sages; students toil over forms like monkeys grasping at reflections”? 
Verse Seeing, hearing, awareness, knowledge; these are not one and the same— (In the multitude of forms there is not a single thing. 
Eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, and mind are all at once a hammerhead without a hole.) Mountains and rivers are not seen in a mirror. 
What is long is itself long, what is short is itself short; green is green, yellow is yellow. 
Where do you see them?) The frosty sky’s moon sets, the night nearly half over; (He has led you into the weeds. 
The world has never concealed it. 
I only fear you will go sit in a ghost cave.) With whom will it cast an image, cold in the clear pool? (Is there anyone? 
If they did not sleep on the same bed, how could they know the cover is worn out? 
Someone who is sad should not speak of it to another who is sad; the sad speaking to the sad saddens them to death.) Commentary Nanquan’s little sleep talk, Xuedou’s big sleep talk; though they are dreaming, they are having a good dream. 
At first there was talk of one body—here he says they are not the same: 
“Seeing, hearing, awareness, knowledge, are not one and the same—Moun­ tains and rivers are not seen in a mirror. 
” If you say they are seen in a mirror, and only then understood, then they are not apart from the mirror. 
Mountains, rivers, earth, plants, trees, forests— do not use a mirror to observe them. 
If you use a mirror to observe, then you create a dichotomy. 
Just let mountains be mountains and rivers be rivers—“Each thing abides in its normal state; the forms of the world always remain. 
” “Mountains and rivers are not seen in a mirror.” Then tell me, where can you see them? 
When you get here, turn to “ The frosty sky’s moon sets, the night nearly half over” —this side he has cleared up for you; that side, you must cross by yourself. 
But do you realize Xuedou uses his own thing to help others? 
“With whom will it cast an image, cold in the clear pool?” Do you think it is reflected itself, or is it reflected together with someone? 
It is necessary to cut off mental activity and cut off understanding before finally reaching this realm. 
Right now, we don’t need a clear pool, and we don’t have to wait for the moon to set in the frosty sky. 
Right now, how is it? 178c41. 
One Who Has Died the Great Death Introduction Where affirmation and negation are mixed, even sages cannot know; when opposition and accord go vertically and horizontally, even Buddhas cannot know. 
Such a one walks on thin ice, runs on a sword’s edge, is like the unicorn’s horn, like a lotus in fire. 
When seeing someone beyond comparison, this one knows they are on the same path. 
Who is an expert? 
Story Zhaozhou asked Touzi, “How is it when one who has died the great death returns to life?” (There is such a thing? A thief doesn’t strike a poor household. 
When one is accustomed to acting as guest, one has a feel for guests.) Touzi said, “ Don’t go by night; go there in daylight.” (Seeing a cage, he makes a cage. 
This is a thief recog­ nizing a thief. 
If he wasn’t lying on the same bed, how could he know the coverlet is worn?) Commentary Zhaozhou asked Touzi how it is when one who has undergone the great death returns to life; Touzi replied that one should not go by night, but in daylight. 
Tell me, what time is this? 
A flute with no holes strikes a felt-pounding board. 
This is called a question to test the host, or an intentional question. 
All over they praised Touzi and Zhaozhou for outstanding eloquence. 
One day Touzi set out tea for Zhaozhou. 
Touzi himself passed him some steamed cakes, but Zhaozhou paid no attention. 
Touzi had a servant give Zhaozhou the cakes; Zhaozhou bowed to the servant thrice. 
See how he always went right to the root to uphold this fundamental thing for the benefit of others. 
When Zhaozhou asked, “ How is it when one who had died the great death returns to life?” Touzi immediately said, “ Don’t go by night; go there in daylight.” Direct as sparks struck from stone, like a flash of lightning. 
One who has died the great death has no Buddhist doctrines and theories, no mysteries and marvels, no gain and loss, no right and wrong, no long and short. 
When one gets here, one just lets it rest this way. 
An ancient said of this, “On the level ground the dead are countless; only those who can pass through thorns are adepts.” One must pass even beyond the Other Side to attain. 
Even so, for people today it is already difficult to get to the realm of the great death. 
Master Zhe called this vision that is not purified. 
Wuzu called it failure to cut off the root of life. 
One must die the great death once, then return to life. 
Yongguang said, “If you miss at the point of their words, you’re a thou­ sand miles from home. 
In fact you must let go over a cliff, trust yourself, and accept the experience. 
Afterward you return to life. 
He just showed the little bit before the eyes. 
So an ancient said, “If you want to attain intimacy, don’t ask with a question. 
The question is in the answer, and the answer is in the question.” It would have been difficult for anyone but Touzi to reply to Zhaozhou’s question. 
But since Touzi is an expert, as soon as it’s raised he knows the ultimate point. 
Verse In life there’s an eye —still, it’s the same as death. (The two don’t know of each other. 
Back and forth, coming and going. 
Having met, try to give a test—what’s the harm? 
I too want to question him.) Even the ancient Buddhas, they say, have never arrived. (Luckily they had companions. 
None of the sages have transmitted it. 
I don’t know either.) I don’t know who can scatter dust and sand. (There is quite a bit of this right now. 
It gets in your eyes whether they’re open or closed. 
When you bring it up this way, what does it come down to?) Commentary “In life there’s an eye—still, it’s the same as death.” Xuedou knows what is, so he can dare to make up verses. 
An ancient said, “He studies the living word, not the dead word.” Xuedou says that to have eyes in life is still to be just the same as dead. 
Has he ever died? 
To have eyes within death is to be the same as alive. 
An ancient said, “Utterly kill the dead, and then you will see the liv­ ing; enliven the dead and you will see the dead.” 179b Though Zhaozhou is alive, he intentionally made up a dead ques­ tion to test Touzi. 
It was like taking a substance that vitiates the virtue of a medicine in order to test him. 
Afterwards he praises Touzi: 
“Even the ancient Buddhas, they say, have never arrived.” Even the ancient Buddhas never got to where one who had died the great death returns to life—nor have the Chan teachers ever gotten there. 
Even Sakyamuni and Bodhidharma would have to study again before they got it. 
So Xuedou said, “I only grant that the old foreigner knows; I don’t allow that he understands.” Xuedou says, “I don’t know who can scatter dust and sand.” A monk asked Changqing, “What is the eye of a teacher?” Changqing said, “Such a one has a vow not to scatter sand.” Baofu said, “ Don’t scatter any more of it. 
” All over teachers sit on fancy seats, using blows and shouts, raising their whisks, knocking on the seat, ex­ hibiting spiritual powers, and acting as masters—all of this is scat­ tering sand. 
Tell me, how can this be avoided? 
Introduction Bringing it out unique and alone is still dripping muddy water. Knocking and resounding occurring together is a silver mountain, an iron wall. 
If you describe and discuss, you see ghosts in front of your skull. 
If you seek in thought, you sit under the black moun­ tain. 
The bright sun lights up the sky; the pure wind circles the earth. 
Tell me, have the ancients any riddles? 
Story When Layman Pang took leave of Yaoshan, (This old guy is act­ ing strange.) Yaoshan had ten Chan students to escort him to the gate. 
What realm is this? 
Only a Chan practitioner who knows the whole thing could do this.) Pang pointed to the snow in the air and said, “Good snowflakes— they don’t fall elsewhere.” (He makes waves where there’s no wind. 
The pointing finger has eyes. 
He comes on following after. 
After all he climbed onto the hook.) Pang slapped him. 
As it turns out, the thief Quan pulled in ransacked his house.) Quan said, “Even a layman shouldn’t be so coarse.” Pang said, “Though you call yourself a Chan student, the king of death won’t let you go.” (The second ladleful of foul water has been poured over him. 
Why only the king of death? 
I wouldn’t let him go either.) Quan said, “How about you?” (His coarse mind hasn’t changed. 
Again he’s asking for a beating. 
From start to finish the monk is at a loss.) Pang slapped him again (After all he adds frost to snow. 
Having taken a beating, reveal the truth.) and said, “You see as though blind, speak as though mute.” (He has another conciliatory statement. 
Also he reads the verdict for him.) Xuedou added, “When Pang first spoke, I ’d just have hit him with a snowball.” (Xuedou is right, but he draws his bow after the thief is gone. 
Nonetheless, I’d like to see a direct confrontation. 
Xuedou has fallen into the ghost cave.) Commentary Layman Pang studied with Mazu and Shitou, and composed verses of awakening at both places. 
My everyday affairs are no different, Only I myself naturally harmonize. 
No place is grasped or rejected, Nowhere do I go for or against. 
Who considers crimson and purple honorable? 
The green mountains haven’t a speck of dust. 
Spiritual powers, wondrous functions— Hauling water, carrying firewood. 
The directions, a common gathering— Everyone studies noncontrivance. 
This is where Buddhas are chosen— Minds empty, they return successful. 
After he had been with Yaoshan for a while, he went to take leave. 
Yaoshan held him in highest esteem, so he had ten students see him off. 
It hap­ pened to be snowing at the time; Pang pointed nt the snow and said, “Good snowflakes—they don’t fall elsewhere.” When the stu­ dent Quan asked, “Where do they fall?” Pang slapped him. 
Since Quan was unable to carry out the order, Pang had him carry out one half. 
Though the order was put into effect, when Quan re­ sponded this way, it was not that he didn’t know what Pang was getting at. 
They each had a point in their activity, but their roll­ ing up and rolling out were not the same. 
Even so, in some re­ spects he didn’t come up to Pang. 
Thus he fell into his trap and found it difficult to get out of Pang’s range. 
After Pang had hit him, he went on to explain, “You see as if blind, talk as if mute.” Xuedou said that in Quan’s place he would have hit him with a snowball as soon as he spoke. 
Xuedou thus intended not to turn his back on the question; it’s just that his action was tardy. 
Librarian Qing said, “Pang’s mind is like a bolt of lightning. 
If we waited for you to grab a snowball, how long would it take? 
Verse The snowball hits, the snowball hits! 
It’s not worth the trouble to bring it forth. 
Overhead, vastness; underfoot, vastness.) Old Pang’s ability cannot grasp it. (Again and again there are people who don’t know this. 
I only fear it’s not so.) Gods and humans do not know themselves; In eyes, in ears, absolutely clean. 
You see as if blind, speak as if mute.) Absolutely clean— Even Bodhidharma would find it hard to discern. 
/ Old Pang’s ability cannot grasp it.” Xuedou wanted to walk on Pang’s head. 
The ancients used “snow” to represent uniformity. 
Xuedou meant that if he had hit him with a snowball then, no matter what abilities Pang had it would’ve been hard for him to handle. 
Xuedou praises his own hitting, not knowing where he’s lost his profit. 
“Gods and humans do not know themselves; / In eyes, in ears, absolutely clean.” In the eyes is snow, in the ears is snow too—just at that moment they are dwelling in uniformity. 
This is also called the realm of Samantabhadra. 
Yunmen said, “Even having no trouble in the world is still an expression of transition. 
When you don’t see a single form, this is half the issue.” If you want the whole issue, first you must know there is a single road beyond; when you get here your great function must be manifest with no gap, and you are not at the mercy of others. 
” An ancient said, “An appropriate statement is a stake on which to tether a donkey for myriad eons.” What’s the use? 
At this point Xuedou has finished the verse. 
Even the thousand sages cannot judge the ability to capture tigers and rhinos. 
Without any further traces of obstruc­ tion, the whole potential appears everywhere equally. 
If you want to understand the hammer and tongs of transcendence, you need the forge and bellows of an adept. 
Since ancient times, has there ever been such a family style? 
Story A monk asked Dongshan, “When cold and heat come, how can we avoid them ?” (It’s not this season. 
Where are you?) Dongshan said, “Why not go where there is no cold or heat?” (No one can find it. 
He hides his body but reveals his shadow. 
A con man sells a bogus city of sil­ ver.) The monk said, “Where is there no cold or heat?” (Dongshan swindles everyone. 
The monk rolls along following him. 
As soon as Dongshan let down his hook the monk climbed onto it.) Dongshan said, “When it’s cold, it chills you thoroughly; when it’s hot, it heats you thoroughly.” (The real does not conceal the false, the crooked does not hide the straight. 
Looking out over the cliff he sees tigers and rhinos—this is indeed an occasion to be sad. 
Dongshan overturns the ocean and kicks over the polar moun­ tain. 
Tell me, where is Dongshan’s trap? 
If you can clearly discern this, for the first time you will know how the five ranks of the Dongshan tradition interchanging absolute and relative handle people in an extraordinary way indeed. 
When you reach this tran­ scendental realm, you’ll be able to be thus without needing any arrangements, and you’ll spontaneously accord perfectly. 
Thus it is said: 
In the middle of the first night, before the moon shines, No wonder when they meet they don’t recognize each other; Each is hidden, still embracing the aversion of former days. 
The absolute within the relative: 
At dawn an old woman encounters an ancient mirror; Clearly she sees her face—there’s no other reality. 
Within nothingness is a road out of the dust. 
If you can avoid violating the present taboo name, You’ll surpass the eloquent ones of yore. 
When two swords cross, no need to withdraw. 
An expert is like a lotus in fire, Clearly having a spirit to reach the heavens. 
Arrival in both at once: 
Who dares to associate with one in neither being nor nonbeing? 
Everyone wants to get out of the ordinary flow, But this one after all returns to sit in the ashes. 
Fushan Yuan considers this story as being in the pattern of the five ranks. 
If you understand one, the rest are naturally easy to understand. 
Yantou said, “It’s like a gourd on water; push it and it rolls over without any effort. 
When the monk said, “Where is there no cold or heat?” and Dongshan said, “When it’s cold it chills you thoroughly; when it’s hot it heats you thor­ oughly,” this was the relative within the absolute. 
This is recorded in detail in the records of the Cao-Dong school. 
Some say, “I like no cold or heat very much.” What grasp do they have on the matter? 
An ancient said, “If you run on a sword’s edge, you’re fast. 
If you see in emotion or intellect, you’re slow.” A monk asked Cuiwei, “What is the meaning of Chan?” Cuiwei said, “I’ll tell you when no one comes,” then went into the garden. 
The monk said, “There’s no one here; please tell me. 
” Cuiwei pointed to the bamboo and said, “ This stalk is so tall, that stalk so short.” Suddenly the monk was greatly enlightened. 
Xuedou uses the affairs of their house to make his verse: 
Where is there not complete communion? 
Once the imperial edict is on its way, the nobles get out of the road.) Why must absolute and relative be in an arrangement? 
(If you do arrange them, where will you have Today? 
How will you avoid becoming involved in dualism? 
When the wind blows the grasses bend, where water runs streams form.) The ancient crystal palace reflects the bright moon; (Round and full. 
Just don’t grasp the reflection, and don’t run right in.) The sly hound of Han vainly runs up the stairs. 
Stumbled past. 
I’ll hit him and say you are a fellow student of this monk.) Commentary 180c In the Cao-Dong tradition there is appearing in the world and not appearing in the world; there is extending a hand and not extend­ ing a hand. 
If you don’t appear in the world, your eyes gaze at the cloudy skies. 
If you appear in the world, your head and face are covered with ashes and dirt. 
Eyes gazing at the cloudy skies is “on top of a ten-mile peak”; head and face covered with ashes and dirt is the business of extending a hand. 
Sometimes head and face cov­ ered with ashes and dirt is on top of a ten-mile peak, sometimes on top of a ten-mile peak is head and face covered with ashes and dirt. 
In reality, going into inhabited areas to extend a hand and standing alone on a solitary peak are the same. 
Returning to the source and comprehending essence is not different from knowledge of differentiation. 
Thus Xuedou says, “He extends a hand, but still it’s the same as a ten-mile cliff.” There’s simply no place for you to cling. 
“Why must absolute and relative be in an arrangement? 
” When it comes time to function, they are naturally like this; it’s not a matter of arrangement. 
This refers to Dongshan’s answer. 
Then he says, “ The ancient crystal palace reflects the bright moon; / The sly hound of Han vainly runs up the stairs.” This re­ fers to the monk running after Dongshan’s words. 
In the Cao-Dong tradition they have the stone woman, the wood horse, the bottom­ less basket, the night-shining pearl, the dead snake, and so on, eighteen kinds of symbols of the absolute. 
When Dongshan answered, “Why not go where there is no cold or heat?” this was like the moon shining in the ancient crys­ tal palace, seeming to have a round reflection. 
The monk asked, “Where is there no cold or heat?” This is like the hound of Han chasing a clod of dirt; he runs frantically up the stairs to catch the moon’s reflection. 
Dongshan said, “When it’s cold, it chills you thor­ oughly; when it’s hot, it heats you thoroughly.” This monk was like the hound of Han chasing a clod, running up the stairs but then not seeing the light of the moon. 
The hound of Han was a swift black dog belonging to the Han clan, the only one who could catch the wily rabbits in the moun­ tains. 
Xuedou uses this as a comparison for this monk. 
What about you—do you know where Dongshan helped people? 
What rabbits are you looking for? 
to Beat the Drum Story Heshan said, “Cultivating study is called learning, ending study is called nearness.” (No Chan practitioner can leap clear of this. 
An iron hammerhead with no hole. 
An iron spike.) “Going beyond these two is real going beyond.” (What are you doing with one eye on your forehead?) A monk asked, “What is real going beyond? 
There’s an iron spike.) Heshan said, “Knowing how to beat the drum. 
(An iron spike, iron brambles. 
Hard, hard.) The monk asked, “What is the real truth?” (What will he say? 
There’s another iron spike.) Heshan said, “Knowing how to beat the drum. 
(An iron spike, iron brambles. 
Hard, hard.) The monk asked, “ I don t i8 ia ask about ‘mind is Buddha’ —what about ‘not mind, not Buddha’? 
This garbage heap! 
The three sections are not the same. 
There’s another iron bramble.) Heshan said, “Knowing how to beat the drum.” The monk asked, “How do you receive a transcendent person?” (What will he say? 
This monk will encounter a fourth ladleful of his foul water. 
There’s another iron spike.) Heshan said, “Know­ ing how to beat the drum.” (An iron spike, iron brambles. 
Going beyond these two is real going beyond. 
” This saying comes from the Jewel Treasury Treatise. 
To study till there is nothing to study is called ending study. 
Yongjia said, “Years ago I accumulated learning, consulted the commentaries, and searched scriptures and treatises. 
Once one’s cultivation of studies is com­ pleted and exhausted, one is called a nondoing free wayfarer, be­ yond study. 
When one reaches the point of ending study, only then is one near the Way. 
When one manages to go beyond these two aspects of study, this is called real going beyond.” The monk too was undeniably bright and quick, so he picked up on these words to question Heshan. 
Heshan said, “Knowing how to beat the drum.” This is called flavorless speech. 
If you want to understand this story, you must be a transcendent person. 
Only then will you see that these words have nothing to do with reason, nor is there anything about them to discuss. 
The nonduality of the real and mundane is the highest meaning of the holy truths. 
Then the monk asked, “ I don’t ask about ‘mind is Buddha’ — what about ‘not mind, not Buddha’? 
” “Mind is Buddha” is easy to seek, but when you come to “not mind, not Buddha,” it’s hard, and few people arrive. 
These four sayings are generally considered a message from the source; they are called Heshan’s four drumbeats. 
A monk asked Jingguo, “ How is it when a crane perches on a lone pine?” Jingguo said, “Underfoot, an embarrassing situation.” He also asked, “ How is it when snow covers the thousand moun­ tains? 
Baofu asked a monk, “What Buddha is the one in the temple?” The monk said, “ Try to decide for sure.” Baofu said, “It’s Sakyamuni.” The monk said, “Better not deceive people.” Baofu said, “It’s you who are deceiving me. 
Heshan’s story is also like Xuefeng’s four ignoramuses. 
All these were classical Chan masters. 
Each produces profound and marvelous teachings and devices to communicate with people. 
Verse One hauls rock; (In the heart of the realm the emperor commands. 
A leper drags along his companions. 
A transcendent person comes this way.) A second moves earth. (Beyond the borders the general gives orders. 
Those with the same illness sympathize with each other.) To shoot the bolt requires a ten-ton crossbow. 
It is not to be lightly answered. 
How could it be used for a dead frog?) Old master Xuefeng rolled balls— (There’s another one who’s come this way. 
He had a holeless iron hammerhead. 
Who doesn’t know?) How could this equal Heshan’s knowing how to beat the drum? (An iron spike. 
One son has attained intimately.) '44. Knowing How to Beat the Drum I report for you to know: (Even Xuedou himself hasn’t seen it even in a dream. 
He’s adding frost to snow. 
Do you know?) Don’t be careless— The sweet is sweet; the bitter is bitter. (Thanks for the answer. Xuedou wrongly adds a footnote—he should get a thrashing. 
Has he ever been beaten? 
As before, vast darkness.) Commentary One day Guizong had his group haul rock. 
” Whenever a newcomer arrived, Muping would first have him move three loads of earth. 
East Mountain Road is narrow; West Mountain is low; Newcomers must not refuse three loads of mud. 
Alas, you’ve been traversing the roads so long; It’s so clear, but you don’t recognize it and get lost. 
Later a monk asked Muping, “I don’t ask about what is included in the three loads; what about what’s outside the three loads?” Muping said, “The iron wheel emperor commands in his realm.” The monk was speechless; Muping hit him. 
This is why Xuedou said, “One hauls rocks; / A second moves earth. 
/ To shoot the bolt requires a ten-ton crossbow.” Xuedou uses a ten-ton-pull crossbow to explain this case; he wants you to see how Heshan helped people. 
You use this crossbow for a fierce dragon or tiger, not for a tiny bird or a little mouse. 
A ten-ton crossbow does not shoot its bolt at a rat. 
“Old master Xuefeng rolled balls.” One day Xuefeng saw Xuansha coming and rolled three wooden balls together. 
Xuansha made a smashing gesture. 
Xuefeng deeply approved. 
Though these stories are instances of the great functioning of the whole capacity, none equals Heshan’s knowing how to beat the drum. 
If you don’t want carelessly to confuse things, “The sweet is sweet; the bitter is bit­ ter. 
Though Xuedou picked it up and played with it like this, in the end he himself can’t leap clear of Heshan either. 
Introduction When he must speak, he speaks—in all the world there is no match for him. 
When he should act, he acts—his whole capacity does not defer. 
It is like sparks struck from stone, like a flash of lightning like a raging fire fanned by the wind, like a rushing torrent crossing a sword edge. 
When he lifts up the hammer and tongs of transcen­ dence, you won’t avoid losing your point and becoming tongue-tied. 
Story A monk asked Zhaozhou, “Myriad things return to one—where does the one return?” (He challenges the old guy. 
Piled in moun­ tains, heaped in ranges. 
He should avoid living in a ghost cave.) Zhaozhou said, “When I was in Qingzhou I made a cloth shirt. 
It weighed seven pounds.” (After all Zhaozhou goes freely in all di­ rections, drawing a net that reaches through the sky. 
But do you see Zhaozhou? 
Do you know where Zhaozhou is? 
If you can see here, you’ll be one with the universe. 
Where water goes a channel forms, when the wind blows the grass bends. 
Naturally where water goes a channel forms. 
The essential point of Buddhism is not a matter of verbose speech. 
A monk asked Zhaozhou, “Myriad things return to one. 
Where does the one return?” Yet Zhaozhou answered by saying, “When I was in Qingzhou I made a cloth shirt. It weighed seven pounds. 
If you go to the words to discern, you are mistakenly abiding by the zero point of the scale. 
If you don’t discern at the words, what about the fact that he nevertheless did speak thus? 
This story, though hard to see, yet is easy to understand; though easy to un­ derstand, it’s still hard to see. 
Insofar as it’s hard, it’s like a silver mountain or an iron wall; insofar as it’s easy, you are directly aware. 
There’s nowhere for your calculations of right and wrong. 
If you can’t turn, wherever you set foot on the road you get stuck. 
But did Zhaozhou discuss Buddhism or not? 
If you say he did, when has he ever spoken of mind or nature, of mystery or marvel? 
If you say he didn’t have the meaning of Buddhism, when has he ever turned his back on anyone’s question? 
A monk asked Muping, “What is the meaning of Buddhism?” Muping said, “This winter melon is so big.” Also, a monk asked an ancient, “Deep in the mountains, on an overhanging cliff, in a re­ mote, inaccessible, uninhabited place, is there any Buddhism? 
” The monk asked, “What is the Bud­ dhism deep in the mountains?” The ancient said, “ The large rocks are large, the small ones are small.” Look at such stories; where are the obscurities? 
Xuedou knows what they come down to; so he opens up a road of meaning and comes out with a verse for you. 
Verse He wraps everything up and presses the ancient awl. (What’s the need to press the old guy? 
They push and push back—to where?) How many people know the weight of the seven-pound shirt? (A second try is worthless; one can only frown. 
Zhaozhou is one up.) Right now I throw it down into West Lake; (Only with the ability of Xuedou could this be done. 
One son attains intimately.) Commentary Of Fenyang’s eighteen questions, this one is called a wrapping-up question. 
Xuedou says, “He wraps everything up and presses the ancient awl. 
” He wraps everything up into unity. 
This monk want­ ed to press Zhaozhou, but Zhaozhou was an adept. 
He had a way to come forth where it was impossible to turn; daring to open his big mouth, he immediately said, “When I was in Qingzhou I made a cloth shirt. 
It weighed seven pounds.” Xuedou says, “How many people know the weight of the seven-pound shirt? 
” “Right now I throw it down into West Lake.” Myriad things return to one, but he doesn’t even need the one. 
Since he doesn’t need the seven-pound cloth shirt either, all at once he throws it down into West Lake. 
When Xuedou lived on Dongting’s green peak, there was a West Lake nearby. 
“The pure wind of unburdening—to whom should it be im­ parted?” This refers to Zhaozhou’s saying, “ If you’re coming from the north I’ll load up for you. 
If you’re coming from the south I’ll unload for you. 
Even if you’re coming from Xuefeng or Yunju, you’re still carrying a board.” Xuedou says, “ To whom can a pure wind like this be imparted?” Loading up means speaking to you of mind and nature, of mysteries and marvels, of all sorts of expedi­ ent methods. 
Some people carried a load of Chan to Zhaozhou, but when they got there they couldn’t use it at all. 
We say of this, “After awakening it’s the same as before awakening.” People these days all make unconcern an understanding. 
Even before the Buddha appeared in the world, before Bodhidharma came to China, it could not have been other­ wise. 
What’s the use of the Buddha appearing in the world? 
You must have greatly penetrated and greatly awakened; then as before mountains are mountains, rivers are rivers, and all things are perfectly manifest. 
As Longya said, “ To study the Way, first you must have a basis of enlightenment. 
It’s like a boat race—though you relax on idle ground as before, you can only rest after winning.” As for this story of Zhaozhou’s seven pound shirt, see how this ancient talks this way, like gold and jade. 
Me talking like this, you listening like this—all this is “loading up.” So what is unload­ ing? 
The Sound of Raindrops Introduction With a single stroke the teacher completes the student, who then passes beyond ordinary and holy. 
The slightest word can break things up, untying what is bound and releasing what is stuck. 
As if walking on thin ice or running over sword blades, one sits in the heaps of sound and form and walks on top of sound and form. 
For the moment I leave aside wondrous functioning in all directions. 
How is it when one leaves that very instant? 
Story Jingqing asked a monk, “What is that sound outside the door?” The monk said, “The sound of raindrops.” (Undeniably truthful. 
It’s good news too.) Jingqing said, “People are backwards—they lose themselves and pursue things.” (Something’s come up. 
He’s used to getting his way. 
He rakes the monk in. 
This takes real ability like his.) The monk said, “What about you?” (As it turns out the monk suffers a defeat. 
He’s turned the spear around; it will be hard to stand up to it.) Jingqing said, “I have reached not losing myself.” The monk said, “What is the meaning of reaching not losing oneself? 
” (He challenges the old guy, pressing him relentlessly. 
His first arrow was still light; the second arrow is deep.) Jingqing said, “It may be easy to free oneself, but to say the whole thing is surely difficult.” (Provisions to nourish a child. 
Though it’s so, where have Deshan and Linji gone? 
If he doesn’t call it the sound of raindrops, what sound should he call it? 
When the ancients imparted their teaching, with one device, one object, they wanted to guide people. 
One day Jingqing asked a monk, “What sound is that outside the door?” The monk said, “The sound of quail.” Jingqing said, “ If you want to avoid uninterrupted hell, don’t slander the true teach­ ing of the Buddha. 
If you can penetrate here, nothing can block your independence within sound and form. 
If you can’t, you are constrained by sound and form. 
In other places this is called tempering words. 
If it were tem­ pering, it would only amount to mental activity. 
This is called penetrating sound and form, clarifying the eye of the Way, clarifying sound and form, clarifying the mind source, clarifying forgetting feelings, clarify­ ing exposition. 
How little they realize that Jingqing has the skill to help people. 
He is so brave he isn’t bound by a single device or a single perspective. 
How could Jingqing not have known that it was the sound of raindrops? 
Why was it still worth asking? 
You must realize that the ancient was probing to examine the monk. 
The monk too pressed back well, saying, “What about you?” What happened then was that Jingqing went into the muddy water to say, “I have reached not losing myself.” The reason was that the monk was losing himself, pursuing things. 
Why should Jingqing lose him­ self too? 
You must realize that Jingqing had a place to get free within the phrase he used to test the monk. 
There’s provisional and true, letting go and gathering in, killing and enlivening, catching and releasing.) If you say he’s ever let the streams enter, (You stick your head into a bowl of glue. 
If you don’t call it the sound of raindrops, what sound will you call it?) As before you still don’t understand. (How often I’ve asked you! 
Give me back my holeless iron hammerhead.) Understanding or not understanding— (Cut off both ends. 
The two are not separate. 
It’s not on these two sides.) On south mountain, on north mountain, more and more downpour. (Above our heads, under our feet. 
If you call it the sound of raindrops, you’re blind; if you don’t call it the sound of raindrops, what sound will you call it? 
Here you must tread the ground of reality.) Commentary 183a “An empty hall, the sound of raindrops. 
” If you call it the sound of raindrops, this is losing yourself and pursuing things; if you don’t call it the sound o f rain­ drops, how will you turn things around? 
So an ancient said, “If your view equals your teacher, you have less than half the teacher’s merit. 
Only if your view goes beyond your teacher are you fit to receive and carry on the transmission.” And as Nanyuan said, “With ac­ ceptance of birthlessness under the staff, one faces situations with­ out deferring to a teacher. 
” “ If you say he’s ever let the streams enter, / As before you still don’t understand.” In the teachings it says, “First, in the midst of hearing, Avalokitesvara let the streams enter, but was mindless of what was there. 
Since what came in was quiescent, the forms of motion and stillness did not arise.” If you say it’s the sound of raindrops, it’s not right, but if you say it’s not the sound of rain­ drops, it’s not right either. 
If you say he lets the streams of sound and form enter, that’s not right either. 
If you call it sound and form, as before you don’t understand his meaning. 
It is compared to pointing to the moon; the pointing finger is not the moon. 
“Un­ derstanding or not understanding — / On south mountain, on north mountain, more and more downpour.” Introduction What does the sky say? 
The four seasons go on there. 
What does the earth say? 
Where the four sea­ sons go on, one can see the essence; where the myriad things are born, one can see the action. 
But say, where can you see a Chan practitioner? 
Detached from speech and action, can you still discern? 
Story A monk asked Yunmen, “What is the body of reality?” (So many people have doubts about this. 
Even sages can’t leap out. 
He’s indulged quite a bit.) Yunmen said, “Six do not take it in.” (He cuts nails and shears through iron. 
An eight cornered mortar flies through the air. 
The sacred tortoise is dragging its tail.) Commentary i83b Yunmen said, “Six do not take it in.” This is indeed hard to attain; even if you reach it before the first indications are distinct, this is already the secondary. 
If you understand after the first indica­ tions arise, you’ve fallen into the tertiary. 
If you go to the words to discern, you will search without finding. 
But ultimately, what do you take as the body of reality? 
Those who are adepts immediately get up and go as soon as they hear it raised. 
Taiyuan Fu was originally a professor. 
One day when he lec­ tured he spoke of the body of reality saying, “Vertically it reaches through the three times; horizontally it extends through the ten directions.” There was a Channist in the audience who let out a laugh when he heard this. 
Please explain.” The Channist said, “Pro­ fessor, you only talk about the extent of the body of reality—you don’t see the body of reality.” Fu said, “What would be right?” The Channist said, “You should temporarily stop lecturing and sit in a quiet room; you will have to see it for yourself. 
” Fu did as he said and sat quietly all night. 
Suddenly he heard the bell for the fifth watch; all at once he was greatly enlightened. 
So he went and knocked on the Channist’s door, saying, “I’ve un­ derstood.” The Channist said, “ Try to tell me.” Fu said, “From now on I’ll no longer twist these nostrils born of my parents.” Also in the scriptures it says, “ The Buddha’s true body of real­ ity is like space. 
These sixes all arise from the body of reality, so the six faculties cannot take it in. 
Moreover, they drag down Yunmen. 
If you want to see, then see; there’s no place for your attempts to rationalize. 
So in every statement there must be three statements. 
And he does not turn his back on your questions; responding to the time, adapting to the situation, with one word, one phrase, one dot, one line, he indeed has a way to express himself. 
Is this the patriarchs? 
Verse One, two, three, four, five, six— (Go all the way through, then start again at the beginning. 
For every drop for water, a drop of ice. 
Why expend so much effort?) Even Bodhidharma can’t count up to it. (Even in three lives, sixty eons. 
Has Bodhidharma ever even dreamed of it? 
Why do you deliberately transgress in spite of knowing?) At Shaolin he deceptively said he passed it on to Shenguang— (When one person transmits a falsehood, ten thousand people transmit it as truth. 
It was already wrong from the start.) Then he rolled up his robe and said he was returning to India. 
This at last is great peace. 
Where is he right now?) He comes back by night to stay here. (He pokes out your eyes. 
This is raising waves where there’s no wind. 
Is this the body of reality or the body of the Buddha? 
I’ll give you a thrashing!) Commentary 183c Xuedou is well able to show his eye where there is no seam or crack and come out with a verse to make people see. 
Yunmen said, “Six do not take it in.” Why does Xuedou nevertheless say, “One, two, three, four, five, six”? 
That is why it is said, “I only allow that the old foreigner knows, not that he understands.” Only as a descendant of Yimmen could Xuedou do this. 
Only if you can penetrate through will you know that the Way is not in words and phrases. 
Otherwise you won’t avoid making up intellectual interpretations. 
Wuzu said, “Sakyamuni Buddha was a low-down hired worker. 
The oak trees in the yard: 
one, two, three, four, five.” If you can man­ age to see truly at Yunmen’s words, you’ll reach this realm instantly. 
“At Shaolin he deceptively said he passed it on to Shenguang. 
” Shenguang was the second patriarch. 
Later he said Bodhidharma had returned to India. 
He had been buried at the foot of Bear Ear Mountain, but an ambassador returned from the West saw Bodhidharma in the mountains returning to India with one shoe in hand. 
When this was reported to the emperor, Bodhidharma’s tomb was opened, and all that was left was a single shoe. 
Xuedou says, “How can this matter really be imparted?” Since there is no imparting it, Bodhidharma rolled up his robe and said he was returning to India. 
You must be able to comprehend before you can enter and act. 
“India is vast, with no place to look for him— / He comes back by night to stay here.” Tell me, where is he right now? 
Striking. 
Story When Minister Wang entered Zhaoqing, they were making tea. 
there’s bound to be something extraordi­ nary. 
Can you stand idly by? 
Everyone set one eye on them. 
Wang has invited trouble.) At the time Elder Lang was holding the kettle for Mingzhao. 
Lang doesn’t know how to make tea, so he drags in someone else.) Lang turned the kettle over. 
Seeing this, the minister asked him, “What’s under the tea stove?” (As it turns out, it’s trouble.) Lang said, “ The spirit who holds up stoves.” (A f­ ter all he runs into Wang’s arrow. 
Nonetheless, he’s extraordi­ nary.) The minister said, “If it’s the spirit who holds up stoves, why then did you turn over the kettle?” (Why doesn’t he give some real provisions? 
Something’s happened.) Lang said, “Serve as an official for a thousand days; lose it in a single morning.” (A mis­ taken indication. 
There are many phony Chan followers.) The minister immediately left. 
I allow that he has one eye.) Mingzhao said, “Elder Lang, you’ve eaten Zhaoqing food, but still you go beyond the river mak­ ing noise gathering charred wood.” (I would go on to thrash him. 
This master has only one eye. 
Still, it takes a clear-eyed person to examine thoroughly.) Lang said, “What about you?” (He presses him—and he deserves to be pressed. 
He was able to speak half. 
He draws his bow after the thief is gone. 
The lot of them are ras­ cals—among them Xuedou is the standout.) Commentary 184a “ If you want to know the meaning of the Buddha nature, observe the conditions of the times.” Minister Wang was in charge of Quan province. 
He had studied at Zhaoqing for a long time. 
One day he went into the monastery while Elder Lang was making tea, and Lang turned over the tea kettle. 
Nevertheless, his start and finish contradicted each other, so he lost the source meaning and blundered with the sharp point, cutting his own hand. 
Not only did he wrong himself, he also offended the other. 
If you discuss this matter, though it’s not in words, nevertheless you must discern what’s alive in words. 
So it is said, “Study the living word, not the dead word.” When Elder Lang talked this way he was like a mad dog chas­ ing a dirt clod. 
The minister left immediately, appearing to disap­ prove of him. 
Mingzhao said, “Elder Lang, you’ve eaten Zhaoqing food, but still you go beyond the river making noise gathering charred wood.” This charred wood is sticks burnt by wild fire. 
Mingzhao used this to illustrate how Lang didn’t go to the correct place to walk, but instead ran off outside. 
So it is said, “A good dog bites with­ out showing its teeth.” Guishan Zhe said, “Minister Wang was like Xiangru carrying off the jew el—in fact his sideburns are sticking out from under his hat. 
Since Mingzhao couldn’t restrain himself, it was difficult for him to do what was proper. 
Had I been Elder Lang, as soon as I saw the minister go, I would have put down the tea kettle and laughed. 
If you see it but don’t grab it, it’s hard to meet with it even in a thousand years. 
” Baoshou asked “Nail Cutter” Hu, “For a long time I’ve heard of Nail Cutter Hu—aren’t you he?” Hu said, “I am.” Baoshou said, “Can you drive nails into space?” Hu said, “I invite you to come smash it.” Baoshou then hit him. 
Hu did not agree, so Baoshou said, “Some day a talkative teacher will clarify this for you. 
” Later Hu saw Zhaozhou and related this incident. 
” At this Hu had an awakening. 
When Master Mi Hu returned from his travels, an old adept asked him, “A piece of rope on a moonlit night, people call a snake. 
What do you call it when you see the Buddha?” Mi Hu said, “ If there is something seen, it’s the same as an ordinary being. 
” The old adept said, “This is a peach pit that sprouts once in a thousand years.” National Teacher Huizhong asked an imperial attendant monk, “I hear tell that you have explained the Consideration o f Benefit Scripture; is this true? 
” The monk said it was. 
Huizhong said, “One must first understand the Buddha’s meaning to be fit to explain the scriptures.” The monk said, “If I didn’t understand the mean­ ing, how could I dare say I’d explained a scripture?” Huizhong then had a servant bring a bowl of water, seven grains of rice, and one chopstick. 
At the end Xuedou turns around and says, “At the time I would have kicked over the stove.” Though Mingzhao was such, he never equaled Xuedou. 
What time and season was it for them? 
Their action naturally stands out in the present and shines through the ages; they had a place of living liberation. 
Verse Wang poses a question like creating a wind— (His arrow was not shot in vain. 
He happens to be artful yet quintessential.) Lang’s responsive action was not skillful. (What end is there of people playing with mud? 
A square peg in a round hole. 
Indeed, he ran into an adept.) How lamentable the lone-eyed dragon Didn’t display his teeth and claws. 
(He had no teeth and claws to display. 
What teeth and claws are you talking about? 
Don’t cheat them.) Teeth and claws open, (See? 
If you have such ability, kick over the stove.) Producing clouds and thunder. (Everyone in the world takes a thrashing at once. 
All the Chan monks in the world have no place to put themselves. 
Commentary “Wang poses a question like creating a wind— / Lang’s response was not skillful.” The minister’s question was like swinging an axe, creating a wind. 
This comes from Zhuangzi: 
a man was plas­ tering a wall, and a bit of plaster splashed onto the tip of his nose. 
The axeman swung his axe so fast he created a wind, and removed the plaster without cutting the man’s nose. 
The man stood there without losing his composure. 
This is what is called wondrous skill on the part of both. 
Though Elder Land did re­ spond to the minister’s actions, his words were unskillful; that is why Xuedou said, “Wang poses a question like creating a wind— / Lang’s response was not skillful.” “How lamentable the lone-eyed dragon / Didn’t display his teeth and claws.” Mingzhao’s speaking was indeed very outstanding, yet he didn’t have the teeth and claws to grasp the clouds and hold onto the fog. 
The bystander Xuedou didn’t approve; unable to restrain himself, he showed some energy in behalf of Mingzhao. 
He versifies his own statement about kicking over the tea stove: 
“ Teeth and claws open, / Producing clouds and thunder. 
/ How many times I’ve gone through the waves of adverse currents! 
” The sayings of Elder Lang and Mingzhao seem dead. 
If you want to see the living place, just look at Xuedou kick­ ing over the stove. 
49, The Golden Fish That Has Passed through the Net Introduction Piercing, penetrating, one takes the drum and captures the flag. 
Fortified, entrenched, one inspects the front and oversees the rear. 
Even one who sits on the tiger’s head and takes the tiger’s tail is not yet an adept. 
Though an ox head disappears and a horse head returns, this too is not yet extraordinary. 
But say, how is it when one who has passed beyond measurement comes? 
Story Sansheng asked Xuefeng, “What does the golden fish that has passed through the net use for food?” (Free in all ways. 
This ques­ tion is very lofty. 
You must just know for yourself—then what need is there to ask any further?) Xuefeng said, “I’ll tell you when you come out of the net.” (He diminishes the other man’s reputa­ tion quite a bit. 
An expert Chan teacher is naturally indepen­ dent.) Sansheng said, “The teacher of fifteen hundred people and you don’t even know a saying.” (The sudden peal of thunder re­ ally startles the crowd. 
” (It’s not a matter of victory and defeat. 
But what is the eye these two adepts have? 
Sansheng received the secret from Linji. 
He traveled all over and was treated as an eminent guest. 
He doesn’t touch on noumenon or Buddhist doctrine; instead he asks, “What does the golden fish that’s passed through the net use for food?” What did he mean? 
Since the golden fish that’s passed through the net ordinarily does not eat the tasty food of others, what does it use for food? 
You must be beyond categories and classifications; you must have attained use of the great function; you must have the eye on the forehead—only then can you be called a golden fish that has passed through the net. 
Still, being an adept, Xuefeng can’t but diminish the other’s reputation by saying, “I’ll tell you when you come out of the net. 
” See how the two of them held fast to their territories, tower­ ing like gigantic walls. 
With this one sentence of Xuefeng’s any­ one but Sansheng would have been unable to go on. 
If you form your understanding in terms of victory and defeat, you haven’t seen Xuefeng even in a dream. 
Look at these two: 
initially both were solitary and strict; in the end both were dead and decrepit. 
But say, was there still gain and loss, victory and defeat? 
Sansheng was the temple keeper for Linji. 
When Linji was about to pass on, he said, “After I’m gone, don’t destroy my trea­ sury of vision of truth.” Sansheng came forward and said, “ How dare we destroy your treasury of vision of truth?” Linji said, “What will you do when people ask questions?” Sansheng shouted. 
Linji said, “Who would have known that my treasury of vision of truth would die out in this blind donkey?” Sansheng bowed. 
Since he was a true heir of Linji, he dared to respond like this. 
Xuedou just versifies the golden fish that has passed through the net, revealing where these adepts saw each other. 
Verse The golden fish that has passed through the net— (A thousand soldiers are easy to get, but one general is hard to find. 
Even the sages can’t do anything about it.) Stop saying it tarries in the water. (It stands beyond the clouds, leaping with life. 
This still isn’t the extraordinary part. 
Let it come out—what’s to prevent it?) It flourishes its mane and wags its tail. (Who can presume to discern the whole? 
A clever trick, coming on with a boast; yet it undeniably startles the crowd.) When a thousand-foot whale spouts, vast waves fly, (It’s gone over to the other side, indeed outstanding, swallowing everyone in the world in one gulp.) At a single thunderclap, the pure wind gusts. 
(Having eyes and ears but being as if blind and deaf. 
Who is not frightened?) The pure wind gusts— Among gods and humans, how many know? 
Why scatter dust and sand? 
”) Commentary “The golden fish that has passed through the net— / Stop saying it tarries in the water.” Wuzu said this couplet alone completes the verse. 
Since it’s the golden fish that has passed through the net, how could it linger in the water? 
It must be where the vast swelling floods of white foamy waves tower up to the skies. 
But during the twenty-four hours of the day, what does it use for food? 
Xuedou said, “ This matter is picked up and used according to one’s capacity.” When something like the golden fish “flourishes its mane and wags its tail, ” it does in fact shake heaven and earth. 
“When a thousand-foot whale spouts, vast waves fly.” This re­ fers to Sansheng saying, “The teacher of fifteen hundred people and you don’t even know a saying!” He was like a whale spouting giant waves. 
“The pure wind gusts— / Among gods and humans, how many know? 
When the pure wind arises, how many can there be among humans and celestials who will know? 
if you haven’t entered the gate of great liberation and attained great freedom of action, how can you measure the en­ lightened or be a mirror and guide to enlightenment? 
When tak­ ing charge of a situation directly, whether going along or against, vertically or horizontally, how will you be able to speak a phrase to express yourself? 
Story A monk asked Yunmen, “What is every atom samadhi?” (All the Chan practitioners in the world make their nests here. 
His mouth is full of frost. 
Why is he scattering sand and dirt?) Yunmen said, “Rice in the bowl, water in the bucket.” (A cloth bag filled with awls. 
Gold dust and sand intermingled. 
He adds error to error. 
Inside the palace they don’t ask about the capital.) Commentary Can you settle this properly? 
If you can, you’ve got Yunmen by the nose. 
If not, Yunmen has you by the nose. 
Yunmen has say­ ings that cut through iron. 
In this one statement three statements are present. 
Verse Rice in the bowl, water in the bucket— (It’s obvious. 
Why scatter sand and dirt? 
You must wash your mouth out for three years before you’ll get it.) The talkative teacher can hardly open his mouth. (He draws in his tongue. 
Those who know the law fear it. 
Why then bring it up this way?) Northern dipper, southern star—their positions are not different; (Why call east west? 
Standing, sitting, still and solemn. 
W hat’s long is the long reality body, what’s short is the short reality body.) Foaming waves flooding the skies arise on level ground. 
Guest and host interchange. 
Suddenly they’re on top of your head—then what will you do? 
Commentary In his earlier verse on Yunmen’s “appropriate statement,” Xuedou said, “An appropriate statement: 
/ He wedges a stake into the iron hammerhead with no hole.” In his later verse on “apart from all permutations of assertion and denial,” he says, “Zhizang’s head is white; Baizhang’s head is black; even clear­ eyed Chan practitioners cannot understand.” If you can penetrate these stories, you will see this present verse. 
Xuedou says right off, “ Rice in the bowl, water in the bucket.’ There’s an echo in his words; he shows his capacity in the line, “The talkative teacher can hardly open his mouth.” With this he adds footnotes for you. 
If you demand conceptualization of myste­ rious and marvelous principles, it will be even harder to speak. 
At first he holds fast; then fearing there’s someone with eyes who’d see through him, he had to forego the primary and bend down to open it up for beginners, coming out with a verse to have people see. 
As before the northern dipper is in the north and the southern star is in the south. 
Thus he says, “Northern dipper, south­ ern star—their positions are not different.” “Foaming waves flooding the skies arise on level ground. 
” When waves suddenly arise on level ground, what will you do? 
If you catch sight of it in phenomena, it’s easy; if you seek it in your conceptual faculty, you’ll never find it. 
This line is like an iron spike: 
it can’t be pulled out, and you can’t get your teeth into it. 
If you try to discuss it, though you wish to understand, you won’t understand; though you wish to stop, you won’t stop randomly displaying your load of ignorance. 
This is precisely “Each and every one is a rich man’s son with no britches. 
” A poem by Hanshan says: 
The sun comes up over the cliff, but still it’s dark, The mist melts away, but the valley is still dim. 
Introduction As soon as there is affirmation and denial you lose your mind in confusion. 
At this point, if you intellectualize at all you are still stuck in verbal­ izations. 
Even if you arrive immediately at the point of soli­ tary liberation, you still are ten thousand miles from home. 
Can you reach it? 
If not, just comprehend this issue at hand. 
Story When Xuefeng was living in a hut, two monks came to pay re­ spects. 
Seeing them coming, Xuefeng pushed open the door, popped out, and said, “What is it?” (Ghost eyes. 
A flute with no holes. 
He raises 186a his head, wearing horns.) A monk also said, “What is it?” (A mud ball. 
A felt-pounding board. The arrow points meet.) Xuefeng low­ ered his head and went back inside. (There are thorns in the soft mud. 
He is like a dragon without feet, like a snake with horns. 
This is the hardest of all to handle.) Later the monk came to Yantou. (He must ask before he can understand. 
Only one on the same path would know.) Yantou asked, “Where are you coming from?” (It takes an adept to do this. 
If Yantou weren’t Xuefeng’s peer, he might have let him go.) The monk said, “Lingnan.” (What news does he bring? 
He must convey the news. 
He mustn’t say he didn t go there.) The monk said, “Yes.” (A truthful man is hard to find. 
Yan­ tou said, What did he say?” (He should have hit the monk right off; he’s lost control.) The monk said, “He said nothing; he lowered his head and went back inside.” (Again he suffers defeat. 
But tell me, what is he?) Yantou said, “Alas! 
Too bad I didn’t tell him the last word before; had I told him, no one on earth could do anything to Xuefeng.” (A leper drags along a companion. 
Not necessarily. 
Even the polar mountain would be shattered to bits. 
But say, where is his trap?) At the end of the summer the monk again brought up this story to ask for more instruction. 
When the real thief has already been gone for quite a while, he draws his bow.) Yantou said, “Why didn’t you ask before?” (You should turn over his mediation seat. 
The opportunity’s passed.) The monk said, “I didn’t dare to be casual.” (This staff was originally for the monk to be beaten with. 
An imprisoned man increases in wisdom. 
He al­ most couldn’t explain.) Commentary Whoever would uphold Chan teaching must discern how to take charge of the situation, must know when to advance and retreat, what is right and wrong, when to kill and give life, capture and release. 
If one’s eyes suddenly blur and go sightless, everywhere one goes one questions when questioned and answers when an­ swered, scarcely realizing one is under the control of others. 
One question, one answer, one capture, one release—right up till today this case has been impenetrable and inexplicable for every­ one. 
Later, due to a persecution of Buddhism, Yantou became a ferryman by the shores of a lake. 
On each shore he hung a board; anyone who wanted to cross would knock on the board. 
Yantou would call out, “Which side are you crossing to?” Then he would come rowing out from among the reeds. 
Xuefeng returned to Lingnan and lived in a hut. 
These monks were longtime students. 
But these monks were unusual too, just saying, “What is it?” Xuefeng low­ ered his head and went back inside. 
This is frequently called word­ less understanding. 
These monks couldn’t grasp this. 
Some say that, having been questioned by the monks, Xuefeng was in fact speechless, and so he went back inside. 
They don’t know that there is something deadly poisonous in Xuefeng’s intention. 
Though Xuefeng gained the advantage, nevertheless while he hid his body he revealed his shadow. 
Later one monk left Xuefeng and took this story to Yantou to have him settle it. 
If you want to see Xuefeng, you should quickly look at this last question. 
Harbor­ ing a bellyful of doubt, he really thought Xuefeng didn’t understand. 
At the end of the summer he brought up the story again and asked Yantou about it. 
Yantou said, “Why didn’t you ask earlier?” The old fellow was crafty. 
If you want to know the last word, ‘just this’ is it.” Yantou was indeed generous! 
Xuefeng was the cook in Deshan’s group. 
One day the noon meal was late; Deshan went down into the teaching hall with his bowl. 
Xuefeng said, “ The signal for the meal hasn’t been given yet—where are you going with your bowl?” Deshan lowered his head and went back to his room without saying anything. 
The next day Deshan lectured in a manner different from usual; Yantou clapped and laughed, say­ ing, “Happily the old guy does understand the last word! 
After this no one on earth will be able to do anything to him. 
Neverthe­ less, he’s only got three years.” When Xuefeng saw Deshan speechless in this story, he thought he had gained the advantage. 
He still didn’t know that he had run into a bandit. 
Since he had met a bandit, later Xuefeng too knew how to be a bandit. 
So an ancient said, “At the last word one finally reaches the impenetrable barrier. 
They have misunderstood. 
he taught, “Clear-eyed folk have no cliches to nest in. 
As for this last word, even if you’ve personally seen the Chan patriarchs, you still won’t be able to understand it rationally.” When Deshan’s meal was late, he picked up his bowl himself and went down into the teaching hall. 
Yantou said, “Even the great Deshan doesn’t understand the last word.” Xuedou picked this out and said, “I’ve heard that a lone-eyed dragon has only one eye all along.” You certainly didn’t know Deshan was a toothless tiger. 
If it hadn’t been for Yantou seeing through him, how could we know that yesterday and today are not the same? 
Do you want to under­ stand the last word? 
“I only allow that the old foreigner knows, not that the old foreigner understands.” Chan stories from ancient times till now have been extremely diverse, like a forest of brambles. 
If you can penetrate, no one on earth can do anything to you, and all the Buddhas of past, present, and future defer to you. 
Verse The last word (It’s already present before anything is said. 
You might think it’s real. 
If you look right at it you’ll go blind.) Is spoken for you; (The tongue falls to the ground. 
It can’t be spoken. 
It has a head but no tail, a tail but no head.) The time of light and dark pair by pair: (Complicated old fellow. 
Like an ox without horns, like a tiger with horns. 
This one and that one are this way.) Born of the same lineage, they share the knowledge; (What clan is this? 
I too am this way; yet others are not. 
“I only allow that the old foreigner knows, not that the old foreigner understands.”) South, north, east, west, let us return— (Xuedou’s gathered everyone in. 
His trail is still following the five-colored thread. 
I ask you for a staff.) And in the depths of the night together look at the snow on the thousand crags. (There’s still half a month’s journey. 
Let the world be covered with snow, filling everywhere; there is no one who understands. 
You too are just blind people. 
Do you know the last word? 
I hit!) Commentary “The last word is spoken for you.” When Xuedou made up his verse on this last word, he intentionally went to extremes going down into the weeds to help people. 
If you want to see all the way through, this is still not enough. 
Daring to say even more Xuedou opened his big mouth and said, “The time of light and dark pair by pair” to open a road for you and also finish it off for you in one line. 
Then at the end he provided even more explanations for you. 
Zhaoqing asked Luoshan, “When Yantou says, Ho, so, not so, not so,’ what is his meaning?” Luoshan called out, “Great Mas­ ter!” and Zhaoqing responded. 
Luoshan said, “Both light and both dark.” Zhaoqing bowed in thanks and left. 
Three days later he questioned Luoshan again; Luoshan said, “I’ve already told you the whole thing.” Zhaoqing said, “Please light the way.” Luoshan told him to ask what he had doubts about; Zhaoqing said, “What is ‘both light and both dark’? 
” Luoshan said, “ Born the same and dying the same.” Zhaoqing then bowed in thanks and left. 
Later a monk asked Zhaoqing, “How is it when being born the same and dying the same?” Zhaoqing said, “Shut your dog mouth. 
’ The monk said, “Just try to eat with your mouth shut.” The monk then came to ask Luoshan the same question; Luoshan said, “Like an ox without horns.” The monk said, “ Then how about being born the same but not dying the same?” Luoshan said, “Like a tiger with horns.” The last word is precisely this truth. 
A monk in Luoshan’s group used this idea to put a question to Zhaoqing. 
If I spoke a phrase on the eastern continent, they would know it on the western continent too. 
If I spoke a phrase in heaven, they would also know it on earth. 
All minds know each other, all eyes perceive each other. 
” Born of the same lineage, they’re still easy to see. 
Not dying in the same lineage, they’re utterly separate, and not even the Bud­ dha or Bodhidharma can find them. 
“South, north, east, west, let us return.” There’s something of a good world. 
“And in the depths of the night together look at the snow on the thousand crags.” Tell me, is this both light and both dark, or is it born of the same lineage, or is it dying in the same lineage? 
Story A monk asked Zhaozhou, “Long have I heard of the stone bridge of Zhaozhou; but now that I’ve come here I only see a simple log bridge.” (Here’s another one who comes to grab the tiger’s whiskers. 
This is the proper business of Chan practitioners.) Zhaozhou said, “You only see the log bridge, not the stone bridge.” (Zhaozhou is accus­ tomed to getting the advantage. 
He’s selling off his body.) The monk asked, “What is the stone bridge?” (He’s climbed onto the hook, after all.) Zhaozhou said, “It lets asses cross, it lets horses cross. 
In fact all the people in the world have no place to breathe; once dead they don’t come back to life again.) Commentary In the state of Zhaozhou there’s a stone bridge, built in ancient times, famed throughout the country. 
Intentionally downgrading Zhaozhou, this monk questioned him by saying, “Long have I heard of the stone bridge of Zhaozhou; but now that I’ve come here I only see a simple log bridge.” Zhaozhou immediately said, You only see the log bridge, not the stone bridge,” based on the question. 
This seems like ordinary conversation, but Zhaozhou used it to hook him. 
The monk after all climbed onto the hook; he followed up behind and asked, “What is the stone bridge?” Zhaozhou said, “It lets asses cross, it lets horses cross. 
” Inevitably Zhaozhou natu­ rally has a place to come forth in his words. 
One day Zhaozhou was with the head monk looking at the stone bridge; he asked, “Who built this?” The monk said, Li Ying did.” Zhaozhou said, “Where did he start?” The monk had no re­ ply. 
Zhaozhou said, “You’re always talking about the stone bridge, but when asked about where it started, you don’t even know.’ Once when Zhaozhou was sweeping the floor, a monk asked, “You are enlightened—why is there dust? 
” Zhaozhou said, “The great way runs to the capital. 
” Zhaozhou was always using such devices; he would go to the peace of ordinary reality to help people. 
He never cut his hand on the sharp point; naturally he was solitary and strict, using these devices most wondrously. 
Verse He doesn’t set up the solitary; in that his way is lofty. 
The words are still in our ears. 
This is due to his own provisions.) Entering the ocean, he must hook a giant tortoise. (He occupies the essential crossing and doesn’t let profane or holy pass. 
Shrimps or clams, snails or oysters, aren’t worth asking about. 
People of power don’t come by twos and threes.) His contemporary Guanxi is worth a laugh; (There’s been another such man who’s come this way, with such ability to use active devices.) Though he was able to say “whistling arrow, ” his effort was in vain. 
He looks alike, but isn’t really the same.) Commentary “He doesn’t set up the solitary; in that his way is lofty.” Xuedou is praising Zhaozhou’s usual way of helping people. 
He doesn’t es­ tablish mysteries or marvels, doesn’t set up the solitary. 
He isn’t like those who say that only breaking up space, shattering the polar mountain, producing dust on the ocean floor, and pounding waves on the polar mountain can be called the Way of Chan. 
Thus Xuedou says his way is lofty in that he doesn’t set up the solitary. 
Others may tower like gigantic walls to display the extraordinary effects of Buddhism, but though they’re solitary and lofty, this is not as good as not setting up the solitary and simply acting ordi­ nary, naturally turning smoothly. 
When capacity goes beyond the solitary, only then do we see profound wonders. 
Thus Xuedou says, “Entering the ocean, he must hook a giant tortoise.” Observe Zhaozhou: 
He doesn’t hook shrimps or clams, snails or oysters—he only hooks giant tortoises. 
This line is used to illustrate a story. 
“His contemporary Guanxi is worth a laugh.” A monk asked Guanxi, “I’ve long heard of Guanxi ; now that I’ve come here I only see a flax soaking pool.” Guanxi said, You just see the flax soaking pool, not the pouring moun­ tain stream.” The monk said, “What is the pouring mountain stream?” Guanxi said, “Swift as a whistling arrow.” A monk asked Huanglong, “I’ve long heard of Huanglong (‘Yel­ low Dragon’); but now that I’ve come here I only see a red striped snake.” Huanglong said, “You only see the red striped snake, not the yellow dragon.” The monk said, “What is the yellow dragon?” Huanglong said, “Slithering along.” The monk said, “What about when it suddenly encounters a dragon-eating bird?” Huanglong said, “Difficult to stay alive.” The monk said, “If so, it’ll be eaten by the bird.” Huanglong said, “Thanks for feeding m e.” These are both cases of setting up the solitary. 
They did not equal Zhaozhou’s ordinary action. 
Thus Xuedou says, “Though he was able to say ‘whistling arrow,’ his effort was in vain.” Leaving Guanxi and Huanglong aside for the moment, how will you understand when Zhaozhou says, “It lets asses cross, it lets horses cross”? 
Try to do it. 
Introduction The whole world does not hide it—the entire capacity stands alone revealed. 
Encountering situations without getting stuck, with ev­ ery move adepts have the ability to come forth. 
With no partiality in their statements, everywhere they have the intent to kill people. 
But in the end, where did the ancients rest? 
Story Once when Mazu and Baizhang were walking, they saw some wild ducks fly by. (Two people in the weeds, rolling around in the weeds. 
Why suddenly notice?) Mazu asked, “What’s that?” (You should know, Teacher. 
This old fellow doesn’t even know his nostrils.) Baizhang said, “Wild ducks.” (He’s already been taken in tow. 
The second ladleful of foul water will be even more poisonous.) Mazu said, “Where have they gone?” (His first arrow was still light; the second goes deep. 
A second enticing peck. 
Here too one should know for oneself.) Baizhang said, “Flown away.” (He just rolls along behind Mazu. 
(The nose born of his parents is in the hands of another. Mazu turned the spear around and twisted Baizhang’s nose around.) Baizhang cried out in pain. (It’s right here. 
Can it be called wild ducks? 
Are you conscious of pain?) Mazu said, “When have they ever flown away?” (Better not deceive people. 
All along this old fellow has been living in a ghost cave.) Commentary If you observe with the true eye, unexpectedly it’s Baizhang who has the correct basis, while Mazu is creating waves where there’s no wind. 
If you want to be teacher of Buddhas and patriarchs, then study Baizhang; if you want to be unable to save even your­ self, then study Mazu. 
See how those ancients were never absent from Here, twenty-four hours a day. 
He became a dedi­ cated disciple of Mazu and served as his attendant for twenty years. 
But these days some say, “Where there is fundamentally no enlightenment they construct the gate of enlightenment, setting this matter up. 
” If you view it in this way, you are like a flea on a lion’s body feeding on the lion’s flesh. 
An ancient said, “If the source is not deep, the flow is not long; if the wisdom is not great, the vision is not far reaching.” If you think enlightenment is a con­ struct, how could Buddhism have come down to the present? 
Once when Mazu and Baizhang were walking they saw some wild ducks fly by. 
How could Mazu not have known they were wild ducks? 
Why did he nevertheless ask like this? 
When Baizhang merely ran after him, Mazu then twisted his nose. 
Baizhang cried out in pain, and Mazu said, “When have they ever flown away?” At this Baizhang had insight. 
But these days some people misunderstand; as soon as they’re questioned, they make a cry of pain. 
They can’t leap out. 
When Chan teachers help people, they must make them pen­ etrate. 
You see Baizhang didn’t understand; he didn’t avoid cut­ ting his hand on the point. 
Mazu just wanted to make him understand this matter. 
Observe how Mazu and Baizhang acted; though they seem radiant and spiritual, yet they don’t remain in radiance and spiri­ tuality. 
Baizhang cried out in pain; if you see it as such, the whole world doesn’t hide it, and it is perfectly manifest everywhere. 
Thus it is said, “Penetrate one point, and you penetrate myriad points all at once.” When Mazu went into the hall the next day, as soon as the congregation had assembled, Baizhang came forward and rolled up the bowing mat. 
Mazu then left his seat and went back to his room. 
Afterwards, he asked Baizhang, “I had just gone up in the hall and had not yet lectured; why did you roll up the mat right away?” Baizhang said, “Yesterday I had my nose twisted by you, and it hurt. 
” Mazu said, “Where were you keeping your mind yes­ terday?” Baizhang said, “ Today the nose no longer hurts.” Mazu said, “You have deep knowledge of the matter of Today.” Baizhang then bowed and returned to the attendants’ quarters, crying. 
An­ other attendant asked why he was crying; he said, “Go ask the teacher.” The attendant went to ask Mazu; Mazu said, “Go ask Baizhang.” When the attendant returned to ask Baizhang, Bai­ zhang laughed. 
The attendant said, “You were just crying—now why are you laughing?” Baizhang said, “Before I was crying, now I’m laughing.” Observe Baizhang after enlightenment, turning smoothly; he can’t be trapped; he’s sparkling clear on all sides. 
They’re extremely numerous.) Mazu saw them coming and had a conversation; (What end is there to creating complications? 
What did they say? 
Mazu alone recognizes the outstanding one.) He told all about the scene of the clouds on the mountains and the moon over the sea. 
(The ladle handle of the eastern house is long; the ladle handle of the western house is short. 
Who knows how many complications he created?) Still not understanding, Baizhang said they’d flown away. 
Don’t say he didn’t know how to speak. 
Where did they fly off to?) He wanted to fly away (He was in another’s grip. 
Don’t make a wild duck cry. 
Heavens! 
Who knows where they went to?) Commentary Xuedou makes his verse directly, saying, “Wild ducks— / Who knows where they are?” How many are there? 
“Mazu saw them coming and had a conversation. 
” This refers to Mazu asking Baizhang, “What is that?” and Baizhang saying “Wild ducks.” “He told all about the scene of the clouds on the mountains and the moon over the sea.” This refers to Mazu again asking, “Where have they gone?” Mazu’s intent for Baizhang was to reveal every­ thing spontaneously. 
” This is where Xuedou turns himself. 
How will you speak? 
If you make a cry of pain, you’re wrong; if you don’t make a cry of pain, then how do you understand? 
Though Xuedou versifies most wondrously, no matter what he does he can’t leap out either. 
Introduction Having penetrated beyond birth and death, one sets devices in motion; perfectly at ease, one shears through iron and cuts nails; wherever one goes one covers the universe. 
Tell me, whose behav­ ior is this? 
Story Yunmen asked a monk, “Where did you come here from ?” (Don’t say Xichan. 
Don’t say east, west, north, or south.) The monk said, “Xichan.” (As it turns out, he’s too literal. 
At that moment the monk should have given him some of his own provisions.) Yunmen said, “What is being said at Xichan these days? 
“Xichan was like you, teacher, talking in your sleep.”) The monk extended both hands. (He’s been defeated. 
He took in a thief and got his house ransacked. 
This will inevitably cause people to doubt.) Yunmen slapped him. (He acts according to the imperative. The monk should be hit. 
The monk is being given an excellent mount, but he doesn’t know how to ride it.) The monk was speech­ less; Yunmen hit him. 
(Don’t let him go. 
Yunmen said, “What is being said at Xichan these days?” This too is just ordinary conversation. 
The monk was speechless, so Yunmen hit him. 
Look—since Yunmen is an adept, whenever he takes a step he knows where the step comes down. 
He knows how to observe in front and take notice behind, not losing his way. 
This monk only knows how to look ahead; he’s unable to observe behind. 
Verse At once he takes the tiger’s head and the tiger’s tail— (The sword that kills, the sword that gives life. 
A thousand soldiers are easy to get, but one general is hard to find.) His stern majesty extends everywhere. 
I ask back, “ Didn’t you know how dangerous it w as?” (You shouldn’t blindly fetter and beat them. 
After all Xuedou himself doesn’t know. 
You are about to get hit yourself.) Xuedou says, “I leave off.” (Had he not left off, then what? 
Everyone on earth loses out all at once. 
I hit the meditation seat once.) Commentary Xuedou’s verse on this story is easy to understand; its overall in­ tent is to praise the sharp point of Yunmen’s ability. 
Thus he says, “At once he takes the tiger’s head and the tiger’s tail. 
” An ancient said, “Occupy the tiger’s head, take the tiger’s tail, and then at the first statement you’ll understand the source meaning.” Xuedou just settles the case on the basis of the facts. 
He likes the way Yunmen is able to occupy the tiger’s head and also take the tiger’s tail. 
When the monk extended his hands and Yunmen hit him, this was occupying the tiger’s head. 
When Yunmen extended his hands and the monk was speechless so that Yunmen hit him again, this was taking the tiger’s tail. 
When head and tail are taken to­ gether, the eye is like a shooting star. 
Yunmen is naturally like lightning; in fact, “ His stern maj­ esty extends everywhere.” The wind whistles all over the world. 
“I ask back, ‘Didn’t you know how dangerous it was?” ’ Un­ avoidably there was danger. 
Xuedou says, “I leave off.” But say, right now as I don’t leave off, then what? 
Everyone in the world will have to take a beating. 
Chan followers these days all say that when Yunmen extend­ ed his hands the monk should have repaid him with some of his own provisions. 
This seems correct, but in reality it isn’t. 
Yunmen can’t just get you to stop this way only—there must be something else besides. 
In contact with the flow, in control of things, one assumes responsi­ bility directly. 
As for cutting off confusion instantaneously, or tow­ ering like a gigantic wall, where one sits on the tiger’s head and takes the tiger’s tail —this I leave aside for the moment. 
Story 189a Daowu and Jianyuan went to make a condolence call. 
Jianyuan hit the coffin and said, “Alive or dead?” (What is he saying? 
He sure isn’t alert. 
He is lingering in duality.) Daowu said, “I won’t say alive, and I won’t say dead.” (When a dragon howls, fog ap­ pears; when a tiger roars, wind rises. 
He buys the hat to fit the head. 
As it turns out, he misunderstands.) Daowu said, “I won’t say, I won’t say. 
” (He pours foul water right on Jianyuan’s head. 
The first arrow was still light; the second arrow goes deep.) On the way back, Jianyuan said, “Tell me right away, or I’ll hit you.” (Now he’s getting somewhere. 
It’s rare to meet an adept; you often encounter people who cling to fixed points of reference. 
Idiots like this go to hell like a shot.) Daowu said, “You may hit me, but I won’t say.” (He must repeat this again and again. 
This old guy’s whole body is covered with muddy water. 
His original attitude is unchanging.) Jianyuan then hit him. (A good whack. 
There have always been people who have received unjust beat­ ings.) Later Daowu passed on. 
He doesn’t know whether he’s right or wrong—if he’s right, that would be amazing.) Shishuang said, “I won’t say alive, and I won’t say dead. 
Yet there have always been people who have this kind of food and drink.) Jianyuan said, “Why won’t you say?” (Though his words are the same, his intent is different. 
Is this the same as his asking before, or different?) Shishuang said, “I won’t say, I won’t say.” (Throughout the universe. 
If the waves of Chan were alike, innumerable ordinary people would get bogged down.) At these words Jianyuan had an insight. 
Better not fool me.) One day Jianyuan took a hoe into the teaching hall and walked back and forth. 
(He has found life within death. 
He should show some life for his late teacher. 
Too bad he was not so careful at first. 
Why gather in crowds?) Xuedou added a comment, “Heavens, heavens!” (Too late—he draws the bow after the thief is gone. 
What has the late teacher ever said to you? 
All along this fellow has been unable to get himself out.) Taiyuan Fu said, “The late teacher’s relics are still present.” (Does everyone see? 
They’re like a flash of light­ ning. 
What worn out straw sandals are these? 
Fu has realized a little bit.) Commentary Daowu and Jianyuan went to a house to make a condolence call. 
Jianyuan hit the coffin and said, “Alive or dead?” Daowu said, “I won’t say alive, and I won’t say dead.” If you can immediately penetrate at these lines, if at these words you immediately know the point, then this is the key to penetrating beyond life and death. 
Observe how these ancients were always mindful of this mat­ ter, whatever they were doing. 
As soon as they got to the house to i89b offer condolences, Jianyuan hit the coffin and asked Daowu, “Alive or dead?” Without stirring a bit Daowu replied, “I won’t say alive, I won’t say dead.” Jianyuan was face to face with it, but he stumbled past, running after the other man’s words, going on to say, “Why won’t you say?” Daowu said, “I won’t say, I won’t say.” Daowu could be said to have compassionately met an error with an error. 
This is what is called a good intention not getting a good reward. 
Even so, Daowu won the point. 
Daowu was dripping with blood like this to help him, but Jianyuan was unseeing. 
After being hit, Daowu told Jianyuan, “You should go away for a while; if the monastery director finds out, he may make trouble for you.” Extremely kind, Daowu secretly sent Jianyuan away. 
Later Jianyuan came to a small temple where he heard a work­ man reciting the Avalokitesvara scripture, where it says, “To those who would attain salvation as monks, he appears as a monk to teach them. 
If you understand this way, how will you attain tranquillity? 
If you walk the real earth, you aren’t even a hair’s breadth away. 
Once seven women sages were walking through a cremation ground. 
One pointed to a corpse and asked the others, “The corpse is here —where is the person?” The eldest sister said, “What? 
But how many are like this? 
Maybe one out of ten thousand. 
Shishuang too said, “I won’t say alive, and I won’t say dead. 
One day Jianyuan took a hoe into the teaching hall and walked back and forth. 
He intended to display his insight. 
Sure enough Shishuang asked him, “What are you doing?” Jianyuan said, “Look­ ing for relics of the late teacher. 
” Shishuang then cut off his foot­ steps, saying, “Immense waves spread far and wide, foaming billows flood the skies—what relics of the late master are you looking for? 
” Since Jianyuan was looking for relics of the late teacher, why did Shishuang nevertheless talk to him this way? 
At this point, if you can comprehend the words, “I won’t say alive, I won’t say dead,” then you will know that the entire capacity is put to use through­ out. 
If you make up rationalizations, hesitate and ponder, then it will be impossible to see. 
Daowu’s skull bone was golden; when struck it sounded like metal. 
Xuedou commented, “ Heavens, heavens!” His mean­ ing comes down on both sides. 
Haven’t you heard it said that if you penetrate one point you penetrate myriad points at once? 
If you can penetrate “I won’t say, I won’t say,” then you silence everyone on earth. 
If not, you must study for yourself and awaken yourself. 
Verse Rabbits and horses have horns— Oxen and rams have no horns. 
What pattern is forming? 
) Nary a hair, nary a wisp — (“In the heavens and on earth, I alone am the honored one.” Where will you search?) Like mountains, like peaks. (Where are they? 
Waves arising on level ground. 
They clog your nostrils.) The golden relics still exist right now— (Cutting off tongues, choking throats. 
I put them to one side; I only fear there won’t be anyone who can recognize them.) With foaming waves flooding the skies, where can they be put? 
They can’t be put in your eyes or ears.) There’s no place to put them— (After all. 
But as it turns out he’s sunk in a deep pit.) Even Bodhidharma on his way back West has lost them. 
I’ll hit, saying, “Then why are they here?”) Commentary Xuedou knows how to add footnotes exceptionally well. 
He is a descendant of Yunmen, with the ability to include three state­ ments in each statement. 
He produces the most crucial and essential point in verse, immediately saying, “Rabbits and horses have horns— / Oxen and rams have no horns.” Why do rabbits and horses have horns? 
Why have oxen and rams no horns? 
Only if you can penetrate the preceding story will you realize Xue­ dou has a way to help people. 
Some mistakenly say, “Not saying is saying; no statement is a statement. 
Though rabbits and horses have no horns, Xuedou says they do; though oxen and rams have horns, Xuedou says they don’t.” But this has nothing to do with it. 
They don’t know that the ancients’ myriad changes, manifesting such spiritual powers, were just to break up your psychic ghost cave. 
If you can pen­ etrate through, it’s not even worth using the word “understand.” “Rabbits and horses have horns— / Oxen and rams have no horns. 
/N ary a hair, nary a wisp— / Like mountains, like peaks.” These four lines are like a wish-fulfilling jewel. 
Xuedou has spit it out whole right in front of you. 
The last part of the verse is all settling the case according to the facts. 
“ The golden relics still exist right now— / With foaming waves flooding the skies, where can they be put?” This versifies the statements of Shishuang and Taiyuan Fu. 
Why is there no place to put them? 
“Even Bodhidharma on his way back West has lost them.” The sacred tortoise is dragging its tail—this is where Xuedou turns around to help people. 
An ancient said, “Just study the living word, not the dead word.” Since the relics are lost, why is that bunch still struggling over them? 
One Arrow Smashes Three Barriers Introduction Buddhas have never appeared in the world—there is no doctrine to be given to people. 
The Chan founder never came from India— he never passed on the mind transmission. 
Since people now do not understand, they frantically search outside themselves. 
They still don’t know that the one great matter right where they are can­ not be grasped even by the sages. 
Right now, where do seeing and not seeing, hearing and not hearing, speaking and not speaking, knowing and not knowing come from? 
If you cannot apprehend clearly, then try to understand inside the cave of complications. 
Story Chan student Liang asked Qinshan, “How is it when a single ar­ rowhead penetrates three barriers?” (Danger! 
Undeniably extraor­ dinary— a fierce general.) Qinshan said, “Bring out the lord within the barriers.” (He comes on directly. 
He wants everyone to know. 
Zhu is high, Mt. 
An is low.) Liang said, “So then knowing my fault I must change.” (He sees the opportunity and acts. 
When the wind blows the grass bends.) Liang said, “A well shot arrow doesn’t hit any­ where,” and set off. 
So he is trying to change his plea. 
He strikes with his second blow, but Qinshan feels no pain.) Qin­ shan said, “Come here a minute.” (Summoning is easy, dispatch­ ing is hard. 
What good is someone who turns when called?) Liang turned his head; Qinshan held him and said, “Leaving aside for the moment a single arrowhead penetrating three barriers, let’s see you shoot an ar­ row.” (He lies down in the tiger’s mouth. 
Waves against the cur­ rent. 
Having seen one’s duty but not doing it is lack of courage.) Liang hesitated. 
I’d hit, saying, “Too bad.”) Qinshan hit him seven times and said, “I’ll allow as this fellow will be doubting for thirty years.” (The im­ perative must be so. 
There’s a beginning, there’s an end. 
Qinshan is correct at the beginning and correct at the end. 
It’s Qinshan who should receive this beating.) Commentary Liang was undeniably a battle-tested general. 
In Qinshan’s hand he turned to the left and revolved to the right, bringing down his whip and flashing his stirrups. 
In the end, what a pity—his bow is broken, his arrows are used up. 
Even so, “General Li Guang had a glorious reputation, but was never enfeoffed, so it was useless. 
Taking charge of a situation, one brings it up face to face; face to face, taking charge of the situation is swift. 
Throughout there is no falling into being and nonbeing or gain and loss. 
This is called mysterious activity. 
This monk too was a brave spirited Chan monk; he posed a question that really startles the crowd. 
How is it when a single arrow penetrates three barriers? 
Qinshan’s re­ ply meant, “For the moment leave aside your shooting through; try to bring out the lord within the barriers.” Liang’s saying, “So then knowing my fault I must change” was undeniably extraordi­ nary. 
Finally Liang just said, “A well-shot arrow doesn’t hit any­ where,” and turned to leave. 
As soon as he saw him talking this way, Qinshan immediately called out to him, “Come here a minute.” After all Liang couldn’t hold fast; he turned his head. 
Qinshan held him and said, “Leaving aside for the moment a single arrow penetrating three barriers, let’s see you shoot an arrow.” When Liang hesitated, Qinshan struck him seven times. 
After this he went on to pronounce a curse on Liang, saying, “I’ll allow this fel­ low will be doubting for thirty years.” Chang followers these days all say, “Why didn’t he hit him eight times or six times? 
Why just seven times? 
Or else why didn’t he hit him immediately as he was asking him to try to shoot?” This may seem right but really isn’t. 
For this story you must not cherish the least bit of rationalizing calculation in your mind; you must pass beyond the words. 
Only then will you be able to have a way to penetrate the three barriers at a single statement and to shoot an arrow. 
At that time, if the monk had been a real man, Qinshan would have been in great danger too. 
But tell me, ultimately, who is the lord within the barriers? 
Verse I bring out the lord within the barriers for you— You who would shoot an arrow, don’t be careless! (Once dead, one doesn’t come back to life. 
Very obscure. Gone by.) Take an eye and the ears go deaf; (In the left eye half a pound. 
He lets his move go. On the left not advancing, on the right not retreating.) Let go an ear and the eyes both go blind. (In the right eye eight ounces. 
He finds only one road. 
Advance and you fall into a pit; retreat and a ferocious tiger bites you.) I can admire a single arrow point penetrating three barriers— (How is it when the entire capacity comes forth this way? 
What is he saying? 
The barriers have been smashed; the barriers have fallen.) The trail of the arrow is truly clear. 
You don’t see? 
“A great adept is the primordial ancestor of mind.” (With one line he cuts off the flow and puts myriad impulses to rest. 
Before heaven and earth and the world existed, where would you live?) Commentary 190c Several lines of this verse draw on a verse of Guizong. 
In Chan this is called talk of the source message, and Guizong was given the name “Return to the Source.” Later Tongan heard of this story and said, “Mr. 
Liang was well able to shoot arrows, but he didn’t know how to hit the tar­ get.” A monk asked, “How can one hit the target?” Tongan said, “Who is the lord within the barriers?” Later a monk cited this to Qinshan. 
Qinshan said, “Even if Mr. 
Although he is right, Dongan is not good-hearted.” Xuedou says, “I bring out the lord within the barriers for you.” Open your eyes and you can see, close your eyes and you can see too. 
With form, without form—all is cut into three. 
“You who would shoot an arrow, don’t be careless!” If you are able to shoot well, you won’t be careless. 
“Take an eye and the ears go deaf; / Let go an ear and the eyes both go blind.” When an eye is taken, why do the ears then go deaf? 
When an ear is let go, why do the eyes then go blind? 
You can penetrate these words only if you have no grasping and rejec­ tion; if you grasp and reject, it will be impossible to see. 
“ I can admire a single arrow point penetrating three barri­ ers— / The trail of the arrow is truly clear.” Liang asked, “How is it when a single arrow point penetrates three barriers?” Qinshan said, “Bring out the lord within the barriers.” These statements and everything down to Tongan’s case at the end are all the trail of the arrow. 
In the end, how is it? 
“You don’t see? 
/ Xuansha had words for this: 
/ ‘A great adept is the primordial ancestor of mind.’ ” It is commonplace to take mind as the ultimate principle of Chan; here though, why is the great adept still the ancestor of this mind even before the universe was born? 
If you can thoroughly understand this time, only then will you be able to recognize the lord within the barriers. 
“ The trail of the arrow is truly clear.” If you want to hit the target, there clearly is a trail behind the arrow. 
But what is the trail behind the arrow? 
Before you’ll understand you must apply concentrated mental effort on your own. 
“A great adept is the primordial ancestor of mind.” Xuansha often taught his disciples this. 
This is from a verse of Guizong’s which Xuedou wrongly attributes to Xuansha. 
Students of today who take this mind as the original source can study till kingdom come and still never understand. 
For one who is a great adept, even mind is still just the descendant. 
“Before the universe” is already the sec­ ondary; at just such a time, what is “before the universe”? 
Introduction i9 i a Before you penetrate, it seems like a silver mountain, an iron wall. 
Once you have penetrated, all along it was your self that was the silver mountain, the iron wall. 
” If, on the other hand, you are not yet thus, observe the look of an ancient. 
Story A monk asked Zhaozhou, “‘The supreme Way has no difficulties— just avoid discrimination.’ What is not discriminating?” (So many people cannot swallow these iron brambles. 
There are many people who have doubts about this. 
A mouthful of frost.) Zhaozhou said, “In the whole universe I alone am the honored one.” (He heaps up a pile of bones on level ground. 
A talisman hard as cast iron.) The monk said, “ This is still discrimination.” (As it turns out he’s rolled along after Zhaozhou. 
He challenges the old fellow.) Zhaozhou said, “Stupid oaf! 
His eyes open wide, his mouth is agape.) Commentary The monk questioned Zhaozhou about the saying, “ The supreme Way has no difficulties—just avoid discrimination.” There are quite a few people who misunderstand. 
If you understand this way, you won’t even see it in a dream in ten thousand years. 
Zhaozhou often used this saying to question people; this monk turned around and used it to question him. 
If you look in the words, this monk does after all startle heaven and shake the earth. 
If it is not in the words, then what? 
Study for thirty more years. 
You must be able to turn this little key before it will open. 
To grab the tiger’s whiskers you need your own abilities. 
Heedless of the mortal danger, the monk dared to grab the tiger’s whiskers and said, “ This is still discrimination.” Zhaozhou immediately blocked him by saying, “Stupid oaf! 
Where is the dis­ crimination?” Had the monk asked anyone else, he would have seen him flustered and confused. 
Zhaozhou moved where it was impossible to move, turned where it was impossible to turn. 
If you can pass through, all kinds of vicious words and mundane nonsense are exquisite; when you get to the real point, then you see Zhaozhou’s naked heart. 
Where is the discrimination?” The eye of Chan teachers must be thus, like the golden winged bird parting the ocean waters to seize a dragon directly and swallow it. 
Verse Deep as the ocean, (What measure is this? 
The abyssal source is impossible to fathom. 
There is still a half yet unattained.) Firm as a mountain. 
191b A mosquito sports in the fierce wind in the sky, (There are some like this. 
After all, he didn’t assess his strength; he certainly didn’t measure himself.) An ant tries to shake an iron pillar. (There’s no different dirt in the same hole. He’s out of touch. 
You’re a fellow student with him.) Discrimination— (Carrying water to sell at the river. 
What is he saying? Zhaozhou is here.) A cloth drum under the eaves. (It is already there before anything is said. They’re buried in the same pit, extremely numerous. 
”) Commentary Xuedou explains Zhaozhou’s two lines in the story by saying, “ Deep as the ocean, / Firm as a mountain.” The monk said, “ This is still discrimination,” so Xuedou says that this monk is like a mosquito playing in a gale, like an ant trying to shake an iron pillar. 
Xuedou praises this monk’s bravery. 
Where is the discrimination?” Isn’t this a fierce wind, an iron pillar? 
“Discrimination— / A cloth drum under the eaves.” At the end Xuedou picks this up to bring you to life. 
If you recognize it clearly, you are carrying the whole thing yourself. 
“If you want intimate understanding, don’t use a question to ask. 
” That is why “the cloth drum under the eaves. 
” Story A monk asked Zhaozhou, ‘“The supreme Way has no difficulties— just avoid discrimination’ —isn’t this a cliché for people today?” (A double case. 
This too is a point that makes people doubt. 
He’s tread­ ing on a scale beam hard as iron. 
There’s still this. 
Don’t judge others based on yourself.) Zhaozhou said, “Once someone asked me, and I simply couldn’t explain for five years.” (Honest speech is better than a red face. 
A monkey eats a caterpillar; a mosquito bites an iron ox.) Commentary Zhaozhou usually didn’t hit or shout; his action went beyond hit­ ting and shouting. 
This monk’s question was also very special; it would have been hard for anyone but Zhaozhou to answer. 
Since Zhaozhou was an adept, he just said, “Once someone asked me, and I simply couldn’t explain for five years.” The question was like a huge wall, and the answer didn’t make light of it. 
When Wayfarer Zong was the scribe in Xuedou’s community, Xuedou had him contemplate “The supreme way has no difficulties; just avoid discrimination.” Thereby Zong had an awakening. 
” Zong said, “Animal, animal.” Later he lived in seclusion. 
Whenever he went to teach, he wrapped his straw sandals and his scriptures in his vestment. 
Since this story is one question i9 ic and one answer, clear and perfectly obvious, why did Zhaozhou say he couldn’t explain? 
And tell me, is this a cliché for people today or not? 
Did Zhaozhou answer him inside or outside the nest of cliches? 
You must realize that this matter isn’t in words. 
One who penetrates the bone and marrow, whose trust is thoroughgoing, will be like a dragon in water, like a tiger in the mountains. 
Verse The elephant king trumpets; (Noblest of the noble, riches of the rich. 
Who isn’t awed? 
All the beasts’ brains burst. 
A good route to enter by.) Flavorless talk (When we’re reviling each other, you may lock jaws with me. 
It’s like an iron spike; where is there to bite into? 
He couldn’t explain for five years and more; carrying all China in a single leaf boat, far in the distant flats, waves are rising; who knows there is another, better realm of thought?) Chokes people off. 
What are you saying?) South, north, east, west— (Is there? 
In the heavens, on earth. 
Heavens, heavens!) The raven flies; the rabbit runs. 
Commentary Zhaozhou said, “Once someone asked me, and I simply couldn’t explain for five years. 
” This is like an elephant trumpeting, a lion roaring, flavorless talk choking people off. 
“South, north, east, west— / The raven flies; the rabbit runs.” If Xuedou didn’t have the last lines, where else would he have come from? 
Since the raven flies, and the rabbit runs, tell me, where do Zhaozhou, Xuedou, and I end up? 
Introduction He includes the heavens and encompasses the earth, going be­ yond holy and profane. 
He points out the ineffable mind of Nir­ vana in the midst of all things and decisively establishes the lifeline of Chan practitioners in the midst of trials and tribulations. 
Tell me, endowed with whose power can one get to be this way? 
Story A monk asked Zhaozhou, “‘The supreme Way has no difficulties— just avoid discrimination.’ ” (Again it’s hauled out. 
What is he say­ ing? 
A triple case.) “As soon as there are words spoken, this is discrimination.” “So how do you help people?” Zhaozhou said, “Why don’t you quote this saying in full?” (The thief is a small man, but his wisdom surpasses a lord’s. 
Zhaozhou is a thief who steals in broad daylight. 
He’s riding the bandit’s horse in pursuit of the bandit.) The monk said, “I only remember up to here.” (Two people playing with mud. 
The monk has met a robber. 
‘The supreme Way has no difficulties—just avoid discrimination.’ ” (In the end it’s up to this old fellow. 
‘The supreme Way has no difficulties—just avoid discrimination’,” is like a spark, like light­ ning. 
Capturing and releasing, killing and giving life—he has such free mastery. 
All agree Zhaozhou has eloquence beyond the com­ mon crowd. 
i92a Zhaozhou often taught with this saying: 
Someone else would have been unable to handle this monk, but Zhaozhou was an adept; he immediately said, “Why not quote this saying in full?” The monk too knew how to turn around and show his mettle: 
he said, “I only remember up to here.” It seems just like an arrangement. 
Zhaozhou answered directly, not needing any calculations. 
An ancient said of this, “Continuity is indeed difficult.” Zhaozhou distinguished dragons from snakes and differentiated right from wrong, after all a true adept. 
He snatched the monks’ eyes away without running afoul of his sharp point. 
It’s wrong to say either that he made a statement or didn’t make a statement; nor will it do to say he neither made nor didn’t make a statement. 
If one discusses this matter, it is like sparks, like lightning. 
Only if you look quickly can you see it. 
If you vacillate you won’t avoid losing your life. 
Verse Water poured on cannot wet; (What are you saying? Too deep and remote. 
What is there to discuss?) Wind blowing cannot penetrate. (Like space. 
Hard, impervious. 
Address your plea to the sky.) The tiger prowls; the dragon walks; Ghosts howl; spirits wail. 
When the wind blows the grasses bend. 
Are you not a fellow student of theirs?) His head is three feet long—I wonder who it is? 
Standing on one foot, he answers back without speaking. 
He draws back his head and lets his move go. 
Mountain sprite? 
He shouldn’t be let go, so I strike.) Commentary “Water poured on cannot wet; / Wind blowing cannot penetrate. 
/ The tiger prowls; the dragon walks; / Ghosts howl; spirits wail.” There’s no place for you to chew on. 
These four lines refer to Zhaozhou’s answer, which is indeed like a dragon galloping, a ti­ ger charging. This monk just got an embarrassment. 
Not only this monk; even the ghosts howl, the spirits wail. 
It’s like when the wind blows the grasses bow. 
Of the final two lines it could be said, “One son has intimately understood.” “His head is three feet long—I wonder who it is? 
/ Standing on one foot, he answers back without speaking.” A monk asked an ancient, “What is the Buddha?” The ancient said, “The head is three feet long, the neck two inches long.” Xuedou draws on this to use in the verse. 
Do you people recognize him? 
Not even I know him. 
All at once Xuedou has fully depicted Zhaozhou. 
The real one has always been within—all of you must investigate care­ fully and try to see it. 
The Staff Changes into a Dragon Introduction Buddhas and sentient beings—fundamentally there’s no difference between them. 
Mountains, rivers, and oneself—how could there be any distinction? 
Why then is it all divided into two sides? 
If you don’t let go, the whole earth isn’t worth grasping. 
But what is the place to set words turning? 
Story Yunmen showed his staff to the assembly and said, (He transforms according to the occasion. 
The sword that kills, the sword that brings life. 
He’s snatched your eyes away.) “ The staff has changed into a dragon” “and swal­ lowed the universe.” (No Chan practitioners can preserve their lives. 
Where will you settle and live?) “Moun­ tains, rivers, the whole earth—where are they to be found?” (In the ten directions there are no walls; on the four sides there are no gates. 
East, west, south, north, the four intermediate points, above, below. 
What about this?) Commentary “The staff has changed into a dragon and swallowed the universe. 
Where are the mountains, rivers, and earth to be found?” If you say they exist, you are blind; if you say they don’t exist, you are dead. 
Do you see where Yunmen helped people? 
Bring the staff back to me! 
People these days do not understand Yunmen’s solitary rev­ elation. 
Instead they say he went to form to explain mind, relied on things to reveal principle. 
But the Buddha couldn’t have been ignorant of this theory as he taught the Dharma for forty-nine years; why then did he also need to hold up the flower for Kasyapa’s smile? 
The old fellow then caused confusion by saying, “I have the treasury of vision of truth, the ineffable mind of Nirvana—these I pass on to Kasyapa.” Why was there still a need for the specially transmitted mind seal? 
Given that you are Chan students, do you understand this specially transmitted mind? 
If there is a single thing in your heart, then mountains, riv­ ers, the whole earth, appear in profusion before you; if there isn’t anything in your heart, then outside there is nothing at all. 
How can you talk about principle and knowledge fusing, about world and mind merging? 
What’s the reason? 
When one is understood, all are understood; when one is clear, all are clear. 
How can you talk about revealing mind in form, demonstrating prin­ ciple by phenomena? 
If you can know this atom, you can know the staff. 
As soon as Yunmen picks up his staff, we immediately see his unconfined marvelous activity. 
Bajiao said, “If you have a staff, I’ll give you a staff; if you have no staff, I’ll take your staff away.” Yongjia said, “ This is not an empty exhibition of form; it is the actual traces of the Buddha’s precious staff.” Long ago in the time of Dlpankara Buddha, the future Bud­ dha spread his hair to cover some mud for that Buddha. 
Dipankara said, “A temple should be built here.” An elder present thereupon set up a blade of grass there and said, “The temple has been built. 
” Tell me, receive what rightly? 
Should you clap your hands? 
Verse The staff swallows the universe — (What is he saying? 
The staff is used only for beating dogs.) He vainly talks of peach blossoms floating on the rushing waves. 
(Open the passage to the beyond, and all the sages will stand downwind. 
It’s not a matter of grasping clouds and fog. 
Being able to say it thousands of times isn’t as good as catching it once.) For those with tails burnt off, it’s not a matter of grasping clouds and fog; (On all sides—I just observe. 
It’s just a stick of dry firewood.) Why should the exhausted ones necessarily lose their courage and spirit? (Everyone’s temper is like a king’s. 
One simply must be completely free — (Leftover soup, spoiled food. 
It’s about to reach your head. 
”) With seventy-two blows I’m letting you off easy— (I’ve never carried out this imperative, but if you are going to act according to the imperative, it’s lucky you found me.) Even with one hundred fifty it’s hard to forgive you. (A just order must be carried out. 
How could it only be this many? 
Even if he gave three thousand blows in the morning and eight hundred in the evening, what good would it do?) Xuedou suddenly picked up his staff and came down from his seat; All at once the assembly scattered and fled. 
(Why does Xuedou have a dragon’s head but a snake’s tail?) Commentary Ynnmen helps people by a circuitous path; Xuedou helps people by a direct shortcut. 
That’s why Xuedou discards the transforma­ tion into a dragon; he doesn’t need such talk, just “the staff swal­ lows the universe.” Xuedou’s intent is to have people avoid fanciful interpretations. 
He goes on to say, “He vainly talks of peach blos­ soms floating on the rushing waves.” There’s no further need for changing into a dragon. 
At the Gate of Yu there’s a three level rapids; every year in the third month when the peach blossoms bloom and the waves rise, the fish who can go against the current and leap past the rapids change into dragons. 
Xuedou says that even if they change into dragons, this too is still vain talk. 
“For those with tails burnt off it’s not a matter of grasping clouds and fog.” When fish pass through the Gate of Yu a celestial fire burns their tails; they grab the clouds and fog and depart. 
Xuedou means that though they change into dragons, it still isn’t a matter of grabbing clouds and fog. 
“Why should the exhausted ones necessarily lose their courage and spirit?” A scripture com­ mentary says, “Even bodhisattvas who have built up practice gasp for breath at the gate of Y u .” This means that the realm of the cosmic unity is not something mastered by small virtue or small knowledge. 
It’s like the fish trying to pass through the Gate of Yu, where those who cannot pass through fail and fall back, lying in the shoals of stagnant water, exhausted and gasping. 
Xuedou means that once they fail and fall back, they always lose their courage and spirit. 
“ I have picked it up— / Do you hear or not?” Again he adds footnotes; all at once he’s swept it clean for you. 
“With seventy-two blows I’m still letting you off easy— / Even with a hundred fifty it’s hard to forgive you.” Xuedou has discarded the heavy for the light for your sake. 
An ancient said, “Seventytwo blows turns into one hundred fifty.” These days people misun­ derstand and just calculate numerically and say, “It should be seventy-five blows; why is it instead just seventy-two blows? 
” They still don’t realize that the ancient’s meaning was outside the words. 
Thus it is said, “ This matter is not in words.” Xuedou drew on this to use in order to avoid people later on trying to rationalize. 
Even if you’re truly free, you still rightly deserve seventy-two blows— this is still letting you off easy. 
If you’re not free like this at all, it would be hard to let you go with one hundred fifty. 
Nevertheless, there wasn’t even one with blood under his skin. 
Introduction 193b To set up the banner of the teaching and establish its fundamental message is a matter for a genuine master. 
To judge dragons and snakes and distinguish initiate from naive, one must be an accomplished teacher. 
As for discussing killing and giving life on the edge of a sword, discerning what is appropriate for the moment with a staff, this I leave aside for the moment; just tell me in one phrase how you will assess the matter of occupying the heartland single-handedly. 
Story Fengxue said, (He rouses clouds and brings rain. 
He wants to be host and be guest.) “If you set up a single atom,” (“ I am king of the teaching, autonomous master of the teaching.” Clusters of flowers, clusters of brocade.) “the nation flourishes;” (This is not the busi­ ness of his house.) “if you do not set up a single atom,” (He sweeps away the tracks and obliterates the traces; having lost the eyes, the nostrils are gone too.) “the nation perishes.” (Everywhere light shines. 
What is the use of the nation? 
This is entirely the business of his house.) Xuedou raised his staff and said, (One must stand like a mile-high wall to accomplish this. 
Bodhidharma is here.) “Are there any Chan practitioners who will live together and die together?” (Return the story to me. 
If you do, I admit you are free. 
If not, you get hit three thousand times in the morning, eight hundred times in the evening.) Commentary “If you set up a single atom, the nation flourishes; if you don’t set up a single atom, the nation perishes. 
When you get here, your great function must become manifest before you’ll understand. 
That is why Fengxue said, “Even if you can grasp it before it is spoken of, still this is remaining in the shell, wandering in limita­ tion; even if you thoroughly penetrate it at a single phrase, you still won’t avoid insane views on the way.” Fengxue was an adept in the line of Linji; he directly used his own provisions. 
“If you set up a single atom, the nation flourishes, and the old peasants frown.” The meaning lies in the fact that to i93 c establish a nation and stabilize the country, it is necessary to rely on crafty ministers and valiant generals; after that, the unicorn appears, the phoenix soars—these are the auspicious symbols of the halcyon. 
How could the people of three-family villages know there are such things? 
When you do not set up a single atom, the nation perishes, the wind blows chill; why do the old peasants come out and sing hallelujah? 
Just because the nation has perished. 
there is no more Buddha, nor sentient beings; no affirmation, no negation, no good, no bad—it is beyond sound and echo, track or trace. 
That is why it is said, “ Though gold dust is precious, in the eye it ob­ structs vision.” And it is said, “Gold dust is a cataract on the eye; the jewel in one’s clothes is the defilement of the Dharma. 
When even one’s own spirit is not esteemed, who are the Buddhas and patriarchs?” Piercing and penetrating spiritual powers and their wondrous action would not be considered exceptional; when one gets here, with the patch robe over the head, myriad concerns cease—at this time, one does not “understand” anything at all. 
If one were to speak any more of mind, of nature, of the profound, of the wondrous, it would not be any use at all. 
“One has one’s own mountain spirit realm.” Nanquan said, “The seven hundred eminent monks at Huangmei all understood Buddhism; they did not inherit the patriarchy. 
Only workman Lu didn’t understand Buddhism—so he became the patriarch.” He also said, “ The Buddhas of all times do not know what is; cats and oxen know what is.” The old peasants either frown or sing, but tell me how you will understand. 
And what eye do they possess, that they are like this? 
You should know that in front of the old peasants’ gates no ordinances are posted. 
Xuedou, having raised both sides, finally lifts up his staff and says, “Are there any Chan practitioners who will live together and die together? 
” Had there been someone who could come forth and make a statement, alternately acting as guest and host, that one would have avoided this old fellow Xuedou’s pointing to him­ self in the end. 
Verse The old peasants may frown, (There is someone three thousand miles away. 
Delicious food is not for a satisfied man to eat.) But for now I hope the nation establishes a sturdy foundation. (Everyone knows the song of peace. 
When you want to go, go; when you want to stay, stay. 
The whole world is one gate of liberation. 
How will you establish it?) Crafty ministers, valiant generals—where are they now? (Are there any? 
The land is broad, the people few, and rarely is anyone met with. 
But do not point to yourself.) Myriad miles’ pure wind, one only knows for oneself. 
Who will you have sweep the ground? 
He cuts down the long and adds to the short, abandons the heavy and goes along with the light. 
/ Crafty ministers, valiant gener­ als—where are they now?” In one gulp he has swallowed everyone completely. 
That is why I say that the land is broad, the people few, and rarely is anyone met with. 
Are there any who know? 
Come forth and be buried in the same pit. 
“Myriad miles’ pure wind, one only knows for oneself.” This is where Xuedou points to himself. 
Introduction By means of the knowledge that has no teacher, one produces the marvelous function of nondoing; by means of unconditional com­ passion, one acts unasked as an excellent friend. 
In one statement there is killing, there is giving life; in one act there is releasing, there is capturing. 
Tell me, who has ever been thus? 
Story Yunmen said, “Within heaven and earth,” (The land is broad, the people few. 
The six directions cannot contain it.) “through space and time,” “there is a jew el” (Where is it? 
Light is produced. 
Check!) “Pick up a lamp and go into the Buddha hall;” (It still can be discussed.) “take the triple gate and bring it on the lamp.” (Yunmen is right, but undeniably difficult to understand. This seems to be getting somewhere, but if you examine thoroughly, you will not avoid the odor of dung.) Commentary i94a Yunmen says, “Within heaven and earth, through space and time, there is a jewel, hidden in the mountain of form.” Does Yunmen intend this as a fishing pole or a lamp? 
These lines are paraphrased from Sengzhao’s Jewel Treasury; Yunmen used them to teach. 
The main idea is “How can you conceal a priceless jewel in the psycho­ physical elements?” The Jewel Treasury Treatise is in accord with Chan teaching. 
Quoting it, Jingqing asked Caoshan, “How is it when there is ultimately no body in the empty noumenon? 
” Cao­ shan said, “Noumenon is thus; what about phenomena?” Jingqing said, “As is noumenon, so are phenomena.” Caoshan said, “You can fool me, but what about the eyes of the sages?” Jingqing said, “Without the eyes of the sages, how could you know it is not so?” Caoshan said, “Officially, not even a needle is admitted; privately, even a cart and horse can pass. 
” So it was said, “Within heaven and earth, in space and time, there is a jewel, hidden in the mountain of form.” The intent of this is to show that everyone is fully endowed, each individual is complete. 
Yunmen thus brought it up to show his group; it is to­ tally obvious—he couldn’t go on and add interpretations for you like a professor. 
But he is compassionate and adds a footnote for you: 
“ Pick up a lamp and go into the Buddha hall; bring the triple gate on the lamp.” Now tell me, what does Yunmen mean by this? 
An ancient said, “The true nature of ignorance is identical to the nature of Buddhahood; the empty body of illusion is identical to the body of reality.” It is also said, “See the Buddha mind right in the ordinary mind.” The mountain of form is the body-mind. 
“Within there is a jewel, hidden in the mountain of form.” That is why it is said, “All Buddhas are in the mind; the deluded seek outside. 
Though they have a precious jewel within, they do not know it, and they let it rest there all their lives.” It is also said, “The Buddha nature clearly manifests, but people dwelling on form cannot see it. 
If one real­ izes that people have no self, how does one’s own face differ from the Buddha’s face? 
Therefore they cannot set it in motion and cannot bring it out in action. 
” “Pick up a lamp and head into the Buddha hall” —as a matter of ordinary sense this can be fathomed, but what about “bring the triple gate on the lamp”? 
Yunmen has broken up emotional dis­ crimination, intellectual ideas, gain, loss, affirmation, and nega­ tion, all at once for you. 
Xuedou has said, “I like the fresh devices of Yunmen; all his life he removed fixations and hang-ups for people.” He also said, “I do not know how many sit on the chair of rank; but the sharp sword cutting away causes others’ admiration.” When he said, “Pick up a lamp and go into the Buddha hall,” this has already cut off completely; yet, “bring the triple gate on the lamp.” If you discuss this matter, it is like sparks, like light­ ning. 
Yunmen said, “If you would attain, just seek a way of entry; Buddhas numerous as atoms are under your feet, and the three treasuries of holy teachings are on your tongues; but this is not as good as being enlightened. 
Do not think falsely: 
sky is sky, earth is earth, mountains are mountains, rivers are rivers, monks are monks, lay people are lay people. 
It is hung on a wall; for nine years Bodhidharma did not dare to look at it straight on. 
If any Chan practitioners want to see it now, I will hit them right on the spine with my staff.” See how these true teachers of Chan never use any actual doctrine to tie people up. 
(Set your eyes on high. 
Why look? 
A black dragon admires a gem.) On the ancient bank, who holds the fishing pole? (Alone, quite alone; stolid, quite stolid. 
He draws his bow after the bandit is gone. 
If you see jowls on the back of someone’s head, don’t have anything to do with him.) Clouds roll on, (Cut them off. 
A hundred layers, a thousand levels. 
A greasy hat, a stinking shirt.) The water, vast and boundless— (Left and right it goes, blocking in front and surrounding in back.) The white flowers in the moonlight you must see for yourself. 
(When you see them you’ll go blind. 
If you can comprehend Yunmen’s words, you will see Xuedou’s last statement.) Commentary If you can comprehend Yunmen’s words, then you will see how Xuedou helps people. 
He goes to the last two phrases of Yunmen’s address and there gives you a footnote, saying, “Look, look!” If you thereupon make raising your eyebrows and glinting your eyes your understanding, you are out of touch. 
It is not captured in writings. 
The nature of the mind has no defilement; it is inherently complete. 
Just get rid of delusive clingings and merge with the Buddha that is as is.” If you just raise your brows and glint and sit there forever, how will you be able to transcend the senses? 
Yunmen is as though on an ancient bank holding a fishing pole; the clouds roll, the water is boundless. 
The bright moon reflects white flowers, white flowers reflect the bright moon. 
At this moment, whose realm is this? 
” If you can perceive it immediately and directly, the former and the latter phrases are just like one phrase. 
Nanquan Kills a Cat Introduction Right where the road of ideation cannot reach is good to bring to attention; where verbal explanation cannot reach, you must set your eyes on it quickly. 
If your thunder peals and comets fly, then you can overturn lakes and topple mountains. 
Is there anyone in the crowd who can manage this? 
Story At Nanquan’s place one day the monks of the east and west halls were arguing over a cat. (It’s not just today that they’re haggling. 
This is a case of degeneracy.) When Nanquan saw this, he held up the cat and said, “If you can speak, I won’t kill it.” (When the true imperative goes into effect, the ten directions are subdued. 
This old fellow has the capability to distinguish dragons from snakes.) No one replied; (What a pity to let it go. 
Phony Chan followers are most plentiful.) Nanquan cut the cat in two. 
If he hadn’t acted thus, they would all be playing with mud. 
He draws the bow after the brig­ and is gone. 
What was his inner meaning? 
But actually these bear no relation to it at all. 
Had he not held it up, would you still spin out all sorts of rationalizations? 
You still don t know that this ancient had the eye to settle heaven and earth, and he had the sword to settle heaven and earth. 
Now you tell me, after all, who was it that killed the cat? 
This is why I say when the true imperative goes into effect the ten directions are subdued. 
Stick your head out beyond the heavens and look. 
The fact is that he really did not kill. 
This matter is clearly known; it is so obvious. 
It is not to be found in emotions or opinions; if you go on searching in emotions and opinions, you turn against Nanquan. 
Just see it right on the knife’s edge. 
Being is all right, nonbeing is all right, nei­ ther being nor nonbeing is all right too. 
Hence the ancient saying, “At an impasse, change; change and you get through.” People nowa­ days do not know how to change and get through; they only go running to words. 
When Nanquan held up the cat in this way, he couldn’t have been telling people they should be able to say some­ thing; he just wanted people to attain on their own, each act on their own, and know for themselves. 
If you do not understand it this way, after all you will grope without finding it. 
Verse In both halls they are phony Chan followers; (Familiar words come from a familiar speaker. 
He has said it all in one statement. 
He settles the case according to the facts.) Stirring up smoke and dust, they are helpless. (Look; what settlement will you make? A completely obvious case. 
He uses the fine diamond sword to cut mud.) With one stroke of the knife he cuts in two, letting the pieces be lopsided as they may. 
He can’t be let go, so I strike.) Commentary “ In both halls they are phony Chan followers.” Xuedou does not die at the phrase and also does not acknowledge anything halfbaked. 
He has a place to turn, so he says, “Stirring up smoke and dust, they are helpless.” Xuedou and Nanquan walk hand in hand; in one statement he has said it all. 
The leaders of the two halls have no place to rest their heads; everywhere they go they just stir up smoke and dust, unable to accomplish anything. 
So Xuedou said, “Fortunately there is Nanquan who is able to bring up the imperative; / With one stroke of the knife he cuts in two, letting the pieces be lopsided as they may. 
” He directly cuts in two with one knife, without further con­ cern about unevenness. 
But tell me, what imperative is Nanquan going by? Nanquan Questions Zhaozhou Story Nanquan told Zhaozhou the preceding story to question him. 
Only one on the same road would know.) Zhaozhou immediately took off his sandals, placed them on his head, and left. 
(He does not avoid trailing mud and dripping water.) Nanquan said, “ Had you been here, you could have saved the cat.” (Singing and clapping, they accompany each other; those who know the tune are few. 
He adds error to error.) Commentary Zhaozhou was Nanquan’s true heir; when Nanquan spoke of the head, Zhaozhou understood the tail; when it is brought up, he immediately knows where it comes down. 
In the evening Nanquan told Zhaozhou the preceding story and asked him about it. 
Zhaozhou was an old adept; he immedi­ ately took off his sandals, put them on his head, and left. 
Nanquan said, “Had you been here, you could have saved the cat.” But tell me, was it really like this or not? 
Even a thousand sages could not deflect him a bit. 
You must bring forth your own family treasure; only then will you see the great function of the total capacity. 
He is saying, “I am king of the Dharma, free in all things.” Many misunderstand and say that Zhaozhou temporarily made his sandals into the cat. 
They still don’t know that the ancient s meaning was like the universal cover of the sky, like the universal support of the earth. 
That father and son harmonized with each other; their minds met. 
Students these days do not know the turning point of the ancients, and they vainly go the road to ideation to figure them out. 
If you want to see, just go to the turning points of Nanquan and Zhaozhou and you will see them well. 
Verse The case completed, he questions Zhaozhou; (The words are still in our ears. 
No use to cut any more. 
He hangs a medicine bag on the back of a hearse.) In the capital city, he’s free to wander at leisure. 
He picks the plants as they come to hand. 
I cannot but let you go on thus.) His sandals he wears on his head—no one understands. (Yet there’s one or a half. 
This is a special style. 
It’s met in the light, and met in darkness too.) Returning to his native village, then he rests. 
But tell me, where is the fault? 
It’s just that you are raising waves where there is no wind. 
They let each other off. 
I only fear you will not be thus; if so, it’s quite unusual.) Commentary “The case completed, he questions Zhaozhou.” The librarian Qing said, “It is like a man settling a case; eight strokes of the cane is eight strokes, thirteen is thirteen. 
Already he has settled it com­ pletely, yet he brings it up to ask Zhaozhou. 
” Zhaozhou was his disciple and understood Nanquan’s mean­ ing. 
But tell me, right now, how will you understand? 
“Returning to his native village, then he rests.” Where is his native village? 
If he didn’t understand, he surely wouldn’t speak this way. 
I strike immediately. 
An Outsider Questions the Buddha Introduction Appearing without form, filling the ten directions of space, ex­ panding everywhere equally; responding without mind, extend­ ing over lands and seas without trouble; understanding the whole when a part is raised, judging grains and ounces at the glance of an eye. 
Even if blows of the staff fall like rain and shouts are like thunder pealing, you still have not filled the footsteps of a tran­ scendent person. 
Story An outsider asked the Buddha, “I do not ask about the spoken or the unspoken.” (Though he is not a member of the household, still he has a bit of a fragrant air. 
Twin swords fly through space. 
(Don’t slander the Buddha; his voice is thunderous. 
He is trying to repair a pot with cold iron.) The Bud­ dha said, “Like a good horse, he goes as soon as he sees the shadow of the whip.” (Tell me, what do you call the shadow of the whip? 
Striking with my whisk, I say that on the staff there is an eye bright as the sun. 
If you want to know if it is real gold, see it through fire. 
Having gotten a mouth, eat.) Commentary Were this matter in words, does not the Buddhist canon contain words? 
Some say it is right just not to speak. 
Then what would have been the use of the Chan founder coming from India? 
Luckily none of this has any connection; how could you ever manage to find it by groping around? 
This matter really isn’t in words yet is not apart from words. 
If you make the slight­ est attempt to assess, you are a myriad miles away. 
See how after that outsider had intuitively awakened, only then did he realize it was neither here nor there, neither in affirmation nor in negation. 
But tell me, what is this? 
Tianyi Yihuai composed this verse: 
Though the sharp sword is in its scabbard, its light is cold; Outsiders and celestial demons all are helpless. 
When Daochang was studying with Fayan, Fayan had him con­ template this story. 
One day Fayan asked him, “What story are you contemplating?” Daochang said, “The outsider questioning the Buddha.” Fayan said, “Quote it.” As Daochang began to speak, Fayan said, “Stop! 
Later, in teaching, he said, “I have three secrets: 
‘have tea,’ ‘take care,’ and ‘rest.’ If you still try to think any more about them, I know you are still not through.” Cuiyan Zhen cited this story and said, “In the six directions and nine states, blue, yellow, red, and white intermingle.” The outsider knew the four Vedas and thought he was omni­ scient; everywhere he went he drew people into debate. 
He posed a question hoping to cut off the Buddha’s tongue. 
The Buddha did not expend any energy, yet the outsider was immediately awak­ ened. 
He said, “The Buddha’s great kindness and compassion have opened up the clouds of my confusion and allowed me to gain en­ try.” But what is the Buddha’s great kindness and compassion? 
The Buddha’s single eye sees through past, present, and future; the outsider’s twin eyes penetrate the Indian continent. 
The outsider had the supreme jewel hidden within; The Buddha kindly lifted it on high for him. 
But after all what did the outsider realize? 
It was like chasing a dog toward a fence: 
If you cast away judgment and comparison and affirmation and negation all at once, your emotions ended and your views gone, it will naturally become thoroughly obvious. 
After the outsider had left, Ananda asked the Buddha what he had realized to say that he had gained entry. 
The Buddha said, “Like a good horse, he goes as soon as he sees the shadow of the whip.” Since then, everywhere it has been said that at this point even he was blown by the wind into a different tune. 
Where is the shadow of the Buddha’s whip? 
Where is the seeing of the shadow of the whip? 
Xuedou said, “False and true are not sepa­ rate; the fault comes from the shadow of the whip.” Zhenru said, “Ananda’s gold bell is rung twice, and everyone hears it together. 
Even so, it is much like two dragons fighting for a jewel. 
(If it doesn’t fall into being, it will surely fall into nonbeing; if it doesn’t go east, it will go west. 
The left eye is half a pound, the right eye eight ounces.) A clear mirror is suddenly set on a stand (But do you see the Buddha? 
One push and it turns. 
Broken, shattered!) And immediately distinguishes beautiful and ugly. (The whole world is the door of liberation. 
But do you see the Buddha?) Beautiful and ugly distinct, the clouds of illusion open; (He lets out a pathway. 
I allow as you have a place to turn around, but nevertheless you’re just an outsider.) In the gate of compassion, where is any dust produced? 
Retreat— Bodhidharma’s here.) Thus I think of a good horse seeing the whip’s shadow. 
But tell me, where is the shadow of the whip, where is the good horse?) Gone a thousand miles in pursuit of the wind, I call him back; (Riding on the Buddha hall, I go out the main gate. 
If he turns around, he goes wrong. 
He shouldn’t be let go, so I strike.) Calling, if I get him to return, I’d snap my fingers thrice. (He neither reaches the village nor gets to the shop. 
With your staff broken, where will you go? 
The sound of Xuedou’s thunder is great, but there is no rain at all.) Commentary “The wheel of potential has not turned; / If it turns it will surely go two ways. 
” The potential is the spiritual potential of the sages; the wheel is the original lifeline of all people. 
Xuedou said, “ The spiritual potential of the sages is not easily approached; dragon children born of dragons, do not be irresolute. 
Zhaozhou stole a gem worth many cities; the king of Qin and Xiangru both lose their lives. 
” After all the outsider was able to hold still and be the master; he didn’t move at all. 
How so? 
He said he didn’t ask about the spoken or the unspoken. 
Is this not where the potential is whole? 
The Buddha knew how to observe the wind to set the sail, how to give medicine in accord with the disease; so he remained silent. 
The entire potential uplifted, the outsider merged with it com­ pletely; his wheel of potential then turned freely and smoothly. 
It turned neither toward being nor toward nonbeing; it did not fall into gain or loss, was not bound by the ordinary or the holy—both sides were cut off at once. 
Many people nowadays fall into nonbeing, or else they fall into being; they only remain within being and nonbeing, running either way. 
Xuedou says, “A clear mirror is suddenly set on a stand / And immediately distinguishes beautiful and ugly.” This has never moved; it just calls for silence, like a clear mirror on a stand— myriad forms cannot avoid their appearance. 
Where is the outsider’s point of entry? 
Here you must seek on your own, investigate on your own, awaken on your own, understand on your own. 
“Beautiful and ugly distinct, the clouds of illusion open; / In the gate of compassion, where is any dust produced?” The whole world is the gate of compassion. 
This also is an open door. 
” “So I think of a good horse seeing the shadow of the whip; / Gone a thousand miles in pursuit of the wind, I call him back. 
” A “wind-chasing” horse, seeing the shadow of a whip, immediately goes a thousand miles; if you make it return, it returns. 
“Calling, if I get him to return, I’d snap my fingers thrice” —is this criticism, or is it scattering sand? 
Introduction Meeting the situation head on, setting a pitfall for a tiger; attack­ ing from front and side, laying out strategy to capture a bandit; adapting in light, adapting in darkness, letting both go, gather­ ing both in, knowing how to play with a dead snake —all this is a matter for an adept. 
Story Yantou asked a monk, “Where do you come from ?” (He’s defeated before he even speaks. Yantou’s boring into a skullbone. 
If you want to know where he’s coming from, it’s not hard.) The monk said, “From the western capital.” Yan­ tou said, “After the rebel Huangchao had gone, did you get his sword?” (Yantou has never been a petty thief. 
He doesn’t fear los­ ing his head, so he asks such a question; courageous indeed.) The monk said, “ I got it.” (He’s defeated. 
He doesn’t know where to turn. 
This is a pitfall to catch a tiger. 
What is going on in his mind?) The monk said, “Your head has fallen.” (He only sees the sharpness of the awl, not the squareness of the chisel. 
What good or bad does he know? 
No one can find out where his head has fallen.) Later that monk went to Xuefeng. (As before he’s fatheaded and stupid. 
He is defeated time and again.) Xuefeng asked, “Where did you come from ?” (He can’t but tell where he comes from; but still Xuefeng wants to try him.) The monk said, “From Yantou.” Xuefeng said, “What did he say?” (If he can recite it, he won’t avoid getting hit.) The monk recounted the preceding story. 
(Right then he should be driven out.) Xuefeng hit him thirty blows with his staff and drove him out. 
(Though it is true he cuts nails and shears through iron, why does he only strike thirty blows? 
This is not yet the real thing. 
“ Three thousand blows in the morning, eight hun­ dred blows in the evening.” Were Xuefeng not a fellow student with Yantou, how could he discern the point? 
This monk’s eyes were like comets, yet he was still thoroughly exposed by Yan­ tou, and pierced all the way through on a single string. 
At that time, had he had a little eye power, he would have been able to get a glimpse. 
This story has a knotty complication in it. 
Though this matter has neither gain nor loss, the gain and loss are tremendous; though there is no discrimination, when you get here, after all you must have the eyes to discriminate. 
“How is it when a student wants to take the master’s head with a sharp sword?” Deshan stretched out his neck and said, “K aa!” Longya said, “Your head has fallen.” Deshan went to his room. 
” At these words Longya was greatly awakened; subsequently he made a gesture of repentance to Deshan. 
Deshan went to his room, thus in darkness was most wonderful. 
Yantou laughs; in his laugh there is poison; anyone who could discern it could travel freely throughout the world. 
If this monk had been able to pick it out at that moment, he would have escaped criticism for all time. 
Observe Xuefeng; being a colleague of Yantou, he immediately knew what he was getting at. 
This is the method of taking an adept Chan practi­ tioner by the nose to help the person; he doesn’t do anything more for him but make him awaken on his own. 
After all, they must have a place to manifest. 
When Yantou said, “After Huangchao had gone, did you get his sword?” —tell me, what could be said here to avoid his laughter, and to avoid Xuefeng’s brandishing his staff and driving him out? 
Here it is difficult to understand; if you have not personally experienced awakening, in the final analysis you will not be able to pass be­ yond birth and death, no matter how glib you may be. 
I always teach people to observe the pivot of this action; if you try to assess it, you are far away. 
Have you not seen how Touzi asked a monk, “ Did you get Huangchao’s sword after he’d gone?” The monk i66. 
Touzi said, “For thirty years I have been handling horses, but today I’ve been kicked by a mule.” Observe that monk; he too was undeniably an adept—neither did he say he had it, nor did he say he didn’t have it; he was as if an ocean away from the monk from the western capital. 
Zhenru brought this up and said, “Of those ancients, one acted as the head, the other as the tail, for sure. 
” Verse After Huangchao’s passing, he had picked up the sword. 
This is just a tin knife.) The great laughter after all needs an adept to understand it. 
How could anyone else be free?) Thirty blows of the mountain cane is still light punishment; (Born of the same lineage, they die of the same lineage. 
Three thousand in the morning, eight hundred in the evening. 
When someone in the eastern house dies, someone of the western house helps in the mourning. 
It is regrettable not to have been careful in the very beginning.) Commentary “After Huangchao’s passing, he had picked up the sword. 
/ The great laughter needs an adept to understand it.” Xuedou immedi­ ately refers to the monk and Yantou’s laughter. 
This bit cannot be grasped by anyone in the world. 
But what was he laughing at? 
In this laughter there is the provisional and the true, there is illumination and function, there is killing and giving life. 
“ Thirty blows of the mountain cane is still light punishment.” This refers to the monk coming to Xuefeng; the monk was crude as before, so Xuefeng acted as was imperative and drove him out with a thrashing. 
But tell me, why did he act like this? 
“To take advantage is to lose the advantage.” Expounds a Scripture Story i97b Emperor Wu requested the great adept Fu to expand the Dia­ mond Cutter Scripture. 
This is not unheard of in fish markets and wineshops, but it is inappro­ priate in the school of patch-robed monks. 
This old guy Fu is sup­ posedly so venerable and great, yet he acts like this.) Fu shook the lectern once, then got down from the seat. 
(He’s like a comet burst­ ing out then disappearing. 
He seems right but isn’t really. 
He doesn’t bother to create any complications.) Emperor Wu was as­ tonished. (He’s been fooled two or three times. 
Fu too makes him unable to get a grasp.) Master Zhi asked, “Does your majesty un­ derstand?” (He sides with principle, not emotion. 
The elbow does not bend outwards. 
He too should be beaten.) The emperor said, “No.” Master Zhi said, “Great Adept Fu has expounded the scripture.” (He too should be driven from the coun­ try. 
They are two people in the same pit, where the dirt is no different.) Commentary After Wu became emperor, he made new commentaries on the Confucian classics and gave lectures. 
He was also devoted to Taoism and was most filial. 
One day he thought of attaining the transmundane teaching; as an act of piety he abandoned Taoism and took up Buddhism. 
He received precepts from Master Louyue; he put on Buddhist vestments and personally expounded the Light Emit­ ting Wisdom Scripture. 
At the time, the great Master Zhi was confined in prison on the pretext that he manifested wonders and confused people. 
Zhi then reproduced his body and wandered around teaching in the city. 
The emperor found out about this and was inspired. 
He re­ spected Zhi very much. 
Time and again Master Zhi practiced pro­ tective concealment; his disappearances and appearances were incomprehensible. 
At that time there was a great adept living on a mountain; he had planted two trees and called them the Twin Trees, and called himself the future great adept Shanhui. 
One day he composed a letter and had a disciple present it to the emperor. 
The court didn’t accept it because he had neglected the formalities of a subject in respect to the ruler. 
When Shanhui, the great adept Fu, was going into the capital city to sell fish, the Emperor Wu had just requested Master Zhi to expound the Diamond Cutter Scripture. 
Zhi said, I cannot expound it, but in the marketplace there is a great adept named Fu who can.” The emperor then had him summoned to the inner palace. 
Once Fu had arrived, he mounted the lecturing seat, shook the lectern once, then got down. 
Zhi said, “The great adept has expounded the scrip­ ture.” This too is one person acting as the head and one acting as the tail. 
Though it is a dead snake, if you know how to handle it, it’ll come to life. 
Since he was expounding the scripture, why did he not make the general distinction into two aspects, just as ordinary professors do — “ The substance of the diamond is hard, so nothing can destroy it; because of its sharp function, it can cut through everything. 
” Explaining like this could be called expound­ ing the scripture. 
It was only appropriate that he should be subject to Master Zhi’s ignorance of good and bad in saying, “The great adept has ex­ pounded the scripture.” Indeed, he had a good intent but didn’t get a good response. 
It was like a cup of fine wine being diluted with water by Master Zhi, like a bowl of soup being polluted by Zhi with a piece of rat dropping. 
But tell me, granted that this is not expounding the scripture, ultimately what can you call it? 
Verse He does not rest this body by the Twin Trees; 197c (It’s just because he can’t hold still. 
How could it be possible to hide a sharp awl inside a bag?) Instead he stirs up dust in the land of Liang. (Had he not entered the weeds, how could we see the point? 
Where there is no style, there is still style.) At that time, were it not for old Master Zhi, (One does not need capital to be a thief. 
There is a leper dragging a companion along.) He too would have been hastily leaving the country. 
(His crime should be listed on the same indictment, so I strike.) Commentary “He does not rest this body by the Twin Trees; / Instead he stirs up dust in the land of Liang.” Great adept Fu and Bodhidharma met the Emperor Wu in the same way. 
The Emperor Wu mentioned this to Master Zhi and asked him about it. 
Zhi said, “ This is the great being Avalokitesvara, transmitting the seal of the Buddha mind. 
” The emperor felt regret and sent an emissary to get Bodhi­ dharma; Zhi said, “Don’t tell me you’re going to send an emissary to get him; even if everyone in the country went, he would not return.” That is why Xuedou says, “At that time, if not for Master Zhi, he too would have been hastily leaving the country.” At the time, had it not been for Zhi exerting energy on behalf of Fu, he too would surely have been driven out of the country. 
Since Zhi wa§ so talkative, Emperor Wu after all was fooled by him. 
Xuedou’s intent is to say there is no need for him to come to the land of Liang to expound the scripture and shake the lectern. 
That’s why he says, “Why doesn’t he rest by the Twin Trees, eat­ ing gruel and rice, passing the time according to his means? 
In­ stead he comes to the land of Liang and comments in this way— shaking the lectern once, he gets right down from the seat. 
This is where he stirs up dust.” If you want the marvelous, look at the cloudy skies; above you do not see that there is any Buddha, below you do not see that there are any sentient beings. 
If you discuss the matter of appear­ ing in the world, you cannot avoid ashes on your head and dirt on your face, taking the nonexistent and making it exist, taking the existent and making it not exist, taking right and making it wrong, taking coarse and making it fine, presenting it sideways and us­ ing it upside down in the fish markets and wineshops, making everyone understand this matter. 
If you do not let go in this way, no one will ever understand. 
Great Adept Fu was already drag­ ging in muddy water; fortunately he had a sympathizer. 
If not for Master Zhi, he would probably have been driven out of the coun­ try. 
But tell me, where is he now? 
Introduction Overthrowing the polar star and reversing the earthly axis, cap­ turing tigers and rhinos, distinguishing dragons from snakes—one must be lively and active before one can match phrase for phrase and correspond act to act. 
But who has ever been able to be thus? 
Story Yangshan asked Sansheng, “What’s your name?” (Name and re1983 ality take each other away. 
He brings in a thief, who will ransack his house.) Sansheng said, “Hug.” (He cuts off his tongue, takes his flag, and steals his drum.) Yangshan said, “ Hug? 
That’s me.” Sansheng said, “My name is Huiran.” (He steals in the bustling marketplace. 
That one and this one keep to their places.) Yangshan laughed. (It can be said that this is the season; he spreads flowers on brocade. 
No one in the world knows the point. 
Because the land is broad, the people few, and rarely is anyone met with. 
This is like Yantou’s laugh, but it is not Yantou s laugh. 
Both are laughs, so why are they two? 
Let those with eyes decide.) Commentary Sansheng was an adept in the Linji line. 
Later he left Linji and traveled around; everywhere he was treated as a distin­ guished guest. 
My tasks as abbot are many.” Later he came to Yangshan, who admired his outstanding acu­ ity and accorded him the position of assembly leader. 
One day an oflicial came to call on Yangshan. 
All the people of the community made comments, but none accorded with Yangshan’s idea. 
At that time Sansheng was sick and staying in the infirmary; Yangshan had his attendant take these words and ask him about them. 
Sansheng said, The master has a problem.” Yangshan had his attendant ask, “W hat’s the problem?” Sansheng said, “A second offense is not permitted.” Yangshan deeply approved of this. 
Baizhang had in the past given his meditation brace and cush­ ion to Huangbo and his staff and whisk to Guishan; Guishan later gave these to Yangshan. 
Since Yangshan greatly approved of Sansheng, when Sansheng was leaving Yangshan wanted to give him his staff and whisk. 
Sansheng said, “I already have a teacher.” When Yangshan asked him about it, it turned out he was an heir of Linji. 
When Yangshan asked Sansheng, “What is your name?” he couldn’t have but known his name; why did he still ask? 
The rea­ son is that an adept wants to test people to know them thoroughly. 
He just seemed to be casually asking his name, speaking no fur­ ther judgment. 
Why did Sansheng not say “Huiran, but instead said “Hug”? 
See how one with the eye is naturally unusual. 
His meaning was beyond Yangshan’s words. 
These words do not fall within the scope of common sense; they are difficult to grasp. 
The methods of such a person can bring people to life; that is why it is said, “He studies the living word, not the dead world.” If they followed ordinary sense, they couldn’t set people at rest. 
See how those ancients kept their minds on the Way like this: 
Once they were completely enlight­ ened, when they used it, after all they appeared the same as unenlightened people. 
Sansheng knew where Yangshan was at, so he said, “My name is Hug.” Yangshan wanted to take in Sansheng, but Sansheng took him in. 
Yangshan was only able to counterattack with, “I am Hug. 
” This is where he let go. 
Sansheng said, “My name is Huiran.” This too is letting go. 
Yangshan laughed; there was both provisional and true, both illumination and function. 
This laugh was not the same as Yantou’s; in Yantou’s laugh there was poison, but in this laugh the pure wind blows chill for all eternity. 
Crystal clear in every respect. 
I thought there really was such a thing.) To ride a tiger always requires absolute competence. (If you haven’t the eye on the forehead and a talisman under your arm, how could you get here? 
You may mount, but I only fear you won’t be able to dismount. 
If you are not such a person, how could you understand such a thing?) His laughter ended, I don’t know where he’s gone; (Even if you seek throughout the country for such a person, one would be hard to find. 
His words are still in our ears. 
For ever and ever there is the pure wind.) It is only fitting to stir forever the wind of lament. (Right now where is it? 
Since it is great laughter, why does it stir the wind of lament? 
The whole earth is flooded with darkness.) Commentary “Both take in, both let go—how do you find the source?” Letting go, alternately they act as guest and host. 
Yangshan says, “What is your name?” Sansheng says, “ My name is Hug. 
Yangshan says, “I am Hug. 
” Sansheng says, “I am Huiran.” This is both taking in. 
when taking in, everyone takes in; when letting go, everyone lets go. 
Xuedou has all at once completely versified it. 
What he means to say is that if we don’t let go and take in, if we don’t interchange, then you are you and I am I. 
An ancient said, “If you stand, I sit; if you sit, I stand. 
If we both sit or both stand at the same time, w e’ll both be blind.” This is both taking in, both releasing, which can be considered the fundamental essential. 
“To ride a tiger always requires absolute competence.” When you have such a lofty manner, the highest essential of active po­ tential, when you want to ride you ride, when you want to dis­ mount you dismount. 
You can sit on the tiger’s head and also hold the tiger’s tail. 
Sansheng and Yangshan both had this style. 
“His laughter ended, I don’t know where he’s gone.” Tell me, what did he laugh at? 
Why does Xuedou say in the end, “It is only fitting to stir forever the wind of lament”? 
This is death without mourning; all at once he has finished adding explanations for you, but yet no one in the world can bite in, and they do not know the final point. 
Even I do not know the final point; do you? 198c69. 
Nanquan’s Circle Introduction There is no place to get your teeth into; the mind seal of Chan is formed like the works of the iron ox. 
Having passed through the forest of thorns, a Chan practitioner is like a snowflake in a red-hot furnace. 
Story Nanquan, Guizong, and Magu went together to pay respects to National Teacher Huizhong. 
When they got halfway there, (“Among three people traveling together, there must be a teacher of mine. 
” What is so special? 
” (He rouses waves where there’s no wind. 
Still he wants people to know. 
He casts off a boat that’s foundered on solid ground. 
Without posing a test, how could one discern the truth?) Guizong sat inside the circle; (When one strikes the cymbal, his compan­ ions join in.) Magu curtseyed. 
(When one strikes the drum, all three prove able.) Nanquan said, “Then let’s not go on.” (The one who can extricate himself halfway along is good. 
He should have slapped him then. 
Brash!) Commentary At that time Mazu’s teaching was flourishing in Jiangxi, Shitou’s way was current in Hunan, and National Teacher Huizhong’s way was influencing Changan. 
The latter had seen the sixth patriarch; all who had high aspirations wanted to study with him. 
These three—Nanquan, Guizong, and Magu—wanted to go pay respects to the National Teacher; on the way they enacted this scenario of defeat. 
Nanquan said, “Then let’s not go.” Since they had each been able to speak, why did he say he wouldn’t go? 
That is why Ciming said, “If you want to restrain him, just grab the rein and yank.” Hit and he turns, like pushing down a gourd on water. 
Many say that Nanquan speaks words of disagreement, but they don’t know that in this matter, when you get to the ultimate point, it is necessary to leave the mud, get out of the water, remove all fixations. 
The ancients could turn and shift well; at this point they could not be otherwise—there must be killing and giving life. 
See how one sat in the circle, and one curtseyed. 
That too was very good. 
He too goes on like this. 
His whole idea in saying this was that he wanted to test Nanquan. 
Nanquan always said, “As soon as you call it ‘thus,’ it has already changed.” Nanquan, Guizong, and Magu—after all they were people of one house. 
One holds, one releases; one kills, one enlivens; undeniably they’re unusual. 
Verse Youji’s arrow shoots the monkey; (Who dares to advance on the road ahead? 
Whenever he hits, he is marvelous; he hits the mark before he shoots.) Circling the tree, how exceedingly direct! (Without attaining mastery, how could one presume to be thus? 
North, south, east, west—one family style. 
They have already been going around for a long time.) A thousand and ten thousand— (Most plentiful. 
A pack of foxy devils. 
What about Nanquan?) Who has ever hit the mark? (One or a half. 
Even one would still be no use.) Calling them together, he beckons, “Come, let’s go back”; (A bunch of people playing with mud. 
Better to have gone back; then they would have gotten somewhere.) He stops climbing the road of Caoqi. 
Level off the lowest place and there’s extra; view the highest place and there’s not enough.) The road of Caoqi is level; why stop climbing? 
(Not only Nanquan extricates himself halfway along; Xuedou does too. 
Even a good thing is not as good as nothing. 
Xuedou too suffers from this kind of illness and pain.) Commentary Youji’s arrow shoots the monkey; / Circling the tree, how exceed­ ingly direct!” Youji was an archer of ancient times. 
Once when a king went hunting, he saw a white monkey and had someone shoot at it. 
The monkey grabbed the arrow and played with it. 
The king had all his courtiers shoot at it, but none could hit it. The king then asked who could shoot it, and they recommended the master archer Youji. 
Ordered to shoot, as Youji drew his bow, the monkey hugged the tree and howled pitifully; the monkey went around the tree to avoid the arrow shot, but the arrow also circled the tree and struck the monkey dead. 
This was a supernatural arrow. 
Why does Xuedou say it was exceedingly direct? 
Had it been too direct, it wouldn’t have hit; since it went around the tree, why does Xuedou say it was exceedingly direct? 
Xuedou borrows the idea and uses it well. 
Some say that “circling the tree” is the circle; they do not know the import of the words; they do not know where the directness is. 
These three men are on different roads but re­ turn to the same place. 
They are uniformly and equally exceed­ ingly direct. 
A hundred rivers flow sepa­ rately but return alike to the ocean. 
That is why Nanquan said, “Then let’s not go.” If you look at this with the true eye of Chan, this is just giving play to the spirit; but if you call it giving play to the spirit, yet it is not giving play to the spirit. 
Wuzu said, “Those three were absorbed in the lamp of wis­ dom, absorbed in the supreme array.” Though Magu curtseyed, he never understood it as curtseying; though Nanquan drew a circle, he never understood it as a circle. 
Xuedou says, “A thousand and ten thousand— / Who has ever hit the mark?” How many could hit the mark every time? 
“Calling them together, he beckons. 
Nanquan didn’t go on, so “He stops climbing the road of Caoqi.” He destroys the forest of thorns. 
” The road of Caoqi is dustless and trackless, openly ex­ posed, naked and clean, level, even, and smooth; why stop climb­ ing after all? 
Each of you should observe where you are. 
Introduction A quick person needs but a single word; a fast horse needs but a single stroke of the whip. 
Ten thousand years is one thought; one thought is ten thousand years. 
If you want to know the direct way, it is before any mention is made. 
But before it is mentioned, how will you search for it? 
You’re headed west, I’m going east.) Baizhang asked Guishan, “How will you speak with your mouth shut?” Guishan said, “ Please speak yourself.” (Guishan proceeds by Baizhang’s road.) Baizhang said, “I don’t refuse to speak to you, but I fear that I might be bereft of descendants. 
He’s thick-skinned. 
He makes a counterattack.) Commentary Guishan, Wufeng, and Yunyan were attending Baizhang. 
Chan practitioners must be able to display their ability in speech and discern the point within words. 
They don’t damage the point or cut their hands. 
Guishan said, “Please speak yourself. 
Here he was like sparks, like lightning; responding to Baizhang’s ques­ tion, he answered immediately. 
Xuedou likes these words of Guishan, likes his freedom to re­ volve and maneuver elegantly while still being able to hold fast to his territory. 
He’s already damaged the point and cut his hand.) The tiger’s head sprouts horns as he emerges from the wild weeds. 
On the ten continents spring ends and the flowers fade and wither— Over the coral forest the sun is dazzling bright. (A hundredfold, a thousandfold. Nevertheless, he can’t be found in phenomena. 
Guishan’s answer covers heaven and earth.) Commentary The answers of the three are all different. 
There’s towering like an immense wall, there’s simultaneous illumining and function­ ing, and there’s inability even to save oneself. 
“You please speak instead.” Immediately in this one line Xue­ dou has displayed his device. 
He goes farther into it and presses ever so lightly to make it easy for people to see by saying, “The tiger’s head sprouts horns as he emerges from the wild weeds.” Guishan’s answer is like putting horns on a ferocious tiger—is there any way to approach it? 
A monk asked Loshan, “ How is it when born together and dy­ ing together?” Loshan said, “Like an ox without horns.” The monk asked, “How about when born together but not dying together?” Loshan said, “Like a tiger with horns. 
He goes on to say, On the ten continents spring ends and the flowers fade and wither.” On the ocean there are ten continents where one hun­ dred years make one spring. 
When the spring is over, myriad flowers fade and wither all at once. 
Only the coral tree forest doesn’t fade and wither—it takes the light of the sun and reflects it back and forth. 
Then it is amazing indeed. 
For this bit one must take it up directly, like a head-on clash in the front lines. 
There s no room for hesitation. 
Wufeng functions directly and immediately; his reply is swift, uncompromisingly strict. 
He’s not like Guishan, who is so relaxed, easygoing and exuberant. 
Followers of Chan today just go under the shelf, unable to go beyond him. 
So it is said, “If you want to attain intimacy, don’t ask with a question.” Wufeng’s answer cut him off immediately; indeed it was fast and brilliant. 
Is it killing or bringing to life? 
Verse “You should shut up too.” (Already there before anything was said, he cut off all flows.) Observe his strategy on the battle lines— (It takes the ability of a great general to be able to do this. 
He’s fully equipped, an expert accustomed to battle.) He makes people think of General Li Guang; (There aren’t many with such marvelous skill. 
With a horse and spear he covers ten thousand miles and 200b defeats ten thousand men.) Over the vast horizon a single hawk soars. 
Where does it alight? 
One with great strategy freely appears and disappears with horse and spear on the battle lines. 
How could you surround him? 
If you’re not such a person, how will you know there is such strategy? 
In all these three verses what Xuedou describes is like this, like Li Guang’s miraculous arrows. 
“Over the vast horizon a single hawk soars.” It is certain that one arrow fells one eagle; there is no more escape. 
In Xuedou’s verse, Baizhang’s question is like a hawk; Wufeng’s answer is like an arrow. 
I have been so occupied with praising Wufeng that without realizing it my whole body has been immersed in muddy water. 
Before he doesn’t reach the village; later he doesn’t get to the shop.) Baizhang said, “ I have lost my descendants.” (Obviously with an answer like this, half is in front and half is left behind.) Commentary Yunyan attended Baizhang for twenty years. 
Later he went with Daowu to Yaoshan. 
See how Yunyan studied for twenty years and still was un­ ripe. 
Something stuck to his skin and clung to his bones; he couldn’t break through. 
He may have been right, but he didn’t reach the village before or get to the shop later. 
Yunyan just went to test the other’s depths. 
When Baizhang saw him acting like this, he immediately held him and struck him dead. 
Yunyan was following the waves, pursuing the ripples, mixing with mud, mingling with water.) The golden-haired lion is not crouching on the ground. 
Two by two, three by three, traveling the old road— (How will you speak with your mouth shut? 
Though it was right under his feet, he missed it.) On Daxiong Mountain Baizhang snapped his fingers in vain. (The dead do not come back to life. 
Too bad, too sad. 
Xuedou adds more grief to his cry of woe.) Commentary ‘“Have you anything to say or not?’ / The golden-haired lion is not crouching on the ground.” Xuedou concludes the case on the basis of the facts. 
Yunyan is indeed one, but this golden-haired lion nev­ ertheless is not crouching. 
To catch its prey, a lion conceals its teeth, hides its claws, and crouches on the ground to rear and leap. 
of Assertion and Denial Introduction In explaining truth, there is neither explanation nor dogma; in listening to truth, there is neither hearing nor attainment. 
Since explanation has no explanation or dogma, how can it compare to not explaining? 
Since listening neither hears nor attains, how can it compare to not listening? 
Then no explanation and no listening amounts to something. 
Those with the eye to pass through the barrier, try to bring it up. 
Story A monk asked Mazu, “Please indicate the meaning of Chan directly, apart from all permutations of assertion and denial.” (Where did he get this saying from? 
Where did he get this news?) Mazu said, “I’m tired today and can’t explain for you. 
Go ask Zhizang.” (He retreats three paces. Those who stumble past don’t even realize it. 
He hides his body but reveals his shadow. 
Undeniably the old guy has passed the buck.) When the monk asked Zhizang, (He should have pressed Mazu. 
He’s stumbled past without realizing it.) Zhi­ zang said, “Why not ask the teacher?” (The scorched-tail tiger has come out of the weeds. 
What is he saying? 
In fact, the monk is bind­ ing himself with straw ropes—he’s totally dead.) The monk said, “He told me to ask you.” (He’s at the disposal of another. 
The first arrow was still light, but the second one goes deep.) Zhizang said, “I have a headache today and can’t explain for you. 
” (Indeed Mazu’s eighty-four enlightened disciples all suffer from this kind of sickness.) When the monk asked Baizhang, (He turns it over to another. 
This question of his is undeniably profound and far reaching. 
As for going beyond the permutations of assertion and denial, the four basic propositions are existence, nonexistence, neither, and both. 
Had it been me, I’d have waited till Mazu had spoken, then bowed thrice, to see how he would have responded. 
When this guy was right in front of it and stumbled past missing it, Mazu still di­ rected him to go ask Zhizang. 
The monk still didn’t know that Mazu profoundly discerns all comers. 
He went in ignorance to ask Zhizang. 
Zhizang said, “Why not ask the teacher?” The monk said, “He told me to ask you. 
” Watch this bit of his: 
when pressed he im­ mediately turns without wasting any more time. 
Zhizang said, “I have a headache today and can’t explain for you. 
Go ask Baizhang. 
In the end, what’s what? 
The monk came back and told Mazu; Mazu said, “Zhizang’s head is white; Baizhang’s head is black.” If you figure this by way of intellectual interpretation, then you would say they were fooling the monk. 
Some say all three knew the point of the monk’s question, and so they didn’t answer. 
All such interpretations amount to covering your eyes and putting poison into the savory delicacy of the ancients. 
Thus Mazu said, “I will explain to you when you swallow all the water of West River in one gulp.” This is the same as the present story. 
If you can understand “Zhizang’s head is white; Baizhang’s head is black, ” you can understand the talk about West River. 
This monk took his load of confusion and exchanged it for un­ easiness; he went on troubling these three adepts, making them enter the muddy water. 
Yet even so, nevertheless the three Chan masters were ex­ posed by this one-sided man. 
People today just make a living on the words. 
They say white refers to merging in light, while black refers to merging in dark­ ness. 
Just occupying themselves with pursuing their calculations, such people are far from knowing that the ancient cuts off their con­ ceptual faculties with a single saying. 
You must go to the true life­ line and see for yourself before you can gain firm accord. 
Therefore it is said, “At the last word you finally get to the impenetrable bar­ rier.” If you hold the essential crossing, you don’t let profane or holy pass. 
If you discuss this matter, it’s like having a sword pressing 201b against your forehead—hesitate and you lose your life. 
Again, it’s said, “It’s like hurling a sword into the sky—it’s not a question of reaching or not.” Just understand at the point of glistening clarity. 
If you know that myriad differences and distinctions are all one, then naturally you will be able to take on opponents from all sides. 
Do you want to understand “Zhizang’s head is white; Baizhang’s head is black” ? 
Wuzu said, “Mr. 
Dust Sweeper.” Verse Zhizang’s head is white; Baizhang’s head is black— (Half closed, half open. 
One hand lifts up, one hand presses down. 
The sound of gold bells, the flourish of jade chimes.) Even clear-eyed Chan practitioners cannot understand. (Go travel for thirty more years. 
Let the old man out.) Linji isn’t yet a thief who can steal in broad daylight. (A leper drags along a companion. 
You too must check into this and see for yourself. 
“Poppa” is like “daddy.”) In all the universe, only I know. (Why use “I”? 
I’ll snatch away your staff. 
If there’s no self and no others, no gain and no loss, what will you use to know?) Commentary “Zhizang’s head is white; Baizhang’s head is black.” What does this mean? 
No Chan practitioner can leap clear of this little bit. 
See how well Xuedou closes up tight at the end; he says that even if you’re a clear-eyed Chan practitioner you won’t be able to un­ derstand. 
This bit of news is called the hidden secret of the spiri­ tual immortals, which is not passed on from father to son. 
It is called the diamond sword, the absolute state. 
Such complications were a matter that couldn’t be avoided—with them the ancients showed a little of their sharp point. 
If you can’t pass through, as before you have no penetrating understanding, and the more you talk the further away you are. 
“The colt has trampled everyone on earth to death. 
” The colt refers to Mazu, an allusion to the sixth patriarch’s prediction of Mazu’s appearance in the world. 
See how special his way of doing 20ic things was—he just said, “Zhizang’s head is white; Baizhang’s head is black.” This is where to see how he tramples everyone to death. 
No one can bite through this line about black and white. 
“Linji isn’t yet a thief who can steal in broad daylight.” One day Linji said, “In this naked lump of flesh is a true person with­ out station, constantly going in and out through your senses. 
Those who haven’t proved this, look!” A monk then asked, “What is the true person without station?” Linji came down, grabbed the monk, and demanded that he speak. 
” Later, Xuefeng heard of this and said, “Linji is like a thief who steals in broad daylight.” Xuedou wants to meet Linji, but in observing Mazu’s active edge, it certainly goes beyond Linji’s. 
Mazu is truly a thief who steals in broad daylight; Linji is not yet such a one. 
Turning to refer to the monk, Xuedou says, “Going beyond all assertion and denial—in all the universe, only I know.” But don’t go into the ghost cave to make your living! 
Xuedou says, “Only I can know this matter. 
” Even the Buddhas of all times cannot catch sight of it. 
Since one must know for oneself alone, what are all of you looking for when you keep on coming here? 
Zhenru commented, “This monk asking this way and Mazu answering this way went beyond the permutations of assertion and denial. 
“ The colt has trampled everyone on earth to death. 
” Introduction The sharp sword wielded horizontally cuts off the nest of compli­ cations in front of its point. 
The clear mirror hung on high brings forth the cosmic seal within a phrase. 
Where one’s state is peace­ ful, one wears clothes and eats food. 
Where spiritual powers wan­ der at play, how can one linger? 
Story Every day at mealtime, Jinniu would personally take the rice pail and do a dance in front of the monks’ hall; laughing, he would say, “Bodhisattvas, come eat!” (“You may play the fishing line as you will—without disturbing the clear waves, the intention is naturally distinct.” He applies pure ghee and poison at the same time—and he’s right. 
Jewels and gems he arrays all at once, but nevertheless those he meets with are few.) Xuedou said, “ Though he acted like this, Jinniu was not good-hearted.” (This is a thief recognizing a thief, a sprite recognizing a sprite. 
One who comes to talk of right and wrong is a right and wrong person.) A monk asked Changqing, “When the ancient said, ‘Bodhisattvas, come eat,’ what was his meaning?” (Indeed, anyone would have doubts about this. 
So he hasn’t known where Jinniu is at all along. 
What will Changqing say?) Changqing said, “ Much like joyful praise on the occasion of a meal.” (He sizes up the audience to give his order, and wraps up the case on the basis of the facts.) Commentary Jinniu was an adept in Mazu’s line. 
Every day at mealtime he would take the rice pail himself and do a dance in front of the monks’ hall; laughing, he would say, “Bodhisattvas, come eat!” He did this for twenty years. 
Tell me, where was his intent? 
If it was just a matter of summoning the others to eat; usually they make a signal to announce the meal; what further need was there for him to take the rice pail himself and do so many tricks? 
If he was expounding this matter, why didn’t he lecture formally? 
Why did he need to act like this? 
People today don’t know that the ancient’s meaning was out­ side of words. 
Why not take a look at the stated purpose of the Chan founder’s coming to China? 
It was clearly stated to be for a special transmission outside doctrine, to transmit the mind seal individually. 
Later people would vainly conceptualize arbi­ trarily and say, “Why so many concerns? 
When cold, turn toward the fire; when hot, sit in the shade; when hungry, eat; when tired, sleep.” If we interpreted this way, on the basis of ordinary feel­ ings, then the Chan school would have died out. 
That which is called the supreme delicacy is converted by such people into poison. 
Since Jinniu descended into the weeds to help people, why did Xuedou say he wasn’t good-hearted? 
Why did he talk this way? 
Chan prac­ titioners must have living potential to begin to understand this. 
People today don’t get to the ancients’ realm—they just say, “What mind is there to see? 
It takes thorough observation to begin to understand. 
If today and tomorrow you go on with such facile explanations, you’ll never be finished. 
In truth it was joyful praise on the occasion of a meal. 
But tell me, rejoic­ ing over what? 
Verse Laughing in the shadow of the white clouds, (There’s a sword in his laugh. 
None of the Chan monks in the world know the ultimate point.) He lifts it up with both hands to give to them. (Is there such a thing? 
Don’t slander Jinniu. 
Can it be called a rice pail? 
If you are a real Chan practitioner, you don’t eat this kind of food.) If they were offspring of the golden lion, (They must first be beyond patterns. 
I’ll allow that they had eyes, but I fear their eyes were not true.) They would have seen the error three thousand miles away. 
Where was the error? 
Blind men!) Commentary “Laughing in the shadow of the white clouds.” Changqing says, “Joyful praise on the occasion of a meal.” Xuedou says, “He lifts it up with both hands to give to them.” But say, was he just giving them food, or do you think there must have been something spe­ cial besides? 
If you can know the true point here, you’re an offspring of the golden lion. 
If they had been offspring of the golden lion, there would have been no more need for Jinniu to do a dance with the rice pail and laugh—in fact they would have known his flaw immediately from three thousand miles away. 
If they just base themselves on words, they won’t avoid in­ dulging in fixations. 
Wujiu’s Unjust Beating Introduction The jewel sword with the spiritual point is perpetually revealed in front of us. 
It can kill and it can bring life. 
It’s there and it’s here, gained and lost together. 
If you want to pick it up, you’re free to do so; if you want to level it, you’re free to level it. 
But say, what’s it like when not falling into guest or host, when interchanging with­ out getting stuck? 
Story A monk from Dingzhou’s group came to Wujiu. 
Wujiu asked, “How does Dingzhou’s teaching compare to here?” (There’s an echo in his words. 
He wants to distinguish shallow from deep. 
He’s really deceiving the man.) The monk said, “Not different.” (Among the dead men there’s a live one. 
One or a half. 
Like an iron spike. 
He’s treading the ground of reality.) Wujiu said, “If it’s not different, then you should go back there,” and hit him. 
(After all the monk’s one of us. 
He just sees his opportunity and acts.) Wujiu said, “A f­ ter all someone received an unjust beating.” (A mute eating a bit­ ter melon. 
He lets go and also takes in. 
What good is someone who turns around when hit?) The monk turned around and said, “What can I do—the handle is in your hands.” (It’s this way three hun­ dred sixty-five days a year. 
After all he is a clever monk.) Wujiu said, “If you want, I’ll turn it over for you.” (Who knows which of them is the lord and which the subject? 
He dares to lie in the tiger’s mouth. 
He doesn’t distinguish good and bad.) The monk came up to Wujiu, grabbed the staff from him, and hit him thrice. 
Guest and host interchange, releasing or capturing according to the occasion.) Wujiu said, “An unjust beating, an unjust beating!” (Check! 
Why is this old man in such a rush?) The monk said, “There’s someone receiving it.” (Haha! 
How many handles are now in the monk’s hands?) Wujiu said, “ I hit this guy carelessly.” (It doesn’t come down on either side. 
Wujiu said, “Yet you act this way.” The monk laughed and went out. (An adept Chan student naturally is thus. 
A fierce tiger must have a pure wind following it. 
Now we know he finished the begin­ ning and finished the end. 
No one on earth can get a grip on him.) Wujiu said, “That’s all it comes to, that’s all it comes to.” (Too bad he let the monk go. 
Why didn’t he strike him across the back? 
Where do you think the monk went?) Commentary A monk from Dingzhou’s group came to Wujiu. 
If here you can perceive the interplay of these two, then ten thousand are in fact just one. 
It is so, whether acting as host or as guest; in the end the two merge into one agent for one session of discernment. 
Look at Wujiu questioning this monk: 
“ How does Dingzhou’s teaching compare to here?” The monk immediately said, “Not different. 
” At the time, if it hadn’t been Wujiu, it would have been hard to cope with this monk. 
Wujiu said, “If it’s not different, then you should go back there,” and hit him. 
But this monk was an adept and immediately said, “ There are eyes on the staff; you shouldn’t hit people carelessly. 
” Wujiu carried out the imperative relentlessly: 
he said, “Today I’ve hit one,” and hit him thrice more. 
At this the monk went out. 
Though the monk went out, the case was still not finished. 
From beginning to end Wujiu wanted to test the monk’s real­ ity, to see how he was. 
But the monk had barred the door, so Wujiu hadn’t yet seen him. 
When Wujiu said, “An unjust beating, an un­ just beating,” tell me, what did he mean? 
If not for this monk’s indepen­ dent resurgence, he couldn’t have handled Wujiu. 
Then the monk bowed. 
This bow was extremely poisonous—it wasn’t good-hearted. 
If it hadn’t been Wujiu, he wouldn’t have been able to see through this monk. 
” The monk laughed and went out. 
Though cut off, they can still continue. 
In fact this is just the mechanism of interchange. 
Since these ancients were beyond defiling feelings and conceptual thinking, both were ad­ epts; neither spoke of gain or loss. 
Though it was a single session of talk, the two were both leaping with life, and both had the needle and thread of the bloodline. 
If you can see here, you too will be perfectly clear twenty-four hours a day. 
When the monk first went out, this was both sides letting go; what happened after that was both sides taking in. 
This is called interchanging. 
Verse To summon is easy— (Everyone on earth doubts this. 
Rancid meat attracts flies. 
No Chan practitioners in the world know the ultimate point.) To send away is hard. (That does not prevent thorough riddance. 
Mirages appear over the sea.) Observe carefully the interchange of action points. (One exit, one entry—both are adepts. 
Two people hold a single staff. 
But say, whose side is it on?) The rock of ages, though solid, can still crumble— (How will you handle the golden hammer in the sleeve? 
The thousand sages haven’t transmitted it.) When they stand in its depths the ocean must dry up. 
There are eyes on the staff. 
Hundreds, thousands, myriad miles.) There was no point in giving him the handle. (Already so before you say. Wujiu’s life was hanging by a thread. 
He deserves thirty blows. 
But where was his fault?) Commentary “To summon is easy — / To send away is hard.” It’s all falling into the weeds. 
With his extreme compassion, Xuedou would often say, “Calling snakes is easy; sending snakes away is hard.” Right now if I were to toot on an ocarina it would be easy to summon snakes, but when I wanted to send them away it would be hard. 
Similarly, it’s easy to give one’s staff to someone else, but to take it back from him and send him away is hard. 
Wujiu was an adept with the skill to call snakes and also the ability to send snakes away. 
This monk wasn’t asleep either. 
When Wujiu asked, “How does Dingzhou’s teaching compare to here?” — this was calling him. 
When Wujiu hit him, this was sending him away. 
When Wujiu said, “If you want, I’ll turn it over to you,” and the monk grabbed the staff and hit Wujiu, this was the monk sending him away. 
As for the monk laughing and going out, and Wujiu saying, “That’s all it comes to” —this clearly is each sending the other away appropriately. 
From beginning to end guest and host are clearly distinct. 
Sometimes, though, host acts as guest and sometimes guest acts as host. 
Even Xuedou cannot praise this enough. 
203b “ The rock of ages, though solid, can still crumble.” This rock of ages is eighty-four thousand leagues wide and thick; every five hundred years a goddess comes down and brushes across it with a gossamer cloth, then departs for another five hundred years. 
The brushing continues thus until it wears the rock away—this makes one age, an eon. 
Xuedou says that though the rock is solid it can still crumble—though it is strong and solid, still it can be worn away to nothing; but the action point of these two people can never be exhausted. 
“ There was no point in giving him the handle.” This staff has been used by all the Buddhas of all times, and by the succes­ sive generations of patriarchs, and by the Chan masters, to re­ move fixations, attachments, obsession, and bondage. 
Xuedou means that it should be used by oneself alone. 
Fortunately it happened that this monk then just opened up to him—if he had suddenly stirred up thun­ der over dry ground, we would have observed how Wujiu met it. 
When Wujiu passed the handle to someone else, wasn’t this in­ deed without reason? 
Introduction Fine as powder, cold as frost, it blocks off heaven and earth and goes beyond light and dark. 
Observe it where it’s low and there’s extra; level it off where it’s high and there’s not enough. 
Story Danxia asked a monk, “Where have you come from ?” (Indeed it’s impossible to have come from nowhere at all. 
If he wants to know where he’s come from, it won’t be hard.) The monk said, “From down the mountain.” (He has put on his sandals and walked into your belly. 
It’s just that you don’t understand. 
There’s an echo in his words, but he keeps it to himself. 
Why just the zero point of the scale? 
He wants to know the real truth.) The monk said, “I’ve eaten.” (As it turns out, he’s collided with a pillar. 
After all it’s an iron hammerhead with no hole.) Danxia said, Did the 203c person who brought you the food have eyes or not?” (Though he’s relying on his power to mystify the man, he is also wrapping up the case on the basis of the facts. 
At the time he deserved to have his meditation seat overturned. 
Why act without reason?) The monk was speechless. (After all he couldn’t run. 
Had the monk been an adept he would have said, “The same as your eyes.”) Changqing asked Baofu, “To give someone food is ample requital of benevolence—why wouldn’t one have eyes?” (He’s still only said half. 
Is it “throughout the body” or is it “all over the body”? 
One cut, two pieces. 
One hand lifts up, one hand presses down.) Baofu said, “Giver and receiver are both blind.” (He acts according to the imperative. 
One statement says it all. 
Such a person is rarely encountered.) Changqing said, “If they fully exerted their potential, would they still turn out blind?” (What does he know of good and bad? 
He still isn’t sure himself; what bowl is he looking for?) Baofu said, “Can you say I’m blind?” (The two of them are both in the weeds. 
A dragon’s head but a snake’s tail. 
At the time when he said, “If they fully exerted their potential, would they still turn out blind?” I would have just said to him, “Blind!” He only managed to say a half. 
It is not known where he was from. 
At first he studied Confucianism, intending to go to the capi­ tal to take the civil service examinations. 
While he was staying at an inn, he dreamed a white light filled the room; a diviner told him this was a good omen of understanding emptiness. 
There hap­ pened to be a Chanist there who asked him where he was going; he replied that he was going to be elected as an official. 
The Chanist said, “How can election to officialdom compare to election to Buddhahood?” Danxia asked, “Where should I go for election to Buddhahood?” The Chanist said, “ The great master Mazu is now teaching in Jiangxi—that is where Buddhas are elected. 
You should go there.” So then Danxia went directly to Jiangxi. 
The moment he saw Mazu he lifted up the edge of his turban. 
Shitou sent him to the mill, and Danxia bowed in thanks. 
He entered the workers’ hall and labored along with the community for three years. 
One day Shitou announced, “Tomorrow w e’re going to clear away the weeds in front of the Buddha shrine.” The next day everyone took a hoe to cut down weeds. 
Danxia alone took a bowl of water, washed his head, and knelt in front of Shitou. 
Shitou laughed and shaved his head for him. 
Then as Shitou began to explain the precepts to him, Danxia covered his ears and went out. 
Before meeting Mazu to pay his respects, he went into the monks’ hall and sat astride the neck of the holy icon. 
Mazu personally went to the hall to have a look; he said, “My son is so natural.” Danxia then got down and said, “Thank you for giving me a religious name.” Therefore he was called Tianran, “Natural.” Danxia was naturally sharply out­ standing like this. 
As said, officialdom isn’t as good as Buddhahood. 
Danxia’s words tower like a mile-high wall; every saying has the ability to remove fixations. 
When he asked this monk where he came from, the monk said, “From down the mountain,” yet he didn’t communicate where he had come from. 
It seemed that he had eyes and was going to reverse things and test the host. 
If it hadn’t been Danxia, it would have been impossible to gather him in. 
Danxia said, “Did the person who brought you the food have eyes or not?” The monk was speechless. 
Nevertheless, Danxia still didn’t let him go, so the monk was blinking stupidly and speechless. 
When Baofu and Changqing were together in Xuefeng’s group, they would often discuss stories of the ancients. 
Changqing asked Baofu, “ To give someone food is ample requital of benevolence; why wouldn’t one have eyes?” He didn’t have to inquire exhaus­ tively into the facts of the case; he could take it all in using these words to make a point, in order to test Baofu’s truth. 
Baofu said, “Giver and receiver are both blind.” How swift! 
Here he just dis­ cusses the immediate circumstances—inside his house Baofu has a way of manifestation in being. 
When Changqing said, “If they had fully exerted their poten­ tial, would they still turn out blind?” Baofu said, “Can you say I’m blind?” Baofu meant, “I have such eyes to have said it all to you— are you still saying I’m blind?” Nevertheless, it’s half closed and half open. 
At that time if it had been me, when he said, “If they had fully exerted their potential, would they still turn out blind?” I would have just said, “Blind! 
” Too bad—had Baofu uttered this one word “blind” at that time, he would have avoided so many of Xuedou’s complications. 
Xuedou too just uses this idea to make his verse. 
Verse Fully exerting potential, not turning out blind— (They’ve only said a half. 
Each wanted to test the other. 
The words are still in our ears.) Holding down an ox’s head to make it eat grass. (They lose their money and incur punishment. 
Half south of the river, half north of the river. 
Without realizing it, they’ve ruined the point and cut their hands.) Twenty-eight and six patriarchs— (If you have a rule, hold to the rule. 
Xuedou is dragging down the ancient sages; he doesn’t just involve one person.) Their precious vessel is brought forth, but it turns out to be an error. 
Give me back my staff. 
They’ve dragged me down so that I can’t even show my face.) The error is profound— (Extremely profound. 
No Chan practitioner in the world can leap clear of it. 
But tell me, how profound?) There’s no place to look for it. 
Gods and humans alike sink into the earth. (All the Chan practitioners in the world are buried in one pit. 
Is there anyone alive? 
I let my move go. 
Heavens!) Commentary “Fully exerting potential, not turning out blind.” Changqing said, “If they fully exerted their potential, would they still turn out blind?” Baofu said, “Can you say I’m blind?” This was like “ Hold­ ing down an ox’s head to make it eat grass.” To get it right you must wait till it eats on its own; why push down an ox’s head to make it eat? 
When Xuedou versifies like this, naturally we can see Danxia’s meaning. 
“Twenty-eight and six patriarchs— / Their precious vessel is brought forth, but it turns out to be an error.” Not only does Xuedou drag down Changqing, but at the same time he buries the twentyeight Buddhist patriarchs of India and the six Chan patriarchs of China. 
In forty-nine years Sakyamuni expounded the teachings collected in the Buddhist canon; at the end he only transmitted this precious vessel. 
“The error is profound— / There’s no place to look for it. 
” This can’t be explained for you; just go sit quietly and inquire into his lines and see. 
Since the error is profound, why then is there no place to look for it? 
Hence Xuedou says, “Gods and humans alike sink into the earth.” 204b77. 
Yunmen’s Cake Introduction Turning upward, one can take everyone on earth in tow, like a falcon catching a pigeon. 
Turning downward, one is in the hands of others, like a turtle hiding in its shell. 
“If you have a rule, go by the rule; if there is no rule, go by the example.” Story A monk asked Yunmen, “What is talk that goes beyond Buddhas and patriarchs?” (He opens up. 
Suddenly there’s thunder over parched ground. 
He presses Yunmen.) Yunmen said, “Cake.” (His tongue is pressed against the roof of his mouth. 
Gone by.) Commentary A monk asked Yunmen, “What is talk that goes beyond Buddhas and patriarchs?” Yunmen said, “Cake.” Do you feel your hair stand­ ing on end with the chill? 
Chan students have asked about Buddhas and about patriarchs, about Chan and about the Way, about facing upward and about facing downward—there’s nothing more that can be asked, yet this one posed a question and asked about talk that goes beyond Buddhas and patriarchs. 
Yunmen was an adept, so “When the water rises the boats ride high; when there is much clay the Buddha image is big.” He answered saying “Cake.” It can be said that the Way is not carried out in vain; his effort is not wasted. 
Yunmen also said, “Without any understanding, when you see people talking about the intent of the patriarchs you immedi­ ately ask for theories of talk that goes beyond Buddhas and patri­ archs. 
But what do you call ‘Buddhas,’ what do you call ‘patriarchs,’ that you immediately speak of talk that transcends Buddhas and patriarchs? 
What perception and cognition are there to hinder you? 
On what basis do you entertain views of differentiations? 
Those ancient sages can’t do anything for you. 
Observe how the monk asked about talk beyond Buddhas and patriarchs, and Yunmen said, “Cake.” Does he know shame? 
There’s a type of phony who says, “Yunmen saw a rabbit and released a hawk; thus he said, ‘Cake.’ ” If you take such a view, that “Cake” is talk going beyond Buddhas and patriarchs, how can there be a living road? 
Don’t understand it as cake and don’t understand it as going beyond Buddhas and patri­ archs—this then is the living road. 
This is the same as “three pounds of flax” and “knowing how to beat the drum” —though he just said “cake,” its reality is hard to see. 
Later people often made up rationalizations and said, “Coarse words and subtle talk all come back to ultimate truth. 
” If you under­ stand in this way, just go be a professor and spend your life collect­ ing intellectual knowledge. 
Chan followers today say, “When you go beyond the Buddhas and patriarchs you are trampling both Bud­ dhas and patriarchs underfoot—that’s why Yunmen just said to him, ‘Cake.’ ” Since it’s “cake,” how does this explain going beyond Buddhas and patriarchs? 
Try to investigate thoroughly and see. 
There are many verses on this story, but they all go to the side of the question to comment. 
Xuedou alone has versified it best. 
Verse Chan students asking about transcendent talk are especially numerous. 
(I’H draw a circle and say, “Haven’t you been understanding this way?” What end is there to chewing over the words of others? 
The whole earth is desolate, killing people with sadness. 
I strike.) Commentary “Chan students asking about transcendent talk are especially nu­ merous. 
Chan followers are especially fond of asking about this saying. 
Yunmen said, “You carry a staff across your shoulders and say you are studying Chan, studying the Way, and then go looking for a principle that goes beyond the Buddhas and patriarchs. 
But I ask you, during all the various activities of the twenty-four hours of the day, is there still any principle that goes beyond the Buddhas and patriarchs? 
“The gap opens see it? 
Yunmen saw it open up in his question, so he used cake to block it up tight. 
But this monk still wouldn’t agree to stop—instead he went on asking. 
Chan follow­ ers these days just go to “cake” to understand, or else they go to “beyond Buddhas and patriarchs” to make up theories. 
Since it’s not in these two places, in the end, where is it? 
Thirty years from now, when I’ve changed my bones, I’ll tell you. 
Story In olden times there were sixteen bodhisattvas. 
This bunch of idiots!) When it was time to wash, the bodhisattvas filed in to bathe. 
Why be such ignoramuses?) Suddenly they awakened to the basis of water. 
How will you understand their saying, “Subtle contact reveals il­ lumination,” (It’s no longer anyone else’s business. 
“Having knocked it down, it s nothing else. ) “and we have achieved the station of offspring of the Buddha”? (Here all the Chan practitioners in the world seek but cannot find. 
Why two heads, three faces?) To realize this you too must be thor­ oughly penetrating. 
(Each blow leaves a welt. 
Have you ever seen Deshan and Linji?) Commentary At the Surangama assembly, Bhadrapala and sixteen bodhisattvas all practiced pure conduct, and each related the basis on which he had experienced the Dharma door of complete pervasion. 
This is numbered as one among twenty-five kinds of complete pervasion. 
When it was time to bathe they filed in to bathe and suddenly awoke to the basis of water. 
Since they didn’t wash off dust, and they didn’t wash their bodies, tell me, what did they wash? 
There’s no more need for so many complica­ tions; all that’s needed is to speak of suddenly awakening to the basis of water, and you spontaneously understand. 
Since they didn’t wash off dust, and didn’t wash their bodies, what did they awaken to? 
When you get to this realm, nothing at all is applicable —even the word “Buddha” is to be avoided. 
They said, “Subtle contact reveals illumination, and we have achieved the station of offspring of the Buddha.” To reveal is to make ap­ parent; the subtle contact is illumination. 
Once you awaken to the subtle contact and achieve the station of offspring of the Buddha, you are in the stage of enlightenment. 
People these days also bathe, also wash in water and feel it this way; why then don’t they awaken? 
They are all confused and obstructed by the objects of the senses, which stick to their skins and cling to their bones. 
That’s why they can’t wake up immedi­ ately then and there. 
If here you can see directly, then this is subtle contact revealing illumination, achieving the station of offspring of the Buddha. 
People these days feel contact too, but do they perceive its subtlety? 
Subtle contact is not ordinary feel­ ing and feeler, where conjunction is considered contact and sepa­ ration is not. 
205b When Xuansha stubbed his toe crossing the mountains and then awakened, when Deshan hits—isn’t this subtle contact? 
If you just search in your body, what connection is there? 
You will make the adamantine realm appear on the tip of a hair and turn the great Dharma wheel in every atom. 
Don’t just hold onto a single nook or den—all places are doors by which Avalokitesvara enters truth. 
For the ancients too there was “awaking to the Way by hear­ ing sound, illumining mind by seeing form. 
” A single person may indeed awaken, but how did the sixteen bodhisattvas awaken at the same time? 
Thus the ancients practiced together and witnessed together, awakened together and understood together. 
Xuedou picks up the meaning of their teaching to make people go to where subtle contact reveals illumination to understand. 
But Xuedou goes beyond the eye of their teaching to let people avoid being trapped in the net of doctrine, half-drunk and half-sober. 
Verse It only requires one accomplished Chan practitioner— (There’s one right here. 
I’ll strike three thousand times in the morning and eight hundred at night. 
Not even one is needed.) Stretch out your legs on the long bench and lie down. 
In a dream you once spoke of awakening to complete pervasion— (Already asleep, he goes on to speak of dreams. 
Yet I’ll allow that you’ve seen it in dreams. 
Why the sleep talk?) Though you’ve washed in fragrant water, I’ll spit right in your face. 
He adds a layer of mud on dirt. 
Don’t defecate on clean ground.) Commentary “ It only requires one accomplished Chan practitioner.” What does one accomplish? 
Once they hear it mentioned, adept Chanists im­ mediately go carry it out. 
“Stretch out your legs on the long bench and lie down.” An ancient said, In clear illumination there is no such thing as awakening. 
The idea of awakening deludes people. 
When you stretch out and sleep, there’s no false and no true—thus there isn’t a single thing on your mind—when hungry you eat, when tired you sleep. 
” Xuedou means that if you speak of washing and awakening to subtle contact revealing illumination, from the standpoint of such a free Chanist this is like speaking of a dream in a dream. 
So Xuedou says, In a dream you once spoke o f awakening to com­ plete pervasion— / Though you’ve washed in fragrant water, I’ll spit right in your face.” Though it seems like fragrant water, in fact it’s foul water suddenly soaking your head. 
What complete pervasion can you go on talking about? 
Xuedou says that this sort of person quite rightly gets spit in the face. 
I say this is add­ ing a layer of mud on dirt. 
Introduction When the great function manifests it doesn’t keep to patterns and rules. 
But say, who has ever acted this way? 
Story 205c A monk asked Touzi, “All sounds are the voice of the B u d d h a right or wrong?” (He knows how to grab the tiger’s whiskers. 
A thunderclap in a clear sky. 
One’s own feces do not seem to stink.) Touzi said, ‘Right. 
He’s sold his body to you. 
He’s put it over on one side. 
What mental activity is this?) The monk said, Don’t fart.” (He just sees the awl is sharp; he doesn’t see the chisel is square. 
What is he saying? 
After all he suffers defeat.) Touzi hit him. 
He’s clutching the loot yet crying he’s been wronged—why? 
East, west, south, north the reflections and echoes are still present.) Touzi said, “ Right.” (Again he’s sold his body to you. 
A pitfall to trap tigers. 
And what mental activity is this?) The monk said, “Can I call you an ass?” (He just sees the awl is sharp; he doesn’t see the chisel is square. 
Though he has waves against the current, yet he has no horns on his head. 
With a mouth full of blood, he spits out at people.) Touzi hit him. (A hit. 
It won’t do to let him go. 
He should be hit—why does Touzi stop before his staff is broken?) Commentary Touzi was plain and truthful, and he had extraordinary discern­ ment. 
Whenever he was questioned, he would immediately see the heart of the matter; without expending superfluous effort, he would immediately cut off the questioner s tongue. 
It could be said that he set plans in motion from inside his tent that decided vic­ tory beyond a thousand miles. 
This monk had taken his views of sound and form Buddhism and stuck them to his forehead; whenever he met someone, he would ask about it. 
Knowing Touzi was truthful, the monk was making a trap for him from the start—hence his subsequent remarks. 
Nevertheless it was Touzi who used the ability to trap tigers, fishing out the monk’s subsequent words. 
This monk received Touzi s answer by saying, “Don’t fart. 
” As it turned out, as soon as Touzi set his hook, the monk immediately climbed onto it; anyone else would have been unable to handle the monk, but Touzi had eyes and followed up and hit him. 
Whether he turned left or right, Touzi fol­ lowed him smoothly. 
When the monk made a trap, wanting to grab the tiger’s whiskers, he didn’t yet know that Touzi was above his trap. 
When Touzi hit him, the monk unfortunately had a start but no finish. 
As soon as Touzi picked up his staff, if the monk had overturned his meditation seat, even if Touzi had used his full capacity he still would have had to fall back three thousand miles. 
When the monk said, Can I call you an ass?” Touzi again hit him Though the monk was making clichés, nevertheless he was still exceptional; a teacher without the eye on the forehead would have been unable to crush him. 
But Touzi did have room to turn around. 
When the monk made up a theory, he wanted to plunder Touzi’s shop, but in the end, as before, he couldn’t do anything to the old man. 
A Chan monk either doesn’t act or doesn’t quit. 
Since this monk was unable to spring back, he was taken in tow by Touzi. 
(Obviously there’s no one on earth like this truthful old man. 
He spoils the sons and daughters of other people’s families.) The wheel of his ability is unobstructed. (What difficulty is there to handling him? 
(Act this way and you get a thrashing; don’t act this way and you still get a thrashing. 
If you take this monk’s place I’ll hit you.) How pitiful the innumerable people playing in the tide; (The monasteries produce one or a half; they produced these two people. 
All the Chan practitioners in the world act this way.) In the end they fall into the tide and die. (Too bad. What can they do? 
A sad person shouldn’t talk to sad people.) If they suddenly came to life, (My Chan seat shakes—he’s startled me. 
I too fall back three thousand miles.) The hundred rivers would reverse their flow with a roar. (Danger! 
It is useless to stop and think. 
I wouldn’t dare open my mouth. 
Old Touzi too must break his staff before he’s all right.) Commentary “ Touzi, Touzi! 
/ The wheel of his ability is unobstructed.” Touzi often said, “You always say Touzi is truthful, but if you suddenly went three steps down the mountain and someone asked you what Touzi s truthfulness is, how would you respond? 
An ancient said, Where the wheel of ability turns, the actor is still deluded.” The wheel of Touzi’s ability turns smoothly, entirely without obstructions. 
” Touzi said, “Swallowing three or four.” “ How is it after the moon is full? 
” Touzi said, “Spitting out seven or eight. 
When Touzi dealt with people he always used this ability. 
When he answered this monk he just used the one word “Right.” The monk got hit both times. 
Hence Xuedou says, “ The same for that and the same for this.” The first four lines have all at once completed Xuedou’s praise of Touzi. 
At the end Xuedou depicts the monk, saying, “How pitiful the innumerable people playing in the tide.” The monk dared to seize Touzi’s banner and drum, saying, “Don’t fart,” and “Can I call you an ass? 
This is where he played in the tide. 
When the monk had exhausted his clever maneuvers, as before he died in Touzi’s words, so Touzi then hit him. 
Thus the monk “in the end falls into the tide and dies. 
” 206b Xuedou releases the monk and says that if he suddenly came to life and overturned the meditation seat, then even Touzi would have to fall back three thousand miles, and then “the hundred rivers would reverse their flow with a roar.” Not only does my seat shake, but the mountains and rivers quake and heaven and earth are blacked out. 
Where will you go to settle your­ selves and establish your lives? 
Story A monk asked Zhaozhou, “Does a newborn baby also have the sixth consciousness?” (The moment is fleeting as a lightning flash. 
What newborn baby is he talking about?) Zhaozhou said, “Tossing a ball on swiftly flowing water.” (It’s gone by. 
You still must check it.) The monk asked Touzi, “What is the meaning o f ‘tossing a ball on swiftly flowing water’? 
Understand? 
It’s gone by.) Touzi said, Moment to moment, nonstop flow.” Commentary In the Abhidharma this sixth consciousness is set up as the true basis. 
Mountains, rivers, earth, sun, moon, and stars come into be­ ing because of it. 
It comes as the vanguard and leaves as the rear­ guard. 
In the stage of Buddhahood the eight con­ sciousnesses are transformed into the four knowledges; in doctri­ nal schools this is called changing names without changing essence. 
A Newborn Baby Sense faculties, objects, and consciousnesses are three. 
Origi­ nally we are unable to discriminate among the sense objects be­ fore us, but the subtle inner faculties produce consciousness, and consciousness manifests discrimination of forms—this is the sixth consciousness. 
The seventh consciousness, manas, can take hold of all images of the world and cause people to be vexed and troubled so that they don’t attain freedom. 
As for the eighth consciousness, called the storehouse consciousness, it contains all good and bad seeds. 
This monk knew the ideas of the verbal teachings, so he used them to question Zhaozhou: 
“ Does a newborn baby also have the sixth consciousness?” Though a newborn baby is equipped with the six consciousnesses, though its eyes can see and its ears can hear, it doesn’t discriminate among the six sense objects. 
At this time it knows nothing of good and evil, superior and inferior, right and wrong, gain and loss. 
A student of the Way must become again like an infant; then one cannot be moved by praise or blame, suc­ cess or fame, trial or ease. 
Though one sees forms, one is the same as blind; though one hears sounds, one is the same as deaf. 
One is like a simpleton, mind immutable as the polar mountain. 
Only if you can be like this will you have a little attainment. 
But though one is like this, nevertheless one can’t be fooled at all—as ever, mountains are mountains, rivers are rivers. 
One is like the sun and moon moving through the sky without stopping, without announcing one has so many names and forms. 
Since sky and earth are mindless, they last forever—what has mind has limits. 
One who has attained the Way is like this too. 
In the midst of effortlessness, one carries out efforts, accepting all trials and pleasures with a compassionate heart. 
The reclining dragon is very wary of the blue pool’s clarity.” If human life can be like this always, how can a single label remain in the world? 
Yet even being this way, one must go on to leap out of the nest. 
It says in the Flower Ornament Sutra, “Bodhisattvas in the eighth stage, Immovability, turn the Dharma Wheel in an atom, using effortless knowledge. 
When they have food and drink, they partake of it; neither the word certainty nor the word uncertainty can be applied to this transcendental matter. 
Shandao said, “Haven’t you even seen a newborn baby? 
At that time it does not know the meaning of having the Buddha nature or not having the Buddha nature. 
As one grows up one learns various sorts of intellectual knowledge; then one comes to claim ability and understanding, not knowing that this is affliction by acquired defilements. 
Among the sixteen contemplation practices, the baby’s practice is best. 
When it’s babbling it symbolizes the student of the Way, detached from the discriminating mind that grasps and rejects. 
That’s why I praise infants. 
I can make a comparison by taking the case of a baby, but if I say the baby is the Way, people of these times would misunderstand.” Nanquan said, “Eighteen times I was able to make a living. 
” Zhaozhou said, “Eighteen times I was able to break up the family and scatter the household. 
” He also said, “I was in the south for twenty years and only varied my application of mind at mealtimes. 
” Caoshan asked a monk, “In concentration the bodhisattva smells the musky elephant crossing the river very clearly; what scripture does this come from ?” The monk said, “From the Nir­ vana scripture.” Caoshan said, “ Does one smell before or after con­ centration?” The monk said, “Y ou’re flowing.” Caoshan said, “Receive it on the river bank. 
” The Surangama Sutra says, “Stillness merges into stillness, going into the bounds of consciousness. 
Birth of conceptions is false thinking. 
Birth of flows is pursuing falsehood, going round in circles. 
Even if you reach the state of effortlessness, you’re still in the midst of the charac­ teristics of flowing.” One must get out of the third aspect, birth of flows, in order to be joyfully alive and free. 
Therefore Guishan asked Yangshan, “How is it with you?” Yangshan said, “Are you asking about my perceptive understanding or my active understanding? 
If it’s my active understanding, I don’t know. 
If it’s my perceptive under­ standing, it’s like a pitcher of water poured into another pitcher.” If you can be like this you can be the teacher of a region. 
When Zhaozhou said, “Tossing a ball on swiftly flowing water,” he was already turning smoothly. 
When you toss it on swiftly flow­ ing water, in a blink of an eye it’s gone. 
The monks also asked Touzi, “What is the meaning o f ‘tossing a ball on swiftly flowing water’? 
” Touzi said, “Moment to moment, nonstop flow, ” spontaneously matching the question. 
They no longer make use of calculations—as soon as you question them they already know what you are getting at. 
Although a baby’s sixth consciousness makes no effort, never­ theless from moment to moment it doesn’t stop, flowing on like a hidden river. 
Of Touzi’s answer we can say that he profoundly discerns whatever comes up. 
Verse Sixth consciousness inactive—he puts forth a question. 
(Though he has eyes, he is like a blind man; though he has ears, he is like a deaf man. 
The clear mirror is on its stand, the bright pearl is in the palm. 
Just experience it, then you’ll know.) On the boundless swiftly flowing water, tossing a ball; (Consistent from beginning to end. 
Gone past. 
W hat’s he saying?) Where it comes down, it doesn’t stay—who can watch it? (Watch it and you’ll go blind. It’s gone. 
”) Commentary “Sixth consciousness inactive—he puts forth a question.” When the ancients studied the Way, they brought themselves to this point; this is called achievement of nonapplication. 
They were the same as a newborn baby: 
though they had eyes, ears, nose, tongue, body, and mind, they didn’t discriminate among the six sense ob­ jects. 
When you get to this realm, then you can overcome dragons and tigers, die sitting or standing. 
Right now people should just put the myriad phenomena before their eyes to rest at once. 
What need is there to get above the eighth stage before you can be like this? 
Although there’s no ac­ tivity, as ever mountains are mountains and rivers are rivers. 
Why use antiserum to test an adept?” Since Zhaozhou and Touzi were adepts, he says, “The adepts have both discerned where he’s coming from— / On the boundless swiftly flowing water, tossing a ball.” Touzi said, “Moment to moment, nonstop flow.” Do you know what this really means? 
At the end Xuedou has people set eyes on it for themselves and watch. 
Hence he says, “Where it comes down, it doesn’t stay—who can watch it?” This is Xuedou’s living statement. 
Introduction One captures the banner and seizes the drums, beyond the ken of the sages. 
This is not the wondrous functioning of spiritual powers, nor is it the suchness of the basic essence. 
Story A monk asked Yaoshan, “On a level field, in the shallow grass, the elk and deer form a herd. 
How can one shoot the elk of elks?” (He enters enemy headquarters with his helmet off. 
He raises his head wearing horns. 
He pulls an arrow out the back of his head.) Yaoshan said, “ Look—an arrow! 
If you’re not running downhill fast, it’s hard to catch up with him. 
(Obviously this monk is unusual, but once dead he doesn’t revive. 
He’s giving play to his spirit.) Yaoshan said, “Attendant, drag this dead man out.” (He acts according to the imperative. 
He doesn’t bother to test the monk again. 
The first arrow was still light; the second arrow is deep.) The monk then ran out. (He opens his eyes inside the coffin; he finds life in death. 
He still has some breath left.) Yaoshan said, “When will this guy playing with a mud ball ever be done?” (Too bad Yaoshan let him go. 
He acts according to the imperative, but he’s adding frost to snow.) Xuedou commented, “ Though he lived for three steps, after five steps he had to die.” (One hand lifts up, one hand presses down. 
Even if he ran a hundred steps he would still have to lose his life. 
Watch the arrow. 
If he lived the same and died the same, Yaoshan would stare agape. 
He’s just like an iron ham­ merhead with no hole—useless.) C o m m e n ta ry 207c In the Cao-Dong tradition this is called a question that uses things, or a question testing the host, used to clarify the present state of mind. 
Ordinarily deer and elk are easy to shoot. 
Only the elk of elks, the king among deer, is very hard to shoot. 
This king elk always sharpens its horns on rocks of cliffs, so they’re sharp as swords. 
It defends the herd with its own body, so even tigers cannot get near. 
Likewise, this monk seems intelligent and alert as he draws on this to question Yaoshan to reveal what he would do first. 
When Sanping first called on Shigong, as soon as Shigong saw him coming, he went through the motion of bending a bow and said, “Look—an arrow!” Sanping bared his chest and said, “ This is the arrow that kills—what is the arrow that brings life?” Shigong plucked the bowstring thrice, whereat Sanping bowed. 
Shigong said, “After thirty years with a single bow and two arrows, today I’ve finally managed to shoot half a sage.” Then he broke his bow and arrows. 
Datian said, “Since it is the arrow that brings life, why draw it on a bowstring?” Sanping was speechless. 
Datian said, “ Thirty years hence it will still be hard to find someone to bring up these words. 
” Fadeng composed this verse: 
Of old we had master Shigong; Setting his bow and arrows, he sat. 
He went on like this for thirty years; Not a single one understood. 
Sanping came and hit the target, And father and son reached harmony. 
Thinking back carefully, All along they were shooting the mound. 
Shigong’s strategy was the same as Yaoshan’s. 
Sanping had the eye on the forehead, so he hit the target immediately given a single phrase. 
It was just like Yaoshan saying, “Look—an arrow!” and this monk then collapsing, playing the elk. 
He had set his trap to make Yaoshan fall in, but Yaoshan was an adept and kept on pressing relentlessly. 
When Yaoshan said, “Attendant, drag this dead man out,” it was as if he was extending his battle lines forward. 
This monk then ran out: 
he may have been right, but he wasn’t free and clean, his hands and feet were stuck. 
Yaoshan said, “Look—an arrow,” whereupon the monk col­ lapsed. 
Was this understanding or not? 
If you say it was, why did Yaoshan say he was playing with a mud ball? 
This was extremely vicious. 
It was like when a monk asked Deshan, “ How is it when a student with a sharp sword tries to take the master’s head?” Deshan extended his neck to him and shouted; the monk said, “ The master’s head has fallen.” Deshan lowered his head and re­ turned to his room. 
The monk said, “The master’s head has fallen.” Yantou laughed. 
Cases of this kind are all traps to fell tigers, just like the present story. 
Yaoshan wasn’t taken in by this monk—since he saw through him, he just kept on pressing. 
Xuedou says, “ Though this monk lived for three steps, after five steps he had to die.” Though the monk knew very well how to look at the arrow and immediately collapsed, when Yaoshan said, “Attendant, drag this dead man out,” he ran out. 
Xuedou says he’s afraid he won’t live beyond three steps. 
Had the monk leaped beyond five steps at that time, no one in the world would have been able to do anything to him. 
208a In a meeting of adepts, from beginning to end there must be an uninterrupted interchange of guest and host; only then is there freedom and independence. 
Since the monk wasn’t able to con­ tinue from beginning to end, consequently he meets with Xuedou’s censure. 
If you want to shoot, then shoot, but why look?) Yaoshan releases one arrow— The monk runs three steps. 
He’s been dead a long time.) Had he lived for five steps, (What for? 
Leap a hundred steps. 
How is it when unexpectedly finding life in the midst of death?) He would have formed a herd and chased the tiger. (The two reflect each other. 
All the Chan practitioners in the world let him come forth, but he’s still in a nest in the weeds.) The correct eye has always been given to a hunter. (Yet Yaoshan doesn’t consent to acknowledge these words. 
It’s so for Yaoshan—what about Xuedou? 
”) Commentary “The elk of elks— / You should take a look.” Chan practitioners must have the eye of the elk of elks and the horns of the elk of elks; they must have devices and strategy. 
Even if it’s a fierce winged tiger or a horned tiger, the elk of elks can still preserve itself and keep harm at a distance. 
“Yaoshan releases one arrow— / The monk runs three steps.” When Yaoshan said, “Look—an arrow,” the monk fell down; when Yaoshan said, “Attendant, drag this dead man out,” the monk ran out. 
He did very well, but he was only able to run three steps. 
“Had he lived for five steps, / He would have formed a herd and chased the tiger.” Xuedou says, “I’m afraid that after five steps he had to die; had he been able to leap beyond five steps and been alive, he would have been able to gather his herd and gone to chase the tiger.” The horns of the elk of elks are sharp as spears— when a tiger sees them, even it becomes afraid and flees. 
This elk is the king among deer, always leading the herd in driving tigers to another mountain. 
“The correct eye has always been given to a hunter.” Yaoshan is like a hunter who knows how to shoot and this monk is like the elk. 
Introduction Only those with eyes can know the fishing line. 
Story A monk asked Dalong, “The physical body decays; what is the stable body of reality?” (His statement makes them into two. 
Still, it’s all right to separate them.) Dalong said, “The mountain flowers bloom like brocade; the valley streams brim blue as indigo.” (A flute with no holes striking a felt pounding board. 
The whole can­ not be broken apart. 
An ancient clearly stated, “If you want to attain intimacy, don’t ask with a question. 
The monk asking thus and Dalong answering thus is a single whole. 
Dalong didn’t move at all; it was like seeing a rabbit and releasing a falcon, like seeing a hole and putting in a plug. 
Thus it is said, “When white clouds lie across the valley mouth, many birds returning by night can’t find their nests.” Some say this was just answering glibly. 
They don’t know that with one device, one perspective, the ancients broke fetters and chains, that every word and phrase had something precious within. 
If one has the eye and brain of a Chanist, sometimes one holds fast and sometimes one lets go. 
Without the great function and great capacity, how would one be able to enclose heaven and earth like this? 
One is like a clear mir­ ror reflecting accurately whatever comes before it. 
This story is the same as that of the flowering hedge, though the meaning is not the same. 
Here the monk’s question was un­ clear, so Dalong’s answer was exactly appropriate. 
A monk asked Yunmen, “ How is it when the tree withers and the leaves fall?” Yunmen said, “The body exposed in the autumn wind.” This is called arrow points meeting. 
It’s easy to see Yunmen acting thus, but it’s hard to see Dalong acting otherwise. 
Playing with the thing without knowing its name. 
Buy the hat to fit the head.) Answered, still not understanding. (South and north not differentiated. 
The skull was switched. 
South of the river, north of the river.) The moon is cold, the wind is high— (What is it like? 
Today is precisely this time. 
All people have eyes but have never seen, have ears but have never heard.) On the ancient cliff, frigid juniper. 
A holeless flute hitting a felt pounding board.) How delightful to meet an enlightened one on the road, (You must get here yourself too. 
Give me back my staff. 
They come like this, forming a crowd.) Who doesn’t use speech or silence to reply. 
What would you use to answer him properly?) His hand grasps the white jade whip And smashes the black dragon’s pearl. 
If he hadn’t smashed it, 208c He would have increased its flaws. (Why play with a mud ball? 
He’d seem more and more decrepit; his crimes would fill the sky.) The nation has a code of laws— (Those who know the law fear it. 
“In the morning three thousand blows, at night eight hundred blows.”) Three thousand articles of offenses. (He’s only told half of it. 
There are eighty-four thousand. Countless eons of uninterrupted hell wouldn’t make up for half of it.) Commentary Xuedou versifies here with much skill. 
Before when he versified Yunmen’s “The body exposed in the autumn wind,” he said, “Since the question has the source, the answer too is in the same place.” This case is otherwise: 
Xuedou instead says, “Asking without know­ ing, / Answered, still not understanding.” Dalong’s answer was a glimpse from the side that was simply outstanding. 
His answer was so clear that whoever questioned him this way had already incurred defeat even before asking. 
Thus Xuedou comes out with his verse to make people re­ alize that the moon is cold, the wind is high and still strikes the frigid juniper on the ancient cliff. 
Thus I just said it’s a holeless flute hitting a felt pound­ ing board. 
On the road, if you meet an enlight­ ened one, don’t use speech or silence to reply.” This is a verse of Xiangyan that Xuedou has drawn on. 
What is this like? 
“ His hand grasps the white jade whip / And smashes the black dragon’s pearl.” Thus the command of the founders must be carried out, cutting off everything in the ten directions. 
This is the matter of the sword’s edge, for which one must have this kind of strategy. 
Otherwise you turn your back on the sages of all time. 
This is how transcendent people act. 
“If he hadn’t smashed it,” necessarily “he would have increased its flaws,” and thus would have seemed broken down and decrepit. 
But in the end, how can you be right? 
“ The nation has a code of law— / Three thousand articles of offenses.” There are three thousand subdivisions of punishments, and none is greater than that for not being respectful. 
This monk offended against all three thousand articles at once. 
How so? 
Because he didn’t deal with people on the basis of his own thing. 
As for Dalong, he of course was not this way. 
The Ancient Buddhas and the Pillars Story 209a Yunmen said, “The ancient Buddhas and the pillars merge—what level of mental activity is this?” (Three thousand miles away. 
Cracked open.) He answered himself, (When someone in the eastern house dies, someone from the western house assists in the mourning. 
The single compounded form cannot be grasped.) “On south mountain clouds gather;” (Throughout heaven and earth, they can’t be seen. 
A knife cannot cut through.) “on north mountain rain falls.” (Not a drop falls. 
Half south of the river, half north of the river.) Commentary Great master Yunmen produced over eighty enlightened teach­ ers. 
Seventeen years after he died, his tomb was opened and his body was found upright and sound as in life. 
All his pointers, alternative remarks, and state­ ments on behalf of others were direct and uncompromising. 
This present story is like sparks, like lightning, baffling and ungraspable. 
Librarian Qing said, “Is there such talk in the Canon? 
” People these days make their living on emotional interpreta­ tions, saying, “The Buddha is the guide of the world, the compas­ sionate father of beings. 
Why then do the ancient Buddhas merge with the pillars?” If you understand this way, you’ll never find it. 
Some call Yunmen’s saying calling out from nothingness. 
They don’t know that the talk of Chan masters cuts off conceptualization, cuts off emotional evaluation, cuts off birth and death, cuts off dogmatism, and enters the absolute without retaining anything at all. 
As soon as you rationalize and calculate, you tie your hands and feet. 
Just unify mind and environment; then judgments of good and bad won’t be able to shake you. 
Then it will be all right whether you say there is or there isn’t; it will be all right whether you have mental activity or not. 
Wuzu said, “Yunmen, supposedly so great, really didn’t have much guts. 
“On south mountain clouds gather; on north mountain rain falls.” Thus he opened up a route of entry for future students. 
That’s why Xuedou picks out the place where he settles heaven and earth to make people see. 
But as soon as you blunder into calculation, you stumble past and miss it, though it’s right in front of you. 
Verse South mountain clouds, (Throughout heaven and earth they can’t be seen. 
A knife cannot cut in.) North mountain rain— (Not a drop falls. 
Half south of the river, half north of the river.) The twenty-eight and the six see it before them. 
The lanterns are hung on the pillars.) In Korea they’ve gone up into the hall; (Surging up in the east, sinking down in the west. 
The east guild doesn’t see the profits of the west guild. 
Give me back the story. 
At first he doesn’t get there; afterwards he goes too far.) In suffering, happiness— In happiness, suffering— (A double case. 
Who would you have bring this up? 
Suffering is suffering, happiness is happiness. 
Why two heads, three faces?) Who says gold is like ordure? (Those with eyes will discern. 
Try to brush it off and look. 
Too bad! 
Tell me, is it the ancient Buddhas or the pillars?) Commentary “South mountain clouds, / North mountain rain.” Xuedou buys the hat to fit the head, watches the wind to set the sail. 
On the edge of a sword he puts down footnotes for you. 
“In Korea they’ve gone up into the hall; / In China they haven’t yet beaten the drum.” Xuedou goes where thunder peals and comets fly and says, “In suffering, happiness— / In happiness suffering.” He seems to have piled up jewels and put them here. 
Finally there’s this little line—“Who says gold is like ordure?” This is from Chanyue’s poem “ Travel is Hard”: 
People cannot fathom the ocean’s depth or mountains’ height— Past and present, more and more green and blue. 
Don’t associate with the shallow and superficial— The low ground can only produce brambles. 
Who says gold is like ordure? 
Traveling the road is hard; The hardships of travel, see for yourself. 
And isn’t the territory broad and the people few? 
Cloud dwelling saints! 
Though you say “it is not,” there is nothing “is not” can negate. 
When is and is not are left behind, and gain and loss are forgotten, then you are clean and free. 
But tell me, what is it in front of you and in back of you? 
If you can judge, I’ll allow that you have personally seen the ancients. 
Story Vimalakirti asked Manjusri, (This fellow is making quite a fuss. 
He should shut up.) “What is a bodhisattva’s entry into the Dharma Door of Non duality?” Manjusri said, “According to what I think,” (What is he saying? 
He’s wearing fetters, carrying evidence of his crime, hauling himself into the magistrate’s office.) “in all things,” “no words, no speech,” “no demonstration, and no recognition,’ (He might fool others. ) “leaving behind all questions and answers;” “this is entering the Dharma Door of Non­ duality.” 209c Then Manjusri asked Vimalakirti, “We have already spoken. 
Now you tell us, what is a bodhisattva’s entry into the Dharma Door of Nonduality?” (Not even the Buddhas of all times, let alone Vimala­ kirti, can speak about this one support. 
Manjusri has turned the spear around and stabbed one man to death. 
The arrow hits Vimala­ kirti just as he was shooting at others.) Xuedou said, “What did Vimalakirti say?” (Tsk! 
Xuedou, drawing ten thousand arrows to his heart, speaks the truth in Vimalaklrti’s place.) He also said, “Completely exposed.” (Not only then, but now too, it is so. 
Xuedou is drawing his bow after the bandit has gone. 
Though he uses all his strength to help people, nevertheless calamity comes from his own door. 
But tell me, can Xuedou see the ultimate point? 
Since he hasn’t even dreamed of it, how can he say “Completely exposed”? 
Danger! 
Even the golden lion cannot search it out.) Commentary Vimalakirti had various bodhisattvas speak on the Dharma Door of Nonduality. 
At the time, thirty-two bodhisattvas all took dualistic views of creation and noncreation, of the two truths, absolute and conventional, and merged them into a monistic view that they considered to be the Dharma Door of Nonduality. 
Finally he asked Manjusri, who said, “According to what I think, in all things, no words and no speech, no demonstration and no recognition, leav­ ing behind all questions and answers; this is entering the Dharma Door of Nonduality.” Since the other thirty-two had used words to dispense with words, Manjusri used no-words to dispense with words. 
At once he swept everything away, not wanting anything, and considered this to be the Dharma Door of Nonduality. 
He still didn’t realize that this was the sacred tortoise dragging its tail, that in wiping away the tracks he was making traces. 
It’s just like a broom sweeping away dust; though the dust is removed, the tracks of the broom remain. 
Since in the end, as before, some traces were left, Manjusri then asked Vimalakirti, “We have already spoken. 
Now you tell us, what is a bodhisattva’s entry into the Dharma Door of Nonduality?” Vimalakirti was silent. 
If you’re alive, you’ll never sink into stag­ nant water. 
If you make up such views, you’re like a mad dog chasing a clod of earth. 
Xuedou didn’t say Vimalakirti kept silent, nor did he say he sat there silently. 
He hadn’t seen him even in a dream. 
Vimalakirti was an ancient Buddha who had a family and house­ hold. 
He helped Sakyamuni Buddha teach. 
He had inconceivable intelligence, inconceivable perspective, inconceivable psychic pow­ ers, and miraculous abilities. 
Inside one room he accommodated thirty-two thousand jewel lion thrones and a multitude of eighty thousand, without it being crowded. 
But tell me, what principle is this? 
Don’t misunderstand; if it is the Dharma Door of Nonduality, only by the same attain­ ment and the same experience can there be common mutual wit­ ness and knowledge. 
Only Manjusri was able to give a reply. 
Even so, was he able to avoid Xuedou’s critical examination? 
Xuedou, talking as he did, also had to meet with these two. 
This little bit has nothing to do with gain or loss, nor does it fall into right and wrong. 
It’s like being on a ten-mile-high cliff; if you can give up your life and leap off, you may see Vimala­ kirti in person. 
If you cannot give up, you’re like a ram caught in a fence. 
This is old Vimalakirti! 
(Why snap at him? In the morning three thousand blows, in the evening eight hundred blows. 
Snapping at him doesn’t accomplish anything. 
He deserves a thrashing.) He suffers an empty affliction out of compassion for living beings, (Why have compassion for them? 
They themselves have the diamond sword. 
He took the trouble but accomplished nothing.) Lying ill in Vaisall, His whole body withered and emaciated. 
He can’t eat or breathe.) ManjusrI, teacher of the seven Buddhas, comes (When a guest comes one must attend to him. 
When a thief comes one must beat him. 
After all Vimalakirti is living in a ghost cave.) He asks about the Door of Nonduality. (Were there anything that could be said, it would have been said by him. 
”) Then Vimalakirti leans and falls. 
He doesn’t lean and fall— (He finds life in the midst of death; there’s still some breath in him.) The golden lion has no place to look. 
Right off Xuedou cuts right through with the diamond sword. 
Vimalakirti should be given three thousand blows in the morning and eight hundred blows in the evening. Vimalakirti means Pure Name in Sanskrit. 
He was also known as the Golden Grain Buddha. 
A monk asked Yunju, “If he was the Golden Grain Buddha, why did he listen to the Dharma in the congregation of Sakyamuni Buddha?” Yunju said, “He didn’t pit himself against others.” Someone who is greatly liberated has noth­ ing to do with becoming a Buddha or not becoming a Buddha. 
If you say such a one practices to attain Buddhahood, this has even less to do with it. 
Whether he goes against or goes along, the gods cannot fathom. 
If he goes along, he turns toward the stage of Buddha­ hood; if he goes against, he enters the realms of sentient beings.” Chan Master Shou said, “Even if you can perfect yourself and get to this realm, you still can’t follow your inclinations. 
Only when you have experienced uncontaminated sainthood can you go along or go against.” Thus Xuedou said, “He suffers an empty affliction out of compassion for living beings.” In the scripture Vimalakirti says, “Since sentient beings have illnesses, I also have an illness. 
He said, “ This body has no permanence, no strength, no power, no stability; it’s a thing that quickly decays; it can’t be relied on. 
It produces suffering and trouble, a mass of diseases. 
It is a compound of mental and physical elements. 
” “Manjusri, teacher of the seven Buddhas, comes” —Manjusri was the teacher of the seven Buddhas of antiquity, but he obeyed Sakyamuni Buddha’s instructions to go ask Vimalakirti about his illness. 
“To the single room that’s been swept repeatedly.” Vimala­ kirti had cleared everything out of his room, just leaving a bench. 
When Manjusri arrived, he asked about the Dharma Door of Non­ duality, so Xuedou says “ He asks about the Door of Nonduality.” “ Then Vimalakirti leans and falls” —Vimalakirti frowned. 
Chan followers these days say his speechlessness was the leaning and falling. 
Pushing you up onto a ten-mile cliff, Xuedou then says, “He doesn’t lean and fall.” With one hand he lifts up; with one hand he pushes down. 
This line versifies his own comment, “What did Vimalakirti say?” “The golden lion has no place to look. 
” It was not only this way at that time, but it’s this way right now. 
Do you see old Vimalakirti? 
Even if the whole world, the mountains, rivers, grasses, trees, and for­ ests all turned into a golden lion, you still would no be able to find him Introduction To hold the world fast without the slightest leak, so that all the people in the world lose their points and become tongue-tied— this is the true imperative for Chanists. 
To radiate light from the forehead that shines through the four quarters—this is the ada­ mantine eye of Chanists. 
To turn iron into gold and gold into iron, to capture suddenly and release suddenly—this is the staff of Chanists. 
To silence everyone in the world so that there’s no way for them to expostulate and they fall back three thousand miles— this is the mettle of Chanists. 
But tell me, when one is not this way at all, who is this? 
Story A monk came to the place of the hermit of Tongfeng and asked, “What if you suddenly encountered a tiger here?” (An expert at playing with shadows. 
There’s one or a half in the nest of weeds.) The hermit roared like a tiger. (He adds error to error. 
Nonethe­ less he does have fangs and claws. 
They are born alike and die alike. 
“Hearing words, understand the source.”) The monk made a gesture of fright. (Two men playing with mud. The monk saw the opportunity and acted. 
(This amounts to something. 
There’s a sword in his laugh. 
He can let go and can also gather in.) The monk said, “You old bandit!” (One must see through this. 
Both let go.) The hermit said, “What can you do to m e?” (I would slap him across the ear. 
What a pity to let him go. 
He adds frost to snow.) The monk gave up. (Thus he was stopped. 
Neither of them were done. 
Heavens!) Xuedou said, “ This is all right, but these two wicked bandits could only cover their ears to steal a bell.” (The words are still in our ears. 
They have been examined by Xuedou. 
But how should they have acted to avoid Xuedou’s criticism? 
No Chanist in the world reaches that.) Commentary Observe how those two had such knowing eyes and capable hands. 
Where is the riddle? 
Xuedou picked this story to make people know wrong from right and discern gain and loss. 
Nevertheless, from the standpoint of adepts, though it’s handled in terms of gain and loss, after all there is no gain or loss. 
If you view those ancients in terms of gain and loss, you miss the point entirely. 
People today should each find the place where there’s no gain or loss; after that you can discern people in terms of gain and loss. 
If you only apply your mind to choosing among words and phrases, when will you ever be done? 
As soon as some teacher speaks, you immediately ask about Chan and the Way, about transcendence and accommodation, about how and what. 
These, you say, are words of eloquence; these, words referring to self; these, words referring to things; these words from within the essence. 
Once you have gobbled down your meal, you only speak of dreams and say you have understood Buddhism. 
You should know that if you go on this way you will never be done.” In the temporary exercises of the ancients, there were no such views as victory and defeat, gain and loss, right and wrong. 
Tongfeng had seen Linji. 
At the time of the story he lived in a hut deep in the mountains. 
This monk came there and asked, “What if you suddenly encountered a tiger here?” Tongfeng then roared like a tiger; he rightly went to the thing to act. 
The monk too knew how to meet error with error, so he made a gesture of fright. 
Thus Xuedou said, “ This is all right, but these two wicked bandits could only cover their ears to steal a bell.” Though both were ban­ dits, still they didn’t take the opportunity to use it; hence they were covering their own ears to steal a bell. 
With these two elders, it s as though they set up battle lines of a million troops but only struggled over a broom. 
2i i a To discuss this matter it is necessary to have the ability to kill people without blinking an eye. 
If you always let go and never capture, or always kill and never bring to life, you will not avoid the scornful laughter of others. 
Though this is so, these ancients still didn’t have so many concerns. 
Wuzu spoke of the concentration of spiritual powers at play, the concentration of the torch of wisdom, and the concentration of the supreme adornment. 
It’s just that people of later times don’t have their feet on the ground; they just go criticize the ancients and say there is gain and loss. 
Some say the hermit clearly lost the advantage, but this misses the mark. 
Xuedou said, “When these two met, it was all letting go.” When the monk said, “What if you suddenly encountered a tiger here?” and Tongfeng roared, this was letting go. 
Xuedou said, “If you want to act, then act.” People today hear such talk and say that the hermit should have carried out the imperative for the monk. 
But you shouldn’t blindly punish and beat the hermit. 
But in the end, how will you avoid covering your ears to steal a bell? 
Verse If you don’t grab it when you see it, You’ll think about it a thousand miles away. 
Fine stripes— (Take what’s due you and get out. 
What could he do— he didn’t know to function.) But he hasn’t got claws and fangs. (I only fear the use of them will be unclear. 
I’ll talk to you when your claws and fangs are ready.) Haven’t you seen the sudden encounter on Mt. 
(If there’s a rule, go by the rule; if there’s no rule, go by the example.) The vast sound and light shake the earth— (This tiger after all goes on this way. Still he amounts to something. 
If you can open your eyes, you can be born alike and die alike. 
Xuedou is creating complications.) They take the tiger’s tail and grab the tiger’s whiskers. (How will you take it when it suddenly appears? 
All the Chanists in the world are taken in here. 
Shouting and striking, I say, why not say, “You th ief?”) Commentary “ If you don’t grab it when you see it, / You’ll think about it a thou­ sand miles away.” Just at the point of danger, the monk couldn’t function at all; when the hermit said, “What can you do to m e?” the monk should have given him some of his own provisions. 
Had he been able to show his skill, the hermit would have had to have a last word. 
Both only knew how to let go; they couldn’t gather in. 
“ If you don’t grab it when you see it” is already white clouds for ten thousand miles; why did he go on to say “You’ll think about it a thousand miles away”? 
211b “Fine stripes— / But he hasn’t got claws and fangs.” This may be so, but this tiger also knows how to conceal his fangs and hide his claws. 
Nevertheless, he didn’t know how to bite people. 
“Haven’t you seen the sudden encounter on Mt. 
/ The vast sound and light shake the earth.” One day Baizhang asked Huangbo, “Where are you coming from ?” Huangbo said, “From picking mushrooms on the mountain.” Baizhang said, “See any tigers?” Huangbo made a tiger’s roar. 
Baizhang took the axe at his side and made a gesture of chopping. 
Huangbo held it fast and slapped him. 
That evening Baizhang said to the group, “There’s a tiger on Mt. 
Daxiong; all of you must watch out when you’re coming and going. 
Today I myself got bitten.” Later Guishan asked Yangshan about Huangbo’s tiger story. 
“ The vast sound and light shake the earth.” This bit trans­ forms freely. 
Xuedou wants a road to express himself in the words. 
“Do great people of power see or not?” Do you see? 
“ They take the tiger’s tail and grab the tiger’s whiskers.” Here again this must be one’s own. 
Even if you take the tiger’s tail and grab the tiger’s whiskers, you won’t avoid being taken in tow at once. 
The Kitchen Pantry and the Main Gate Introduction One holds the world fast without the slightest leak; one cuts off all flows without keeping a drop. 
Tell me, what is the eye that pen­ etrates barriers? 
Story Yunmen said, “Everyone has a light;” (But they are ignorant of it.) “when you look at it, you don’t see it and it’s dark and dim.” “What is everyone’s light?” (Moun­ tains are mountains, rivers are rivers. 
Though it’s a light, when you’re asked about it you don’t understand—isn’t it dark and dim ?” For twenty years he handed down this lesson, but no one understood his meaning. 
” Usually what he said on behalf of others was just a single sentence; why are there two here? 
The first sen­ tence briefly opens a road for you to let you see. 
If you’re real, as soon as you hear it you get right up and go. 
Yunmen feared people would get stuck here, so he also said, “A good thing isn’t as good as nothing. 
As before he’s swept it away for you. 
As soon as they hear you mention “light,” people today put a glare in their eyes and say, “There is the pantry; there is the main gate. 
But this has nothing to do with it. 
This is why it is said, Perceive the meaning on the hook; don’t stick to the zero point of the scale.” This matter is not in the eye or in objects. 
To begin to understand you must cut off views, forget gain and loss, and be­ come purified, naked, and free; one must investigate on one’s own. 
Yunmen said, “You come and go by daylight; you distinguish people by daylight. 
Suddenly it’s midnight, and there’s no sun, moon, or lamplight. 
If it’s a place you’ve been to, then of course it’s possible, but in a place you’ve never been, can you even manage to get hold of something?” The Merging o f Difference and Sameness says, Right within light there’s darkness, But don’t see it as darkness: 
Right within darkness there’s light, But don’t meet it as light. 
If you cut off light and darkness, tell me, what is it? 
Light and objects both forgotten, then what is this?” Also it is said, “This very seeing and hearing is not seeing and hearing, but there s no other sound and form to be offered to you. 
Here if you can understand there’s nothing at all, substance and function may be separated or not. 
” Just understand Yunmen’s final statement thoroughly, then you can go back to the previous one to roam at play. 
But ulti­ mately, you do not make a living there. 
Vimalaklrti said, “All things are established on a nonabiding basis.” You mustn’t go here to play with lights and shadows and do mental gymnastics. 
Nor will it do to make up an understanding in terms of nothingness. 
An ancient said, “ Better you should give rise to a view of existence as big as a mountain than that you should produce a view of noth­ ingness as small as a mustard seed. 
People of the lesser vehicles often fall one-sidedly into this view. 
Verse Spontaneously shining, ranged in the solitary light. 
Guest and host intermingle. 
He snaps your nose around. 
What are you doing, blind ones?) He opens a route for you. (Why only one route? 
Ten suns are shining in concert. 
He has managed to set down one route.) Flowers fall, the tree has no shadow— (What end is there to creating complications? 
Where will you seek it? 
He fills a black lacquer bucket with black ink.) When looking, who doesn’t see? 
You shouldn’t always hold onto fences and grope along walls. 
Two blind ones, three blind ones ... 
) Seeing or not seeing— Riding backwards on an ox into the Buddha shrine. 
Give me back the story. 
I hit, saying, “Where has he gone?” Xuedou too is just m aking his living inside a ghost cave. 
At midnight the sun comes out, at noonday the midnight watch is sounded.) Commentary “Spontaneously shining, ranged in the solitary light. 
Originally, right where you are, there’s this beam of light; it s just that your usual use of it is dark. 
That’s why Yunmen set out this light for you right in front of your faces. 
But what is your light? 
“The kitchen pantry and the main gate.” This is where Yunmen ar­ rays the solitary light. 
Panshan said, “The mind-moon is solitary and full; its light engulfs myriad forms. 
Afterwards “ He opens a route for you.” Yunmen still feared people would become attached to “the kitchen pantry and the main gate. 
” Conceding for the moment the kitchen pantry and the main gate, when the morning flowers fall and the tree has no shadow, when the sun has gone down and the moon goes dark and all the world is vast blackness—do you still see? 
“When looking, who doesn’t see?” Tell me, who is it that doesn’t see? 
Here, where “right within light there’s darkness” and “right within darkness there’s light,” both are “like a step forward and a step backward.” You must see for yourself. 
212a Xuedou says, “Seeing or not seeing,” in reference to “A good thing isn’t as good as nothing.” Merged with seeing, you don’t see anymore; merged with understanding, you don’t understand any more. 
“Riding backwards on an ox into the Buddha shrine.” He’s gone into the black lacquer bucket. 
You must personally ride the ox into the Buddha shrine to see what it is that he’s saying. 
sometimes on the summit of a solitary peak weeds grow profusely; sometimes they’re naked and free in the bustling marketplace. 
Suddenly they appear as angry titans with three heads and six arms; suddenly as Sun Face or Moon Face Buddha they emanate the light of all-embracing mercy. 
In a single atom they manifest all physical forms; to save people according to type they mix with the ordinary world. 
If suddenly they release the opening upward, not even the Buddha’s eye could see them; even if a thousand sages appeared, they too would have to fall back three thousand miles. 
Is there anyone with the same attainment and same realization? 
Story Yunmen said, “Medicine and disease subdue each other.” (A com­ pounded form cannot be grasped.) “The whole earth is medicine;” “what is your self?” (Sweet melon is sweet to the stem. 
The whole earth is medicine; what is your se lf?” Do you have a way out? 
Concentrate constantly on “towering like a mile-high w all.” Deshan’s blows fall like rain; Linji’s shouts peal like th u n d e rputting this aside for the moment, Sakyamuni is Sakyamuni and Maitreya is Maitreya. 
Those who don’t know what it comes down to frequently understand by calling it “medicine and disease merg­ ing with each other. 
” For forty-nine years, in over three hundred assemblies, the Buddha set up teachings in accord with poten­ tials; all this was giving medicine according to the disease, like exchanging sweet fruit for bitter gourds. 
“The whole earth is medicine.” Where will you sink your teeth into this? 
If you look around and hesitate, you won’t be able to get your teeth into it; Yunmen is under your feet. 
“Medicine and disease subdue each other.” This is just an ordi­ nary proposition. 
If you cling to being, he speaks of nonbeing for you; if you are attached to nonbeing, he speaks of being for you. 
If you are attached to the idea of neither being or nonbeing, he mani­ fests the golden body of the Buddha for you in a pile of rubbish, appearing and disappearing. 
212b Right now this whole earth is a profuse array of myriad forms, up to and including one’s own self. 
If you only call it medicine, you’ll never see Yunmen even in a dream. 
Ultimately how is it? 
See the meaning on the hook; don’t stick by the zero point of the scale. 
One day Manjusri had Sudhana pick medicinal herbs. 
He said, “If there is something that is not medicine, bring it to me. 
” Sudhana searched all over, but there was nothing that was not medicine. 
So he went back and told Manjusri, “There is nothing that is not medicine.” Manjusri said, “Gather something that is medicine.” Sudhana picked up a blade of grass and handed it to Manjusri. 
Manjusri held it up and showed it to the assembly, saying, “ This medicine can kill and can also bring life.” This talk of medicine and disease subduing each other is ex­ tremely difficult to see. 
They discussed this statement “medicine and dis­ ease subdue each other” all night until dawn before they were finally able to exhaust its excellence. 
Afterwards, Xuedou made a verse to see him off: 
Medicine and disease subdue each other—most difficult to see; The myriad locked gates indeed have no starting point. 
Wayfarer Jin E came calling; In one night we exhausted the waves of the ocean of learning. 
Xuedou’s subsequent verse is most effective. 
His meaning is in the host and in the guest. 
You can see for yourself. 
Verse The whole earth is medicine: (Who would you have discern the point? 
This is scattering sand and dirt. 
Put it on a high shelf.) Why have people of all times been so mistaken? 
Tsk!) I don’t make the carriage behind closed doors— (Great Xuedou uses all his strength to help the assembly. 
Misfortune comes forth from one’s own door. 
Calm and clear, totally untrammeled. 
Who has any spare time? 
He is making a living in a ghost cave.) The road through is naturally quiet and empty. (Wherever you step you enter the weeds. 
When you get on a horse, you’ll see the road. 
(Twin swords fly through space. 
A single arrow fells two eagles.) Though your nose be high as the sky, you’re still taken in tow. 
Commentary “The whole earth is medicine: 
/ Why have people of all times been so mistaken?” For all time those who have understood by calling it medicine have instantly gone wrong. 
” “ I don’t make the carriage behind closed doors— / The road through is naturally quiet and empty.” Xuedou speaks to open up a road for you: 
“If you build your carriage behind closed doors, and it fits the ruts in the road when you bring it out, what has this accomplished? 
I am not building a carriage behind closed doors here. 
When I go out the door, naturally it’s quiet and empty.” Here Xuedou reveals a slight crack to let people see. 
Who would have known that Xuedou’s opening up a road is also wrong? 
Since your nose is as high as the sky, why do you get taken in tow any­ way? 
Then immerse yourself in this for thirty years. 
If you have a staff, I give you a staff; if you have no staff, you won’t avoid being taken in tow. 
Taking charge of the situation, one hits home and smashes apart the occult barrier of the golden chains. 
Acting according to the imperative, one obliterates all tracks and traces. 
Tell me, where is there confusion? 
For those who have the eye on the forehead, I bring this up to see. 
Story Xuansha said, “The adepts everywhere all speak of guiding and aiding people.” (They set up their shops according to their capaci­ ties, according to whether their houses are rich or poor.) “Suppose they met three kinds of invalids—how would they guide them?” (He’s beating the weeds just to frighten the snakes. 
You must fall back three thousand miles.) “With blind people, they could pick up the gavel or raise the whisk, but they wouldn’t see.” (Truly blind! 
This is guiding and aiding people. 
One doesn’t have to be blind.) “Deaf people wouldn’t hear what they said.” (Truly deaf! 
This is guiding and aiding people. 
One doesn’t have to be deaf. 
This is guiding and aiding people. 
One doesn’t have to be mute. 
If they couldn’t guide these people, then Buddhism has no effect.” (How true these words are. 
They’ve already been guided. 
I’ll strike!) A monk asked Yunmen for instruction on this. (He wants everyone to know too. 
This is pertinent.) Yunmen said, “Bow.” (When the wind blows the grasses bend. 
Tsk!) The monk bowed and rose. (This monk has broken the staff.) Yunmen poked at him with his staff; the monk drew back. 
Yunmen said, “You’re not blind.” (Truly blind! 
Better not say this monk is blind.) Then Yunmen called him closer; when the monk approached, (The second ladleful of foul water douses the monk. 
Avalokitesvara has come. 
At that time the monk should have shouted.) Yunmen said, “You’re not deaf.” (Truly deaf. 
Bet­ ter not say the monk is deaf.) Next Yunmen said, “Understand?” (Why doesn’t he offer his own provisions? 
At that time the monk shouldn’t have made a sound.) The monk said, “No.” (A doubled case. 
Heavens!) Yunmen said, “You’re not mute.” (Truly mute. 
He’s babbling. 
Better not say this monk is mute.) At this the monk had an insight. (He draws his bow after the bandit is gone. 
What vessel is he looking for?) C o m m e n ta ry Xuansha had reached the point of eliminating emotional defilement and conceptual thought, where he became purified, naked, free; only thus could he speak this way. 
Blind people wouldn’t see them raise the gavel or whisk; deaf people wouldn’t hear what they said; mute people couldn’t be made to speak. 
If they couldn’t guide these people, then Buddhism has no effect.” If you now under­ stand this as being blind, deaf, and mute, you’ll never be able to find it. 
Thus it is said, “Don’t die in the words.” To attain, you must understand Xuansha’s intent. 
Xuansha often used this statement to guide people. 
One of his longtime disciples once said, “Will you permit me to present a theory of the story of the three invalids?” Xuansha said, “Go ahead. 
” The monk then bade them farewell and left. 
Fayan later said, “When I heard Master Dizang tell about this monk I finally understood the story of the three kinds of inva­ lids.” If you say the monk didn’t understand, then why would Fayan say this? 
If you say he did understand, why did Xuansha say “wrong”? 
One day Dizang said to Xuansha, “I hear you have a saying about three kinds of invalids—is that so?” Xuansha said, “Yes.” Dizang said, “I have eyes, ears, nose, and tongue—how will you guide m e?” Xuansha immediately stopped. 
If you can understand Xuansha’s meaning, how could it be in the words? 
Later a monk took this up with Yunmen. 
Yunmen said, “You’re not blind.” Then Yunmen called him closer. 
When the monk approached, Yunmen said, “You’re not deaf.” Next he said, “Understand?” When the monk said, “No,” Yunmen said, “You’re not mute.” At this the monk attained insight. 
Had the monk been real, he would have turned over the Chan seat as soon as Yunmen told him to bow; then how could so many complica­ tions have appeared? 
The under­ standing of those two was the same. 
See how the ancients appeared and created millions of kinds of expedient methods. 
Wuzu said, “One person can speak but doesn’t understand; one understands but cannot speak. 
If these two came calling, how would you be able to distinguish between them? 
If you can’t distinguish between these two, in fact you will be unable to free people from fixations and bonds. 
If you can distinguish them, then as soon as you see them come through the gate, you have put on your shoes and walked around several times inside their bellies. 
” Now you better not make your understanding in terms of blind, deaf, and mute. 
Thus it is said, “One sees forms as though blind, and hears sounds as though deaf. 
” It is also said, “Though it fills the eyes, one doesn’t see form; though it fills the ears, one doesn’t hear sound—Manjusri is always covering the eyes, Avalokitesvara blocks the ears.” At this point, only if you see as though blind and hear as though deaf will you be able to be close to Xuansha’s meaning. 
Do you know where the blind, deaf, and mute are? 
Verse Blind, deaf, mute — (Already there before anything is said. 
Already made into one piece.) Dark, without any adjustments to potentialities. (Where will you search? 
Can you make any judgments? 
What have they got to do with it?) In the heavens, on earth— Laughable, lamentable. 
Li Lu can’t discern the true form; How can Shi Kuang recognize the mystic tune? 
No reward has been established for the great achievement. 
Truly deaf.) How can this compare to sitting alone under an empty window? (You must be thus to attain. 
Don’t live in a ghost cave. 
This breaks through obscurity all at once.) The leaves fall, the flowers bloom—each in its own time. (What time is it right now? 
You mustn’t understand it as nothing. 
Today goes from morning to evening and tomorrow too goes from morning to evening.) Again Xuedou says, “Do you understand or not?” An iron hammerhead with no hole. 
Too bad—Xuedou let go, so I hit.) C o m m e n ta ry “Blind, deaf, mute— / Dark, without any adjustments to potenti­ alities.” All your seeing and not seeing, hearing and not hearing, speaking and not speaking—Xuedou has swept it all away at once for you. 
In fact, views in terms of blindness, deafness, and mute­ ness, and calculations and judgment of what’s right to suit poten­ tials, are at once obliterated; none of them can be applied. 
This transcendental matter can be called real blindness, real deafness, real muteness, without potentials or adjustments. 
“In the heavens, on earth— / Laughable, lamentable.” Xuedou lifts up with one hand and pushes down with one hand. 
But tell me, laugh at what? Lament over what? 
It’s worth laughing joy­ ously that this blindness is not really blind, this deafness is not really deaf, this muteness is not really mute. 
It’s worth lamenting being clearly not blind, yet still being blind, being clearly not deaf, 2i3c yet still being deaf, being clearly not mute, yet still being mute. 
“Li Lu can’t discern the true form. 
” If you can’t tell green from yellow or red from white, then you’re really blind. 
Li Lu was a man of ancient times known for his sharp eyes. 
Even Li Lu’s eye can’t discern the true form of this lofty realm. 
“How can Shi Kuang recognize the mystic tune?” Shi Kuang was a man of ancient times noted for his keen hearing. 
Though he could hear ants fighting on the other side of a mountain, Xuedou says that even he would be unable to recognize the mystic tune. 
People who, even though they are not deaf, are nonetheless still deaf, still could not recognize the mystic tune of this lofty realm even if they were Shi Kuang. 
Xuedou says, “I am not Li Lu, nor am I Shi Kuang—it is better so sit alone under an empty window. 
/ The leaves fall, the flowers bloom, each in its own time.” If you get to this realm, though you see, it’s like not seeing; though you hear, it’s like not hearing; though you speak, it’s like not speaking. 
When hungry you eat and when tired you sleep. 
You let the leaves fall and the flowers bloom. 
When the leaves fall it’s autumn; when the flowers bloom it’s spring—each has its own season. 
Having swept it clean for you, Xuedou again puts down a path and says, “Do you understand or not?” Xuedou’s strength is ex­ hausted and his spirit wearied; he can just manage to say, “An iron hammerhead with no hole. 
” Set your eyes on this line quickly; only then will you see. 
Do you see? 
Do you hear? 
Can you speak? 
The Hands and Eyes o f Great Compassion Introduction Even if your whole body were an eye, you still wouldn’t be able to see it. 
Even if your whole body were an ear, you still wouldn’t be able to hear it. 
Even if your whole body were a mouth, you still wouldn’t be able to speak of it. 
Even if your whole body were mind, you still wouldn’t be able to perceive it. 
Now leaving aside the “whole body” for the moment, if suddenly you had no eyes, how would you see? 
Without ears, how would you hear? 
Without a mouth, how would you speak? 
Without a mind, how would you perceive? 
Here, if you can unfurl a pathway, you’ll be a fellow seeker with the ancient Buddhas. 
But leaving seeking aside for the moment, from whom would you seek? 
Story Yunyan asked Daowu, “What does the Bodhisattva of Great Com­ passion use so many hands and eyes for?” (Daowu should have given him some of his own provisions then. 
Why are you constantly running around? 
Why do you ask?) Daowu said, “It’s like someone reaching back for the pillow in the middle of the night.” (Why didn’t he use his own provisions? 
One blind person leads a crowd of blind people.) Yunyan said, “I understand.” (He adds error to error. 
There’s no different dirt in the same hole. 
He hasn’t avoided damaging the point and cutting his hand.) Daowu said, “ How do you understand it? 
” (Why bother to inquire further? 
He still had to ask; Yunyan should be challenged.) Yunyan said, “All over the body are hands and eyes.” (What does this have to do with it? 
He’s living in a ghost cave, washing dirt in mud.) Daowu said, “You’ve said quite a bit, but you’ve only said eighty percent.” (There’s no different dirt in the same hole. 
When the manservant sees the maid, he takes care. 
Daowu too should be challenged.) Daowu said, “ Throughout the body are hands and eyes.” (The frog cannot leap out of the basket. 
He’s snatched your eyes and made off with your tongue. 
Has he gotten a hundred percent or not? 
He’s calling daddy poppa.) Commentary 2 i4 a Yunyan and Daowu were fellow students under Yaoshan. 
Yunyan never lay down to sleep for forty years. 
Yaoshan produced the whole Cao-Dong school. 
There were three people whose teaching flour­ ished: 
The Bodhisattva of Great Compassion has eighty-four thou­ sand symbolic arms. 
Great Compassion has this many hands and eyes—do you? 
Baizhang said, “All sayings refer to oneself.” Yunyan used to follow Daowu, seeking certainty. 
One day he asked him, “What does the bodhisattva of Great Compassion use so many hands and eyes for?” Right at the start Daowu should have given him a blow of the staff across his back, to avoid so many com­ plications appearing later. 
But Daowu was compassionate—he couldn’t act like this. 
Daowu said, “It’s like some­ one reaching back for the pillow in the middle of the night.” Reach­ ing for the pillow at night, with no light—where are the eyes? 
Though they seem covered with mud, nevertheless they are clean. 
People today often make up emotional interpretations and say “all over the body” is wrong, while “throughout the body” is right—they’re merely chewing over the ancients’ words. 
They have died in the words, not knowing that the ancients’ meaning isn’t in the words, and that all talk is used provisionally. 
Groping over their bodies, the lamps and pillars, they all make a literal understanding of “throughout the body.” If you understand this way you degrade those ancients quite a bit. 
So it is said, “Study the living word, not the dead word.” You must cut off emotional defilements and conceptual thinking, be­ come clean and naked, free and unbound—only then will you be able to see this saying about Great Compassion. 
Caoshan asked a monk, “ How is it when manifesting form in accordance with beings, like the moon in water? 
If you go to the words to see, you’ll never be able to get out of Daowu’s and Yunyan’s trap. 
Is “throughout the body” right? (There’s half on the forehead. 
You’re still in the nest. 
Blind!) Bringing it up is still a hundred thousand miles away. (It won’t do to let go. 
Why only a hundred thousand miles?) Spreading its wings, the roc soars over the clouds of the six compounds— 214b It propels the wind against the waters of the four oceans. 
Too bad—as before he’s creating complications.) Where do the hands and eyes on the staff come from? 
He draws his bow after the bandit’s gone. 
Can’t let you go. 
No one has any way to show some life. 
Even having let go, one still must take a beating. 
Commentary “ Is ‘all over the body’ right? 
/ Is ‘throughout the body’ right?” Whether you say reaching back for the pillow is it, or running the hand over the body is it, if you make up such interpretations, you’re doing nothing but making a living in a ghost cave. 
In the end neither “all over the body” nor “throughout the body” is right. 
If you want to see this story of Great Compassion by means of emo­ tional consciousness, in fact you’re still a hundred thousand miles away. 
he says, “Bringing it up is still a hundred thousand miles away.” In the following lines Xuedou versifies what was extraordinary about Daowu and Yunyan, saying, “Spreading its wings, the roc soars over the clouds of the six compounds— / It propels the wind against the waters of the four oceans.” The great roc swallows dragons: 
with its wings it propels the wind against the waters; the waters part, and the roc captures a dragon and swallows it. 
Xuedou is saying that if you can propel the wind against the waves like the roc, you are very strong indeed, yet if such actions are viewed with the thou­ sand hands and eyes of the Bodhisattva of Great Compassion, it’s just a little bit of dust suddenly arising, or a wisp of hair cease­ lessly blown by the wind. 
Xuedou says that if you take running the hands over the body as the hands and eyes of Great Compas­ sion, what is this good for? 
Thus Xuedou says, “What speck of dust suddenly arises? 
Nonetheless, at the end of the verse as usual he breaks down and gives a comparison—as before, he’s yet in the cage. 
“You don’t see? 
/ The net of jewels hanging down in patterns: 
reflections upon reflections.” Xuedou brings out the clear jewels of Indra’s net to use as a pattern. 
But tell me, where are the hands and eyes after all? 
In the Flower Ornament School they designate four reality realms: 
first, the reality realm of noumenon, to explain uniform equality; second, the reality realm of phenomena, to explain that 2 i4 c noumenon in its entirety constitutes phenomena; third, the real­ ity realm of noumenon and phenomena in harmony, to explain how noumenon and phenomena merge unhindered; fourth, the reality realm of harmony among phenomena, to explain how ev­ ery phenomenon everywhere enters all phenomena, that all things everywhere embrace all things, all intermingling simultaneously without obstruction. 
So it is said, “As soon as a speck of dust arises, the whole earth is contained therein; each atom contains the bound­ less cosmos. 
” As for the net of jewels, there’s a net of jewels in the Hall of Goodness of the god Indra. 
Myriads of jewels are reflected in each jewel, and each jewel is reflected in myriads of jewels. 
This is used to illustrate the reality realm of harmony among phenomena. 
Once National Teacher Xianshou set up a demonstration using mirrors and a lamp. 
He arrayed ten mirrors in a circle and put a lamp in the center. 
If you looked in any one mirror, you saw nine mirrors mirroring the lamp, mirrors and lamp all appearing equally. 
Thus when the Buddha first achieved true enlightenment, with­ out leaving the site of enlightenment he ascended into all the heav­ ens of the thirty-three celestial kingdoms, and at nine gatherings in seven places he expounded the Flower Ornament scripture. 
Xuedou uses Indra’s jewel net to impart the teaching of the reality realm of harmony among phenomena. 
The six aspects are very clear; that is, the totality, the separation, the sameness, the difference, the formation, and the disintegration. 
Raise one aspect and all six are included. 
It’s just like this: 
That’s why Xuedou says, “Where do the hands and eyes on the staff come from ?” This is to make you attain realization at the staff and ob­ tain fulfillment at a shout. 
When Deshan hit people as soon as they came through the door, and when Linji shouted at people as soon as they came through the door, where were the hands and eyes? 
And why did Xuedou go on at the end to say, “Bah!”? 
Introduction Even the sages have not transmitted the one phrase before sound. 
The single thread right before us is perpetually unbroken. 
Purified and naked, free and unbound, hair disheveled and ears alert—tell me, what about it? 
Story A monk asked Zhimen, “What is the body of wisdom?” (Through­ out the body there are no reflected images. 
Why use “body”?) Zhimen said, “An oyster swallows the bright moon.” (Leaving aside for the moment “the light en­ gulfs myriad forms,” what about the business of the true eye on the staff? 
The crooked does not hide the straight. 
This is adding frost to snow.) The monk asked, “What is the functioning of wis­ dom?” (Fall back three thousand miles. 
What does he want “func­ tion” for?) Zhimen said, “A rabbit gets pregnant.” (Danger! 
Bitter gourd is bitter to the root, sweet melon is sweet to the stem. 
If you make your living in the reflections of a light, you won’t get out of Zhimen’s nest. 
In essence this is adding mud to dirt.) Commentary When Zhimen said, “An oyster swallows the bright moon,” and “A rabbit gets pregnant,” in both he used the sense of mid-autumn; 2i5 a even so, the ancient’s meaning was not in the oyster or the rabbit. 
As Zhimen was an adept in the line of Yunmen, each of his say­ ings had to contain three statements: 
Moreover, without arrangement, there is a spontaneous fitness. 
Thus he went to the danger point to an­ swer this monk’s questions, showing a bit of his sharp point, unde­ niably extraordinary. 
Nevertheless, this ancient never played with reflections of a light; he just pointed out a bit of a road for you to let you see. 
The monk asked, “What is the body of wisdom?” Zhimen said, “An oyster swallows the bright moon.” Oysters contain bright pearls: 
when the mid-autumn moon comes out, the oysters float to the surface, open up, and swallow the moonlight; from this pearls are produced. 
If there is moonlight in mid-autumn, the pearls are many; without a moon, the pearls are few. 
” The meaning of this is no different. 
in mid-autumn when the moon comes out, the rabbits swallow its light and become preg­ nant. 
Here too, if there’s moonlight the offspring are many; with­ out a moon they are few. 
But even so, his meaning wasn’t in the words. 
However, people later made a living on the words. 
Panshan said, “The mind-moon is soli­ tary and full; its light engulfs myriad forms. 
The light is not shin­ ing on objects, nor do the objects exist—light and objects both forgotten, then what is this?” People today just stare and call this the light: 
they produce interpretations from their feelings, driv­ ing spikes into empty space. 
It s not only your eyes that radiate light—nose, tongue, body, and mind also radiate light.” To get here you simply must clean up your sense faculties so that there’s no reification, and you are purified and free. 
Only then will you see the point of this story. 
Xuedou does his verse just this way. 
Verse One piece of empty solidity, beyond saying and feeling; (Try to set your mind on it and you err; stir your thoughts and you’re obstructed. 
Not even the Buddhas’ eyes can catch sight of it.) From this humans and gods see Subhuti. (Subhuti should be given a thrashing. 
What do you want with this old fellow? 
Even Subhuti has to fall back three thousand miles.) The oyster swallows the moon—deep deep meaning: (You’d have to be the one involved to understand. 
What meaning is there? 
What further need for “deep deep meaning”?) Given to Chan people, it makes them fight and struggle. (When shields and spears are already at rest, there’s great peace in the world. 
Understand? 
I hit, saying, “How many blows have you taken?”) Commentary “One piece of empty solidity, beyond saying and feeling.” With a single line Xuedou has versified it well: 
naturally we can see the ancient’s meaning. 
When the six senses are still, what is this? 
It’s just this one mass, empty and bright, solid and quiescent. 
You needn’t go to heaven to look for it. 
You needn’t seek it from some­ one else. 
The perpetual light spontaneously appears before us: 
Fayan’s verse on perfect reality says: 
When reasoning’s exhausted, saying and feeling are forgotten; How could this be properly described? 
Wherever I go, the frosty night’s moon Falls as it may on the valley ahead. 
The fruits are ripe and heavy with monkeys, The mountains go on so far it seems I’ve lost my way. 
As I look up, there’s a remnant of illumination left— Actually this is west of my dwelling place. 
Thus it is said, Mind is the faculty, things are the objects; Both are like flaws on a mirror. 
When the defilement of objectification is obliterated, The light first appears; When mind and things are both forgotten, Nature is real. 
It is also said, I’ve been living in a three-room hut; In the uniform spiritual light, myriad objects are at rest. 
Don’t use right and wrong to judge me — Fleeting life and its rationalizations having nothing to do with me. 
These verses too let you see “one piece of empty solidity, beyond saying and feeling.” “From this humans and gods see Subhuti.” Subhuti was sitting quietly on a cliff when the gods showered flowers in praise. 
” Brahma said, “You said nothing, I heard nothing—no speaking and no hearing is true wisdom, ” and again he caused the earth to tremble and flowers to shower. 
See how Subhuti expounded wisdom so well, without speaking of body or function. 
If you can see at this, you can see Zhimen’s saying “an oyster swallows the bright moon” and “a rabbit gets pregnant. 
” Though the ancient’s meaning was not in the words, never­ theless there was deep deep meaning in his answer. 
This caused Xuedou to say, “ The oyster swallows the moon—deep deep mean­ in g.” Here, “Given to Chan people, it makes them fight and struggle.” The followers of Chan all over have haggled about Zhimen’s answers noisily; never has a single one seen him even in a dream. 
If you want to be a fellow student with Zhimen and Xuedou, you must first set eyes on it for yourself. 
Introduction To transcend emotion, detach from views, remove bonds, and dis­ solve sticking points, to uphold the fundamental vehicle of tran­ scendence and support the treasury of the eye of the true Dharma, you must also respond equally in all ten directions, be crystal clear in all respects, and directly attain to such a realm. 
But tell me, are there any who attain the same, realize the same, die the same, and live the same? 
Story One day Yanguan called to his attendant, “Bring me the rhinoceros horn fan.” (He creates quite a few complications. 
How can it compare with the fine scene here?) The attendant said, “The fan is broken.” Yanguan said, “If the fan is broken, bring the rhinoceros back to me. 
Yu province is still all right; the worst suffering is in Korea. 
What does the master want with the rhi­ noceros?) The attendant has no reply. (After all a hammerhead with no hole. 
What a pity.) Touzi said, “I do not refuse to bring it out, but I fear the horn on its head will be incomplete.” (This seems like it, but he has two heads and three faces. 
It’s right under his nose.) Xuedou commented, “ The rhino is still here.” Zifu drew a circle and wrote the word “rhino” inside it. 
He’s playing with a shadow.) Xuedou com­ mented, “Why didn’t you bring it out before?” (He doesn’t distin­ guish gold from brass. 
What is he doing, avoiding hardship yet speaking of his suffering?) Xuedou commented, “What a pity to have worked hard without accomplishing anything. 
It would be even better to give thirty blows of the staff. 
Clearly.) Commentary One day Yanguan called to his attendant, “Bring me the rhinoc­ eros horn fan. 
” Though this matter isn’t in words, yet if you want to test someone’s ordinary disposition and ability, it is necessary to be able to use words in this way to reveal it. 
this can be called accomplishment without accomplishment, effortless power. 
Yanguan was Chan master Jian. 
In ancient times they used to make fans of rhinoceros horn. 
At the time, how could Yanguan not have known that his fan was broken? 
He just wanted to test the man to see whether or not he knew where it was. 
Touzi said, “I don’t refuse to bring it out, but I fear the horn on the head will be incomplete.” Xuedou said, “I want an incomplete horn.” He harmonizes in a phrase. 
Shishuang said, “If I return it to you, then I won’t have it.” Xuedou says, “ The rhino is still here.” Zifu drew a circle and wrote the word “rhino” inside; because he succeeded to Yangshan, he liked to use objects to illustrate this matter for people. 
Baofu said, “ The master is aged; he should ask someone else.” These words are most appropriate; the preceding three quotes are after all easy to see, but these words have a profound meaning. 
I understood the reasoning when I was with Librarian Qing in the past; he said, “ The master is old and senile; getting the head, he forgets the tail—before he sought the fan, now he seeks the rhinoceros. 
the ancients saw through this matter, so though each was different; when they spoke forth they hit the mark every time, always having a way of living expres­ sion. 
Each phrase preserves the bloodline. 
Verse The rhinoceros horn fan has long been in use, (In summer, cool; in winter, warm. 
(They know, but they don’t understand. 
Better not fool people. 
And you shouldn’t suspect anyone else.) The boundless pure breeze and the horn on the head, (Where are they? 
In the heavens and on earth. 
The horn has regrown. 
What is it? 
He rouses waves without wind.) Just like clouds and rain, are difficult to pursue when gone. (Heavens! 
Still this is losing one’s money and incurring punishment as well.) Xuedou also said, “If you want the pure breeze to return and the horn to regrow, (Everyone has this fan; they have all its power all the time. 
Why do they not know at all when asked? 
Yanguan is still alive.) I ask you, since the fan is broken, return the rhinoceros to m e.” (There is yet one or a half. 
It would be better to overturn his Chan seat.) Then a monk came forth and said, “Everyone, go meditate in the hall.” (He draws the bow after the bandit has gone. 
He had the spear taken away. 
He neither gets to the village nor reaches the shop.) Xuedou shouted and said, “I cast my hook fishing for whales, but caught a frog.” Then he got down from the seat. 
(He brought this about. 
He drew his bow after the thief had gone.) Commentary 216b “The rhinoceros horn fan has long been in use, / But when asked, actually nobody knows.” Everyone has this fan and has all its power all the time—why is it that when asked no one knows where it’s gone? 
The attendant, Touzi, all the way down to Baofu—neither do any of them know. 
Tell me, does Xuedou know? 
If you know what this story is about, you will know that the rhinoceros horn fan has a boundless pure breeze; you will also see the horn towering on the rhino’s head. 
The four old men speaking as they did were like the morning clouds and evening rain; once gone, they are difficult to pursue. 
I ask you, since the fan is broken, return the rhinoceros to me.” Then a Chan stu­ dent came forward and said, “Everyone, go meditate in the hall. 
” This monk has usurped the master’s authority. 
He certainly could speak, but he was only able to say eighty percent. 
If you want a hundred percent, then throw the meditation seat over for him. 
Now you tell me, did this monk understand the rhinoceros or not? 
If he didn’t, yet he knew how to speak this way; if he did, why didn’t Xuedou approve of him? 
Why did he say he cast a hook fishing for whales but only caught a frog? 
Tell me, ultimately how is it? 
Introduction One who can discern the tune as soon as the lute strings move is hard to find even in a thousand years. 
By releasing a hawk upon seeing a rabbit, at once the swiftest is caught. 
Story One day the Buddha ascended the seat. (Guest and host both lose. 
This is not the only instance of indulgence.) ManjusrI struck the gavel and said, “Clearly observe the Dharma of the Dharma King: 
the Dharma of the Dharma King is thus.” (One person has inti­ mately understood.) The Buddha then got down from the seat. (Sad man, do not speak to sad people; if you speak to sad people, you’ll sadden them to death. 
Beating the drum, playing the lute, two masters in harmony.) Commentary There was already this scene before the Buddha raised the flower. 
At that time, if among the crowd there had been 2 i 6c someone with the spirit of a Chan adept who could transcend, it would have been possible to avoid the final messy scene of raising the flower. 
It is like the story o f Suzong asking Huizhong about making a seamless monument, and also like the story of the out­ sider asking the Buddha about neither the spoken nor the unspo­ ken. 
Observe the behavior of those transcendent people—when did they ever enter a ghost cave for their subsistence? 
Some say the meaning lies in the silence; some say it is in the pause, that speech illumines what cannot be said and speechlessness illumines what can be said—as Yongjia said, “Speaking when silent, silent when speaking.” But if you only understand this way, you will never see it even in a dream. 
If you can immediately and directly understand, then you will no longer see that there is anything ordinary or holy—this Dharma is impartial; it has no high or low. 
Every day you will walk with all the Buddhas. 
Verse Among the assembled sages, if an adept had known, (Better not slander old Sakyamuni. 
It’s hard to find one or a half among a thousand or ten thousand.) The command of the Dharma King wouldn’t have been like this. (Those who run after him are numerous. 
Three heads, two faces. 
Clearly. How many could reach here?) Had there been a good interpreter in the assembly, (It’s hard to find a clever one in there. 
If ManjusrI isn’t an adept, you sure aren’t.) What need for ManjusrI to strike the gavel? 
The second and third strokes are totally unnecessary. 
How will you speak a phrase appropriate to the situation? 
Dangerous!) Commentary “Among the assembled sages, if an adept had known.” The multi­ tude of eighty thousand on Vulture Peak were all ranked among the sages: 
Manjusri struck the gavel and said, “Clearly observe the Dharma of the Dharma King; the Dharma of the Dharma King is thus.” Xuedou says the command of the Dharma King would not have been like this. 
The Nirvana Sutra says, “Saindhava is one name for four actual things: 
A wise attendant who understood the four meanings would bring the king water when he wanted to wash and needed saindhava; when the king asked for saindhava at mealtimes, the attendant brought salt; when the meal was over, he offered him a bowl for tea; when he wanted to go out, he brought a horse. 
He acted according to the king’s intention without error.” Clearly one must be a good interpreter to do this. 
A monk asked Xiangyan, “What is the king asking for as saindhava? 
At this time if there had been a good interpreter who could penetrate before the Buddha had even ascended the lecturing seat, he would have attained somewhat. 
The Buddha yet ascended the seat, then immediately got down; al­ ready he hadn’t got to the point—how was it worth Manjusri’s still striking the gavel? 
Story 2 i7 a A monk asked Daguang, “Changqing said, ‘Joyful praise on the occasion of a meal’ —what did he mean?” (The light shines again. 
It is unavoidable to doubt; without asking, you won’t know.) Daguang did a dance. 
(He draws a cat according to a model. 
After all he misunderstood. 
He’s playing with a shadow.) Daguang said, “Foxy devil!” (This kind­ ness is hard to requite. 
The patriarchs only transmitted this.) Commentary The Chan patriarchs only transmitted this little bit; but do you people know the ultimate point? 
If you know, you can avoid this error; if not, as before you will only be foxy devils. 
Some say Daguang wrenched the other’s nose around to de­ ceive him, but if it were actually so, what principle would that amount to? 
Daguang was able to help others; in his statement there is a road along which to get oneself out. 
Daguang said, “Foxy devil” —these words cut off Jinniu, indeed outstanding. 
” That is the basis on which he produces his verse. 
But tell me, is this “foxy devil” the same as “Zhizang’s head is white, Baizhang’s head is black,” “You ignoramus,” “Fine monk,” or is it different? 
Tell me, are these the same or different? 
Verse The first arrow was still light; the second arrow went deep: (A hundred percent bulls-eyes. 
Where can you go to escape?) Who says yellow leaves are gold? 
(Yet they’ll stop crying; but even if you can fool a child, it’s no use.) If the waves of the Chan stream were alike, (What limit is there to people playing with mud? 
He draws a cat according to a model. 
He lets out a single road.) Innumerable ordinary people would get bogged down. (We meet a live one! 
He has involved every Chan practitioner in the world, and makes them unable to get a hold; he entangles you too, and makes you unable to come forth.) Commentary “ The first arrow was still light; the second arrow went deep.” Daguang’s dance was the first arrow. 
He also said, “Foxy devil!” This was the second arrow. 
This has been the tooth and nail since time immemorial. 
2i7 b “Who says yellow leaves are gold?” Yangshan said, “You should each look within; do not memorize my words. 
Since beginningless time you have turned your backs on the light and plunged into darkness; the roots of your false conceptions are deep, so after all they are hard to pull out all at once. 
That is why I temporarily set up expedient methods to take away your coarse consciousness; this is like using yellow leaves to stop a child’s crying.” It is like ex­ changing sweet fruit for bitter gourd. 
The ancients provisionally established expedient methods to help people; when their crying has stopped, yellow leaves are not gold. 
When the Buddha explained timely doctrines, these too were just talks to put an end to crying. 
If you can understand, you’ll be like a tiger with wings. 
Introduction The one statement before sound is not transmitted by the sages; the single thread before our eyes is forever without a gap. 
Pure and naked, bare and clean, the white ox on open ground. 
Eyes alert, ears alert, the golden lion—leaving this aside for the mo­ ment, tell me, what is the white ox on open ground? 
Story The Surangama Sutra says, “When I do not see, why don’t you see my not seeing?” (Good news. 
W hat’s the use o f seeing? 
Old Sakyamuni has leaked quite a bit.) “If you see my not seeing, natu­ rally that is not the characteristic of not seeing.” (Tsk! 
What idle time is there? 
You shouldn’t tell me to have two heads and three faces.) “If you don’t see my not seeing,” (Where are you going? 
It’s like driving a nail into an iron spike. 
Bah!) “it is naturally not a thing;” (He pushes down the ox’s head to make it eat grass. 
What further sound and form is there to speak of?) “how could it not be you?” (To say you or me is totally beside the point. 
Striking, I say, “Do you see old Sakyamuni?”) Commentary The Surahgama Sutra says, “When I don’t see, why don’t you see my not seeing? 
If you see my not seeing, naturally that is not the characteristic of not seeing. 
If you don’t see my not seeing, it is naturally not a thing; how could it not be you? 
” Xuedou here doesn’t quote the entire passage of the scripture; if quoted in full it can be seen: 
“If seeing were a thing, then you could also see my sight. 
If seeing alike were called seeing my seeing, when I don’t see, why don’t you see my not seeing? 
If you see my not seeing, naturally that is not the characteristic of not seeing. 
If you don’t see my not seeing, naturally it is not a thing; how could it not be you? 
” The words are many, and I won’t record them. 
Ananda intended to say, “The objects in the world can all be given names; I also want the Buddha to point out this subtle spiritual fundamental illumi­ nation—what can you call it, to let me see the Buddha’s intent?” The Buddha said, “When I see the incense stand, that can be known; when I do not see the incense stand, then how will you see? 
Just as the Buddha said, “When I don’t see, why don’t you see my not seeing? 
If you see my not seeing, naturally that is not the characteristic of not seeing. 
If you don’t see my not seeing, naturally it is not a thing; how could it not be you?” If you say you acknowledge sight as an existent thing, you are not yet able to wipe away the traces. 
“When I don’t see” is like the antelope with its horns hung up —all echo of sound, traces of tracks, all breath is utterly gone; where will you search for it? 
Xuedou goes beyond the eye of the scriptural doctrines to versify; he does not eulogize things, seeing, or not seeing—he just eulogizes seeing the Buddha. 
Verse The whole elephant or the whole ox—the blinding cataracts, no different. 
Half open, half closed. 
What are you doing, clinging to fences and groping along walls? 
One cut, two pieces.) Adepts of all time have together been naming and describing. 
The old barbarian! 
Blind man! 
He’s right at your feet.) Each atom of every land lies halfway there. 
Will you ever see him, even in a dream?) Commentary “The whole elephant or the whole ox—the blinding cataracts, no different. 
” A group of blind people groping over an elephant each speaks of a different aspect; this comes from the Nirvana Sutra. 
A monk asked Yangshan, “When you saw someone come and ask about Chan or the way, you drew a circle and wrote ‘ox’ inside; what is the meaning of this?” Yangshan said, “ This too is an idle matter: 
if you can understand, it doesn’t come from outside; if not, you certainly don’t recognize it. 
Now I ask you, what have the adepts in various places pointed out in you as your Buddha nature? 
Is it that which neither speaks nor is silent? 
If you take that which speaks as it, you are like the blind man who has grabbed the elephant’s tail. 
If you take that which is silent as it, you are like the blind man grabbing the elephant’s ear. 
If you take that which neither speaks nor is silent as it, you are like the blind man grabbing the elephant’s trunk. 
If you say everything is it, you are like the blind man grabbing the elephant’s legs. 
If you say none are it, you abandon the elephant and fall into the view of nothingness. 
According to what the blind ones perceive, they just attribute different names and descriptions to the elephant. 
don’t say percep­ tive awareness is it, yet do not say it’s not it.” The sixth patriarch said, “Enlightenment basically has no tree, the clear mirror also has no stand. 
Fundamentally there is not a single thing; how is it possible to be defiled by dust? 
” He also said, “ The Way basically has no shape or form; wisdom itself is the Way. 
To attain this understanding is called true transcendent wisdom.” One with clear eyes sees the elephant and apprehends its whole body; the seeing of the Buddha nature is also like this. 
The “whole ox” appears in Zhuangzi: 
Pao Ding, in cutting up oxen, never saw the whole ox; he followed the internal patterns to cut them apart; letting his cleaver glide freely, he did not need to add any further effort. 
In a trice, head and horn, hoof and flesh separated. 
He did this for nineteen years, yet his cleaver was still as sharp as though it had just come from the whetstone. 
This is called the whole ox. 
Though he was so excellent, Xuedou says that even if you can be like this, the whole elephant and the whole ox are no different from blinding cataracts in the eyes. 
All the teachers in India and China and all over the world are just naming and describing. 
Even when all the atoms in the cosmos can be seen in one atom, you’re still only halfway there; there’s still another half of the way yonder. 
But tell me, where is the Buddha? 
Old Sakyamuni didn’t even know himself; how would you have me explain? 
Introduction Where there is a Buddha, do not stay; if you stay there, your head will sprout horns. 
Where there is no Buddha, quickly run past; if you don’t run past, weeds will grow ten feet high. 
Even if you are clean and free, without mental activity outside of things, without things outside of mental activity, you still have not escaped stick­ ing to an outmoded method. 
Story Changqing once said, “Rather say that saints have the three poi­ sons than say that the Buddha has two kinds of speech. 
What third or fourth kind will you talk about?) Baofu said, “What is the Buddha’s speech?” Changqing said, “How can a deaf man hear?” (He addresses a plea to the sky. 
He snaps his nose around. 
Why only the second level?) Changqing said, “What is the Buddha’s speech?” Baofu said, “Go have tea.” Commentary While in Xuefeng’s group, Changqing and Baofu were always re­ minding and awakening each other, engaging in discussion. 
The three poisons are greed, hatred, and folly, the fundamental afflictions. 
Changqing said it’s better to say that saints have the three poisons than to say that Buddhas have two kinds of speech; his general idea was to show that the Buddha does not say anything untrue. 
The Lotus Sutra says, “Only this one thing is true; any second besides is not real. 
” It also says, “There is only one vehicle of truth, no second or third. 
” In over three hun­ dred assemblies, the Buddha taught according to potentials, giv­ ing medicine according to disease: 
His idea having gotten this far, how can you see? 
The Buddha taught the truth with one voice; this I don’t deny—but Changqing actually has not seen the Buddha’s speech even in a dream. 
It’s just like a man talking about food—that can’t satisfy his hunger. 
Baofu saw him talking about doctrine on level ground, so he asked, “What is the Buddha’s speech?” Changqing said, “ How can a deaf man hear it?” Baofu knew that Changqing had been living in a ghost cave for some time; he said, “I knew you were speaking on the secondary level.” And after all Changqing lived up to these words; he asked back, “What is the Buddha’s speech?” Baofu said, “Go have tea.” Changqing had his spear snatched away by someone else; supposedly so great, he lost his money and incurred punishment. 
You should know that only when you can see in this way will you see the defeat of these two men. 
2 i8c I’ll lei out a pathway, to let others comprehend. 
Some say that Baofu spoke correctly and Changqing spoke incorrectly; they just follow words to produce interpretations, so they say there is gain and loss. 
They don’t know that the ancients were like sparks, like lightning. 
If you only look at it in this way, you’ll never see the ancients’ meaning. 
If you say, “What is wrong with ‘How could a deaf man hear?’ What is right about ‘Go have tea’? 
So it is said, “Study the living word, not the dead word.” This story is the same as the story of “all over the body, all through the body —there is nowhere you can judge and compare right or wrong. 
It is necessary for you to be clean and free right where you are; only then will you see where the ancients met. 
Wuzu said, “ It is like coming to grips on the front line.” It requires a discerning eye and a familiar hand. 
In this story, if you see it with the true eye, where there is no gain or loss, it distinguishes gain and loss; where there is no near or far, it distinguishes near and far. 
Changqing still should have bowed to Baofu. 
Be­ cause he used this little bit of skill well, like thunder pealing or a comet flying. 
But Baofu nevertheless produced tooth upon tooth, nail upon nail. 
(There are no such things in my royal storehouse. 
Why are you following the false and pursuing the bad?) A reclining dragon does not look to still water— Where one is not, there is the moon, waves settle: (Over the four seas a solitary boat goes by itself. It is useless to bother to figure it out. 
(He threatens people ferociously; do you feel your hair standing on end in a chill? 
Striking, I say, “One is here.”) Changqing, O Changqing: (Take in a thief and he’ll ransack your house. 
Don’t appear in a bustling marketplace. 
He lost his money and incurred punishment.) In the third month, at Dragon Gate, you’ve got a failing mark. (Not one in ten thousand can withdraw and defer to others. 
Xuedou says, “A reclining dragon does not look to still water.” How can there be a dragon hidden in stagnant water? 
If it is “primary and second­ ary,” this indeed is living in stagnant water. 
There must be huge swells wide and vast, white waves flooding the sky; only there can a dragon be concealed. 
It is just as was said before, “A limpid pond does not admit the blue dragon’s coils.” As it is said, Stagnant water does not contain a dragon,” and “A reclining dragon is al­ ways wary of the clarity of the blue pond.” That is why Xuedou says that where there is no dragon, there is the moon, waves settle—the wind is calm, the waves grow still. 
Where there is a dragon, waves rise without wind; much like Baofu s saying to have tea” —this indeed is rousing waves without wind. 
Xuedou at this point cleans up emotional interpretations for you and has com­ pleted the verse. 
in the third month, at the Dragon Gate, you’ve got a failing mark. 
” Though Changqing was a dragon who had passed through the Dragon Gate, yet he got a rap on the head from Baofu. 
Story Zhaozhou spoke three turning words. (What did he say? 
The three parts are not the same.) Commentary After Zhaozhou had spoken the three turning words, in the end he said, “ The real Buddha sits within.” This statement is exceed­ ingly indulgent. 
That ancient set forth a single eye, extended his hand to guide people; briefly making use of these words to convey the message, he wanted to help others. 
If you one-sidedly bring up the true imperative in its entirety, there would be weeds ten feet deep in front of the teaching hall. 
To avoid the indulgence of that final statement, Xuedou omits it and just versifies three sayings. 
If a mud Buddha passes through water it will dissolve: 
if a gold Buddha passes through a furnace it will melt; if a wood Buddha passes through fire it will burn up. 
What is difficult to understand about this? 
Xuedou’s hundred examples of versifying ancient sto­ ries are complicated with judgments and comparisons; only these three verses directly contain the breath of a Chanist. 
However, these verses are nonetheless difficult to understand. 
If you can pass through these three verses, I’ll allow as you have finished studying. 
Verse 1 A mud Buddha does not pass through water: 
Spiritual Light illumines heaven and earth; (Seeing a rabbit, he releases a hawk. What has it to do with others?) Standing in the snow, if he didn’t rest, (When one person transmits a falsehood, ten thousand people transmit it as truth. 
He meets error with error. 
Who has ever seen you?) Who would not carve an imitation? (Upon entering a temple you see its nameplate. 
Running up and running down twenty-four hours a day—what is it? 
You are it.) Commentary “A mud Buddha does not pass through water: 
/ Spiritual Light illumines heaven and earth.” This phrase clearly completes the verse: but tell me, why does he mention Shenguang (“Spiritual Light”)? 
When the second patriarch of Chan was born, a spiritual light illumined the room, extending into the sky. 
Also one night a spirit appeared and said to him, “Why remain here? 
The time for you to attain enlightenment has arrived; you should go south.” Because of his association with spirits, the second patriarch was eventually named Shenguang, “Spiritual Light.” He lived for a long time near Luoyang and studied many books. 
He used to la­ ment, “The teachings of Confucius and Laozi only transmit cus­ tomary norms. 
Recently I hear the great teacher Bodhidharma is living at Shaolin. 
Shenguang thought, “When people of ancient times sought the Way, they broke their bones and took out the marrow, shed their blood to appease hun­ ger, spread their hair to cover mud, threw themselves off cliffs to feed tigers. 
Even the ancients did this; what about m e?” Then there was a heavy snow; Shenguang stood by the wall, and by dawn the snow had piled up past his knees. 
he took a sword and cut off his own left forearm, and placed in before Bodhidharma. 
Bodhidharma knew he was a vessel of Dharma, so he asked him, “You stand in the snow and cut off your arm—what for?” Shenguang said, “My mind is not at ease; please ease my mind. 
” Bodhidharma said, “Bring me your mind and I will ease it for you. 
” Shenguang said, “When I search for my mind, after all I can’t find it.” Bodhidharma said, “I have put your mind at ease.” Afterwards Bodhidharma changed Shenguang’s name to Huike. 
Later Huike taught the third patriarch, Great Master Sengcan. 
So Xuedou says, “Standing in the snow, if he didn’t rest, who would not carve an imitation?” If he kept standing in the snow, slavish deceivers would imitate him, becoming more contrived bogus imitations. 
These are the obsequious phony followers. 
Xuedou is eulogizing “a mud Buddha does not pass through water” —why then does he bring up this story? 
He had reached the point where there was nothing in his mind; clean and naked, only thus could he versify like this. 
Wuzu always used to have people look at these three verses. 
Dongshan Shouchu composed a verse that he showed to his group: 
Atop Mt. Wutai, clouds are steaming rice; Before the ancient Buddha hall, a dog is pissing skyward. 
Frying cakes atop a flagpole, Three monkeys pitch pennies in the night. 
And Master Du Shun said, When oxen in Huai province eat grain, The bellies of horses in Yi province are full; Looking for a doctor all over the world, To cauterize a pig’s left arm. 
And Great Adept Fu said, Empty-handed, holding a hoe, Walking, riding a water buffalo, Someone is crossing a bridge; The bridge, not the water, flows. 
It is also said, If the capacity of a stone man were like you, He too could sing folk songs; If you like a stone man, You too could join in the opera. 
Verse 2 A gold Buddha does not pass through a furnace; (It burns off the eyebrows. 
“ Throughout the universe I alone am the Honored One. 
”) Someone comes calling on Zihu; On the sign, several words— (An illiterate would have no way of understanding even if it were about a cat. 
No Chanists can get their teeth in. 
They may lose their lives.) Where is there no pure wind? 
Above the head, vast and boundless; below the feet, vast and boundless. 
I also say, “It’s arrived.”) Commentary “A gold Buddha does not pass through a furnace; / Someone comes calling on Zihu.” This one phrase has also completed the verse. 
Why does he bring up someone calling on Zihu? 
Master Zihu set up a sign at his gate, saying, “Zihu has a dog: 
above, it takes people’s heads; in the middle, it takes people’s loins; below, it takes people’s legs. 
” As soon as the monk turned his head, Zihu would return to his room. 
But tell me, why could he not bite Zhaozhou? 
Zihu also once late at night shouted in the lavatory, “Catch the thief, catch the thief! 
If not, you will surely not be able to do anything about “the several words on the sign.” If you want to see it, just pass through completely and then you will see. 
Verse 3 A wood Buddha does not pass through fire; I always think of the Oven Breaker— (Going east, going west, what is wrong? 
A leper drags a companion along.) The staff suddenly strikes, (It’s in my hands. 
Who doesn’t have it?) And then one realizes having turned away from self. 
If you can’t find it out, what use is it? 
After thirty years you’ll finally get it. 
It is better to be sunk forever than to seek the liberation of saints. 
If you can seize it here, you’ll still not avoid turning away. 
How to be able not to turn away? 
The staff is still in another’s hands.) Commentary “A wood Buddha does not pass through fire; / 1 always think of the Oven Breaker. 
” This one phrase also has completed the verse. 
Xuedou, because of this “Wood Buddha does not pass through fire,” always thinks of the Oven Breaker. 
The Oven Breaker Monk of Mt. Song was not known by any surname; his speech and behavior were unfathomable. 
He lived in seclusion on Mt. 
they had a sacred shrine, with just an oven in it. 
People sacrificed to it all the time, and had immolated very many living creatures. 
The master entered the shrine, tapped the oven thrice with his staff, and said, “What humbug? 
You were originally made of brick and mud compounded; where does the spirit come from, whence does the sanctity originate, that you burn living creatures to death like this?” And he hit it thrice more. 
The oven then toppled over, broke and collapsed of itself. 
Momentarily there was a man in a blue robe and tall hat standing in front of the master; bowing, he said, “I am the god of the oven; for a long time I have been subject to karmic retribution, but today, hearing you explain the truth of nonorigination, I am freed from this place and live in heaven. 
I have come to offer thanks.” The master said, “It is your inherent nature, not my force saying so.” The god bowed again and disappeared. 
An attendant said, “I and others have been around the master for a long time but have never received instruc­ tion. 
What shortcut did the oven god find, that he was immediately born in heaven?” The master said, “I just said to him, ‘You were originally made of brick and mud put together; where does the spirit come from, whence does the sanctity emerge?’ ” The attendant had no reply. 
The master said, “Understand?” The monk said, “No.” The master said, “ Bow!” The monk bowed; the master said, “Broken! 
Collapsed!” The attendant was suddenly greatly enlightened. 
Later a monk reported this to National Teacher Huian. 
The teacher said in praise, “This man has comprehended things and self as one suchness. 
” The oven god understood this principle, therefore he was thus: 
that monk was a body composed of five clusters; the master also said, “Broken! 
” Both were enlightened, but tell me, are the five clusters the same as brick and tiles, mud and earth, or different? 
Since it is so, why does Xuedou say, “ The staff suddenly strikes; / And then one realizes having turned away from self?” Why does one become turned away? 
It is just a matter of not yet having found the staff. 
And tell me, as Xuedou eulogizes “A wood Buddha does not pass through fire, ” why does he cite the story of the oven breaking and collapsing? 
I will explain it directly for you; his intention is just to cut off feelings and ideas of gain and loss; once clean and naked, you will naturally see his kindness. 
Even if you get heaven and earth to change instantly, without rejoinder from the four quarters, thunder pealing and lightning flying, clouds mov­ ing and rain rushing, overturning lakes and toppling cliffs, like a pitcher pouring, like a bowl emptying, you have still not raised a half. 
Is there anyone who can turn the polar star, who can shift the axis of the earth? 
Story The Diamond Sutra says, “If one is scornfully reviled by others,” “one has done wicked acts in previous ages,” “that should bring one down into evil ways;” “but be­ cause of the scorn and vilification by others in the present age,” (Paying off the roots has effects that extend to the branches. 
One can only accept it with forbearance.) “the wicked action of former ages” (Where can you look for it? 
Planting grain will not produce beans.) “is thereby extinguished.” (This is adding frost to snow. 
It’s like boiling water melting ice.) Commentary The Diamond Sutra says, “If one is scorned and vilified by others, the fact is that one has done wicked actions in former ages that should bring one down into evil ways; but because of the scornful revilement of people in this age, the wicked action of former ages is thereby extinguished. 
” According to the ordinary way of inter­ pretation, this is the constant theme throughout the scripture. 
Xuedou brings it up and versifies this meaning to break up the scholastics’ livelihood in ghost caves. 
Prince Zhaoming classified this part as the ability to clear away obstruction by karma. 
someone like this in former times created hellish karma, but hasn’t suffered because of the power of good. 
Because of scorn and vilification by people in the present age, the wicked karma of former ages is extinguished. 
This scripture therefore can extinguish the bad karma of innumerable eons, changing the grave to light, chang­ ing the light to inconsequential, and furthermore bringing attain­ ment of enlightenment. 
According to scholastics, reciting this twenty-odd page scrip­ ture is itself called upholding the scripture, but what connection is there? 
Fayan said realizing Buddhahood is called upholding the scripture. 
The scripture says, “All Buddhas, and the teaching of the complete enlightenment of all Buddhas, come from this scrip­ ture.” But tell me, what do you call “this scripture”? 
Don’t mistakenly stick by the zero point of the scale. 
The diamond is likened to the body of truth, indestructible and capable of breaking through anything. 
This wisdom is of three kinds: 
Knowledge of the character of real­ ity is true knowledge, the one great matter right where you are, shining throughout all time, beyond intellectual knowledge and opinion; it is that which is clean and naked, bare and untrammeled. 
Observant illuminative knowledge is the real world; it is that which emanates light and moves the earth twenty-four hours a day, see­ ing and hearing. 
Verbal knowledge is the language that can ex­ press it; that is, the present speaker and hearer. 
Even if you could match the ability of the sages, that would still not be anything special. 
No self, no other; how could there be near or far? 
I urge you to stop going through lectures; It is better to seek the real directly. 
The nature of adamantine wisdom is void of any dust; “I have heard” through “I faithfully accept” Are all just artificial names. 
220c This verse is most excellent; it has clearly explained all at once. 
Guifeng picked out a four-line stanza, saying, “All appearances are unreal; if you see that forms are not forms, you see the Bud­ dha.” The meaning of this four-line stanza is exactly the same as “Realizing Buddhahood is called upholding this scripture.” It is also said in the scripture, “If one sees me in terms of form, if one seeks me through sound, one is traversing a false path and cannot see the Buddha.” This too is a four-line stanza; we just take from among them those whose meaning is complete. 
A monk asked Huitang, “What is a four-line stanza?” Huitang said, “Your talk is degenerate, yet you don’t even realize it.” Xuedou points out what is in this scripture. 
If there is some­ one who can uphold this scripture, then this is the scenery of everyone’s original ground, the original face: 
but if you act accord­ ing to the Chan imperative, the scenery of the original ground, the original face, would still be cut into three pieces; the teachings of the Buddhas wouldn’t be worth a pinch. 
Nowadays people only recite scriptures and do not know what the principle is at all. 
They merely talk about how many they have recited in a day. 
They only recognize the physical text, perusing the lines and count­ ing the ink marks. 
They don’t realize it all arises from their own original minds, that this is only a bit of a turning point. 
Dazhu said, “Pile up several cases of scriptures in an empty room, and see if they emanate light.” It’s just your own mind, in­ spired in a moment of thought, that is the virtue. 
Myriad things all come from one’s own mind. 
One moment of thought is aware; once aware, it pervades; having pervaded, it transforms. 
An ancient said, “The green bamboos are all true thusness; the yellow flowers are all wisdom.” If you can see all the way through, this is true thusness; but if you haven’t seen, what do you call true thusness? 
The Flower Ornament Sutra says, “If one wants to know all the Buddhas of all times, one should observe that the nature of the cosmos is all just the fabrication of mind.” If you can discern, then in whatever situations or circumstances you’ll be the master and the source. 
If you cannot yet get it clear, then humbly listen to the verdict: 
Xuedou puts forth an eye and versifies the main theme, to clarify the scripture’s spiritual efficacy. 
Verse The clear jewel is in the palm; (It pervades the sky above and the earth below. 
What is he saying? 
Impenetrable on four sides, crystal clear on eight faces.) Whoever has accomplishment will be rewarded with it. 
Were there no accomplishment, how would you award it?) When neither foreigner nor native comes (Inside and outside are void of events. 
Still this amounts to something.) It has utterly no abilities. 
Where would you look for it? 
Outsiders and the king of demons cannot find any tracks.) Gautama, Gautama! 
It was already so before it was said.) Commentary “The clear jewel is in the palm; / Whoever has accomplishment 221a will be rewarded with it.” If one can uphold this scripture with actual effect, then one is rewarded with the jewel. 
This is having ac­ tual accomplishment. 
Fayan said realizing Buddhahood is called upholding this scripture. 
These two lines have finished versify­ ing the story. 
Here, even the Buddha’s eye cannot see. 
But tell me, is this accomplishment, or is it wicked action? 
It’s like the antelope with its horns hung up; there is not even a breath, much less any sound or trace— where could you go to look for it? 
Here there is no road for gods to offer flowers, no door through which demons and outsiders might secretly spy. 
The Buddha regarded all beings as his children: 
if even one person aspires to enlightenment and acts on that aspiration, the palace of the Evil One trembles and splits because of this, and the demons come to torment and con­ fuse the practitioner. 
Xuedou says that even if the Evil One comes like this, still one must make him lose the way and have no av­ enue of approach. 
/ Do you know me or not?” Do not even speak of demons; even should the Buddha come, would he know me or not? 
Even Gautama Buddha himself couldn’t see him; where will you search for him? 
Let those with eyes try to see for sure. 
Story 221b When Master Tianping was traveling, he called on Xiyuan. 
He used to say, “ Don’t say you understand Buddhism; I cannot find anyone who can quote a saying.” (He’s let slip quite a bit. 
This man is right, but he’s like the sacred tortoise dragging its tail.) One day Xiyuan saw him from a distance and called him by name. 
A double case.) Xiyuan said, “W rong!” (He must be tempered in a furnace. 
He splits his guts and wounds his heart. 
When the seal of the three essentials is lifted, the red spot is narrow; before any at­ tempt to discuss it, host and guest are distinguished.) Tianping went two or three steps; (Already he’s fallen halfway behind. 
He is washing dirt in mud.) Xiyuan again say, “Wrong!” (Splits his guts and wounds his heart. 
Everyone calls this a double case, but they don’t know it is like putting water in water, like exchanging gold for gold.) Tianping approached; (As before he doesn’t know where to rest. 
As for such Chan monks, even if you killed ten thou­ sand of them, what crime would it be?) Xiyuan said, “Wrong! 
After all he doesn’t know where to rest. 
Later, when Tianping was teaching, he said to his group, (A poor man thinks of his old debts. 
twice in a row he said ‘W rong’ and tried to keep me over there the summer for him to deal with me. 
when I set out for the south I already knew it was wrong.” (What can he do about the two wrongs? 
One day he asked, “How is it after trampling down the temporary citadel of Nirvana?” Baoshou said, “A sharp sword does not cut a dead man.” Xiyuan said, “Cut!” Baoshou hit him. 
” ten times, and Baoshou hit him ten times; then Baoshou said, “W hat’s your hurry to submit this corpse to another’s painful cane?” Finally he shouted Xiyuan out. 
Then a monk asked Baoshou, “ That monk who just asked a question is quite reasonable; deal with him appropriately.” Baoshou hit him too and drove him out. 
Tell me, when Baoshou also drove that monk out, can you say it was just because he was speaking of right and wrong, or is there another reason? 
What was his intent? 
Later both succeeded to Baoshou. 
One day Xiyuan went to see Nanyuan. 
Nanyuan asked, “Where do you come from ?” Xiyuan said, “From Xuzhou.” Nanyuan said, “What do you bring?” Xiyuan said, “I bring a razor from Jiangxi; I offer it to you.” Nanyuan said, “Since you come from Xuzhou, how is it that you have a razor from Jiangxi?” Xiyuan pinched Nanyuan’s hand. 
Nanyuan said, “Attendant, take him away!” Xiyuan left at once. 
” Tianping had once called on Jinshan. 
Because he had gone various places and attained this turnip Chan and put it in his belly, everywhere he went he scornfully talked big and claimed to understand Chan and the Way. 
He used to say, “ Don’t say you understand Buddhism; I can’t find anyone who can quote a say­ ing.” His stinking breath affected others, and he only indulged in scorn and contempt. 
22ic Before the Buddha had appeared in the world, before Bodhidharma had come from India, before there were questions and answers, before there were Chan stories, was there any Chan Way? 
The ancients couldn’t avoid imparting teachings according to po­ tentialities; people later called them public cases. 
As the Buddha raised a flower, Kasyapa smiled; later on Ananda asked Kasyapa what special teaching the Buddha had transmitted to him. 
Kasyapa said, “Ananda.” Ananda responded; Kasyapa said, “ Take down the flag in front of the sanctuary.” But before the flower was raised, before Ananda had asked, where do you find any Chan stories? 
You just accept the useless seals of various centers, and once the seal is set, you immediately say, “I understand the marvel of Bud­ dhism! 
Don’t let anyone know.” Tianping was just like this: 
This is why it is said, “Study the living word, not the dead word.” When Tianping raised his head, he had al­ ready fallen into two and three. 
Already he had fallen into seventh or eighth place. 
” Tianping immediately went away. 
He seemed right, but wasn’t really. 
Nevertheless, he still had something of the air of a Chanist. 
When Tianping was teaching, he said to his group, “When I was first traveling, I was blown by the wind of events to Xiyuan. 
I did not say it was wrong then; when I set out for the south I already knew it was wrong. 
” He said quite a bit; it’s just that he’s fallen into seventh or eighth place, shaking his head thinking, out of touch. 
Even before traveling to study, you can’t call earth sky or mountains rivers; fortunately there is nothing to be concerned about at all. 
” If you entertain such common vulgar views, why not buy a bandanna to wear and pass your time in a boss’s house? 
What’s the use? 
Buddhism is not this principle. 
If you discuss this matter, how could there be so many complications? 
If you say you understand while others do not, carrying a bundle of Chan around, when you are tried out by clear-sighted people you won’t be able to use it at all. 
Xuedou versifies in exactly this way: 
Verse Followers of Chan (The ignoramuses all have their crimes listed on the same indictment.) Like to be scornful: 
Those who scold Buddhas and revile patriarchs are plentiful.) Having studied till their bellies are full, they cannot use it. 
A square peg does not fit in a round hole. 
He doesn’t fear that bystanders may frown. 
And he’s gotten people to fret foolishly.) After all he says at the outset it was regrettable to go traveling. (He was already wrong before he had gone traveling. 
Wearing out sandals, what’s the use? 
What is it like? 
Do not speak only of Xiyuan; even the Buddhas of all times and the Chan masters everywhere also must fall back three thousand miles. 
He’s still gotten somewhere.) “How does Xuedou’s wrong compare to Tianping’s wrong?” (Xiyuan again appears in the world. 
He settles the case according to the facts. 
But tell me, after all, how is it? 
Striking, I say, “Wrong!”) Commentary “Followers of Chan / Like to be scornful; / Having studied till their bellies are full, they can not use it.” This fellow understood, but he just couldn’t use it. 
He used to gaze at the cloudy sky and say he understood so much Chan, but when he was heated a little in the furnace, it turned out he couldn’t use it at all. 
Wuzu said, “There’s a kind of person who studies Chan like stuffing cakes in a crystal pitcher; it can’t be turned over, can’t be cleaned out, and breaks the moment it’s bumped. 
If you want to be lively and active, just study ‘leather bag’ Chan: 
even if you smash it down from the high­ est mountain, it still won’t break, won’t burst.” An ancient said, “Even if you can grasp it before it is spoken, this is still remaining in the shell, wandering within limitation; even if you can thor­ oughly penetrate upon hearing a phrase, you still won’t avoid crazy views on the way.” “ How lamentable, laughable old Tianping: 
/ After all he says it was regrettable at the outset to go traveling. 
Xuedou is saying it’s lamentable that he couldn’t explain to others; it s laughable that he understood a bellyful of Chan but couldn’t make any use of it. 
“Wrong, wrong.” Some say Tianping didn’t understand and thus was wrong; some say his not speaking was wrong. 
But what connection is there? 
They hardly realize that these two wrong s are like sparks, like lightning; this is where those transcendent people tread, like using a sword to kill people, immediately grab­ bing their throats, whereupon their root of life is cut off. 
If you can travel on the sword’s edge, then you will be free in all ways. 
If you can understand these two “wrong”s, then you can thereby see Xiyuan’s pure wind suddenly melting Tianping. 
Study for thirty more years. 
Introduction 222b When a dragon howls, mist arises; when a tiger roars, wind arises. 
In the fundamental design of appearing in the world, gold and jade play together; in the strategic action of omnicompetence, arrowpoints meet. 
The whole world does not conceal; far and near are equally revealed; past and present are clearly described. 
But tell me, whose realm is this? 
Story Emperor Suzong asked National Teacher Huizhong, “What is the Ten Body Controller?” (An adept ruler, the emperor of China; he should know this. 
On his head is the rolled lobe hat, on his feet are unworn shoes.) The teacher said, “Walk on Vairocana’s head.” (He takes his hand and walks together with him on the other side of the polar mountain. 
What a pity. 
The emperor should have immedi­ ately shouted then; what further need did he have to understand?) The teacher said, “Don’t acknowledge your own pure reality body.” (Though he makes complications, he still has a way out. 
Drunk and doddering, he saddens others to death.) Commentary Emperor Suzong was already studying with National Teacher Huizhong when he was crown prince; he honored him even more after he succeeded to the throne, personally greeting him and see­ ing him off, even bearing the palanquin. 
One day he asked the teacher, “What is the Ten Body Controller?” The teacher said, “Walk on Vairocana’s head.” The teacher’s spine was usually stiff as iron, but when he came into the presence of the emperor it was like soft mud. 
Though he answered subtly, still he had a good point. 
“ Don’t mistakenly acknowledge your own pure reality body.” That refers to what is inherent in everyone, complete in each individual. 
A good teacher sets up teaching according to potential, ob­ serving the wind to set the sail; if one just stayed in one corner, how could one interchange? 
See how Huangbo was a skilled guide: 
when he met Linji, he beat him thrice and Linji thereupon under­ stood; but when it came to helping Prime Minister Pei Xiu, he was extremely complicated. 
Was he not a good teacher? 
National Teacher Huizhong skillfully used appropriate meth­ ods to teach emperor Suzong; in all it was because he had the skill to take on adversaries from all sides. 
The Ten Body Controller is the ten kinds of Buddha body as experienced by others. 
The three Buddha bodies—reality, enjoyment, and emanation—are identi­ cal to the reality body, because the enjoyment and emanation bodies are not the real Buddha, not what expounds the Dharma. 
When remaining in the body of reality, as a single expanse of empty stillness, spiritual luminosity shines tranquilly. 
When Taiyuan Fu was expounding the Nirvana Sutra in Guangxiao temple, there was a wandering monk—actually it was the cook of Jiashan—who, being snowed in, took the opportunity to go listen to the lecture. 
When the lecture touched on the three bases of the Buddha nature and the three qualities of the body of reality, as Fu spoke profusely of the subtle principle of the reality body, the cook suddenly broke out laughing. 
Fu looked at him, and had him summoned after the lecture. 
He asked, “My simple knowledge is narrow and inferior; I interpret the meanings ac­ cording to the words. 
Just now I saw you laugh during the lecture; I must have some shortcoming, so please explain it to me.” The cook said, “Had you not asked, I wouldn’t speak; since you have, I must explain. 
I was actually laughing because you don’t know the reality body.” Fu said, “What’s wrong with my explana­ tion?” The cook said, “ Please explain it once more.” Fu said, “ The principle of the reality body is like space, extending throughout space and time, all-embracing and all-pervasive. 
He went right away to knock on the Chanist’s door. 
He had to have broken up his habitually conditioned consciousness, so that there is nothing that can be apprehended; yet he has still only realized one half. 
But tell me, at just such a moment, where is the reality body? 
Students of the Way do not know reality Because they still acknowledge the conscious mind; It’s the root of countless eons of birth and death, Yet fools call it the original being. 
People now just acknowledge this radiant awareness and immedi­ ately stare and glare, playing with their spirits: 
As he said, “ Do not acknowledge your own pure reality body,” but when it comes to your own reality body, you have still not seen it in a dream—how can you yet talk about not acknowledging it? 
In the doctrinal schools, they consider the pure reality body to be the ultimate law; why not let people acknowl­ edge it? 
Whoever can understand the meaning of this will for the first time understand his saying, “ Don’t acknowledge your own reality body.” Xuedou dislikes his indulgent kindness, but never­ theless there are thorns in the soft mud. 
Master Dongshan had three roads for teaching people, called the hidden road, the bird’s path, and extending the hands. 
Begin­ ners temporarily traveled these three roads. 
Even if you clean everything up and make your­ self trackless and silent, yet in the Chan school this is still the view of novices and children. 
You must still turn your heads around to the troubles of the world and fully arouse your great function. 
Verse £The Teacher of the Nation” is also a forced name; (What’s the necessity? A flower in the sky, the moon in the water. 
When the wind passes over, the treetops move.) Huizhong alone may flaunt his good fame. 
(After all he occupies the essential bridge. Even among a thousand or ten thousand, it’s hard to find one or a half.) In the Tang dynasty he helped a real emperor— (Pitiful. 
What’s the use of teaching him? 
What’s accomplished by teaching a blind Chan monk?) Once he had him tread on Vairocana’s head. (Why doesn’t everyone go like this? 
They would find heaven and earth. 
How would you tread?) Then his iron hammer struck and shattered the gold bones; (Making everyday life happy. 
It’s already so before saying so.) Between heaven and earth, what more is there? (Within the four seas, vast and boundless, there are few who know. The whole body bears the load. 
He’s scattering sand and dirt.) The lands and seas of three thousand worlds are still and silent by night; (Set your eyes high. 
Hold fast to your territory; are you waiting to enter a ghost cave?) I do not know who enters the blue dragon’s cave. (Thirty blows of the staff; not one can be omitted. 
Do not mistakenly acknowledge your own pure reality body.) Commentary “The Teacher of the Nation is also a forced name; / Huizhong alone may flaunt his good fame.” This verse is just like a eulogy on a portrait. 
To call him National Teacher is also a case of having forcibly affixed a name. 
The Way of the National Teacher is incomparable; he was skillfully able to teach others in this way. 
Huizhong alone may be accepted as a master; “In the Tang dynasty he helped a true emperor— / Once he had him tread on Vairocana’s head.” If you have the eye and brain of a perceptive Chanist, you must walk on Vairocana’s head; only then will you see this Ten Body Controller. 
A Buddha is called the Controller; this is one of ten epithets. 
One body transforms into ten bodies, ten bodies transform into a hundred bodies, and on and on, to mil­ lions of millions of bodies; in their totality they are just one body. 
the latter part refers to the saying, “ Don’t acknowledge your pure reality body and versifies it in such a way that water poured on cannot wet it; it is difficult to explain. 
“ His iron hammer strikes, smashing the gold bones.” This re­ fers to “ Don’t acknowledge your own pure reality body.” Xuedou praises Huizhong greatly; the golden bones have been smashed by one blow of his mallet. 
“Between heaven and earth, what more is there?” It is just necessary to be clean and naked, bare and un­ trammeled, so there is no longer anything to be apprehended; then this is the scenery of the basic ground. 
It is just like the lands and seas of three thousand worlds still and silent in the night. 
In a universe of three thousand great world systems, in the midst of the ocean of fragrant waters, there are infinite lands; in each land there is a sea. 
Just when the night is deep and still, and heaven and earth are clear and calm, tell me, what is this? 
Just don t make an understanding of closing your eyes. 
If you understand in this way, you’ll fall into the poison sea. 
“I do not know who enters the blue dragon’s cave.” Stretching out the legs, folding the legs, who is this? 
Story A monk asked Baling, “What is the sharpest sword?” (Cut! 
Dan­ ger!) Baling said, “Each branch of coral supports the moon.” (The light engulfs myriad forms, the entire land.) Commentary Baling does not move his shield and spear, but how many people’s tongues fall to the ground! 
Yunmen taught people just like this, and Baling was his true heir. 
This story is just like this; within one statement there are three statements naturally inherent—the statement encompassing the universe, the statement cutting off all streams, and the state­ ment following the waves. 
His reply was undeniably outstanding. 
Fushan Yuan said, “For one who has not yet passed through, studying the statement is not as good as studying the intent. 
For one who has passed through, studying the intent is not as good as studying the statement.” Among Yunmen’s students were three adepts who replied about the “sharpest sword. 
But tell me, are “complete” and “each branch of coral supports of the moon” the same or different? 
Before, Xuedou said, The three statements should be distinguished; one arrow flies through space. 
If you want to understand this story, you must cut off the defile­ ments of feelings and conceptions and be completely purified; then you will see his saying, “Each branch of coral supports the moon. 
If you make up any further rationalizations, all the more you 11 find you’re unable to grasp it. 
This expression is from a poem by the Chan lyricist Chanyue, from which Baling took one line to reply to the sharpest sword. 
A sword is tested with a hair; when a hair blown against its edge splits of itself, the sword is the sharpest sword. 
Baling just goes to the point of the question and immediately answers; the monk’s head fell without him even realizing it. 
He hides his body but reveals his shadow.) Sometimes on the finger, sometimes in the palm; Leaning against the sky, it shines on the snow— Even a great smith cannot hone it; (What do you still want to forge it for? 
Even Gan Jiang the legendary smith couldn’t find it.) Even a master craftsman would never finish polishing it. 
Even if Gan Jiang came forth, he too would fall back three thousand miles.) It is exceptional, unique: 
What is so special about it? 
There is something praiseworthy about it.) Each branch of coral supports the moon. (In the third watch the moon descends, its light shining in the cold pond. 
Tell me, where does it go? 
The world’s at peace. 
Drunk and doddering, he saddens people to death.) Commentary “Wanting to even the uneven, / The great adept seems inept.” In the past there were wandering warriors; on their way when they saw inequity where the strong oppressed the weak, they would let fly with their swords to take the heads of the strong. 
In this way Chan masters hide a jewel sword in their eyebrows and hang a golden mallet in their sleeves, whereby to settle matters of un­ rest. 
instead he goes off into a corner and with one stroke secretly beheads the man, while the man is unaware of it. 
224a “Sometimes on the finger, sometimes in the palm; / Leaning against the sky, it shines on the snow.” If you can understand, then it is like the cold severe grandeur of a long sword leaning against the sky. 
An ancient said, “ The mind-moon solitary and full, its light engulfs myriad forms. 
The light is not shining on objects, and the objects are not existing either. 
Light and objects both forgotten, then what is this?” This precious sword is some­ times manifest on the fingertip; suddenly it appears in the palm. 
When Librarian Qing reached this point in his explanation of this text, he raised his hand and said, “Do you see?” Still, it’s not nec­ essarily in the hand or the finger: 
Xuedou just takes a shortcut to let you see the ancient’s meaning. 
That is why it is said, “When the waves are high at the triple gate, the fish turn to dragons; yet fools still scoop the evening pond water.” * Xuedou says this sword can lean against the sky and shine on the snow. 
Usually it is said that the light of the long sword lean­ ing against the sky can shine on the snow: 
this little bit of func­ tion is such that even a great smith cannot hone it; even a master craftsman could never finish polishing it. 
When Xuedou has finished the verse, in the end he reveals the sword, saying, “Exceptional, unique!” It is undeniably exceptional and has special excellence; it is not like an ordinary sword. 
But tell me, how is it special? 
“Each branch of coral supports the moon.” This can be said to be absolutely unique, occupying the heartland alone, without any peer. 
Ultimately, how is it? 
People, your heads are fallen. 
Having brought up one hundred old stories, How much sand have I thrown in people’s eyes? 
The translator omitted an insertion about the legendary smith Kan Chiang, and his sword No Yeh. 

xviiiTHE BAIZHANG ZEN MONASTIC REGULATIONS Compiled by Dehui, Abbot of the Master Sage of Great Wisdom and Long Life Temple Edited by Dasu, Abbot of the Great Dragons Flying to Assemble for Celebration TempleFascicle One Chapter I Festivities and the Observance of Rites I. 
Hence, from ancient times, the sublime rulers of this land have continued to revere the teachings of our Western Sage and have never failed to treat Buddhists in a manner well beyond conventional propriety. 
This is because they revere the Way. 
Our indebtedness to imperial favor is as vast as heaven and earth, beyond measurement. 
We are obliged to realize the insight of buddha-nature and return to the abode of highest good. 
We will give full play to the wondrous faculty of insight to transcend to the height of spirituality, lead the populace toward spontaneous conversion, and thereby promote benevolence and long life in this world. 
It is the goal for which we Buddhists strive wholeheartedly. 
With respect to everyday life, we have a rule to pray for imperial well-being every morning and evening and at each mealtime so as not to become unmindful of it. 
Inauguration of the Rite of the Imperial Birthday 1113a When the day of celebrating the imperial birthday arrives, the ﬁrst step is to set up the place for the rite of prayer for the Adamantine Immeasurable Life Buddha . 
For the sake of proper expression of reverence, no one should be allowed to be absent for the duration of the entire month . 
is obliged to prepare the name list for rotating shifts according to ordination seniority. 
Five days in advance, the director of the practice hall, accompanied by a novice attendant, visits the ofﬁcial of the scribes’ quarters, carrying a sheet of paper in his sleeve. 
May I request you to compose the word of tribute for the inauguration of the rite of the imperial birthday. 
(If the ofﬁcial is not available at the time, the scribe’s assistant performs this role, and if neither is available, any previous composition may be substituted. 
After an informal prostration, he thanks the director for his prior visit. 
After burning incense and performing an informal prostration, the director asks the abbot for his approval: This is the word of tribute prepared for the inauguration of the rite for the imperial birthday, sir. 
The sutra chanting to inaugurate the rite of the imperial birthday is scheduled for tomorrow morning at the Buddha hall, sir. 
The various quarters are immediately notiﬁed, and the wooden tablet announcing the sutra chanting is hung at the entrance to the practice hall. 
I announce to you, fellow practitioners, that when we hear the bell ring after breakfast, each of us, properly attired, will proceed to the Buddha hall and inaugurate the prayer rite for the imperial birthday. 
After a short recess after breakfast, the practice hall novice attendant reports to the abbot’s guest master when the Buddha hall is ready, [that is, when] incense, candles, tea and sweet hot water, the cymbals, and a portable incense burner . 
The guest master in turn conveys this message to the abbot, then to his chief assistant. 
Before all this takes place, the wooden sounding board at the practitioners’ quarters is struck three times to call them to return to the practice hall, where they wait in their places in sitting meditation , facing the wall as usual. 
Also upon hearing the drum, the training faculty ofﬁcials, who have previously assembled outside, enter the hall and take their respective places. 
The west hall ofﬁcial, the retired ofﬁcials and retired subfunctionary ofﬁcials of the temple, and the functionaries of various ofﬁces take their seats in the outer hall. 
As the drumming begins, the abbot comes to his reception hall, and when he takes his seat, his chief assistant greets him with a bow and stands on the east side of the hall, while the novice attendants salute him likewise and stand on the west side. 
When the drumming changes pitch, the chief assistant proceeds to the Dharma hall, stands by the left side of the main rostrum seat, and waits for the practitioners to assemble. 
At the practice hall the training faculty ofﬁcials descend to the ﬂoor, bow before the altar of the guardian bodhisattva, and lead the practitioners toward the Dharma hall. 
The practitioners take parallel positions behind their column. 
When the drumming commences, an ofﬁcial at the novice attendant’s hall also strikes the wooden sounding board three times, and the ceremonial leader leads the group of novice attendants toward the kitchen hall. 
They line up in two columns in front of the hall, facing each other, and wait for the change of drum pitch. 
The novice attendants then take parallel positions behind the administrative ofﬁcials at a slight distance from them. 
When the abbot reaches the rostrum, the novice attendants close in behind the administrative ofﬁcials. 
During the winter months, everyone is required at this moment to take off his cap to bow. 
With a gesture of greeting, the abbot ascends the rostrum seat, followed by his chief assistant, and receives from him incense proffered on the lid of an incense case. 
Thereupon, receiving the incense back, the chief assistant pours it into the burner with his left hand, simultaneously placing next to it a stick of incense with his right hand while giving a word of prayer. 
After a slight bow, the chief assistant descends the rostrum and returns to his place. 
The ranking west hall resident and east hall resident likewise go before the rostrum and bow. 
Thereupon, the chief assistant ascends the rostrum, offers incense with his left hand, turns to the abbot, and bows toward him with a gesture of offering his unopened sitting cloth. 
On such-and-such day, we respectfully perform the commemoration of the imperial birthday. 
On this day in such-and-such month, this temple shall inaugurate the continual session of prayer for the Adamantine Immeasurable Life Tathāgata for the duration of an entire month. 
Your subject So-and-so, abbot of this temple, has ascended this high seat this morning and has expounded the sublime truth and primary meaning of the Dharma. 
Now, descending from this hall, let us proceed, with proper attire and dignity, to the hall of the great Buddha and inaugurate the commemorative rite of the imperial birthday. 
On this day, if government ofﬁcials are present at the morning session it is customary not to give any words of appreciation for their participation, in regard to the primary respect the imperial throne. 
The abbot commences offering tea and sweet hot water before the Buddha image. 
When this is done, the abbot returns and stands at his position. 
Next, the ranking east and west hall residents simultaneously step forward in pairs to offer incense. 
The whole assembly of practitioners performs three prostrations with half-opened sitting cloth. 
We solemnly dedicate the great merit accrued from reciting the sacred chapter of the Śūraṃgama-dhāraṇīs to the present imperial highness for this day of festivity, well-being, and longevity. 
Veneration to Adamantine Immeasurable Life Tathāgata, Benevolent King Bodhisattva Mahāsattva , and Mahāprajñāpāramitā . 
Each day of , the assignees conduct themselves with utmost seriousness, entering the hall after the large bell tolls. 
They are obliged to maintain proper attire and dignity, carry an incense case for venerating the Buddha, and recite the sutras at their assigned position. 
When evening comes, the assignees toll the large bell and retire from the hall. 
The practitioners have completed the recitation of the sacred chapter of verses. 
We solemnly dedicate the merit thereby accrued to the present imperial highness for this day of festivity, well-being, and longevity. 
Veneration to Adamantine Immeasurable Life Buddha, and so on. The Prayer Service on the Days Ending in Three and Eight of the Month of Festivity On the days ending in three and eight during the month of the rite of the imperial birthday, regular prayer services must be conducted in the Buddha hall . 
Before the evening session, the wooden sounding boards located in the various corridors of the temple are struck three times to assemble the practitioners at the Buddha hall, where they take their positions facing the Buddha’s altar. 
Next, at the sound of the large bell, the abbot offers incense and returns to his position. 
The imperial wind forever sends fresh air, and the imperial way forever ﬂourishes, while the Buddha’s sun shines ever more brightly and the wheel of the Dharma perpetually turns. 
Luminous Pure Dharma Body Vairocana Buddha (Pariśuddhadharmakāyavairocanabuddha; Qingjingfashenpilushenafo), and so on. 
(Upon completion of the prayer of the ten sacred names of the Tathāgatas, the following invocation of merit transference is given:) We solemnly dedicate the merit hereby accrued to the present imperial highness for this day of festivity, well-being, and longevity. 
Veneration to Adamantine Immeasurable Life Buddha, and so on. After the practice hall bell is tolled three times the practitioners bow and leave the hall. 
Inauguration and Fulﬁllment of the Rite of the Imperial Birthday Recorded in the Ancient Regulations The Ancient Regulations record that the practitioners who participated in the rite of the imperial birthday were given a certiﬁcate from the director of the practice hall, while temporary visitors or recent arrivals were given a similar certiﬁcate from the guest reception ofﬁcial, in order to verify their status and career. 
This is because in olden days, Buddhist as well as Daoist practitioners were required to pay a tax for their exemption [on religious grounds] from levies of service. 
Though such certiﬁcates are not in use today, mention is made here to show such bygone regulations. 
Respectfully meeting at Such-and-such Temple in such-and-such district and province on such-and-such day and month For the Day of Festivity of the Imperial Birthday This temple will conduct the commemoration rite on such-and-such day and month. The inauguration of the rite is scheduled at the Buddha hall, in the place set up for the prayer rite to Adamantine Immeasurable Life Buddha, and practitioners are assigned to recite the sacred mantras and the sacred names of the buddhas continually every day for the duration of a month. We dedicate the great merit thereby accrued to the festivity of the imperial birthday and the promotion of imperial well-being for the sake of The Everlasting Life of the Present Emperor May the Buddha’s supernatural vision clearly illuminate and the Dragon God of Heaven witness the sincerity of the foregoing statement. Day, month, and year Respectfully stated by the imperial subject, Head Administrative Ofﬁcial So-and-so The imperial subject, Abbot Priest So-and-so 2. 
The descending illumination is so dazzling that its brightness cannot be compared even with that of the sun and moon. 
One only knows that it is futile to look up to praise it; nor is there any limit to it even when one tries to make a tribute to it. 
One can only entrust oneself to the care of the imperial realm, and thereby faithfully weigh the four kinds of indebtedness (i.e., indebtedness toward parents, people, kings, and the Three Treasures). 
Thus, one is obliged to exert one’s mind in loyalty and love, respectfully wishing the throne to be ﬁlled with the three kinds of blessing . 
The imperial network covers myriads of rivers and mountains, thereby bringing all of them to imperial deliberation, while the three thousand worlds of the lotus storehouse make the great dominion of the empire ever more spacious . 
May the imperial couple rise, the auspicious star shine, the exalted seat be ever in peace, the unicorn and phoenix bring good fortune, and the wise lead, making myriads appear as they are. 
The Word of Tribute for the Fulﬁllment of the Rite of the Imperial Birthday The blooming of the lotus ﬂower is an auspicious sign in this world, just as it was auspicious that the Buddha was born into this world. 
It meets with the utmost zenith and returns to it, and thereby erects the utmost and establishes its center of the universe. 
The harmonious way of our tradition has, indeed, received an advantage at the time of the best governance, comparable to that of 15 the ancient Sage. 
The bells and drums of this forest enjoy times of peace, their sound expanding and increasing. 
Grasses, trees, and insects receive the permeating beneﬁt of such advantage. Good omens inaugurate the dawn and hymns celebrate the ﬂowery hill. 
While the robes fall and do nothing, yet may heaven and earth take their positions, myriads of things be nourished and grow, forms be created, the principles of yin and yang be harmonized, the four seasons be in proper order, longevity be enjoyed for ten thousand years, and the root and branches be extended for one hundred generations. 
The director leads the recitation of the Śūraṃgama-dhāraṇīs and invokes the name of Medicine Buddha. 
Veneration to Adamantine Immeasurable Life Buddha, Benevolent King Bodhisattva, and so on. 
The Word of Praise for the First and Mid-month Days in the Tripiṭaka Hall From ancient times, it has been customary on these days to read the sutras and conduct the prayer for imperial longevity. 
The abbot then leads the procession, each member holding his palms together, in three circumambulations around the building, or a single circumambulation if the number of participants is too large. 
The Lotus-store ocean in the Huayan universe is ﬁlled with vast perfect illumination. 
Although light rushes back and forth in all six directions (i.e., north, east, south, west, zenith, and nadir), this ocean is profoundly quiescent. 
The mystery of this ocean is indeed inexhaustible no matter how much and how far it is praised and exalted. 
Veneration to Adamantine Immeasurable Life Buddha, Benevolent King Bodhisattva Mahāsattva, and Mahāprajñāpāramitā. 
The Word of Praise for Daily Ritual Services Twice a day, at breakfast and the noon meal, the practitioners leave the practice hall and are obliged to assemble at the Buddha hall. 
Having intoned the sacred verses of the esoteric chapter, we respectfully dedicate the merit accrued thereby to the festivity and promotion of the well-being and longevity of the present emperor. 
Veneration to Adamantine Immeasurable Life Buddha, and so on. 
The Festivity for the Birthday of the Crown Prince 1114c On the evening before the appointed day, the practice hall novice attendants should notify the practitioners of the scheduled sutra chanting by posting a tablet. 
Next morning, they toll the practice hall bell to assemble the practitioners at the Buddha hall. 
All the practitioners of this temple have assembled at the Buddha hall and reverently chanted the Śūraṃgama-dhāraṇīs and praised the sacred name of Medicine Buddha. 
The merit accrued thereby is dedicated to the festivity of the birthday of the Crown Prince, divine heir-apparent. 
May the wheel of the sun be turned many more times and the brightness of the moon be increased manyfold, so that they will be able to illuminate the whole ocean under heaven. 
May the mountain be like sandstone and the river like a girdle so that the foundation of the nation can be strengthened. 
Veneration to Adamantine Immeasurable Life Buddha, and so on. 
Each day, the large bell is tolled before sutra chanting begins, and the scheduled sutras are recited in the Buddha hall. 
The end of the day is concluded with a word of praise. 
The origin of this practice can be traced to the third year of Kaihuang of the Sui dynasty, when a decree was issued throughout the land that during the designated months as well as on the six speciﬁc days of religious austerity, each temple was required to set up a place of practice for prayer and invocation and no life should be taken or injured. 
According to a sutra, the deity Vaiśravaṇa , who is said to have conducted inspection tours every year over the four great continents, happened to regulate the southern continent and prohibited the slaughter of animals during the ﬁrst, ﬁfth, and ninth months. 
When Tang provincial governors received their appointments to their respective territories, they customarily used to by sponsoring a feast for their victorious soldiers, whose number was never less than several ten-thousands, thus increasing the slaughter of animals for food. 
Popular belief, however, wrongly attributed this custom to superstitious fear. 
Preface to the Chapter The state has the duty of conducting the sacriﬁcial rite for the supreme, for the imperial ancestors, and the rite for the four seasons. 
Each emperor is said to govern the realm of heaven and earth as an incarnate Buddha body , and upon completing his task of transforming the realm returns to the state of buddhahood. 
Thus, in those temples in the capital that are supported by the government, the imperial portrait is placed in the Buddha’s altar. 
Five times a month, the portrait is enshrined with offerings and words of reverence as though for a living person and is venerated with a kind of nurturing protective thought. 
We can observe generally that wherever the imperial power of spiritual transformation ﬂows, it has spread along with the teachings of the Buddha with no obstruction. 
Thus, Buddhist followers have been bathed in the benevolent waves and marshlands. 
Finally, set up the imperial seat on the rostrum in the Dharma hall and place the imperial tablet, with the sacred name (i.e., that of the deceased emperor) solemnly inscribed on a sheet of yellow paper, enshrining it with incense, a ﬂower vase, candle stand, table, and ﬂoor sheet. 
On the appointed day, the practitioners assemble at the Dharma hall at the signal of the practice hall bell. 
After is over, he concludes the service with the following invocation of merit transference: 
We dedicate the merit thereby accrued to the enshrinement of the imperial carriage with further assistance. 
It is humbly wished that the imperial spirit may enjoy all the corners of the universe, assume a visit on the chariot formed of clouds and winds, receive the delight of his abode in the center of the sky and of his palace inlaid with precious gems and his pavilion adorned with colorful gems. 
Various Prayer Services Whenever an occasion for prayer arises, the place of its performance must be prepared in strict accordance with the rules, and must be furnished with food and other offerings. 
The practitioners must carry out their duties in a tidy and austere manner, while the administrative ofﬁcials are obliged to supervise the outer and inner temple operations and make their rounds through various quarters and buildings in order to keep them clean. 
His novice attendants are then instructed to inform the practitioners of the coming event and to post the signboard announcing the prayer service. 
Twice a day, at morning and noon mealtimes, the practitioners assemble at the signal of the bell to chant sutras. 
Either the reading of the three Tripiṭaka scriptures or the four major groups of scriptures (i.e., the Perfection of Wisdom Sutra ; the Sutra of the Heap of Jewels ; the Flower Ornament Sutra; and the Nirvana Sutra ) is to be carried out for three, ﬁve, or seven consecutive days, according to the particular situation. 
In the cases of prayers for sunshine or rain, practitioners are grouped in teams of ten, twenty, thirty, or ﬁfty members, led by the ﬁrst member of each team, so that the sutra chanting can be carried out without interruption from one team to another. 
This is called the “uninterrupted wheel of chanting.” After a whole day of chanting, there should be a rite of fulﬁllment and a word of invocation, with earnest wishes for a favorable response. 
The format of each invocation is given below. 
The Prayer Invocation for Sunshine It is anxiously observed that vicious rain has caused much damage by preventing things from realizing their function. 
Hundreds of rivers have swept away all things, leaving no place of refuge. 
This is a result of the karma shared in common by all people. 
The objective of this prayer is fair weather. 
May a prompt response be granted, so that the persistent clouds may be swept away from all ﬁelds in the four directions, the gloomy disharmony be dispersed, the bright sun may appear in the center of the sky and its glorious rays illuminate, enabling all human activities to occur in proper order and enabling myriads of things to realize the fulﬁllment of their lives. 
The Prayer Invocation for Rain It is anxiously observed that the sun’s overbearing rays precipitate disasters for all kinds of crops. 
This is not a punishment heaven sends from above but a result of the mounting transgressions of people below. 
The objective of this prayer is abundant rainfall. 
May the cloud dragon rise over the mountains and rivers, bringing about abundant rain, so that farm work may be done and the harvest season may be completed once again. 
The Prayer Invocation for Snowfall It is anxiously observed that whenever the winter is unusually warm, living things are always harmed. 
Snowfall puriﬁes the noxious atmosphere of the land below. 
We thus offer incense with utmost sincerity, wishing for the good omen of snowﬂakes amassed on the ground. 
The objective of this prayer is snowfall. 
May a prompt response be granted, so that snowclouds may spread equally over thousands of miles and there may be abundant rain and snowfall in the eight regions of the universe, the six agencies of nature may operate through the threefold processes (i.e., essential, efﬁcient, and self-regenerating), grasses and trees may grow thick, the two principles of yin and yang may be harmonized, and the ﬁve primary elements of nature may be in good order, and, thereby, gods and humans may be in harmony. 
The Prayer Invocation for the Dispersion of Locusts It is anxiously observed that ﬂying locusts ﬁll the entire sky. 
This is a bad omen to be feared, for after they disappear by entering the ground, no one knows where they may stir up calamities again. 
Unless supernatural efﬁcacy is rendered, no matter how many human hands may attempt it, the dispersion cannot be accomplished. 
The objective of this prayer is the expulsion and dispersion of locusts. 
The Prayer Invocation for a Day of Eclipse It is predicted that an eclipse will take place today, and that the ﬁve regulatory agencies of time (i.e., year, day, month, constellation, and calendrical numeration) are slightly out of proper order. 
Because of such disorder, it is feared that the mighty force of heaven might cause the six kinds of evil celestial phenomena (i.e., periods of continuous cloud cover, drought, wind, rain, darkening, and gloaming) to occur. 
Thus, in order to rescue the people from their fear and protect them from confusion, we rely on the power of the buddhas. 
Teams of practitioners have respectfully conducted uninterrupted prayer through chanting the sacred scriptures and esoteric verses in order to extend our help and protection. 
May the spirit of the sun promptly regain its light so that its ﬁve variegated rays spread wide, illuminating the earth’s surface below and causing shadows to disappear, and the sun shines brightly throughout the sky. 
The Prayer Invocation for a Day of Lunar Eclipse The moon is the master of the night through its shining nature of yin. 
The faintness of its illumination during an eclipse reveals heaven’s inauspicious omen to the people. 
May the ﬂowery moon promptly return to its brightness, so that evil darkness extinguishes its trace and the clear light may once again manifest itself over the earth’s land, hills, and rivers. 
May the moon maintain long life so as to include myriads of phenomena in its vast and cool palace. 
It is neither possible to know its origin even if one were to shake heaven and earth, nor to know its fulﬁllment by exhausting myriads of years. 
Buddhas and sentient beings are equally endowed with this nature. 
By acquiring insight into this nature, one reaches the summit of wondrous enlightenment; by straying from it, one is washed away by the waves of life and death. 
From one kalpa to the next, one goes through different births in the sixfold cycle of rebirth in accordance with one’s karmic retribution, and ﬁnds no end to this process. 
We Zen practitioners have reverently inherited the formality of the attire and the lineage of his Dharma transmission. 
What we advocate as his principle of practice are the codes of discipline and morality ; what we propagate as his word of truth is the body of teachings ; and what we transmit as his mind of transcendence is the state of meditation . 
Moreover, our compliance with the so-called Great Origin is to identify ourselves with the totality of the Buddha’s wondrous faculty, alone through which, for the ﬁrst time, we are called the Buddha’s disciples and transmit the life of his insight. 
The Buddha’s Birthday Commemoration 1. The Ascent to the Dharma Hall Prior to the day, the practice hall ofﬁcial collects contributions from the practitioners and entrusts the collection to the head administrative ofﬁcial in order to obtain various offerings. 
(The procedure is identical to that of the imperial birthday rite.) When the appointed day comes, the head administrative ofﬁcial respectfully sets up a small pavilion decorated with ﬂowers in the Buddha hall and places in it a statue of the infant Buddha with a tray of scented water, and provides a pair of small dippers and various offerings in front of the pavilion. 
On the felicitous morning of the Buddha’s birthday, disciple So-andso, abbot of Such-and-such Temple in charge of the Buddha’s teaching, reverently offers fragrant incense to express care and devotion for the sake of the Original Patriarch, Śākyamuni Tathāgata, the Great Preceptor . 
May all the buddhas manifest themselves in this world within every successive moment of our consciousness so as to rescue all beings of this Dharma world . Next, the abbot sits down cross-legged and says: On this eighth day of the fourth month, we greet the commemorative morning of the birth of the Original Patriarch Śākyamuni Tathāgata, the Great Preceptor. 
Disciple So-and-so, abbot of this temple, a remote descendant in charge of the Buddha’s teaching, has ascended this main rostrum seat to offer the teaching of vehicle of religious salvation. 
The abbot descends the rostrum seat and leads the practitioners toward the Buddha hall. 
When the practitioners have taken their respective positions, facing the Buddha image, the abbot burns incense and performs three prostrations with half-opened sitting cloth before the altar. 
Without folding his sitting cloth, he proceeds to the altar and conducts the offering of sweet hot water and food. 
His guest reception assistant hands him the offerings, while the incense offering assistant places them on the altar. 
The abbot returns to his position and again performs three full prostrations, and once again proceeds to the altar to offer incense, a monetary gift, and tea. 
Once again he returns to his position, performs three prostrations, and stands, folding his sitting cloth. 
The single moon, abiding in the sky, magnanimously imprints its image into the multiple waves of water, The single Buddha, coming into this world, has made multiple buddhas appear and sit on a lotus ﬂower, The single light issuing from the Buddha’s forehead illuminates all three worlds, The single ﬂow of nectar beneﬁts all sentient beings born through the four different modes at once. 
Now I respectfully bathe the Tathāgatas, The merit body that embellishes their pure insight, I wish all sentient beings to be freed from the ﬁve kinds of deﬁlement, And equally realize the pure Dharma body of the Tathāgata. 
We dedicate the merit accrued from this chanting to the absolute truth and ultimate reality for the sake of adorning the bodhi that is the fruit of buddhahood. 
Veneration to the buddhas of the ten directions and the three times, and so on. 
The Word of Tribute The Great Ocean is profoundly quiescent, and we hear nothing but the rumbling vibration of its current. 
The Great Void is totally transparent, and we see nothing but the latitudinal movement of its respective weft and warp. 
Though there is neither Buddha nor , may each of all dharmas proclaim the precious verses of bathing the Buddha. 
Though there is neither ﬁlth nor purity, may particle after particle of dust cleanse the golden body. 
The Buddha’s Enlightenment and Nirvana 1. The Buddha’s Enlightenment Day Prior to the day marking the Buddha’s enlightenment, the practice hall ofﬁcial collects contributions from the practitioners and entrusts the collection to the head administrative ofﬁcial in order to obtain various offerings. 
On the eighth day of the twelfth month, we reverently greet the commemorative day on which the Original Patriarch Śākyamuni Tathāgata, the Great Teacher, realized enlightenment. 
Assembling all the practitioners of this temple and offering incense, ﬂowers, candles, and tea, as well as fruit and delicacies, we have expressed our care and devotion to the original master of our religion. 
With the special merit thereby accrued, we wish in part to discharge our indebtedness to the compassion bestowed upon us and, in part, along with all sentient beings of the Dharma world, wish for them to discover their own insight and turn the great wheel of the Dharma by entering into each inﬁnitesimal particle. 
I respectfully announce that we shall leave this hall and, with proper dignity and decorum, proceed to the hall of the great Buddha to chant sutras. 
Perceiving the morning star over Mount Perfect Enlightenment , the Buddha realized the path. 
Lifting the sun of insight in the great universe composed of a thousand universes, he thereby let its illumination ﬂow forth . 
The Buddha’s Nirvana Day On the day of commemoration for the Buddha’s nirvana, initially the abbot offers incense at the Buddha hall to conduct the mid-month prayer chanting for imperial well-being, and following that he ascends the rostrum seat at the Dharma hall for preaching as usual. 
On this day of the Buddha’s nirvana, So-and-so Bhikṣu, abbot of Suchand-such Temple, remote descendant of the Buddha’s teaching, respectfully offers precious incense to express our care and devotion for the Great Teacher and Original Patriarch Śākyamuni Tathāgata. 
We wish, in part, to discharge our indebtedness for his compassion in bestowing refuge on us and, in part, to express, along with all sentient beings of the Dharma world, our dear remembrance of him. 
On the ﬁfteenth day of the second month, we reverently honor the commemorative day of parinirvāṇa on which the Original Patriarch, Great Teacher Śākyamuni Tathāgata, entered total cessation. 
Assembling the practitioners and reverently offering incense, ﬂowers, candles, tea, fruit, and delicacies, we express our care and devotion to the master. 
With the special merit accrued thereby, we wish, in part, to discharge our indebtedness to the compassion bestowed on us, and in part, along with all sentient beings of the Dharma world, to perfectly realize omniscient knowledge. 
Upon descending from our seats, we shall leave this hall and proceed to the Buddha hall with dignity and decorum and chant sutras for this Nirvana Day. 
The abbot descends the rostrum seat and leads the practitioners. 
The pure Dharma body essentially has neither phenomenal appearance nor disappearance but, through the power of the vow of great compassion, it shows as phenomenal appearance or nonappearance. 
1116b When the word of tribute is completed, he immediately calls for chanting the sutras and concludes with the same invocation of merit transference as before. 
People use it in daily life, they are not aware of it, only attributing it to the enlightened of the past. 
The Buddha is called the World-honored One because he knows both the world of convention and its transcendence. He initiated the path of conversion through his entire career by following the standard tradition of the past buddhas. 
When he sat under the bodhi tree, the Evil One’s palace darkened the entire world, but the Buddha made the lotus ﬂower bloom and the wheel of the Dharma forever turn brightly. 
At the moment when one fully realizes what is truly eternal, both existence and nonexistence disappear, enlightened and unenlightened become equally a dream or illusion. 
While myriad phenomena continue to change, past and present become one moment in which heaven and earth are lost in a dazzling ray of light. 
Indeed, what do any of the remote descendants really know? 
May form and non-form, light and darkness, all equally express the miraculous sound of the Dharma, and may squirming worms and living creatures equally realize ultimate insight and meritorious virtue. 
How much more authentic could a transmission be when the realization of buddhahood was directly transmitted to who understood the meaning that Śākyamuni imparted by lifting a ﬂower by its stalk. 
Abiding in multiple illusions, one is obliged to return to what they really are; this is called “ultimate quiescence.” Yet, the mysterious gem always illuminates turbidity and ﬁlth without discrimination, and the precious moon does not avoid casting its reﬂection onto polluted water. 
Great concentration has no limit in space and always abides through myriads of kalpas as many as the sands of the Ganges River. 
Nevertheless, we cannot forget the historical aspect of the Buddha and we feel that his memory is ever more dear to us on this memorial day. 
May the Buddha rectify wrong views entertained by those of us who are remote descendants of his teaching, reverse the trend of this degenerate period to that of Right Dharma in which both concentration and insight are equally practiced, and convert the Evil One and his entire clan to be leading protectors of the religion. 
A Brief Biography of the Buddha The Buddha was born on the continent of India. 
This Sanskrit name is translated as “Sweet Beet” in Chinese. 
The ﬁrst ancestor, a royal sage, was shot with a hunter’s arrow. At his death, his blood ﬂowed into the ground, 1116c from which two sugarcane stalks sprouted. 
Because the king came from a descendant of the sun, his race was also called “the sun’s race.” From that time, after seven hundred generations, the lineage reached the time of King Śuddhodana. 
Because the Buddha had fulﬁlled meritorious deeds for myriads of kalpas, he entered the womb of Queen Māyā by descending from the Tuṣita Heaven. 
He was born on the eighth day of the fourth month in the twenty-sixth regnal year, Jia and Yin of King Shao of the Zhou dynasty. He was named Sarvasiddhārtha (“One Whose Every Goal Has Been Accomplished”). 
On the seventh day after his birth, his mother died and he was raised by his mother’s younger sister, Mahāprajāpatī. 
He cut off his hair and became a mendicant. 
He exchanged his luxurious garments for a hunter’s clothing, crossed the Ganges River to the south, and reached the hills of Gayā, where he practiced meditation and austerities. 
For six years, Siddhārtha toiled hard, maintaining his endurance with only a single grain of hemp and rice . 
He thought to himself that if he continued the ascetic way, heretics would claim that self-abnegation is the way to reach nirvana. 
So, instead he bathed in the Nairañjaṇā River and accepted a meal of milk-rice gruel from the cowherd maiden Sujātā. 
The god Indra made a seat out of kuśa grass and bade him sit on it cross-legged. 
the king of the evil ones, mobilized his army to try to disrupt Siddhārtha’s meditation, but none of Māra’s attempts could prevail in disrupting his determination. 
Thus, departed after saluting the Buddha with apologies and repentance. 
On the morning of the eighth day of the second month, when he saw the morning star, Siddhārtha suddenly attained a great intuitive understanding and realized the highest path, highest, perfect enlightenment . 
(Some traditions hold that this occurred on the eighth day of the twelfth month, the ﬁrst year of Zhengjian of Zhou; there are different interpretations in other traditions.) He was then thirty years old. 
Immediately, the Buddha is said to have preached the Flower Ornament Sutra at the seat of enlightenment in the forest of Magadha. 
The listeners, had not yet ripened, were unable to comprehend the teaching as if they were deaf and dumb. 
For three weeks, the Buddha meditated under various trees and thought of entering nirvana. 
Meanwhile Brahmā and Indra respectfully requested the Buddha three times to remain and teach what he had realized. 
Thus, the Buddha traveled to the Deer Park where he conducted the First Turning of the Great Wheel and taught the three vehicles initially to his ﬁve disciples, including Kauṇḍinya. 
Here he taught the Four Noble Truths, the twelve links of the chain of causation , the six principles of practice, and so forth. 
Twelve years later, at the age of forty-two, the Buddha introduced a more advanced teaching, recorded in the general Mahayana texts , and thereby was able to educate more disciples and consolidate a ﬁrm basis of his sangha. 
By then, having reached his seventy-second year, he began to teach the Lotus Sutra and thereby entrusted his task to his disciples and assured their future realization of buddhahood. 
Yet, in the following eight years, he continued to detail his original intent. 
In the ﬁfty-third regnal year of King Mu, year of Ren and Shen, at the age of seventy-nine, the Buddha for the ﬁrst time visited the Tuṣita Heaven to preach for his mother. 
In his absence, King Udayana, who yearned for his master, ordered a golden image to be cast, and when the Buddha descended from heaven the golden statue is said to have welcomed his return. 
The Buddha’s aunt Mahāprajāpatī and her ﬁve hundred female followers, as well as such saintly disciples as Śāriputra, Maudgalyāyana, seventy thousand arhats, and so forth, felt unable to bear the passing of their master and hence passed away at the same time. 
The bodhisattvas, the four groups of followers (i.e., monks , nuns , laymen , and laywomen ), the eight groups of demigods, and the kings of the birds and animals all assembled, while the Buddha allowed Cunda, a smith, to make the last food offering. 
For the sake of his disciples, the Buddha preached the 1117a principles of impermanence , suffering , and emptiness . 
Mañjuśrī conveyed the Buddha’s wish to Ānanda and brought him back to the place. 
At once, Subhadra came to listen to the Buddha’s teaching and immediately attained the state of arhatship. 
“O disciples, after my death, you must pay respect to the prātimokṣa rules and disciplines. 
There is no lessening of its importance.” He lay his right side on a cloth decorated with seven kinds of precious gems. 
Aniruddha immediately went to the Tuṣita Heaven to tell Queen Māyā that the Buddha had entered parinirvāṇa. 
As she came down from heaven, the Buddha once again raised himself to preach, in order to console his mother, and then said to Ānanda, “You must know that because I fear there might appear some unﬁlial people in the future, I have exempliﬁed ﬁlial piety by coming out of the golden cofﬁn to greet my mother.” At that moment, Mahākāśyapa, leading the group of ﬁve hundred disciples, arrived running from the hills of Mount Gṛdhrakūṭa and greeted him with lamentation. 
Once again the Buddha miraculously revealed the mark of the sacred symbol of the “Wheel of One Thousand Spokes” on the soles of his feet. 
Heavenly beings brought aromatic woods to the cremation site, and the cremation ﬁre continued to burn by itself for seven days. 
Lay followers deposited the Buddha’s relics in eight golden vases. 
King Ajātaśatru as well as the kings of eight countries, the god Indra, and other gods as well as the nāga kings, all vied for acquisition of the relics. 
Thus, they divided the relics into three portions, one for the heavenly gods, a second for the nāga kings, and the third was further divided among the eight kings. 
King Ajātaśatru obtained eighty-four thousand pieces, placed each within a purple and gold case, and enshrined them in stupas he had built in the regions of the ﬁve major rivers that ﬂow into the Ganges River. 
Nirvana Day of the Emperor’s Religious Counselor 1. 
Offerings of incense, ﬂowers, candles, tea, fruit, and delicacies should be carefully prepared. 
On the appointed day, the bell is tolled to assemble the practitioners, and they line up facing the rostrum seat. 
The abbot kneels to offer incense at a portable incense burner, while at the same time the director reads the word of tribute. 
The merit accrued from the foregoing deed of chanting shall be dedicated to the one “Above the Emperor” under the imperial heaven , the great sage who assisted imperial governance by introducing religion and propagating letters, the spiritual ruler who, endowed with supreme virtue, universal enlightenment, and true illumination, unfailingly assisted the throne in ruling the nation, the Buddhist disciple from the Western Heaven and the imperial counsel of the great Yuan. We wish to discharge our indebtedness to him for the compassionate refuge bestowed upon us. Veneration to the buddhas of the ten directions and the three times, and so on. 
The Word of Tribute Heaven inaugurated the nation of Yuan and magnanimously created the great sage as its counselor. 
He quietly helped the foundation of cultural conversion and privately assisted the imperial rule. 
When he spoke, his speech became a religious text. 
When he lifted his foot, his act became rule. 
His rank was among a thousand buddhas, the generosity he extended matched that of earth, and his supreme intelligence matched that of heaven. 
A Brief Biography of the Religious Counselor The imperial counselor of religion, Baheshiba , whose ordained name was Huichuangxianjixiang, was a man of Tibet. 
He was born on the thirteenth day of the fourth month in the year of the “sixth stem and boar.” His father was called Suonangancang. 
During the beginning of Tibet, there was a national master of Buddhism, Śāntarakṣita by name. 
He realized the supreme insight and acquired the supernatural powers, and his descendants equally excelled in spiritual matters and religious practice through successive transmission. 
The rulers of that country honored them as their religious counselors. 
The man of the seventeenth generation, Sasijiawa by name, was the paternal uncle of the master. 
At the age of seven, he gave his ﬁrst lecture and demonstrated his speech, showing himself to be well versed and totally commanding. 
At the age of ﬁfteen, in the year of the “tenth stem and ox,” he came to know that the heavenly mandate would fall to Emperor Shizu, Longdeyuanqian . 
He traveled swiftly on horseback to reach the capital in order to ofﬁciate for him at the ordination ceremony of the Buddhist laity for Xianzong, his queen Zhongwei, and the Crown Prince , imparting special meaning to the event of their conversion. 
After six years had passed, in the year of the “seventh stem and monkey,” Shizu ascended the throne and established the Yuan dynasty in the Zhongtong era. 
Four years later, bidding farewell to the emperor, he returned west. However, he was called back before a year had passed. 
In the seventh year of Zhiyuan, the “seventh stem and horse,” he was entrusted with the task of creating a new set of scripts as standard for the great Yuan empire. 
Since his accomplishment was profoundly satisfactory to imperial expectation, a decree was immediately issued for the prompt enactment of its usage throughout the respective divisions of capitals, provinces, prefectures, and districts. 
The master was appointed religious counselor to the throne, the spiritual ruler embodying the great treasure of the BuddhaDharma, and was granted the imperial seal. 
1117c Once again the master returned to the west. 
Eleven years later, the emperor sent a special envoy to ofﬁcially invite him back to the capital. 
On the twenty-second day of the eleventh month in the seventeenth year of Jiyuan, the master passed away. 
Upon learning of his death, the emperor could hardly bear his dear memory and ordered a great stupa built in the capital in order to enshrine the ashes of the master. 
The one “Above the Emperor” under the imperial heaven, the great sage who assisted imperial governance by introducing religion and propagating letters, the spiritual ruler who, endowed with supreme virtue, universal enlightenment, and true illumination, unfailingly assisted the throne in ruling the nation, the Buddhist disciple from the Western Heaven and the imperial counselor of the great Yuan. 
Preface to the Chapter The reason that each person should enshrine his ancestors is to regard the beginning of his form and life as important. 
Form and life begin with love, and yet forms change in time, and so does love exhaust itself in time. 
Yet the spiritual aspect of the essential nature is never obscured, because it neither depends on life nor does it disappear when life ends. 
Therefore, the Buddha taught that humans must acquire clear insight into this nature. 
And yet, misguided by words and statements, scholars of later periods cannot grasp the true meaning, as if a doctor were to adhere to the medical textbook too well and forsake actual treatment with medicine and acupuncture. 
What value is there in this? 
Thus, any one of us who succeeds in the lineage and hands it on to another must accomplish this just as ﬁre naturally burns fuel or water takes the form of the vessel . 
There is no difference, not even as slight as a single hair, between past and present. 
Doesn’t this tradition emphasize the meaning of original form and life? 
In later days, Zen Master Baizhang Dazhi instituted the Zen monastic regulations so that the practitioners of our tradition could abide by their own standards, and this was, indeed, the origin of the Zen monastic community. 
The Venerable Shouduan of Haihuiyuan Temple advised that it is our duty to enshrine Bodhidharma in the center, Baizhang to his right, and the founder of each temple to his left. 
Look for this information in the introductory chapter of the Regulatory Rules of the Patriarchal Hall . 
The Memorial Rite for the Patriarch Bodhidharma Prior to the appointed day, the practice hall ofﬁcial is obliged to organize the memorial service by collecting contributions and see that word of tribute is composed and approved. 
At the right-hand side of the rear of the hall a meditation couch, a brush duster, and a clothes rack with robes hung upon it should be set up, and at the left-hand side of the rear of the hall a chair, desk, incense burner, vases, incense, and candles should be set up and some scriptures placed on the desk. 
The practice hall novice attendants notify the practitioners of the coming event and post the signboard indicating sutra chanting, and also announce to them: 
There will be the memorial service with sutra chanting this evening, and also another for fulﬁllment chanting tomorrow mid-morning. 
Please be reminded of proper attire. 
Before the evening Zen session, the practice hall bell is tolled to assemble the practitioners at the Dharma hall. 
Drumming signals the special rite of offering sweet hot water. 
The abbot burns incense and performs three prostrations . 
Without folding his sitting cloth, he proceeds to the altar to offer hot water, and, returning to his place, performs another three prostrations. 
Then he returns to his seat, performs two prostrations, and folds up his sitting cloth. 
Ernestly reﬂecting upon the tradition, our religion transmits Zen experience in the manner of direct ﬁnger-pointing and gratefully depends on the reverberation of the subsequent waves of descendants who transmit it. 
The ultimate Way is vast and difﬁcult to name; we hesitate to enjoin this brilliant luster of the Way to any of those remote future generations. 
May the practitioners pray for the gracious assistance of the buddhas by intoning their ten sacred names: the Luminous Pure Dharma Body Vairocana Buddha, and so on. The prayer concludes with the director intoning the following invocation of merit transference: 
We respectfully dedicate the merit accrued from the foregoing prayer to the First Patriarch Bodhidharma, perfectly enlightened Great Master. 
Veneration to the buddhas of the ten directions and the three times, and so on. After the practice hall bell tolls three times, the practitioners leave the hall, or they may be invited to take their seats for an evening meal. 
While the evening bell tolls, the practice hall bell signals the practitioners to assemble and proceed toward the Dharma hall once again. 
The pure Dharma body has essentially neither phenomenal appearance nor disappearance, but because of the great compassion and power of its vow, it shows, as it were, phenomenal appearance as well as disappearance. 
We implore: May compassion shine its bright mirror reﬂection upon us. 
On the ﬁfth day of this month, the memorial day has arrived on which the First Patriarch Bodhidharma, the perfectly enlightened Great Master and Great Priest, entered absolute quiescence. 
Assembling 45 all the disciples and offering incense and provisions, we thereby express our care and devotion for the master. 
We humbly dedicate the merit accrued from chanting the Śūraṃgama-sūtra for the sake of discharging our indebtedness to the compassion which has bestowed refuge upon us. 
We humbly pray: 
Veneration to the buddhas of the ten directions and the three times, and so on. 
Lastly, lay devotees line up to worship the patriarch. 
Early the next morning, the abbot burns incense, performs prostrations, offers sweet hot water and rice gruel, and participates in the rice gruel breakfast, sitting to the side of the patriarch. 
The merit accrued by the foregoing chanting shall be respectfully dedicated for the sake of the First Patriarch Bodhidharma, perfectly enlightened Great Master and Great Priest. 
Veneration to the buddhas of the ten directions and the three times, and so on. 
He is aided by the guest reception assistant, who hands the offerings from the abbot to the incense offering assistant, who respectfully sets them on the table beside the patriarch’s tablet. 
When this is completed, the abbot returns to his position and performs three prostrations as before, then once again immediately goes forward to burn incense and offer a monetary gift. 
Upon returning peforms another three prostrations, then stands, folding his sitting cloth. 
(This procedure is identical to that of the special serving of sweet hot water.) After the special serving of tea, the abbot offers incense with prayer and utters a word of tribute. 
Next, the director invites the ranking practitioners of the east and west halls, followed by the dual order ofﬁcials, to proceed in pairs to offer incense at the incense burner. 
The pure Dharma body has in essence neither phenomenal appearance nor disappearance. 
Only because of great compassion and the power of its vow, it manifests, as it were, phenomenal appearance as well as nonappearance. 
The merit accrued by the foregoing chanting shall be respectfully dedicated for the sake of the First Patriarch Bodhidharma, perfectly enlightened Great Master and Great Priest. 
Veneration to the buddhas of the ten directions and the three times, and so on. 
The Word of Tribute How great was the authentic transmission of the Dharma to China by the distinguished descendant of the enlightened spiritual ruler. 
His insight, “vast, limitless openness and nothing especially holy,” indeed broke the vital point of the pedantic scholasticism then prevalent. 
When hundreds of rivers reach the vast ocean they all lose their singularity. When the bright sun shines in mid-sky there is no shadow to follow anything on the ground. Pointing to the mind of humans, he enabled us to see that “to become a Buddha” means to become mind itself. Experiencing the wondrous path, one forgets words; while, having lost words, one sees the path. 
As this is a greatly beneﬁcial teaching in the world, it should widely ﬂourish in terms of its tradition. 
Making a rare appearance in this turbid world by becoming the First Patriarch, he found a Mahayana receptacle in the country of China and totally immersed him in the grain. 
The robe of faith symbolizes the weightiness of the buddhas and patriarchs and the strength capable of bearing a thousand weights. May a single ﬂower once again bloom in the spring of heaven and earth, so that its fragrance may be transmitted through tens of thousands of generations. 
A Brief Biography of Bodhidharma 1118b The patriarch was born the third son of the king of Xiangshi in South India. 
His family belonged to the noble class, and his own name was originally Bodhitāra. 
Later, along with his two brothers he happened to meet the twentyseventh patriarch Prajñātāra. 
Because the master saw the innate capacity of the patriarch, he tested him and his brothers in debate on the meaning of his gift of a gem to them. 
Prajñātāra told him, “You have acquired the whole inclusive principle and since ‘Dharma’ conveys the entire inclusive meaning of the Mahayana, your name should be changed to ‘Dharma.’” Thus, the patriarch’s name became Bodhidharma. 
The patriarch asked his master, “As I have accomplished the essentials of the religion, in which country should I propagate Buddhism? 
Please, give me a suggestion, sir.” Prajñātāra replied, “Although you have obtained the essential of my religion, you shall not go anywhere far distant. 
Just stay in South India and wait for an opportunity sixty-seven years after my death. 
Then you should go to China where you can set up a great Dharma session to teach the best qualiﬁed, but do not leave India immediately lest you become quickly exhausted by the troublesome environment of China’s capital city.” On the twenty-ﬁrst day of the ninth month in the eighth year of Putong of Liang, in the year of the “fourth stem and sheep,” Bodhidharma arrived in Southern China. 
Suang, the prefect of Guangzhou, sent an ofﬁcial report to Emperor Wu of Liang . 
The emperor dispatched his envoy with a decree inviting the patriarch to his imperial court. 
Bodhidharma arrived in Jinling on the ﬁrst day of the tenth month and spoke with the ruler, but they did not reach an accord in their meeting. 
Thereupon Bodhidharma crossed the Yangtze River to the north on the nineteenth day and reached Luoyang on the twenty-third day of the eleventh month, which was the tenth year of Taihe under the reign of Emperor Xiaoming of the Wei dynasty. 
He stayed in Shaolinsi, the temple of Mount Songshan, and spent years facing the wall in silent meditation. 
No one was able to fathom his purpose; he was called the “wall-facing brahman.” On the ﬁfth day of the tenth month in the nineteenth year of Taihe , he passed away while sitting upright in meditation. 
He was buried on Mount Xiongershan on the twentyeighth day of the twelfth month of the year, and a memorial stupa was erected within Dinglinsi. 
During the Tang dynasty, Bodhidharma was honored by the title Yuangue Dashi , and the stupa is called Kongguan . 
The Memorial Rite for Baizhang Prior to the appointed day, the practice hall ofﬁcial collects contributions to obtain various offerings. 
On the evening before the day, the ceremonial place should be set up properly in the Dharma hall. 
We implore: May compassion shine its bright mirror reﬂection upon us. 
On the seventeenth day of the ﬁrst month, we have respectfully honored the memorial day on which Baizhang Dazhi, Jiaming Huangcong Miaoxiang Changshi, entered absolute quiescence. 
Assembling all the disciples and offering incense and provisions, we thereby express our care and devotion for the master. 
We humbly dedicate the merit accrued from chanting the of the Śūraṃgama-sūtra for the sake of discharging our indebtedness for the compassion which has bestowed refuge upon us. 
May the rare ﬂower of the uḍumbara tree once again appear to herald springtime in the garden of enlightenment, and the insight of the sun extend daylight to forever illuminate the night of dark delusion. 
Veneration to the buddhas of the ten directions and the three times, and so on. 
The Word of Tribute He spoke, it became the law of the land. It exactly marks the norm and establishes the standard. Through tens of thousands of generations, the Way he established has been known as worthy of reverence. 
The richness of the content is comparable with that of the literary works of Shiqu and Tianlu. 
In content, the discourses of teaching and the rules of restraint are combined in a mutually complementary form, and the precision represents a specimen of golden sentences and gemlike phrases combined. 
The rules of regulation are ceremonial forms that display footprints inside the building; they do not represent the manner of footsteps by which men collect silk ﬂoss outside in the ﬁeld. 
He ought to be enshrined along with every Zen patriarch. 
May the victorious ﬂags of Indra in his strife overcome all evil ones and heretics, and may great trees of shady coolness such as Linji ﬁll the Buddhist world. 
A Brief Biography of Baizhang The master was a native of Changle of Fuzhou province, son of the Wang family. 
He sought out Mazu for instruction and training in Jiangxi province and joined his ﬂourishing Zen community. 
Among Mazu’s able young disciples, Dazhu, Nanquan, Guizong, and so forth were called great ﬁgures, yet the master was appointed primary seat ofﬁcial. 
While traveling, he passed Xinwu and took a rest below Chelun Peak. 
A man called Ganzhenyuochang donated land and requested him to stay. 
In the meantime many more practitioners had gathered around him, and ﬁnally he decided to build a temple, naming it Datuoti (“Great Development and Improvement”). 
He passed away on the seventeenth day of the ﬁrst month in the ninth year of Yuanhe. 
It is said that the forest of ﬁr trees appeared to look ﬁery, as if burned, and the beautiful gorge dried up by springtime. 
The four groups of followers mournfully buried his ashes on Daxiong Peak (“Great Virility”). 
Prior to this event, a foreign ascetic monk, Sima (Dhutadhara; Toutuozhe) by name, had chosen this place as the burial site, saying, “Since 51 this peak is linked to three other peaks but has not been fully appreciated for its wonderful beauty, if his holiness on this mountain, it would enhance his stature as a spiritual ruler and command reverence throughout the land.” It is said that the people of that period all agreed with him. 
The Tang imperial court granted Baizhang the title Dazhi Chanshi (“Chan Master Great Wisdom”) in the ﬁrst year of Changqing. 
The stupa erected at the burial site was called Dabaoshenglun (“Great, Precious, Victorious Wheel”). The Song imperial court further added the title Juezhao (“Mirror of Enlightenment”) in the ﬁrst year of Daguan, and the commemorative tower built was called Huiju . 
In the third year of Yuantong the great Yuan court further added another title, Zen Master Hongzongmiaoxing . 
The Memorial Rites for the Founder and the Patriarchs The founder’s memorial day and the successive patriarchs’ religious deeds should be properly honored. 
Whoever contributed to the temple must be enshrined in the Dharma hall the evening before each memorial day. 
The head administrative ofﬁcial should prepare various offerings. 
If the word of tribute is omitted for the memorial days of the successive patriarchs, it is not necessary to conduct the special serving of tea and sweet hot water. 
Prior to the appointed day, the practice hall ofﬁcial notiﬁes the head administrative ofﬁcial to prepare a set of offerings to be placed on the altar. 
The tablet of the patriarch in question must be placed at the western end of the rostrum seat. 
The vast ocean of illumination of the Tathāgata’s insight comprises the waves of whirlpools like the cycle of birth and death . 
The teaching of great concentration dissolves the distinctions of coming and going, past and present. 
May compassion shine its bright mirror reﬂection upon us. 
On this day of such-and-such month, the temple respectfully honors the memorial day of So-and-so, Patriarch and Zen Master, of such-andsuch generation in the succession of this temple. 
By offering various delicacies, we express our care and devotion for him, and the assembly of practitioners has chanted the Mahākāruṇikacitta-dhāraṇīs. 
We respectfully implore: 
May the sun of insight once again shine, illuminating the luminous seed in the patriarchal room, reviving the springtime of trees and ﬂowers [that ﬂourished] in Shaolinsi, and so on. 
The merit accrued by the foregoing chanting shall be dedicated for the sake of the great master and teacher So-and-so to enhance his enshrinement with ever more reverence. 
Veneration to the buddhas of the ten directions and the three times, and so on. 
This was the way they paid their debt, just as citing the three crucial passages uttered by Haojian of Baling became the honorable act to discharge indebtedness at the memorial service of Yunmen. 
The predecessors had profound thoughts, and honoring them is the path of grave importance that should not be abandoned. 
Prior to the appointed day, the abbot requests the head administrative ofﬁcial to prepare a set of offerings and provisions with his own money. 
The evening before the day , the altar should be set up in the Dharma hall in due manner. 
The attendants of the practice hall ofﬁcial are obliged to notify the practitioners about the coming event and post the signboard indicating the sutra chanting. 
That evening, the Śūraṃgama-dhāraṇīs are chanted; those who are from the same province and those who are related in his Dharma lineage may chant the Mahākāruṇikacitta-dhāraṇīs. 
Early the next morning, the abbot offers rice gruel at the altar and participates in the breakfast meal, and upon completion of this rite, the practitioners chant the Mahākāruṇikacitta-dhāraṇīs, while those who come from the same province and who are related in Dharma lineage intone the Śūraṃgamadhāraṇīs. 
The Special Serving of Tea for the Portrait After the noon meal is over, the abbot’s guest reception assistant delivers to the west hall guest resident and the dual order ofﬁcials an invitation to participate in a special serving of tea to be conducted before the patriarch’s portrait that evening. 
As the participants move their respective seat markers to the right side of their seats, the abbot makes a gesture of greeting to request them to take their seats. 
He then proceeds to offer incense and sweet hot water at the altar, and then serves sweet hot water to the participants. 
Returning to his position, the abbot again burns incense, performs three prostrations with opened sitting cloth, and stands up to bow toward the invitees, thanking them for their presence. 
If there are three or ﬁve guests of the west hall, their seats must be assigned symmetrically opposite the dual order ofﬁcials. 
The abbot himself serves sweet hot water to the west hall residents of the ﬁrst seat section, whereas his assistant serves the dual order ofﬁcials of the second seat section. 
If there is no west hall guest in attendance, the ﬁrst serving is exempted, and fruit or cake are served when the sutra chanting is over. 
The retired dual order ofﬁcials must be invited beforehand, and senior or junior practitioners related in the Dharma lineage or colleagues trained under the same master must be also invited. 
Novices and those who are indirectly related are not entitled to participate in the event. 
When all participants are seated, the abbot stands to offer incense and sweet hot water. 
End of Chapter IV: Honoring the Patriarchs of the Zen Tradition The Abbot, Resident Bearer of the Dharma I. Preface to the Chapter Four hundred years after the initial introduction of Buddhism to China, Bodhidharma arrived in this country. 
By the time of Baizhang, however, the Zen school had begun to ﬂourish. 
When the number of practitioners of Zen rapidly increase, unless they deeply respect their teacher’s authority, the rules and disciplines transmitted by the latter may not be rigorously maintained. 
larger buildings were constructed to house them, and the two sets of ofﬁcial positions were created to divide responsibilities. 
In the matter of labor, even the abbot was obliged to take equal part in the work along with the practitioners. 
Baizhang always said, “A day of no work, a day of no eating.” How could this principle represent a life of wealth and riches, amassing heaps of rice or stores of grain! 
Later, however, the position of abbot became a position of high status to be purchased at great price or forcefully seized as if it were a rare commodity. 
We sometimes hear about the tragic retributions that people receive in the next life . 
In the morning, once again reminds the abbot about the proceeding and instructs the guest reception attendant to post the signboard indicating the ascent to the Dharma hall and informing practitioners of the day’s event. 
The usual three tolls of the practice hall bell after the rice gruel breakfast should not be made on this day. 
The practitioners then return to the practice hall and sit cross-legged. 
If any guests are present, the abbot thanks them for their participation at this time. 
Ascent to the Dharma Hall on the Every-ﬁfth-day Dharma Session On occasions of the every-ﬁfth-day Dharma session, the dual order ofﬁcials ﬁrst reach the base of the rostrum seat, go around to their respective order’s position, and remain standing there. 
The abbot ascends the high seat but does not burn incense nor utter the word of insight or blessing. 
If requested by lay donors, the abbot is obliged to ascend the rostrum seat to preach for them at any time. 
Nowadays, those who call themselves “Zen experts” or who say they are “conversant in Zen” obliterate the moral retribution of cause and effect, augment bad habits, and act as if they were in a theatrical performance, even bursting into boisterous laughter, which is very disappointing to any observer. 
If happen to be near government ofﬁcials or renowned persons, a brief explanatory excuse must be made. 
Today, contemporary practitioners, without exception, seek excessive words of praise and appreciation. 
This is especially contrary to the Buddhist tradition. 
If they want to talk about the practical affairs of the temple, they may do so on the occasion of tea at the abbot’s hall. 
One must refrain from engaging in frivolous discussion and annoying others. 
The Evening Dharma Session 1119c In general, preaching on Zen to an assembly of practitioners is called a “session.” In the past, to assist students, Zen masters held such an assembly in the morning as well as in the evening their students could consult and improve . 
Hence, it has been made compulsory to conduct a Dharma session around dusk every day. 
Accordingly, prior to their attendance at the Dharma session, practitioners take their seats and sit cross-legged in the main hall. 
On occasions other than these, for instance, on the four annual festivity days (i.e., the opening and closing days of the summer retreat, the day of the winter solstice, and New Year’s Day), the regular evening session is converted into a “night session,” which is signaled by the evening bell. 
This is called a “small or supplemental session.” In this way, the abbot can also meet the requirements of convention. 
The Small or Supplementary Session From its inception, the supplemental session has no determined place of meeting. 
According to the size of the audience, it is held either in the abbot’s reception hall or in the Dharma hall. 
In the afternoon, the assistant ofﬁcial notiﬁes the abbot, “The supplemental session is in order this evening, sir,” and instructs the guest reception attendant to inform the practitioners and post the signboard announcing the session. 
There is no call-off bell this evening. 
When the evening bell begins to toll, the attendant reports the time of the supplementary session to the abbot and starts a series of drumbeats. 
(The subsequent proceeding is identical with that of the every-ﬁfth-day session.) The abbot preaches on the doctrine, thanks any special participants, mentioning them all by name, and then closes the session with some instructive words of past Zen masters. 
When the abbot descends the rostrum seat, the guest novice attendant announces as follows: 
The abbot, Venerable Temple Master, respectfully invites the ranking west hall ofﬁcial, the dual order ofﬁcials, the retired ofﬁcials, and visiting Zen practitioners to share a serving of sweet hot water at the reception hall immediately hereafter. 
The head administrative ofﬁcial prepares sweet hot water and fruit or cake in advance and has them delivered to the reception hall. 
In the past, when Zen Master Chuangzhao of Fenyang stayed in Taiziyuan Temple, he hesitated to conduct night sessions because the region of Fen was extremely cold in winter. 
A foreign monk arrived one day, and, shaking his staff toward him, said: 
“You have six capable practitioners among your students. 
Why don’t you conduct a night session?” Then he ﬂew up into the air and disappeared. 
The master secretly wrote about this event in a verse: 
At that time, Chuyuan, the predecessor of Ciming, made Shouzhi the head practitioner. 
Ciming lived in Shishuang in later years and used to make it a rule for himself to practice zazen in the mountains after the noon meal. 
Ciming at once hurriedly returned and angrily criticized Fanghui: 
Where did you get this kind of regulation?” Fanghui gently replied, “What can you tell me about the evening session at Fenzhou? 
For this event, a senior practitioner who has just returned for a second residency may be appointed ceremonial leader. 
Allow me sir, to convey your request to the abbot. 
When the request is accepted, the ofﬁcial assistant reports this to the practice hall ofﬁcial and requests him to hand in the ceremonial position chart. 
The attendants of the practice hall ofﬁce collect monetary contributions to purchase three packs of largeand small-grain incense and some sheets of paper to prepare the ceremonial position chart, and they give the collected fees to the ceremonial leader. 
When the appointed day arrives, the practitioner assistant requests the guest master to set up a screen and a chair, either in the abbot’s reception hall or in the Dharma hall, and three incense tables are aligned, with some space between them, before the chair, each set with a pair of candle stands. 
The practice hall attendants are required to inform the practitioners individually about the proceedings and to post the signboard announcing the incense offering for exhortation. 
Prior to the ceremony, the assistant ofﬁcial places over the pillar of the Dharma hall a small wooden tablet with the following notice: 
Respectfully stated by assistant ofﬁcial So-and-so. 
The practitioners assemble in the Dharma hall and stand at their positions as designated by the chart, each carrying an incense case and sitting cloth. 
“May your reverence, honorable master, be seated.” When has seated himself, the ceremonial assistant hands a piece of large-grain incense to the ceremonial leader and bows in unison with the practitioners. 
I, So-and-so, and others are deeply concerned with the matter of life and death and with the swiftness of impermanence. 
1120b the abbot should raise three kōan cases, referring to the experiences of some eminent masters of the past, and then give his own comments on these topics. 
Offering another piece of incense, he returns to his position among the other practitioners, where he remains standing with his hands folded over his chest. 
[At that moment] two groups of three practitioners each from the east and west sections step forward to burn incense. 
The ﬁrst two of the east group go to the eastern table’s incense burner, while the third one goes to the middle table’s burner. 
The ﬁrst two of the west group go to the western table’s burner, while the third group goes to the middle table’s burner. 
[The members of] both groups in turn burn incense and bow. 
Subsequently, three east group members return by way of the eastern side of the hall, while three west group members return by way of the western side of the hall. 
Each group as before slowly proceeds to the very end of their respective sections. 
In similar manner, the next two groups of three, moving up in their respective lines, step forward with their hands folded over their chests, but while returning to their former positions hold both palms together. 
When all members of both sections have offered incense in this way and have returned to their places, they then perform in unison three prostrations with opened sitting cloth and without folding their sitting cloths. 
We are extremely gratiﬁed with the compassion and preaching granted to us by So-and-so, abbot of Such-and-such Temple, and we are most grateful to the master. 
Returning to the central position, the ceremonial leader performs in unison with the other practitioners three prostrations as before, and then once again steps forward, saying: 
Thereupon the novice attendant strikes the drum ﬁve times, and the dual order ofﬁcials turn from their positions to line up before the abbot’s seat, while the ceremonial leader takes his place at the lower end of the west order ofﬁcials. 
When these ofﬁcials have each completed offering incense, they return to their positions and turn to face to each other. 
The retired ofﬁcials and subfunctionaries, having burned incense, stand behind the line of those ofﬁcials who have completed offering incense. 
The ceremonial leader burns incense and performs three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth in unison with the other practitioners. 
Due to a fortunate past life, I, So-and-so, and others have been able to receive your compassion and preaching. 
Next, the practitioners in unison thank the ceremonial leader with a prostration with unopened sitting cloth. 
The Special Serving of Tea and Other Servings after the Ceremony 1120c The guest reception assistant, setting up a crepe-covered desk and a brush and inkslab, prepares beforehand a letter of invitation for tea reception on the basis of seniority. 
After the noon meal, a series of drumbeats signals the practitioners to return to their places. 
Next morning, the abbot once again invites the ceremonial leader for tea, and at mid-morning invites both the ceremonial leader and the director’s assistant for a light refreshment. 
If all members equally participate in the ceremonial offering of incense, the primary seat ofﬁcial takes the role of the ceremonial leader, and for the special serving of tea, the ofﬁcial of the west hall is also invited as an honorary participant. 
Primary Seat Ofﬁcial C. 
General Preaching When practitioners conduct the rite of incense offering in a request for general preaching, the abbot is required to take his seat wherever it is set up. 
After the practitioners have assembled, the assistant ofﬁcial escorts the abbot into the hall. 
Individual Instruction through Visitation (rushi, “entering into the master’s room”) is the way a Zen master examines his students. 
He urges them on when their understanding is insufﬁcient, strikes at their unguarded throat, and presses them with regard to their imbalances. 
In order for the furnace to produce gold, no admixture of lead or mercury should be found, nor should any faulty elements remain when cutting a jewel. 
Therefore, in the past practitioners always carried a small incense case with them at all times. 
Whenever they heard three drumbeats, they promptly went to receive instruction. 
(The practice we have today sets forth six such occasions during each month, namely, the days ending in three and eight [i.e., the third, eighth, thirteenth, eighteenth, twenty-third, and twenty-eighth days of each month], and is intended to provide opportunities similar to those of former days.) When the abbot opens his room for individual visitation, the assistant ofﬁcial instructs the guest reception novice attendant to post the signboard before the morning meal in front of the practice hall as well as in all the quarters to inform the practitioners of the schedule. 
An image of Bodhidharma should be placed in the reception hall and incense, candles, and a place for prostrations should be set up on the left side, facing the image. 
When the practitioners leave the practice hall after breakfast, the guest reception attendant strikes the drum three times with an interval in between the drumbeats. 
He then returns to the next room where he takes his seat, while his assistant, after bowing, goes to stand on the left side of the room and the attendant stands on the right side. 
The primary seat ofﬁcial, followed by the practitioners, burns incense and performs three prostrations before the image of Bodhidharma, and in a close line they reach the master’s room. 
The practitioners follow, one after another, waiting their turn to burn incense and perform prostrations with opened sitting cloth. 
When entering the room, the practitioner is obliged to step into the room with his left foot ﬁrst and use his left hand to burn incense, step forward and bow toward the master, and go to the right-hand side of chair. 
he steps to the left of the chair, makes a bow, and to perform a prostration with unopened sitting cloth. 
He then leaves the room, again leading with his left foot, and salutes the next practitioner, thus signaling him to enter the room in the same manner. 
In the case of a regular ascent to the rostrum seat of the Dharma hall, such personalities may be excused from participation by public announcement. 
The point is that depends on the kind of master.) The rear hall primary seat ofﬁcial usually leads the practitioners. 
69 The assistant brings up the end of the line, enters the room last, similarly receives instruction, offers incense, and performs three prostrations with opened sitting cloth. 
The novice attendant also burns incense and performs three prostrations with opened sitting cloth. 
Thereupon, the abbot burns incense before the image of Bodhidharma, performs three prostrations with opened sitting cloth, and leaves the room. 
Prayer Chanting on the Days of the Month Ending in Three and Eight In the Ancient Regulations, prayer chanting was observed on the third, eighth, thirteenth, eighteenth, twenty-third, and twenty-eighth days of each month. 
the eighth, eighteenth, and twenty-eighth of each month. 
The practice hall ofﬁcial is obliged to make a chart of the ceremonial positions in the practice hall based on ordination seniority. 
When the appointed day comes, the entrance area of the practice hall must be swept and cleaned, and in the afternoon the practice hall ofﬁce attendant informs the practitioners of the schedule for prayer chanting and posts the signboard announcing the event. 
When the abbot comes out from his hall, signaled by three strikes of the metal gong located at the kitchen hall with an interval between strikes, the practitioners take their positions as designated in the chart and remain standing. 
Meanwhile the abbot’s secretarial assistant goes directly to his designated position. 
The guest reception assistant proceeds to the front of the the west order ofﬁcials and, with a bow, invites them to the serving of sweet hot water; he then goes around to the front of the [column of] the east order ofﬁcials and invites them. 
The abbot then comes out into the outer hall and stands in the center, followed by his incense offering assistant. 
the Luminous Pure Dharma Body Vairocana Buddha, and so on. 
the practitioners remain in silent prayer. 
According to the ﬁrst regnal year of Zhiyuan of the great Yuan dynastic calendar, it has been twentytwo hundred and eighty-four years since the time the Tathāgata, the Great Teacher, entered parinirvāṇa. 
Just as this day is about to pass, so is our lifespan diminishing, like ﬁsh in a shrinking pond. 
May you exert yourselves in your endeavors as if to extinguish a ﬁre burning on your head. 
For the sake of the foregoing causes, we shall intone the ten sacred names of the buddhas: 
Turning toward the abbot, they bow before him, and moving to their left they make a round with their palms together. 
Recent arrivals follow the practitioners behind the abbot’s assistant, but proceed only up to the rear half of the hall. 
When the assistant stops behind the altar facing the rear exit, they also stop there and face him. 
The recent arrivals follow the abbot’s assistant and leave the hall by the rear exit. 
The altar attendant leaves the hall by passing around behind the altar. 
In the Ancient Regulations, the serving of sweet hot water was a norm on the days ending in three and eight but there was no evening meal on the eighth and eighteenth days. 
Inspection Rounds of the Quarters The Ancient Regulations stipulated that a signboard announcing “inspection round” was to be posted in front of the practice hall to inform the practitioners when the abbot was going to make rounds through the various quarters. 
In each quarter a seat for the abbot is set up and incense, tea, and sweet hot water are prepared in advance of his arrival. 
When the abbot arrives, they greet him outside the gate of their quarters and follow him into the quarters. 
The head practitioner of the quarters burns incense and bows to him in unison with the others, and all sit down. 
When he stands up, the practitioners perform a prostration with opened sitting cloth to thank him. 
Nowadays, the inspection rounds of the practitioners’ quarters are conducted only on the four annual festivity days and at no other time. 
If anyone is capable of reviving the Ancient Regulations, he should be encouraged to do so. 
It is said in the Mahāsaṃghika-vinaya that the Worldhonored One visited the bhikṣus’ quarters once every ﬁve days for ﬁve major reasons: 
ﬁrst, he was concerned that disciples might be trapped in worldly affairs; second, that they might be attached to conventional doctrines; third, that they might be idly asleep; fourth, to see if anyone might be sick; and ﬁfth, to encourage junior disciples through having them directly witness the dignity of the Buddha. 
Reprimanding Measures The eminent Hanlin scholar Yangyi of the Song dynasty tried to trace the original ideas of the Baizhang Zen Monastic Regulations in the great Tripiṭaka scriptural collection in order to fathom the meaning of their creation. 
Suppose someone assumes an ordained name or , and mixes with real practitioners. 
If a person commits a certain transgression, he may be punished by sticks. 
His robes, almsbowl, and requisites may be burned in front of the assembly of practitioners. 
He should be expelled through the side gate of the temple. 
This single rule is seen to bring about four beneﬁts. 
Second, it does not destroy the physical body of an imposter and is in accordance with the Buddha’s Vinaya rule. 
Third, it does not involve public ofﬁcials and avoids possible legal prosecution or imprisonment. 
Fourth, it does not create a scandal outside the temple and protects the Zen religious institution. 
Thus, the regulations that Baizhang formulated were a reorganization of the Buddhist Vinaya rules and disciplines, which were organized under the ﬁvefold categories of offenses or the sevenfold classiﬁcations of transgressions, as the broadest standards acceptable to the whole world. 
The successive rulers of the imperial courts granted Buddhist ordination to those men of aspiration and strictly obliged them to follow the Buddhist rules and regulations. 
For instance, regarding an offense committed by a practitioner, insofar as it does not necessarily involve the civil authorities, the temple community is authorized to deal with the offender in accordance with the rules of the monastic regulations. 
Since the title of “Śākya” can be understood to carry ancestral authority over whoever bears that title as a Buddhist, similar to secular convention one is obliged to maintain the ancestral rules and regulations and punish transgressors in accordance with those rules and regulations. 
When one’s conduct is grave, the offender may be whipped and expelled in front of the assembly of practitioners; if the offense is light, a monetary ﬁne, or a ﬁne of incense or oil may be levied and announced on the temple’s bulletin board. 
If one’s conduct involves money and goods, his responsibility is pressed with a written record by a consensus of jurors. 
Through just and conﬁdential , the offender may be brought to repent and rectify his wrongdoing by himself. 
If an offense is grave, the offender’s robe and almsbowl must be burned. 
Zen Master Dahui, while serving as abbot of Ayuwangsi, put up an announcement to instruct his director of practitioners’ affairs that anyone who argued with others in an unenlightened way would not be welcome and would be dismissed from the temple, regardless of whether he may be right or wrong. 
In some cases, even if a person is right , he should be shunned. 
If instead he continues to argue and insists upon being right, this is an unenlightened attitude. 
When the evening bell is tolled, the wooden sounding board at their attendent novices’ hall is struck three times to call them to assemble. 
The ceremonial leader leads the assembly of novice attendants ﬁrst to visit the Buddha hall, then the patriarch’s hall, practice hall, and practitioners’ quarters. 
Escorted by the ceremonial leader, the abbot comes into the reception hall and takes his seat. 
When it is over, the novice attendants again perform three prostrations, and the ceremonial leader announces, “Goodbye, sir,” repeated in unison by the novices in lower voices. 
General Preaching for Novice Attendants The ceremonial leader visits the ofﬁce of the abbot’s assistants in advance, and after burning incense and performing prostrations, requests the assistant in charge to request the abbot to preach. 
Following the assistant in charge, the ceremonial leader goes in to escort the abbot. 
All in unison perform nine prostrations. 
I, So-and-so, and others have wished to receive your preaching for some time. 
We implore you, in your compassion, to grant us the opportunity to hear your preaching on the teaching of the causality of dependent origination. 
Next day, the signboard of “general preaching” should be posted at the novice attendants’ hall. 
A seat for the abbot, an incense table, and candle stands are placed in the hall. 
After notifying the novices, the ceremonial leader goes to invite the dual order ofﬁcials to participate, while the ceremonial assistant, leading the novices, receives the ofﬁcials at the hall entrance. 
The ceremonial leader and the hall master go to the ofﬁce of the practitioner assistants and escort the abbot to the attendants’ hall. 
When takes his seat, the assistant bows and stands at his side. 
The ceremonial leader, leading the novices, burns incense, offers greetings, and performs three prostrations. 
Then, dividing the novice attendants, he has them take their respective positions behind the east and west order ofﬁcials. 
After the preaching has been attentively heard, the ceremonial leader, once again leading the novice attendants, has them line up and perform three prostrations. 
They then all leave the hall and stand to the right of the entrance. 
He burns a large-grain incense and performs nine prostrations before withdrawing. 
Next, he goes to the ofﬁce of the assistants and again offers incense and performs three prostrations. 
Finally both the ceremonial leader and his assistant go round to each of the ofﬁcials to express their gratitude. 
The assistant in charge instructs the guest master to request the presence of the temple ofﬁcials. 
After giving thanks for the tea, he once again burns incense and performs the formal propriety of two prostrations with opened sitting cloth and three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth. 
This is the robe of Master So-and-so, which embodies his faith in the Dharma transmission. I hereby present it to your reverence on his behalf. 
The dual order ofﬁcials participate in the serving of tea, followed by the serving of sweet hot water, and when all this is over, they accompany the delegate to the guest house. 
On a different day, at the time of his ascent to the Dharma hall, the abbot takes the seat that has been placed at the left side of the rostrum seat. The ofﬁcial delegate performs three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth 79 and respectfully presents the robe to him. 
After descending the high seat, makes offerings and chants sutras. 
Receiving a Renowned Virtuous Guest Practitioner When a renowned practitioner visits the temple, a signboard indicating “senior guest reception” should be posted, and the large bell tolled to assemble the practitioners to greet the distinguished guest at the gate. 
The guest master reports the visit to the primary seat ofﬁcial by ringing the practice hall bell. 
The practitioners withdraw after saluting the guest with a bow, but the dual order ofﬁcials and the retired ofﬁcials remain in the presence of the honorable guest. 
After these ofﬁcials burn incense and drink tea, the abbot’s assistant burns incense and performs prostrations. 
Following him, the guest’s assistants, novice attendants, serving men, and sedan chair bearers perform prostrations, all in due order. 
Once again the assistant burns incense and serves sweet hot water to the guest and the temple ofﬁcials. 
The guest reception attendant signals the sedan chair bearers to be ready. 
The abbot, accompanied by his assistant, escorts the guest on a courtesy round of the practitioners’ quarters. 
If the guest is from a monastic temple of lower status, the assistant takes the role of escorting the guest. 
The abbot requests your honorable presence at the special service of sweet hot water to be held at the reception hall. 
At the reception hall, the abbot’s ofﬁce assistants are obliged to hang curtains and arrange the seat markers designating the special guest seat as well as those of the other participants. 
The drum signals commencement of the ceremony. 
The guest is escorted to his seat, incense is offered, and he is invited to drink. 
The abbot requests your presence for a serving of sweet hot water and fruit this evening. also invites the dual order ofﬁcials to participate in the serving. 
The abbot’s assistant notiﬁes the participants that the abbot is scheduled to go to the Dharma hall the next morning to express his gratitude. 
The abbot shares rice gruel with the guest and then invites him to tea. 
Next, they visit the abbot to request him to perform the role of introducing the guest. 
Two chairs 81 should be placed in front of the two chairs to the left and right of the rostrum. 
The abbot introduces the guest to the practitioners and, as usual, takes his seat. 
The dual order ofﬁcials proceed forward to salute the guest with a bow. 
The abbot, the dual order ofﬁcials, and the practitioners accompany the delegate to the guest house, burn incense, and express their gratitude. 
The procedure and decorum are the same as those of the usual special serving. 
If the guest delegate is equal in rank to the abbot, they may deliberate to determine the proper courtesy. 
If the guest is senior to the abbot in Dharma succession, the intermonastic reception propriety should be observed, as mentioned previously. 
The abbot burns incense and performs prostrations. 
If it is a matter of the propriety for a person of the same Dharma lineage , the guest must be escorted to the abbot’s ofﬁce and offered the main seat. 
The abbot then has the practice hall bell rung to assemble the practitioners there so that he can carry out the interpersonal propriety. 
The abbot is ﬁrst invited to take the central seat, and the guest performs an interpersonal disciple-to-master propriety. 
The only difference is that a written invitation for the special serving of sweet hot water is not required. 
The abbot’s guest reception assistant burns incense and verbally invites the guest. 
Format of the Invitation to a Special Reception of Sweet Hot Water The abbot of this temple, So-and-so, unceremoniously invites the above titled Venerable So-and-so to a special serving of sweet hot water this evening at the reception hall. 
May you in your compassion especially grant your presence. 
Invitation to a Special Dinner Reception The abbot of this temple, So-and-so, unceremoniously invites the above titled Venerable So-and-so to a special serving of rice gruel tomorrow at the reception hall. 
May you in your compassion especially grant your presence. 
Request for a Special Dharma Preaching The abbot of this temple, So-and-so, unceremoniously requests the above titled Venerable So-and-so to preach the Dharma and teach the practitioners. 
If the guest is a great magnanimous benefactor, such as a high-ranking government ofﬁcial, the large bell should be tolled to assemble the practitioners to welcome him at the main gate of the temple. 
On the appointed day, a seat for the patron should be set up in front of the rostrum seat and a signboard to the practitioners should be posted. 
The drum signals the to assemble. 
The guest reception ofﬁcial, together with the patron donor, escorts the abbot. 
A hand incense burner, candles, ﬂags, and cymbals must be prepared beforehand as required for this occasion On reaching the rostrum seat, the abbot ascends it and sits cross-legged while the donor stands before the high seat. 
The patron remains standing during the preaching. (It is not appropriate to sit down during the preaching of the Dharma.) When the abbot descends from the seat, the patron donor expresses his gratitude. 
If the guest wishes to give alms to the practitioners, the abbot must consult with the administrative ofﬁcials to determine the amount of money required. 
A seat for the donor should be prepared in the practice hall next to the abbot. 
Next, the abbot and the primary seat ofﬁcial visit the donor at the guest house to thank him for his benefaction. 
One must remember how clear and evident moral retribution is. 
In the Precious Mirror of Human and Heavenly Worlds , the following story is related: 
Zen Master Shouzhi of Mount Yungai, in Hunan province, was meditating one night in his abbot’s ofﬁce. 
He suddenly felt scorching heat and heard the noise of dragging chains. 
He then saw someone wearing a ﬁery wooden collar, ﬂames still burning up and down. 
The collar was attached by a chain to the gate’s threshold. 
Astonished, Shouzhi asked, “Who are you? 
One night, Shouyu appeared in a dream to thank Shouzhi, saying that due to the abbot’s help he would escape from his hellish suffering, would be able to be reborn in the world of heaven as well as that of human beings, and would again be able to become a Buddhist practitioner after three transmigrations. 
Scorch marks can still be seen on the gate’s threshold. 
Not only are diverted for alternative purposes, but also, in extreme cases, temple possessions are stolen for personal use. 
What can be done about such people? 
Receiving the Serving of Tea from a Disciple in the Dharma Succession If a disciple of the abbot in his Dharma lineage visits the temple and wishes to serve tea at the practice hall on behalf of his master, his accompanying administrative ofﬁcial must ﬁrst meet with his counterpart at the host temple. 
If this formality is excused, he performs a single prostration with unopened sitting cloth. 
The guest master conveys this request to the dual order ofﬁcials as well as to the retirees of the individual quarters, and posts a signboard announcing the occasion. 
On the appointed day, a crepe-covered table is solemnly set at the abbot’s position in the practice hall. 
The guest disciple enters the hall behind the abbot in order to help him take his seat. 
He then turns toward the altar of the guardian bodhisattva and burns incense before it, then proceeds toward the abbot with his hands clasped at his chest and bows before him. 
He goes around the back of the altar, and he reappears, the abbot signals him to take his seat. 
The guest takes the head seat on the raised platform of the guest reception ofﬁcial . 
Thereupon, the kitchen ofﬁce signals the beginning of the noon meal by striking the wooden sounding board. 
When the noon meal is over, the practitioners clean and put their almsbowls back in proper order and the table is removed from the abbot’s place. 
The guest disciple burns incense at the altar, proceeds before the abbot, and bows. 
A bell signals the serving of tea and when is nearing completion, the guest disciple proceeds to the abbot and presents tea. 
It is my greatest joy that you have granted me the privilege of your special presence on this day for this humble propriety and meager offering. 
After opening his sitting cloth again, he makes a cordial greeting and then performs three prostrations without reopening the sitting cloth. 
He thanks the ofﬁcials in the outer hall for their participation, and once again returns to the altar to offer incense and, after ringing the bell, retrieves the tea bowl from the altar. 
Next he goes to the abbot’s ofﬁce to thank him for his presence. 
Whether he is obliged to conduct the propriety of the serving of tea is contingent on the given situation. 
Arrival of the Written Will of the Master in the Dharma Lineage When an ofﬁcial delegate arrives at the temple with a written will, (the formality of the proceeding is detailed below in part VI, section 17, “Sending Written Wills”), the abbot opens the will and the dual order ofﬁcials console him. 
A ritual altar should be set up in the center of the Dharma hall, before which the abbot offers incense and utters a word of insight. 
With three utterances of grief, he performs three prostrations and offers sweet hot water, and once 1123c again performs three prostrations before placing food and monetary gifts on the altar. 
At the drum signal, following the propriety of the special serving, he performs three prostrations and offers tea. 
The director of practitioners’ affairs calls for chanting the Śūraṃgama-dhāraṇīs and concludes with an invocation . 
We dedicate the merit accrued by this chanting to Great Master So-andso, abbot of Such-and-such Temple, in order to enhance the enshrinement of his dignity and reverence. 
Veneration to the buddhas of the ten directions, and so on. 
It is unfortunate for the tradition that the master of your Dharma transmission has passed away. 
We junior practitioners feel extreme sadness because we have lost a support. 
Nevertheless, may you endure it for our sake and endeavor ever more assiduously on the path. 
For this purpose, silk cloth is to be used. 
As for the ofﬁcial delegate referred to before, either the head administrative ofﬁcial, one of the retired ofﬁcials, the primary seat ofﬁcial of the west hall, or a training ofﬁcial of lesser rank may be appointed. 
Unless a head administrative ofﬁcial is appointed, someone of lower administrative rank must accompany the delegate in order to handle ﬁnancial matters and act as a consultant. 
The practice hall bell is rung to assemble the practitioners at the gate to see off the ofﬁcial delegate and his party. 
A curtain should be hung below the temple gate and seats prepared behind it for the serving of tea and sweet hot water. 
The dual order ofﬁcials and the retired ofﬁcials are invited to participate in the occasion. 
If the head administrative ofﬁcial is serving as the temple delegate, the administrative member next in rank should conduct the ceremonial serving; if the primary seat ofﬁcial or a retired ofﬁcial is chosen as the delegate, the head administrative ofﬁcial is obliged to conduct it. 
The ceremonial host respectfully requests the ofﬁcial delegate to take his seat, and burns incense to invite him to drink tea. 
Once again, the host rises from his seat, burns incense, and returns to his seat to drink sweet hot water together with the delegate. 
When the tea bowl is retrieved, the ofﬁcial delegate rises, thanks the host, and climbs into the sedan chair. 
Then he visits the primary seat ofﬁcial as well as the various quarters, and ﬁnally arrives at the ofﬁce of the abbot’s assistants where he explains the purpose of his visit. 
The ofﬁcial assistant reports the matter to the abbot and waits for his reply as to whether the invitation is accepted. 
May the Venerable Abbot be seated in the cross-legged meditation posture. 
The official delegate burns incense and performs three full prostrations with opened sitting cloth. 
Thereupon performs another set of three prostrations, saying: 
I respectfully wish at this moment on this day that all is well and felicitous with the newly appointed abbot, great teacher. 
He then once again performs three prostrations and folds his sitting cloth. Having responded to each set of prostrations with a single greeting, the abbot then says: 
(The ofﬁcial delegate is obliged to take his seat opposite the prospective abbot. 
The west hall ranking ofﬁcial of the host temple sits at a lower position below the guest on this occasion, in order to show his respect for the ofﬁcial delegate who has traveled a long distance.) When they ﬁnish drinking tea, the two ofﬁcials escort the delegate to the guest house. 
The head administrative ofﬁcial prepares incense, and the primary seat ofﬁcial and administrative ofﬁcials burn incense. 
Our religion is fortunate, and, as we have observed, this community has been made joyous by your transfer and promotion. 
At this time and on this day, we all wish that everything is well and felicitous with the newly appointed master and great teacher. 
When the practitioners depart, the guest reception ofﬁcial escorts the ofﬁcial delegate on a round through the practitioners’ quarters. 
The [guest reception ofﬁcial] then receives the record of the temple’s assets and the gift items brought from the temple for which the new appointment has been made. 
The head administrative ofﬁcial bears the responsibility for fulﬁlling these activities. 
His assistant has made arrangements beforehand, assigning the novice attendants to place the ofﬁcial documents brought by the guest delegate on the right side below the rostrum seat and to set up a seat for an ofﬁcial who will read the documents on behalf of the delegate. 
The proceeding of the event is identical with an ordinary ascent to the Dharma hall, beginning with the assistant’s notifying the abbot and the drum signaling his entrance into the hall. 
When the abbot reaches the rostrum seat he remains standing there. 
The ofﬁcial delegate burns incense and presents the documents one by one. 
He burns incense and then passes the documents to the abbot, and each time the abbot says a prayer before burning incense and uttering the word of insight. 
When all the documents have been read in this manner, the delegate burns incense and performs the propriety of two prostrations with opened sitting cloth and three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth. 
When the table is removed, the master ascends the high seat, preaches the Dharma, and thanks the participants before concluding his discourse. 
The Delegate’s Special Serving of Tea and a Meal for the New Appointee The delegate meets with the new appointee beforehand to determine the cost of the noon meal for the practitioners and they agree on the appropriate ratios of their ﬁnancial responsibility. 
The funds for the noon meal and so on must be transferred beforehand by the ofﬁcial delegate to the treasury ofﬁcial. 
When the appointed day comes, the guest delegate visits the abbot’s ofﬁce, burns incense, and makes a formal request by performing the propriety of two prostrations with opened sitting cloth and three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth. 
I have made preparations for a special serving in the practice hall at noon today. 
May you in your compassion grant me the honor of your presence at this occasion, though I am gravely ashamed of the humble offering. 
At this time and on this day, I wish that all is well and felicitous with the newly appointed abbot and great master. 
concludes his formal request by performing three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth. 
A signboard announcing the special serving should also be posted in the practice hall. 
The abbot’s main seat should be placed in the practice hall; the guest delegate’s seat is prepared at the ﬁrst place on the raised sitting platform on the west hall ofﬁcial’s side . 
Signboards announcing the serving of tea and sweet hot water must be posted on each side of the practice hall entrance. 
Next he burns incense facing the higher and lower positions on the raised platform of the inner hall, and then does the same in the outer hall. 
When the serving of tea is completed and the attendants have left the hall, he bows as before [when requesting the abbot and the practitioners to drink tea]. 
At the ﬁrst opening of his sitting cloth, he says: 
I, So-and-so, have humbly offered this meal and have received your compassionate presence. 
He accompanies the abbot as far as the hall entrance, returns to the inner hall to burn incense, performs three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth toward the altar of the guardian bodhisattva, and makes a round through the aisles of the practice hall, ending with bows in the outer hall as well as in the inner hall. 
The guest delegate at once proceeds to the abbot’s ofﬁce to express his gratitude. 
Next, he goes to the head administrative ofﬁcial to thank him for his management of the almsgiving. 
Once again he returns to the abbot to invite him to the evening meal. 
Later that evening, after the dinner, there should be a serving of sweet hot water and cake, for which the dual order ofﬁcials and the retired ofﬁcials are invited as participants. 
The Host Temple’s Special Dinner Reception for the New Appointee and Guest Delegate The head administrative ofﬁcial convenes a meeting to prepare for a special dinner reception and discuss matters of offering monetary gifts, as is regularly done on such occasions. 
The day before the event, the head administrative ofﬁcial goes to the newly appointed abbot to formally invite him by burning incense and performing prostrations. 
Then he goes to the guest house to invite the ofﬁcial delegate to the reception. 
The wording [of invitations] and decorum to be used are identical to those of ordinary special servings. 
The abbot’s high seat should be placed in the reception hall, with the seat of the guest delegate to its right. 
The seats of the dual order ofﬁcials are at their usual places, facing each other from each side of the hall; the seats of the retired ofﬁcials are across the hall, facing the high seat; and those of the assistants are behind the administrative ofﬁcials. 
Simply because of a single ignorant person, a temple can fall into infamy. 
Farewell Ascent to the Dharma Hall and Reception of Tea and Sweet Hot Water 1124c On the day of departure, the guest delegate visits all the quarters to bid farewell. 
The newly appointed abbot ascends the rostrum seat of the Dharma hall and expresses his thanks to the dual order ofﬁcials, retired ofﬁcials, and practitioners. 
When descends from the high seat, he turns toward the high seat at the signal of three drumrolls and performs three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth in unison with the practitioners. 
He then departs from the western corridor of the Dharma hall. 
The area surrounded by hanging curtains for the farewell serving should be set up beforehand at the gate, and a high seat should be placed within the space, facing the temple buildings. 
The primary seat ofﬁcial takes the main seat facing outside, while the west hall ranking ofﬁcial and the retired ofﬁcials take their seats symmetrical to the main seat. 
The east and west order ofﬁcials are seated on both lines facing the high seat. 
He requests the new appointee to take his seat, respectfully burns incense, and returns to his own seat for serving tea. 
When the tea bowls are collected, he once again stands up to burn incense and returns to his seat for the serving of sweet hot water. 
Inviting the West Hall Ofﬁcial to Become Abbot The guest delegate meets with the guest reception ofﬁcial upon his arrival, and together they visit the ofﬁce of abbot’s assistants. 
When the meeting and serving of tea are concluded, the guest ofﬁcial is escorted to the guest house. 
Next, he visits the various ofﬁcial quarters to complete the formal greetings. 
Such-and-such Temple has commissioned me to invite Venerable Soand-so to become its abbot. 
The documents and letters brought by the guest delegate are presented. 
The ceremonial procedure followed in the latter situation for burning incense and so forth is exactly identical to that of inviting an incumbent . 
Upon his acceptance, the abbot invites the new appointee, the dual order ofﬁcials, and the retired ofﬁcials to a serving of tea. 
Thereupon, the new appointee is escorted to the guest house to receive congratulations from various ofﬁcials and the practitioners in due order. 
Ascent to the Dharma Hall by the New Appointee (If the new appointee is a renowned ranking west hall ofﬁcial or the primary seat ofﬁcial, he is rightly recommended to conduct such an occasion.) The evening before the day , the guest ofﬁcial should visit the host abbot with incense in his sleeve, perform three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth, and say: 
I request you to invite the new appointee to have the opportunity of ascending to the Dharma hall tomorrow. 
The next day, after the morning meal, a table for the ofﬁcial documents and a chair should be placed to the right of the rostrum seat in the Dharma hall. 
The abbot’s seat is placed to the left of the high seat. 
The practitioners are called to assemble by the drum signal. 
The abbot signals his guest reception assistant to direct the new appointee to sit cross-legged. 
(Songyuan invited Yanshi to take the opportunity to ascend the rostrum seat; Xiaoan likewise invited Songyuan to take such opportunity, but in neither case was a Zen insight episode given. 
If the new appointee is the host abbot’s disciple in the Dharma lineage, the abbot grants him a robe and utters a word of insight. 
The appointed disciple, having donned , requests to sit cross-legged and performs three prostrations with opened sitting cloth. 
Yet, having been encouraged to accept the invitation, I feel it is difﬁcult to decline this public imperative. 
I cannot help feeling extremely uneasy about it. He once again performs three prostrations and says: 
I wish on this day and at this time that all is well and felicitous with your reverence, my original master and great teacher. 
After another three prostrations, he folds his sitting cloth and steps forward to bow. 
Whether one is suitable or not is only of relative importance. I wish you the best in maintaining it. The new appointee then returns to stand to the right of the high chair. 
Next he bows toward the west order ofﬁcial and the practitioners, and immediately moves to the right of the high seat, where he offers incense over the robe of Dharma transmission and the documents of his appointed temple, each time giving a word of insight. 
The guest delegate ﬁrst requests the director of practitioners’ affairs to invite the ofﬁcial to read the documents. 
When the new appointee completes the session, he descends the seat, comes before the abbot and formally greets him with the propriety of two prostrations with opened sitting cloth and three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth. 
I am greatly indebted to you and grateful for your effort in polishing my training. The abbot replies: I rejoice and congratulate you in your appointment as the guide in the human and heavenly worlds. 
It increases the illumination of the Buddha like that of the sun. 
99 On this day and at this time, I together with others wish that all is well and felicitous with your reverence, temple master and great teacher. 
He completes the greeting with three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth. 
The guest reception assistant escorts the new appointee on a round through the practitioners’ quarters to express appreciation. 
If the appointee is the abbot’s disciple, immediately after his descent from the high seat he performs three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth before the abbot, and, stepping back, bows toward the ofﬁcials and practitioners. 
If the appointee holds the status of a secondary rank in the west hall, there might be some variation in matters of formality at the discretion of the abbot. 
After breakfast on the appointed day, the guest delegate visits the abbot with incense in his sleeve, performs a prostration with unopened sitting cloth, and requests: 
This morning at noon, I shall offer a humble provision at the practice hall for the new appointee. 
May you in your compassion grant us the honor of your presence on this occasion. 
The guest reception attendant at the abbot’s ofﬁce and the ofﬁcial delegate’s attendant together visit each quarter to convey the invitation and post the signboard. 
The new appointee’s seat should be placed in the practice hall opposite the abbot’s, and the ofﬁcial delegate’s seat should be placed at the ﬁrst position of the raised sitting platform of the guest reception ofﬁcial in the outer hall. 
Signboards announcing the serving of tea and sweet hot water must be posted on each side of the hall entrance. 
At the time of the noon meal, the new appointee is directed to wait for the abbot in front of the practice hall and together they enter the hall and bow toward the shrine. 
The guest delegate follows and respectfully requests ﬁrst the host abbot and then the new appointee to take their respective seats. 
Thereupon, [the guest delegate] burns incense and conducts his ceremonial role as described previously. 
Then the ofﬁcial delegate goes before , performs the formal propriety of two prostrations with opened sitting cloth and three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth, and then escorts him out through the rear entrance. 
Once again he returns to the inner hall, burns incense, performs the propriety of three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth, makes a round through the hall, and bows in the midouter hall. 
When the tea bowl is collected from the altar of the guardian bodhisattva, signaled by three drumbeats, leaves the hall. 
The Host Temple’s Special Dinner Reception for the New Appointee and the Delegate The abbot’s seat should be placed in the main position in the reception hall and the new appointee’s seat is placed opposite it in the center, with the ofﬁcial delegate’s seat to the left of the abbot and those of the dual order ofﬁcials and the retired ofﬁcials on each side. 
The New Appointee’s Farewell Ascent to the Dharma Hall and the Serving of Tea and Sweet Hot Water The new appointee and the ofﬁcial delegate visit the ofﬁce of the abbot’s 101 assistants to secure the abbot’s permission for using the rostrum seat for conducting farewell ascent. 
The abbot’s seat should be placed to the left of the high seat. 
Thereupon, he greets the abbot with three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth. 
Next he faces the rostrum seat, makes a farewell greeting to the practitioners, and in unison with them performs three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth. 
At the temple gate, a special seat is placed facing the temple buildings for the new appointee to receive a special serving of tea and sweet hot water. 
The dual order ofﬁcials and the retired ofﬁcials participate in the serving; the head administrative ofﬁcial is in charge of ceremonial conduct. 
If the appointee is second in rank after the west hall ofﬁcial, there should be no farewell ascent to the high seat. 
Before his departure, he visits the abbot together with the ofﬁcial delegate to burn incense and, after three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth, offers a farewell greeting. 
The farewell serving of tea and sweet hot water at the temple gate is as described previously. 
Establishment of the Newly Appointed Abbot’s Residency at the Temple In ancient times, the new appointee, upon reaching the gate in his traveling attire and hat, would remove his hat, pass through the gate, burn incense, and utter a word of insight. 
In front of the practice hall, he took off his traveling pack, washed his feet, donned a robe taken from his pack, and entered the hall. 
He then offered incense to the guardian bodhisattva and performed the formal worship through three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth, followed by his accompanying practitioners. 
He completed the formality of establishing residency by placing the sack containing his robe and almsbowl at the abbot’s designated position in the practice hall, and then proceeded to the Buddha hall to burn incense, express a word of insight, and complete his worship with the formality of three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth. 
But if it is too far, only the dual order ofﬁcials and the retired ofﬁcials come to meet him. 
The ofﬁcial delegate must consult with him beforehand so as to dispatch a note excusing the practitioners from traveling a long distance to present themselves. 
The evening before, a signboard informing the practitioners about the schedule for the “reception of the abbot” is posted. 
The large bell is tolled and other ceremonial instruments are played to celebrate the arrival of the new appointee. 
When the new appointee reaches the gate, he burns incense and gives a word of insight. 
At the Buddha hall, he again offers incense and gives a word of insight, and completes his worship with three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth. 
The new appointee enters the hall and offers incense, while the accompanying practitioners perform in unison three prostrations with opened sitting cloth. 
The dual order ofﬁcials escort the new appointee to the abbot’s designated seat and perform three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth. 
1125c Next, the new appointee visits the shrine of the local divinities and the patriarchal shrine hall to offer incense and give a word of insight at each place. 
When he enters the abbot’s ofﬁce and takes his seat, the abbot’s assistant steps forward, burns incense, and stands by his side. 
As he completes the word of insight, the attendant places by him a table equipped with a brush and inkslab, while the head administrative ofﬁcial presents an ofﬁcial document . 
The new appointee examines the seal and asks the head administrative ofﬁcial to open it. 
Next he writes the date and stamps over it as well. 
The head administrative ofﬁcial takes the document, and the abbot’s personal assistant puts the seal and table away. 
When the abbot stands, all the ofﬁcials line up as their leader burns incense on their behalf, and perform in unison the propriety of two prostrations with opened sitting cloth and three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth. 
At the ﬁrst opening of the sitting cloth, the head ofﬁcial says: 
We wish that all is well and felicitous with the newly appointed abbot and great teacher. They complete the greeting with three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth. 
If the former abbot, though already having accepted a new position elsewhere, has not yet departed, or if he is staying on in the east hall as a retiree, the new appointee is obliged to conduct the propriety of the transfer ceremony before occupying the main rostrum seat as abbot. 
Ringing the practice hall bell and leading the practitioners, he personally escorts his predecessor to his quarters and peforms a prostration with unopened sitting cloth to . 
The Document for Presenting the Temple Seal Bhikṣu So-and-so, head administrative ofﬁcial of this temple, respectfully presents the single piece of the temple seal to the newly appointed temple master and great teacher. Awaiting his compassionate acceptance. Solemnly written and presented, Date and year 2. The Temple’s Invitation to the New Appointee for the Noon Meal After the new appointee has settled in his ofﬁcial seat at the abbot’s ofﬁce, the head administrative ofﬁcial waits for the moment when the congratulatory proprieties are ﬁnished, then comes to the abbot to invite him to the noon meal reception. 
At noon, a humble meal reception will be offered at the practice hall to respectfully welcome your reverence. 
We earnestly wish that in your compassion you will grant us the honor of your presence on this occasion, though we feel hesitant because of its meagerness. 
The proceeding is identical with that of the special dinner reception. 
The Letter of Invitation to the Noon Meal Bhikṣu So-and-so, head administrative ofﬁcial of this temple, respectfully invites the newly appointed temple master to a humble meal reception at the practice hall at noon. We earnestly wish that in your compassion you will grant us the honor of your presence on this occasion. Written by So-and-so on Date, month, year Format of the Envelope Solemnly sealed for the Honorable Seat New Appointee, Venerable So-and-so 3. Inaugural Ascent to the Dharma Hall and Invocation for Imperial Longevity In ancient times, the inaugural ascent to the Dharma hall was conducted under imperial decree or under the request of a deputy ofﬁcial of the imperial court, and hence such an event was called for with magnanimity. 
Either the provincial judges or the district and prefectural ofﬁcials requested the new appointee with gifts of silk and so on, which were presented at the welcoming meal reception, to conduct the inaugural ascent to the Dharma hall at a certain temple or at its mother temple by providing funds from the government treasury for the meal reception and inaugural events. 
Nowadays, the inaugural ascent to the Dharma hall is generally conducted at each temple’s expense. 
The abbot’s assistant assigns the attendants to set up the rostrum seat at the Dharma hall, notify the practitioners, and post the signboard indicating the ascent to the Dharma hall. 
A crepe-wrapped table with an incense burner and a candle stand are placed to the left of the rostrum seat, and the ofﬁcial documents are displayed on it. 
The seats of the government ofﬁcials should be placed opposite the rostrum seat. 
Crimson lanterns have been placed in the hall, cymbals are sounded, and ﬂowers are scattered. 
If he is not wearing the robe of Dharma transmission, he must raise up the word of insight on the Dharma [that he has written] before donning the robe. 
The abbot is obliged to give a word of insight also before [the congratulatory message] is read by the ofﬁcial. 
Immediately afterward he ascends the high seat and offers incense for the invocation of imperial longevity. 
Next, he offers incense for the sake of the imperial religious councilor, the ofﬁces of the imperial chamberlain and the censorate, the district and prefectural government ofﬁces, and also for civil and military bureaucrats. 
Finally, and only when offering incense for his own teacher in the Dharma transmission, the abbot takes out his own incense from his sleeve and burns it. 
The abbot now sits cross-legged and arranges his robe. 
His assistant burns incense, descends the high rostrum, and bows. 
The abbot’s assistant once again ascends the rostrum, burns incense, and bows. 
The proceeding is the same as that of the ascent to the Dharma hall on the ﬁrst day and mid-month day. 
Through his assistant, the abbot requests the government ofﬁcials to take their seats. 
The inaugural session is then completed. 
The senior practitioner once again strikes the octagonal wooden post with the mallet and announces: 
The government ofﬁcials congratulate the abbot ﬁrst, and are then escorted by the guest reception ofﬁcial to the guest house. 
The guest master attendant brings forward the incense burners and candle stands and places them in a horizontal line before the abbot’s seat. 
After the ofﬁcial delegate offers incense and performs the formal propriety of two prostrations with opened sitting cloth and three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth, the attendant of the practice hall ofﬁce announces: 
The ofﬁcials also perform the formal propriety of two prostrations with opened sitting cloth and three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth. 
The abbot now takes his seat, and his assistant and his own disciples burn incense and perform the formality of three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth. 
Next, the attendants of the ofﬁcial functionaries burn incense and perform prostrations, followed by the other attendants led by the ceremonial leader; they likewise burn incense and perform prostrations. 
Finally, the business affairs workers, the transportation workers, the estate foremen, the carpenters, the skilled workers, and the laborers all come to pay their respects and perform prostrations. 
After receiving all these congratulatory greetings, the abbot pays a visit to the guest positions to thank the government ofﬁcials and the representatives of the neighboring temples. 
He then proceeds on rounds through various quarters in due order. 
The resident practitioners of each quarter must prepare a table with incense, an incense burner, and candle stands, as well as a special seat. 
makes a polite enquiry into the well-being of the practitioners and expresses his appreciation, and is then escorted out. 
The Temple Community’s Special Serving of Tea and Sweet Hot Water for the New Abbot Signboards announcing the special serving of tea and sweet hot water must be posted on each side of the outer practice hall. 
After the noon meal, a special serving of tea is scheduled at the practice hall in honor of your reverence. 
May you in your compassion grant us the honor of your presence at that time. 
He then presents the written invitation and asks the guest master to notify the dual order ofﬁcials, the retired ofﬁcials, and the practitioners to participate in the special serving of tea. 
The signboard announcing the serving of tea and sweet hot water should be posted to inform the practitioners. 
The abbot’s seat must be specially set up in the practice hall for this occasion. 
In the Ancient Regulations, there was no rule about making a round in order to invite the practitioners to the occasion, and it is more appropriate to dismiss this custom, which was only recently created.) Sometime after the noon meal, the drumming commences to assemble the practitioners at the practice hall. 
The administrative ofﬁcial escorts the abbot into the hall, requests him to take a seat, burns incense at the altar of the guardian bodhisattva, and then burns incense before the master. 
When the serving of tea is completed throughout the hall, and as soon as the tea jars have been carried out, the administrative ofﬁcial once again goes to the abbot and invites him to drink tea. 
Returning to his former position, again going around behind the altar, he burns incense before the altar and performs three prostrations with opened sitting cloth. 
Format of the Written Invitation Bhikṣu So-and-so, head administrative ofﬁcial of this temple, respectfully extends an invitation to the abbot for a special serving of tea (and sweet hot water) today, after the noon meal and toward the evening. 
When the evening bell sounds, the abbot’s assistant notiﬁes the master and has the attendants strike the wooden sounding board and drum for one session. 
The practitioners assemble and the dual order ofﬁcials take their respective places. 
The attendant carries a candle and the assistant presents the name list. 
The temple master invites the ofﬁcials representing the neighboring temples, the dual order ofﬁcials, the west hall ranking ofﬁcial, the retired ofﬁcials, the retired subfunctionaries, ofﬁcial assistants, and Zen experts to a serving of sweet hot water at the reception hall immediately after this session. 
The head administrative ofﬁcial escorts the government ofﬁcials to the guest house where sweet hot water and fruit are served. 
The next morning, the abbot’s assistant requests the guest reception attendant to post the signboard informing the practitioners of the abbot’s forthcoming ascent to the hall. 
The head administrative ofﬁcial orders the patriarchal shrine hall to be enshrined and various offerings to be prepared. 
After descending from the high seat, he leads the assembly to the patriarchal shrine hall, burns incense, serves tea and sweet hot water to the altar, and offers food. 
On the appointed day, curtains are placed in the reception hall and seats are designated according to rank. 
The dual order ofﬁcials and the retired ofﬁcials should be invited to participate. 
After setting up the special seats, the guest reception assistant himself escorts the main guest, while the guest reception attendant invites the remaining participants. 
The propriety of this serving is the same as that of an ordinary special serving. 
Extending the Terms of the Dual Order Ofﬁcials After conducting the special reception for the ofﬁcial delegate, the dual order ofﬁcials visit the abbot and express their intention to resign from their ofﬁces. 
He instructs his assistant and the guest reception attendant to prepare sweet hot water and a crepe-wrapped board equipped with an incense burner and candle stand. 
Accompanied by his assistant, the abbot visits the head administrative ofﬁcial’s quarters, and so on, and tries to persuade him and the other ofﬁcials to stay on in their ofﬁces. 
The practitioner assistant must burn incense and serve sweet hot water with utmost cordiality so as to persuade to stay on. 
The abbot should visit the district and prefectural government ofﬁces. 
In the event that he must be away from the temple for some length of time, the head administrative ofﬁcial enquires about the time of his return and requests the director of the practice hall to post the signboard informing the practitioners about “meeting the abbot.” The abbot’s return is announced by tolling the large bell. 
The abbot may send a message beforehand to excuse this formality and upon his arrival proceed directly to offer incense at the Buddha hall and at the shrine of local divinities. 
The primary seat ofﬁcial, leading the practitioners, then visits the abbot’s ofﬁce to welcome him back. 
The abbot’s assistant and attendant on duty in the ofﬁce burn incense and perform prostrations. 
Next, the ceremonial leader together with the novice attendants perform prostrations. 
If the temple is within a town or city, and if there is no speciﬁc morning or evening time departure and arrival, there is no need for such procedures. 
The abbot may return to the hall incognito, in which case the dual order ofﬁcials and the retired ofﬁcials are obliged to visit him and enquire about his well-being. 
Master Wuzhun, at the time of his residence in Jingshan , had a busy schedule of religious activities and arrived and departed frequently. 
Each time he returned to the practice hall in time to partake of the morning gruel and the noon meal along with the practitioners. 
He then requested his guest reception attendant get permission from the assistant of the guardian bodhisattva to strike the octagonal wooden post located at the back of the hall at the moment the practitioners were about to step down [from the raised sitting platform]. 
The abbot is going to make a round of the hall. 115 then burned incense and walked the aisles of the hall. 
However, the dual order ofﬁcials and the retired ofﬁcials are nonetheless obliged to visit the abbot to welcome him. 
This requires detailed inspection. 
Receiving the Invitation from the Dual Order Ofﬁcials and Retired Ofﬁcials for a Special Serving of Tea On the appointed day, the primary seat ofﬁcial, the head administrative ofﬁcial, and the head retired ofﬁcial, representing their colleagues, visit the abbot’s ofﬁce and burn incense to invite the abbot to the reception. 
Next, they invite the abbot’s assistants and disciples. 
The abbot’s seat should be placed at the main position of the reception hall, while the dual order ofﬁcials and the retired ofﬁcials are assigned their usual positions . 
After the meal is over, the primary seat ofﬁcial stands to burn incense. 
If this formality is excused, he remains seated, drinking tea. 
Retirement from the Ofﬁce of Abbot If the abbot is aged and suffers from illness, or if his mental agility declines, or if things do not go well with him, he himself should know when it is time to retire. 
On the day of his retirement, the abbot ascends to the Dharma hall, expresses his thanks, says farewell, descends from the high seat, and, at the signal of three drumbeats, departs. 
If the retired abbot chooses to stay on in the east hall of the temple, his successor is obliged to look after his well-being with the utmost care and decorum. 
When Emperor Lizong of the Song decided to build a temple for his deceased empress on the farmyard that belonged to Lingyinsi, the temple’s honorable abbot, Chijueh Chonggong, retired that very day and went to Lushan, carrying his own travel pack and wearing a hat. 
The emperor sent messengers to try to persuade the former abbot to return, but his effort was in vain. 
Chijueh’s noblemindedness shines throughout the millennium. 
Since a feeling of indebtedness and a grudge are not identical, one should not create cause for later dispute. 
The abbot should also instruct his disciples who wear hemp cloth to refrain from loudly weeping. 
The abbot must request the primary seat ofﬁcial to conduct the funeral rite. 
Excusing all ritual performances, he orders the rite to be conducted only with the chanting of the verse of “impermanence,” just as with any other practitioner’s passing away. 
If the abbot has contributed to the temple, the members of the temple community may remember him with a sense of love. 
Written wills addressed to government ofﬁcials, patrons, or neighboring temples and relations in Dharma lineage must be delivered. 
Yet wind and the ﬂame of a candle do not stand still. 
Whatever I possess are gifts from donors and are not part of the temple’s public property. 
I, therefore, ask the dual order ofﬁcials to take all my possessions and request Venerable So-and-so to be in charge of my funeral rite. 
The remaining materials must be distributed to the practitioners for their service in chanting sutras. 
Date and year Abbot, Venerable So-and-so Format of the Written Will I. 
Succeeding to my present position, pushing and pulling, I have carried it out by a toad’s effort from an insigniﬁcant basis. 
Lightning and dew abruptly disappear. A cloudy mountaintop becomes more and more remote. I dare pray, take care of yourself. Please accept this letter. 
The external world seen in a dream is originally nonexistent. 
However, I am thankful for the illusion of this world which has been an assisting cause. 
May the sun of the Buddha increase in its brightness and thereby make the tradition ever more vibrant. 
Please take good care of yourself. 
Now my lifespan is coming to an end. 
With respect, I send this letter to convey my wish at my departure: May you brighten the honorable virtue of our common teacher. 
As to the religious goal, one must exert one’s own strength and not let his efforts decline. 
Please take good care of yourself. 
Addressed to Venerable So-and-so Title, with Veneration Respectfully sealed by Venerable Bhikṣu So-and-so Such-and-such Temple 3. 
Laying the Deceased in the Portable Shrine When the abbot has passed away, his practitioner assistant immediately asks the guest reception attendant to go to the practice hall and inform the practitioners. 
The Venerable Master, abbot of this temple, left this message to the practitioners: 
“Wind and ﬁre are separated and can no longer reach one another.” 1127c He once again strikes the octagonal wooden post. 
Next, he informs the members of the various quarters about the event. 
The attendant of the practice hall ofﬁcial rings the practice hall bell to assemble the practitioners. 
If a particular person is designated in the will, that person must be invited in accordance with the will. 
The verse left by the deceased is posted on the left side of the shrine. 
At the appointed time, the practice hall bell is tolled to assemble the practitioners for the funeral rite. 
The relationship of the transcendent and its phenomenal embodiment is mysterious in having shown its phenomenal trace in the world of humans and heavenly beings. 
It is respectfully reﬂected that the Venerable Master, abbot of this temple, his dazzling insight like a moon, shed his light over thousands and thousands of miles of waves. 
Our grief is sincere indeed, and accords with the feeling of the buddhas of the ten directions. 
Though we look up reverently we ﬁnd no ground, and our determination does not go afar but returns. 
We have assembled here with sincerity to intone our prayer by praising the names of the buddhas: 
the Luminous Pure Dharma Body Vairocana Buddha, and so on. 
The merit accrued by chanting the foregoing esoteric verses is intended to enshrine the indescribable rewarding state of non-arising, which the Venerable Master, abbot of this temple, has realized. 
Veneration to the buddhas of the ten directions and the three times, and so on. 
The merit accrued by chanting the Śūraṃgama-dhāraṇīs is intended to promote and honor the head of the temple, the Venerable Master’s rank and state of realization. 
Veneration to the buddhas of three times and the ten directions, and so on. 
The Venerable Master, abbot of this temple, has already returned to the true state of quiescence. 
We have all lost our support. 
the Luminous Pure Dharma Body Vairocana Buddha, and so on. 
Twice a day, at morning and noon respectively, rice gruel and rice must be served, and three times a day , tea and sweet hot water must be served. 
Nowadays, popular manners and customs have become corrupted. 
Some practitioners want to be assigned to the management posts of estates, storage, and manpower but do not obtain them, while some steal temple property. 
When the abbot punishes such acts according to the monastic regulations, these evil ones not only do not repent their wrongdoing but also harbor grudges against the abbot. 
In extreme cases, they may even vandalize the enshrined cofﬁn, openly taking the clothing and goods by force to demonstrate their brutality. 
For who ever escapes death? 
How much more should those wicked people who have come for training under the deceased master and yet commit such transgressions be expelled, punished, and reformed! 
If the master of the funeral rite can ahead of time set up guidelines of discipline and reform the regulations so as to prevent such crimes before their occurrence, this would contribute greatly to the outward beauty of all the proceedings of the funeral rite. 
Format of the Obituary Note Bhikṣu So-and-so in charge of the funeral rite of Such-and-such Temple, respectfully notiﬁes you that a bereavement has befallen the above temple, whose abbot, Venerable So-and-so, suddenly returned to the transcendent on such-and-such day of this month. Date and year Written by Bhikṣu So-and-so, in charge of Such-and-such Temple’s funeral rite Format of the Envelope Obituary Notice Addressed to Zen Master, Venerable So-and-so Such-and-such Temple Respectfully sealed 4. Inviting the Director of the Funeral Rite When the invited director of the funeral rite arrives, it is customary to toll the large bell to assemble the practitioners at the temple gate to receive him. 
When he reaches the front of the shrine, he burns incense. 
The dual order ofﬁcials and the retired ofﬁcials escort him to the guest house, and, after burning incense, perform prostrations with opened sitting cloth. 
The latter stands up to burn incense and, after returning to his seat, serves tea to the guest. 
The disciples of the deceased master then line up in front, burn incense, and perform the formal propriety of three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth. 
After them, the workers of the abbot’s 1128a ofﬁce pay their respects. 
Next, the guest is escorted on rounds of the various quarters in due order. 
In general, the position of director of the funeral rite must be assigned to a very distinguished, virtuous practitioner. 
For instance, Yuanwu Keqin conducted funeral rites for Zen Master Kaifu Daoning and helped Venerable Dawei Shangao inherit the Dharma transmission from Kaifu Daoning. 
Appointment of the Directors of the Funeral Rite After the senior practitioner who has been designated director of the funeral rite completes his rounds through the various quarters, he is accompanied to the guest house by the dual order ofﬁcials, the retired ofﬁcials, and the disciples of the deceased master. 
There he is shown the record of the abbot’s personal possessions, the written wills, and so on left by the deceased. 
If there is no silk or other kind of cloth available, respective amounts of money equivalent to the cost of each garment may be distributed under the circumstances. 
By consulting the primary seat ofﬁcial, the director of the funeral rite divides all the possessions of the deceased into three portions. 
The director of the funeral rite must be impartial and fair-minded and must not seek personal gain. 
The accompanying practitioners and attendants cannot interfere in the proceedings once the director takes up his role as required. 
Every day, sutra chanting, offerings of monetary gifts, and servings of tea and sweet hot water must take place. 
In general, frivolous talk should be avoided. 
The practitioner assistant of the guardian bodhisattva keeps accounts. 
Uttering the word of grief “ai.” Serving tea and sweet hot water to the deceased. 
Moving the Shrine to the Dharma Hall 1128b After the body has lain in the shrine for three days, it must be covered with a curtain. 
The portrait and tablet with his name should be placed on the rostrum seat in the central part of the hall, and a platform surrounded by a raw silk screen is made into an altar for ritual offerings. 
In the lower rear section of the hall, the shrine surrounded by hempcloth curtains should be set up, in front of which a table equipped with an incense burner and candle stands is placed. 
Incense should be kept burning constantly and the candles are kept lit at all times. 
There should also be ﬂower vases holding artiﬁcial paper ﬂowers . 
Placing the Portrait, Uttering the Expression of Grief, and Serving Tea and Sweet Hot Water After the funeral shrine has been moved to the Dharma hall and the door closed, the rite of placing the portrait is performed. 
When this is over, and if there is any written will, the practitioner assistant, the director of the funeral rite, and the primary seat ofﬁcial together present it to the practitioners, saying: 
The director of the funeral rite himself gives the will to the primary seat ofﬁcial, who passes it through incense smoke over the burner and in turn hands it to the director of practitioners’ affairs to read. 
The attendant of the director of the funeral rite is obliged to attach the written will to the rightside curtain that hangs in the central rear section of the hall. 
The Venerable Master, abbot of this temple, has returned to the state of total quiescence. It is appropriate to utter the expression of grief together. 
The disciples of the deceased abbot, who have lined up under the curtain, weep. 
When the serving of tea and sweet hot water is completed, they line up in front of the portrait and perform prostrations before returning to their former places under the curtain. 
The director of the funeral rite burns incense and performs prostrations toward the portrait. 
The dual order ofﬁcials, the retired ofﬁcials, and the practitioners then burn incense in turn and perform prostrations one after another, while the disciples of the deceased master also perform prostrations at the left side of the portrait. 
The director of the funeral rite comes to the curtain and consoles the disciples of the deceased, and they express their thanks by performing three prostrations. 
Next, the director of the funeral rite offers condolences to the dual order ofﬁcials and the practitioners, saying: 
We wish, however, that you fulﬁll your task through restraining your grief. The disciples must guard the shrine during the night. 
The director of the funeral rite makes a list and order of assignments for the rite of offerings and attaches it to the curtain in the left-hand side of the hall. 
In general, the funeral addresses are composed by the head secretarial ofﬁcial appointed by the director of the funeral rite. 
Two or three times each day rites of offering are conducted, and no one should hesitate to participate in them. 
In cases when the deceased abbot’s relations in Dharma lineage or his former students approach the gate, the guest reception ofﬁcial meets them, reports their arrival to the director of the proceedings, and only after funeral garments are delivered to them do they conduct the rite of offering. 
Conducting the Supplementary Session, the Serving of Tea and Sweet Hot Water, Prayer Chanting, and the Funeral Offering On the evening before cremation, the director of the proceedings, carrying incense in his sleeve, along with the director of practitioners’ affairs and the disciples of the deceased abbot, visits the guest house to request the person designated as the director of the funeral rite to conduct the supplementary session in honor of the deceased. 
The director of the funeral rite, accompanied by his practitioner assistant, ascends the seat and burns incense. 
If no practitioner assistant accompanies him, the practitioner assistant of the guardian bodhisattva of the practice hall performs the role of assisting in the rite. 
The Venerable Master, abbot of this temple, 129 has entered nirvana. 
This day has already passed by, and so has our lifespan been diminished, just as a ﬁsh living in a shrinking pond. 
All of us must exert ourselves as if to extinguish a ﬁre burning on our heads. 
May you be reminded of the truth of impermanence and refrain from falling into unrestrainedness. 
Veneration to the Luminous Pure Dharma Body Vairocana Buddha, and so on. 
We earnestly wish that due to his retention of the power of vow, he will manifest an apearance as rare as the uḍumbara ﬂower once again, guide the wheel of compassion to sail through the waves of life and death, and help the strayed multitudes reach the far shore of enlightenment. 
Veneration to the buddhas of the ten directions and the three times, and so on. 
When this is over, the guest reception ofﬁcial of the temple calls for the chanting of the Śūraṃgama-dhāraṇīs, and concludes with the following invocation of merit transference: 
The merit hereby accrued is intended on this evening before the day of cremation to promote the status of honor and reverence for the sake of the Venerable Master, abbot of this temple, who has just passed away. 
At the end the Mahākāruṇikacitta-dhāraṇīs are chanted and the rite concludes with the same invocation of merit transference as before. 
The primary seat ofﬁcial invites the practitioners to a serving of sweet hot water and fruit at their designated seats. 
Former practitioner assistants of the deceased master. 
Head of the attendants’ hall. 
Workers in charge of lights and ﬁre. 
The disciples of the deceased master follow behind the shrine to escort the procession, which is announced by tolling the large bell and all other instrumental sounds. 
The golden casket of the Buddha rose by itself and went through the town of Kuśinagara. 
Veneration to the Luminous Pure Dharma Body Vairocana Buddha, and so on. 
When the shrine reaches the temple gate, the rite of placing the portrait in a portable pavilion and serving tea and sweet hot water should be conducted. 
Both require the chanting of sutras. 
The dual order ofﬁcials and the practitioners line up at the gate to await the shrine. 
The director of the funeral rite, leading the practitioners in two columns, proceeds on foot, scattering pieces of artiﬁcial paper ﬂowers to the right and left along the way. 
No one is allowed to touch another’s shoulders or exchange words; all should feel a sense of sadness. 
The director of practitioners’ affairs of the temple calls for prayer: 
On this day, the Venerable Master, abbot of this temple, terminating all conditions for conversion, swiftly returned to true eternity. 
[The casket of the Buddha went through the town of Kuśinagara, and] it is said that ﬁre ﬂamed up spontaneously to cremate his body. 
Homage to the Pure Land of the Western World, Amitābha Buddha of great compassion and commiseration, and so on up to the ten names of prayer. 
We have respectfully intoned the sacred names to help the rite of conversion. 
The essential nature is equal to that of his predecessors; his excellent capacity does not falter even before the buddhas 133 and patriarchs; he helped the junior practitioners, and his compassionate mind permeates the world of humans and heavenly beings. 
With his body comprising hundreds of illusory and phenomenal elements, he is now entering the state of ﬁery concentration . 
Having offered three servings of tea and having burned incense over a single burner, we shall receive this deed and carry out the task earnestly. 
The merit accrued from intoning prayer and chanting is intended to promote the status of honor and reverence for the sake of the late Venerable Master, abbot of this temple, on the occasion of cremation. 
Veneration to the buddhas of the ten directions and the three times, and so on. 
Next, the practitioners from the same native province [as the deceased abbot] chant sutras in unison with all the practitioners. 
When this is over, the primary seat ofﬁcial leads the practitioners back to the temple and the noon meal is served. 
When the noon meal is over, the practice hall bell is rung to assemble the practitioners. 
Twice a day, morning and noon, rice gruel and rice, respectively, should be served, and three times a day tea and sweet hot water should be served. 
This may be continued for ten days or half a month, with the practitioners in attendance chanting sutras. 
Veneration to the Pure Land of the Western World, Amitābha Buddha of great compassion and commiseration, and so on. 
We wish that the limitless insight and compassion of the wide-spreading cloud reveal the truth that in the world of the four modes of birth, there is neither birth nor death , and also preach the doctrine that within the six migratory passages of rebirth there is no recipient such as “self” nor is there any agent such as “person” who undergoes rebirth. 
Having made three servings of tea and burned incense over a single burner, we shall receive this deed and carry out the task earnestly. 
Salutation to the holy community of disciples. 
Thereupon, the disciples burn incense and express their thanks to the director of the funeral rite by performing three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth. 
Next, the dual order ofﬁcials and the practitioners also thank the director of the funeral rite, saying: The temple has had an unfortunate loss with the abbot’s passing away. 
Along with the director of funeral proceedings and others, the director of practitioners’ affairs specially appointed for the funeral rite makes rounds of the various quarters to express his thanks. 
Tea and sweet hot water should be served three times a day, accompanied by sutra chanting by the practitioners on each occasion. 
This is continued until the portrait and the name tablet are enshrined in the patriarchal shrine hall. 
Auctioning the Possessions of the Deceased On an appointed day, a long table equipped with brushes, inkslabs, and a bell should be set up either in the outer practice hall or in the upper and lower front sections of the Dharma hall. 
The practice hall bell is tolled to assemble the practitioners. 
The director of practitioners’ affairs specially appointed for the funeral rite, the guest reception ofﬁcial, and the assistant in charge of the altar of the guardian bodhisattva sit directly opposite the director of the funeral rite. 
Breaking human greed through the insight of the Dharma is the traditional practice handed down by our predecessors. 
Veneration to the Luminous Pure Dharma Body Vairocana Buddha, and so on. 
The method of auction is based on the existing practice, and everyone is required to examine the qualities of each item for himself as to whether it is new or old, short or long, so that he should not regret when no contesting voice comes forth. 
The director of practitioners’ affairs calls out the price of an item and rings the bell, while the attendants look around to conﬁrm the name of the person who has responded to the call. 
Mixing up the papers that record prices and arbitrarily reducing the set price of each item is not allowed. 
Nowadays, however, the lottery is the method used in most cases, as it can greatly reduce the possibility of dispute. 
This method consists of using small pieces of paper on which one thousand characters are inscribed serially, representing a serial order of numbers. 
Each numbered paper is copied in triplicate or has three divisions marked by an ofﬁcial stamp. 
According to the number of practitioners who may possibly participate in the event, the director of the proceedings and his assistant jointly seal these lottery tickets in an envelope. 
At the appointed time, the dircector of the funeral rite delivers the envelope to the dual order ofﬁcials to check the seal, and then it is opened by the primary seat ofﬁcial. 
The practitioner assistant cuts the remaining tickets into halves and places one half on the tray. 
At that moment the primary seat ofﬁcial asks a young novice to pick up one half-piece of a lottery ticket from the tray and give it to him. 
The latter opens it, examines the number, and passes it to the attendant of the practice hall to announce. 
The practitioners now open their half-pieces for identiﬁcation. 
The person who holds the matching number responds at once. 
Next, the young novice is asked to pick another half-ticket from the tray, and the number of the item is called in the same manner. 
The practitioner assistant then issues a card to the alms-serving master who delivers it to the practitioner. 
The foregoing activity of auction and prayer is intended to promote the rank of honor and reverence for the late Venerable Master, abbot of the temple, who passed away. 
Veneration to the buddhas of the ten directions and the three periods, and so on. 
If any items are not picked up after three days, they are again put on auction with adjusted prices. 
The ancient method of auction is also detailed in “The Practitioners of the Zen Community,” . 
Revenue amount Revenue amount Expenditure amount Expenditure amount Auction held of such-and-such items Payment collected for such-and-such items Already paid for such-and-such items To be paid for such-and-such items 139 Total revenue amount Total expenditure amount Balance Such-and-such amount used for the initial seventhday memorial service and for the cost of sutras purchased for practitioners and attendants Date and year Recorded by So-and-so, Attendant of the Director of the Funeral Rite Presented to The person in charge of the account books, the dual order ofﬁcials, and the ofﬁcials of the funeral rite 16. 
On the appointed day, the bell is rung to assemble the practitioners. 
The call for sutra chanting, the recitation of the sacred names of the buddhas, and the concluding invocation are all identical to the rite of interring the body. 
After returning to the reception hall, offerings should be made before the portrait and the proceedings for thanking the director of the funeral rite and so on are as before. 
Sending Written Wills When all the funeral affairs are completed, the director of the funeral rite requests the practitioner assistants to deliver the written wills as special ofﬁcial delegates to the various temples, the deceased abbot’s relations in Dharma lineage, lay patrons, and government ofﬁcials. 
It is desirable to choose only very capable persons for this purpose since the ofﬁcial delegates are obliged to engage in conversation when they meet with the high-ranking ofﬁcials of various temples. 
When the ofﬁcial delegate reaches the designated temple, he ﬁrst meets with the guest reception ofﬁcial, who then escorts him to the ofﬁce of the abbot’s assistant. 
A crepe-wrapped table has been set up beforehand, and the written will is placed there. 
The ofﬁcial delegate steps forward, bows, and says: 
“May your reverence sit crosslegged.” If the abbot gives some word, the ofﬁcial delegate must immediately reply and, after burning incense, perform a prostration with opened sitting cloth. 
If this formality is excused, the ofﬁcial delegate may perform prostrations with unopened sitting cloth in the usual manner. 
Venerable So-and-so of such-and-such locality passed away on suchand such day and month. 
The ofﬁcial delegate sits across from the abbot and one rank space away from the dual order ofﬁcials. 
When tea is over, the ofﬁcial delegate straightens his posture, and the abbot addresses him: 
1130a The attendant prepares a paper-cutting knife, the letter, and the item, which the assistant hands to the master, who passes them [through the smoke from] the incense burner and returns them to the assistant. 
The abbot visits the latter to bow, followed by his assistant and the dual order ofﬁcials. 
The head secretarial ofﬁcial is requested to compose a notice of the funeral rite on behalf of the temple but the notice of the funeral rite from the abbot’s ofﬁce may be composed by the abbot himself. 
The abbot’s assistant must attend to their conduct at each occasion. 
Next morning, the abbot serves tea in honor of the deceased. 
The practitioner assistant announces the event of an ascent to the Dharma hall, while the attendants inform the practitioners and post the signboard at the practice hall to announce the event. 
A crepe-wrapped table, on which the letter and material items are placed, should be set before the high seat and the abbot’s seat to the left of the high seat. 
The drum signals the practitioners to assemble in the hall. 
The abbot enters the hall, proceeds to the high seat, and stands before it. 
When the drumming ends, he steps forward to the incense table, while the ofﬁcial delegate escorted by the guest reception ofﬁcial go before him, across the table. 
I have rushed to deliver the will to your reverence, and cannot help feeling apprehensive of my manner in meeting with your reverence. 
He then completes his greeting with three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth and hands the letter to the abbot. 
After descending from the high seat, the abbot goes before the funeral name-tablet set on the desk, burns incense, serves sweet hot water, makes offerings, serves tea, and performs prostrations with opened sitting cloth. 
The ofﬁcial delegate returns to the right side of the high seat and bows toward him. 
The abbot again performs prostrations with opened sitting cloth, and the ofﬁcial delegate returns his prostrations. 
1130b The dual order ofﬁcials, the residents of the four quarters, the practitioners from all regions, those of various temple functionaries, and those who come from the same native province all make funeral offerings, to which the ofﬁcial delegate returns prostrations respectively. 
He should not, however, return prostrations to lower-ranking practitioners related in the Dharma lineage, the deceased’s disciples, or serving subfunctionaries. 
Thereupon, the ofﬁcial delegate steps forward and performs two prostrations with opened sitting cloth and three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth to thank the abbot. 
Next, the ofﬁcial delegate makes rounds through the various quarters to thank the practitioners. 
Afterward the temple prepares a special dinner reception for the ofﬁcial delegate, in which the dual order ofﬁcials are invited to participate. 
If the deceased master had previously held the position of abbot at this temple, he may be enshrined in the patriarchal shrine hall on the same day. 
If so, after the chanting is completed, the name tablet is carried to the shrine hall and the current abbot offers incense and places it in the shrine with a due word of tribute. 
The ofﬁcial delegate then expresses a word of thanks to the master. 
If the deceased was the incumbent abbot of the temple, his enshrinement in the patriarchal hall occurs after three days of services conducted before the remains at the reception hall, during which time the new abbot has arrived. 
After burning incense and drinking tea, the representing ofﬁcial sits properly upright and states the purpose of his visit. 
After the rite of offerings and the service of sutra chanting at the Dharma hall, where the abbot conducts the proceedings with the proper word of tribute, the remainder of the proceeding is identical to that described above. 
After tea, the practice hall bell is rung to assemble the practitioners, and the large bell is tolled to send off the master of the funeral rite at the temple gate. 
Appointing the New Abbot The incumbent and retired dual order ofﬁcials meet for tea at the ofﬁce of the head administrative ofﬁcial to discuss the matter of selecting a prospective candidate for the position of abbot. 
It is customary to select a person who is well qualiﬁed by his authentic insight, virtue, seniority, integrity, and, most importantly, by his ability to fulﬁll the practitioners’ trust and expectations. 
These people seek to monopolize the position of abbot through insidious methods of inﬂuence, bribery, and scheming. 
To repeat, one must refrain from this kind of activity. 
Zen Master Mingjiao said: 
The monastic order and its institutional structures are the material basis for maintaining the Dharma. 
The Dharma means the path of the Great Sage . 
The material basis and the instrument become meaningful only when practitioners begin to put them to good use. 
It is inevitable that by improving the instrument one improves the material basis; and that by improving the material basis, one may improve the instrument. 
When both factors are improved and become good, one is obliged to maintain their excellence and abide in them. 
In ancient times, the resident bearer of the Dharma at Vulture Peak was Mahākāśyapa, while that of the Bamboo Forest was Śāriputra. 
Due to the greatness of these masters, the Dharma of the Sage continued to exist for a long time. 
Since the Sage entered nirvana so many generations have passed that we have long since become unable to trace them. 
By fortunate coincidence, we in the Zen tradition have the name of zhuchi and its authority and beneﬁt. 
Throughout the land, however, everything has become conventional, crowded, and confused. 
Unless those of us in the position of guarding the institution are watchful and selective, it will be impossible to prevent the original spirit of the Sage and his Dharma from declining, no matter how earnestly we wish to maintain and uphold it. 
This would be most lamentable. 
What else can I wish for? 
The Abbot, Resident Bearer of the Dharma End of Fascicle Three 147 1130cFascicle Four Chapter VI The Dual Order Ofﬁces I. Preface to the Chapter The dual order ofﬁces were established to manage various things for the sake of the member practitioners , so that he may engage himself in teaching the essentials of the religion, promulgating the path of practice, and embellishing the patriarchal tradition. 
Insofar as the handling of money and rice storage and experiencing various duties are concerned, no one fails to acquire good training through worldly matters as well as non-worldly religious matters. 
In the past, the east and the west order ofﬁces exchanged their positions and reciprocated their functions. 
It is, therefore, wrong that today the ofﬁcials are divided into the two orders. 
In extreme cases, the two groups compete against each other, allowing no compatibility if either one’s inﬂuence tilts to the stronger or weaker side. 
The Training Faculty of the West Order 1. The Primary Seat Ofﬁcial of the Front Part of the Practice Hall 1131a The primary seat ofﬁcial is the model standard of the monastic institution, comparable to the visual organ of humans and gods. 
He is obliged to advise the treasury as to whether or not each meal (i.e., rice gruel in the morning and rice at noon) is prepared well. 
When the community ceases to comply with normative propriety, he may have to show what punishment is mandated by the regulations. 
Compassionate toward the aged, the sick, and the dying, he should take care of them up to their funeral rites. 
As a whole, he must be ready to act practically in all matters that concern the practitioners, like a collar attached to all clothes or a controlling rope attached to an entire net. 
This is called “acting for the sake of others by forsaking one’s own.” Mañjuśrī Bodhisattva, though he was the teacher of the seven past buddhas, agreed to become the primary seat ofﬁcial for an assembly of disciples and helped Śākyamuni Buddha accomplish the path by leading his disciples to religious conversion. 
Zen Master Muzhou became the primary seat ofﬁcial under Huangbi, and Yunmen under Lingshu, whereby they made the foremost position luminous and clear and thus left lessons for those of later periods. 
It is said in the Collection of Records of the Patriarchal Courtyard : 
The shouzuo is the “foremost elder” in the ancient tradition. 
In the Zen tradition today, the person elected as the primary seat ofﬁcial should necessarily be one who has already achieved the Buddhist insight regarding the nature of self, and is able to command his fellow practitioners’ respect and obedience in terms of his excellence in both moral virtue and religious training. 
The Primary Seat Ofﬁcial of the Rear Part of the Practice Hall Holding a seat on the rear raised platform, the primary seat ofﬁcial of the back part of the hall assists the primary seat ofﬁcial of the front part of the hall in upholding community morale for the pursuit of the goal. 
His manner of conduct ornaments the rules and regulations as the model for the practitioners. 
Twice a day, at the time of the morning rice gruel and the rice meal at noon, and also at the time of zazen practice, he must enter and depart from the hall through the rear exit. 
Ascending the rostrum seat in the Dharma hall on a special day, he invites the ofﬁcial of the rear part of the hall to move to the front part of the hall. 
For zazen practice and for the period of zazen preceding the evening session, he must enter the hall at the time of the third strike of the wooden sounding block located at the practitioners’ quarters. 
It is not necessary to strike the wooden sounding block located at his quarters on each occasion. 
The rest is identical with the duties of the front hall primary seat ofﬁcial. 
The Head Secretarial Ofﬁcial In the Ancient Regulations this ofﬁce was called “shuzhuang,” and its function was to be in charge of all literary composition, including nearly all the signboard announcements to be posted at the temple gate, letters of correspondence, and verses of prayers and invocations. 
Whoever became the abbot of a renowned large temple would have likely been so appointed under the edict of the imperial court, and he had to carry with him a written form of thanks . 
Yet the abbot must be fully in charge of the great Dharma and cannot divert his attention to literary composition. 
Originally this particular position was adopted from military headquarters, where generals had a secretarial ofﬁce in charge of recording the names of soldiers, their duties, and so on. 
This is called the private secretarial function of the abbot’s ofﬁce. 
Again, another known example was Qingyuan , who was appointed to this position under Zen Master Fayan of Mount Dongshan . 
The latter wished to glorify the title of the secretarial position by having Qingyuan, who was well versed in non-Buddhist literature, assist him in disseminating Zen in the religious world. 
Moreover, Dahui Zonggao also previously held a similar position. 
In general, it is satisfactory if the holder of this position tries to follow these three major ﬁgures as models of conduct. 
The Tripiṭaka Hall Ofﬁcial This ofﬁcial should handle the library of sacred scriptures (i.e., the Tripiṭaka sutra building) and must also be an expert in the scholarship of scriptural interpretation. 
Today, however, practitioners read scriptures at the practitioners’ quarters, hence no table or chair is set up in the scriptural hall. 
Reﬂecting upon the origins of our Zen tradition, its essence was long since declared as having been transmitted outside verbal or written teachings. 
So why are some practitioners assigned to be in charge of the scriptural library? 
The answer is that whatever the Buddha said to his disciples and whatever he prescribed for their conduct became the teachings and regulations . 
Especially because our tradition claims that the ultimate experience, the supreme insight, cannot be trapped by the constraints of language but transcends forms of speech and action. 
This is called the “principle of neither adherence nor rejection” . 
The Guest Reception Ofﬁcial This ofﬁcial deals with the reception of high-ranking guests. 
He then sends his novice attendant to inform the abbot about such visitors. 
The transient guest quarters , which come under this ofﬁce, must be kept neat as to the bed curtains, furnishings, lamp oil, and charcoal for burning. 
If he encounters the situation of a death among the guest practitioners, he must take charge of the funeral account with the help of his practitioner assistant. 
If one of the new arrivals dies, he assumes the role of the director of the funeral rite for the deceased. 
The Bath Hall Ofﬁcial In general, on the day designated for bathing, a signboard should be posted before the noon meal to inform the practitioners. 
In winter months, bathing should be scheduled once every ﬁve days, while during the hot season it should be scheduled every day to wash away sweat. 
He assigns the novice attendant of the ceremonial leader to be in charge of the day. 
After the wooden sounding blocks are struck three times in succession in various parts of the corridors throughout the temple, a series of drumrolls follows, indicating that the time for the practitioners to bathe has arrived. 
Next, a second series of drumrolls signals the time for the training faculty ofﬁcials to bathe. 
The third series of drumrolls signals the time for the novice attendants to bathe. 
The fourth series of drumrolls signals the time for the lay workers to bathe, and the very last members to bathe are the attendants who supervise the workers and the administrative ofﬁcials. 
As to the boiler, after the bathing has been completed the ﬁre must be suppressed by sprinkling water carefully over the ﬂames and coals, and the hearth cleaned and dried. 
The order of bathing must be speciﬁed on the signboard outside the bathroom. (Nowadays, it is believed that the abbot is supposed to bathe after the members of the training faculty have all ﬁnished, and that the administrative ofﬁcials are supposed to bathe after the novice attendants have all ﬁnished. 
This is wrong. 
If the abbot wishes for some reason to take his bath at the same time as the training faculty members, no separating screen is required between them. 
He does not go into a private room but disrobes at the front section of the dressing room.) 1131c A small wooden sounding board should be hung inside the room, with instructions written on a tablet posted next to it, reading: “One strike: 
add hot water; two strikes: 
This is the standard signal.” When a donor donates the cost of bathing for the practitioners, a service of sutra chanting should be performed, followed by an invocation of merit transference. 
The Shrine Hall Ofﬁcial The practitioner at this ofﬁce is in charge of handling the incense burners and candle stands in the various shrine halls, and keeps everything neat and tidy by wiping dust from these items and the desks. 
When it becomes windy, he must extinguish the incense burners and candles, and tie up the bottom of the banners to prevent them from blowing near the ﬂames of lamps and lights. 
Diverting money offered by donors for incense for other purposes of the temple is forbidden. 
On the commemorative day of the Buddha’s birthday, he is obliged to prepare the sweet water to be used by the practitioners to bathe the statue of the infant Buddha, and on the four monthly days of religious observance he must also open the doors of the shrine halls so that general visitors may pay their respects. 
The Incense Offering Assistant, the Secretarial Record Assistant, and the Guest Reception Assistant The functions of these practitioner assistants are the closest and most intimate with the daily life of the abbot. 
Observing their master’s practice of the path and virtue, listening to his teaching and instruction in the morning and evening, and thereby closely guarded from undesirable inﬂuence while encouraged by desirable inﬂuence, they may aspire to reach the great goal of the Dharma and path . 
Next, it is the duty of the assistant ofﬁcial in charge of the secretarial record to compose the abbot’s correspondence. 
When neither the director of practitioners’ affairs nor the guest reception ofﬁcial is available the needs of the practitioners, or if [these ofﬁcials] are temporarily absent from the temple, the abbot’s three assistant ofﬁcials are obliged to act as their proxies according to the foregoing prescribed conduct. 
If absence is brief , they do not leave their ofﬁcial positions. 
The Personal Managerial Assistant Many of our predecessors appointed to this position a well-trained person experienced in monastic life. 
There is an episode about Mian, who appointed Qingruo as his personal managing assistant and acquired Songyuan as his Dharma heir through this assistant. 
Nowadays, many abbots frequently appoint an inexperienced junior practitioner to this position, and such appointments often result in damaging the virtuous name of an abbot and in serious mismanagement. 
One must be cautious about this. 
The Medicinal Care Assistant 1132a This practitioner assistant attends the abbot with the duty of prescribing medicine at all times. 
He assists him also in dealing with things around him and helps the managerial assistant. 
A mature person, humble and courteous in nature, should be appointed to this position. 
The Assistant in Charge of the Image of the Guardian Bodhisattva (This ofﬁcial is not part of the ofﬁcial order, stays behind the practitioners in the practice of the path, and takes meals in the outer hall.) It is desirable to appoint a person devoted to the path of practice [to this post]. 
He is obliged to prepare and offer meals twice a day, offering the sublime image morning rice gruel and rice at noon; to strike the octagonal wooden post with the mallet located at the back of the practice hall; to check the seats of the practitioners prior to zazen practice; and to reduce the lighting during the night. 
Or , he may strike the octagonal wooden post with the mallet and intone the names of the buddhas. 
When the two elder practitioners Tuigeng and Duanqiao were practitioners, they were once appointed to this position. 
They were able to cultivate good associations with their fellow practitioners and thereby encouraged them to progress in the practice of the path. 
Later on, however, due to the fact that the temples, in general, became larger and the number of resident practitioners increased, the present ofﬁce of head administrative ofﬁcial was added to oversee all aspects of the administration. 
in charge of replenishing the incense and lighting materials to be used in the morning and evening, receiving government ofﬁcials and patron donors, keeping the record of accounts dealing with revenue and expenditure in cash or in kind , and always working to maintain the annual ﬁscal balance. 
He reprimands and instructs the novice attendants and workmen, rather than unreasonably punishing them by whip. 
Even when they deserve disciplinary action and punishment, he should instead consult with others about the matter, applying due consideration and mercy, and give warnings. 
In the past, when the monastic institution was at the height of its vitality, there were many instances in which a west hall ofﬁcial, a primary seat ofﬁcial, or a secretarial ofﬁcial was invited to take this position, and in turn, the administrative head was invited to take the primary seat ofﬁce or the secretarial ofﬁce. 
Otherwise, an appointee for this position must be qualiﬁed by having a high ordination age, must be well experienced in life and tradition, be clean and capable, public-minded and courteous, not to mention having the practitioners’ respect and obedience. 
Accordingly, in earlier days there were no more than ﬁve or six retired ofﬁcials in each temple who stayed in the private quarters or in the retirees’ hall. 
The three qualiﬁcations of administrative ofﬁcials are comparable to the huge ropes that are linked to ﬁshing nets. 
It is difﬁcult to administer the things that belong to the sangha. 
I (the Buddha himself) should allow only two kinds of people to be in charge of the things that belong to the Three Treasures: 
1) arhat (alohan; saint) , 2) srotaāpanna , one who has reached the initial state of transcendence, and this is further twofold: 
a) one who holds fast the moral and religious rules and disciplines and knows karmic retribution; and b) one who adheres to repentance [of all his actions], fearing that he might be still subjected to some offense after this life. 
He must determine whether or not the ordination certiﬁcate that each practitioner presents when applying for residency is authentic. 
He must direct his mind with utmost care toward the sick and the deceased. 
Twice each day he goes to the practice hall for meals. 
Upon hearing the sound of the bell located in front of the practice hall, he leaves his seat in the outer hall, enters the inner hall, offers incense before the altar of the guardian bodhisattva using his left hand, and stepping back two and a half steps, bows toward the altar. 
He then stands with palms joined to the side of the wooden post equipped with its mallet. 
First, he looks at the prayer invocation of the day and the names and the localities of the deities to whom it is addressed. 
When the sound of the bell and drum end, he makes the ﬁrst strike on the octagonal post with the mallet, whereupon the practitioners open their almsbowls. 
the Luminous Pure Dharma Body Vairocana Buddha, the Buddha with the Perfect Reward Body, and so on. 
As each name is intoned, he strikes the post with the mallet with his right hand, which should not be raised more than ﬁve inches from the post. 
At the moment when the primary seat ofﬁcial ﬁnishes reciting the third verse of the “almsgiving prayer” , he turns and goes to stand by the head position of the raised platform at the back of the rear hall. 
When the ﬁrst serving is completed throughout the hall, he steps forward and strikes the wooden post with the mallet once again, goes with palms joined before the altar of the guardian bodhisattva, and bows. 
This gesture conveys that the sangha has received the alms gift from the donor. 
Also, in the Vinaya in Ten Chapters , it is said that because no one in the monks’ hall knew the time, the practice of indicating the time by striking the wooden sounding board was instituted. 
Also, in the Treatise on Vocal Sound , is interpreted as “the order” or “proceedings,” namely, one who knows the proceedings of the monastic events. 
The Treasury Ofﬁcial In the Ancient Regulations, this position was called kutou, “kitchen storage master.” Today, in many temples it is still called “cupboard master” , while in the northern region it is called “wealth holder” . 
In actuality, these are all the same position. 
He oversees the novice attendants in their daily calculation of the accounts concerning revenues and expenditures, and has one of them present the day’s accounts to the abbot. 
This is called the “daily accounts” . 
There are other accounts, such as an account closed every tenth day , an account closed monthly , and the annual account, inclusive of all others, that concerns the yearly revenues and expenditures. 
In general, the temple’s properties and commodities, no matter how small, have to be shared by all the practitioners in the ten directions (i.e., all regions, everywhere). 
The treasury ofﬁcial is obliged to select subordinates, whether senior or junior, who are alert and energetic in mind, skilled in calligraphy and accounting, and who are honest in nature and have integrity. 
Any items required for the sick must be provided at once. 
If the stores are damaged by sparrows and mice due to carelessness, or if rice and wheat grain become wet because of negligence, and if there are those who do not comply with the standard service for prompt supply of each of these items as well as for their careful preservation, the abbot is obliged to bring any such unﬁt personnel under his control and thereby deal with them over the course of time. 
In preparation and serving, he must always maintain sanitary standards with utmost care. 
Instructing the novice attendants to keep the rules, he must not allow them to become idle and negligent in matters of public action (i.e., serving food to the practitioners ), or participating in physical labor . 
The kitchen ofﬁcial must treat farmworkers kindly, and at planting time, , should give them some reward and equal beneﬁt among themselves. 
In general, he is obliged to carry out repairs and restoration from yearly damage and deterioration, such as roof leakage, that occur to the temple buildings and various resident quarters. 
Clerical and construction manpower must be calculated in regard to the degree of progress, so as to prevent idle workers, nonproductive food expenditure, robbing of the public fund, and damage to the temple institution. 
He must oversee security measures for the estate farms and cottages; the mills for grinding and hulling grain; the cattle, boats, and carts for transportation; and policing against ﬁre, theft, and robbery. 
By sending messengers, reward and punishment must be properly accorded for the kinds of work done. 
Honest service and hard work must be especially rewarded. 
If there is a large-scale construction project, this ofﬁcial must appoint assisting members to help handle the matter. 
The Head Ofﬁcial of the Practitioners’ Quarters The duty of this head ofﬁcial is to manage the scriptures and household items for the practitioners’ quarters: 
The associate head ofﬁcial of the quarters takes his seat symmetrically a little away from the head ofﬁcial in the same line, while the master of the ﬁrst quarters and the master of the second quarters take their seats to the right and left of the room, facing each other. 
The master of the second quarters steps forward to burn incense and returns to his seat. 
The manner of burning incense and serving the sweet hot water is the same as for a regular occasion. 
The Master of the Quarters and Associate Master of the Quarters In order to make the daily life of the practitioners comfortable, the head ofﬁcial of the practitioners’ quarters should assign their respective seating spaces in accordance with ordination seniority, inviting each member from lower to higher. 
Assigned on a rotation shift every ten days, the master of the quarters assists the head ofﬁcial of the quarters in carrying out these tasks. 
He must not allow any nonresidents from outside to stay in the quarters overnight or to bring things there for sale. 
The Inﬁrmary Ofﬁcial This ofﬁcial is in charge of nursing the sick. 
He provides them with hot water, medicine, oil lamps for lighting, charcoal and ﬁre, rice gruel and rice as well as all ﬂavoring items , making these items available for their use at all times. 
Among the eight kinds of ﬁelds of merit , attending to the sick is the foremost. 
Head of Cleaning The tasks of sweeping the grounds, cleansing the air with incense, replacing used bamboo scrapers with new ones, cleaning the lavatories, and boiling and adding water must all be carried out whenever required. 
Even when things become somewhat messy, the task is to immediately restore the original cleanliness. 
He is obliged to inspect washcloths and pails and change them if necessary. 
The post of head of cleaning has been vacated. To volunteer for this, please put up your name. Someone wishing to volunteer takes the board to the director of practitioners’ affairs to express his intent. 
The Fundraising Ofﬁcial In general, monastic temples where practitioners live always have the problem of being short of funds. 
The Head of the Farmyard Unhesitatingly takes the lead in heavy physical labor. 
He cultivates the soil, sows seeds for vegetable crops, irrigates the ﬁelds when necessary, and thereby provides a steady supply of fresh vegetables and so on to the kitchen hall throughout the year. 
The Head of Mill Operations is in charge of hulling and grinding grain. 
His function is indispensably related to the supply of rice and noodles for the practitioners. 
He also supplies hand cloths, water trays, lamps, and dental powder so that there is no shortage. 
In the winter months, it is necessary to dry the washed hand towels. 
The Head of the Charcoal Supply is in charge of securing kindling and charcoal before the season in order to protect practitioners from severe cold weather. 
The Head of Estate Management is obliged to inspect the demarcation of the temple’s rice ﬁelds, repair the estate cottages, supervise farming, and settle disputes with the farmers. 
In recent times, innumerable evils have been observed to happen in the affairs of many temples, and the most extreme cases have involved estate management. 
The following three points brieﬂy explain the extent of the problem. 
The common characteristic of this evil, ﬁrst and foremost, in all temples, is the fact that the post of estate management is the object of ﬁerce competition. 
Accordingly, some hold grudges against the abbot for not appointing them to the post, and they create discord between superiors and subordinates. 
This is the second evil. 
Even if a mature and capable person is appointed , he is obliged to deal with the prefectural and district governments, and will likely have to deal with the clerks of local governments, in the city or village, or neighboring wealthy landowners. 
Even when there has been no clear expenditure, by cunning contrivance a deﬁcit may result, and there is no beneﬁt whatsoever in this case to the temple or to the person in regard to his own religious goals. 
Thus, the expense for running the estate often takes half of the temple’s entire budget. 
This is the third evil. 
It is never the case that temples assign members widely in various parts of the estate operation in the way a wealthy family uses its clan members extensively. 
A temple estate may have a group of farmers at the time of sowing, a group of supervisors for farming, and at harvest time the temple sends a practitioner in charge of revenue and his attendants for the task. 
This way not only saves the cost of manpower but also sometimes prevents possible disasters by reducing the expenditure required. 
Today, many temples have abandoned their estate operations, leaving their facilities like abandoned houses. 
The Head of Collection of Various Estate Revenues In the Ancient Regulations, in the very beginning there was no post such as estate revenue ofﬁcer under the head of estate management. 
Only in recent times was this ofﬁce created. 
There is no end of such examples, which in all cases are harmful both to the temple community and individuals. 
Only if there are retired ofﬁcials who are honest and assist the abbot may it become possible to select an appropriate person in terms of public election and appoint him over some limited area of responsibility. 
Or it may also be possible to appoint a person by lottery from among the practitioners. 
Anyone who holds this post must be rigorous in his standard of personal conduct and motivated to serve the community of practitioners. 
One must not impose heavy demands on the farming families. 
Electing the Primary Seat Ofﬁcial as Occasional Teacher Since this is a serious and grave matter, one should not lightly choose the appointee. 
171 The abbot then descends. 
We earnestly wish that in your compassion you will grant your consent. 
After offering incense and performing a prostration with unopened sitting cloth, he thanks him, saying: 
So-and-so has fortunately found a waystation here. 
When he completes his exhortation, the director of practitioners’ affairs once again performs prostrations in unison with the practitioners to express thanks. 
Immediately following, the elected teacher, carrying incense in his sleeve, pays a visit to the abbot’s ofﬁce to express his thanks. 
Performing the formality of two prostrations with opened sitting cloth and three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth, he states: 
Next day, the abbot conducts a special serving of tea at the practice hall for the primary seat ofﬁcial who is now the elected teacher. 
He visits the quarters of the primary seat ofﬁcial as elected teacher and, after burning incense, invites him to the serving of tea. The manner and proceedings are the same as those for serving tea for the newly appointed primary seat ofﬁcial. 
The primary seat ofﬁcial too is obliged to conduct a special serving of tea for the practitioners. 
The proceeding is identical with that of a special serving of tea sponsored by the front and rear hall primary seat ofﬁcials for the practitioners. 
On the following day, the abbot invites the elected teacher, the primary seat ofﬁcial, to a special dinner reception and the dual order ofﬁcials are invited to participate. 
Electing Various Renowned Virtuous Primary Seat Ofﬁcials as Occasional Lecturer The abbot is obliged to talk to the prospective primary seat ofﬁcial beforehand . 
If the latter welcomes the idea, the abbot invites him for tea, with the dual order ofﬁcials participating. 
1134a Without immediately announcing his invitation, he introduces the idea in a polite and earnest manner. 
The manner and proceeding of the serving of tea, sweet hot water, and the meal reception are identical as before. 
The appointment and resignation of the primary seat ofﬁcial do not mix with those of the dual order ofﬁcials, nor is there any ceremonial form of transfer between the old and new ofﬁcials. 
Format of the Signboard The Venerable Abbot, master of the temple, will serve tea at the practice hall today after the noon meal. 
This is especially intended for the newly appointed primary seat ofﬁcial. 
If one critically characterizes those mediocre ofﬁcials of the present day, they indulge in lengthy entertainment with drink and food as their major function, and thereby compel those who remain in poverty and in the practice of the path to withdraw more and more into the storehouse of the scriptures. 
The abbot must rectify this kind of evil trend. 
In the Ancient Regulations, only ﬁve ofﬁcial titles were mentioned, namely, the administrative head , the director of practitioners’ affairs, the kitchen ofﬁcial, the maintenance ofﬁcial, and the treasury ofﬁcial. 
In the beginning there were no individual quarters, and the monastic institution ﬂourished. 
Today, the number of retired ofﬁcials in many temples, large and small, has often surpassed a hundred, and that of service men and workmen twice as many. 
During the era of Taiding , his excellency Grand Minister Tuohuan of the Commission for Buddhist and Tibetan Affairs had his agency classify all Zen temples into three groups of “higher” , “middle” , and “lower” . 
This was done in order to limit the number of administrative ofﬁcials in these different classes of institutions. 
When the date of resignation is determined, the abbot has the attendant notify the dual order ofﬁcials. 
The abbot’s assistant burns incense, serves him sweet hot water, and urges him to stay on. 
In the practice hall, when the ﬁrst serving of rice gruel is completed, the former administrative ofﬁcials enter the hall from the rear entrance. 
So-and-so and others were assigned through the abbot’s compassion to administrative ofﬁces during the past term. 
Because of the declining power of our minds, we have conveyed our resignation to the venerable abbot and we are now returning to the practice hall to join you. 
After striking the post once again, they proceed toward the seat of the abbot, passing to the left of the altar of the guardian bodhisattva, and perform the propriety of two prostrations with opened sitting cloth and three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth. 
So-and-so and others were selected to serve during the last term. 
We fear, however, that our performance may not have fully matched the expectation of your reverence, and cannot help feeling regretful about it, sir. 
Stepping back and going around the altar, they line up before the altar, perform three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth, then turn to make a round of the hall, starting from the primary seat ofﬁcial’s raised platform. 
After breakfast, the attendant of the abbot’s ofﬁce escorts the new ofﬁcial appointees to the reception hall. 
When the serving of tea is over, the abbot rises and burns incense, returns to his seat, and announces: 
The former dual order ofﬁcials conveyed to me their intent to resign. 
His assistant invites the new appointees to proceed, and then proceeds ﬁrst toward the master and performs a prostration with unopened sitting cloth. 
The new administrative ofﬁcials likewise step forward and perform the propriety of two prostrations with opened sitting cloth and three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth. 
We, So-and-so and others, have joined this community only recently. 
We fear that our appointment may have been a mistake and cannot help feeling apprehensive, sir. 
They complete the meeting with three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth. 
Next, the new appointees to the ofﬁces of the training faculty proceed forward and perform the same propriety of two prostrations with opened sitting cloth and three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth, uttering the same greetings as before. 
(According to the Xianshun Regulations, this morning event, i.e., consisting of “inviting the new appointees to take seats, burn incense, and drink sweet hot water,” was still practiced in various temples up to that time . 
An alternative, it is said, is that if there was a plan to have a special serving in the evening of that day, the morning rite could be omitted. 
The alms-serving attendant tolls the practice hall bell, and the practitioners return to their respective seats where they take the meal. 
The abbot enters the hall, ﬁrst escorting the primary seat ofﬁcial of the front hall, followed by the lower-ranking training ofﬁcials who reach their seats in proper order. 
The new administrative ofﬁcials as a group must take their positions beforehand on the raised platform that begins with the west hall ranking ofﬁcial’s seat. 
When the abbot returns to his position, the director of practitioners’ affairs proceeds toward him and bows, remaining there by his side. 
The former administrative ofﬁcials conveyed their wish to resign from their posts. 
Since these posts cannot be left vacant, the Venerable Master, abbot of this temple, has invited the following resident practitioners to take charge of the following positions: 
Once again, after striking the post, the abbot’s assistant immediately ushers the group of new administrative ofﬁcials in front of the master. 
The administrative ofﬁcials perform in unison the propriety of two prostrations with opened sitting cloth and three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth. 
Immediately he steps aside and moves toward the raised platform of the west hall ofﬁcial, leaving the ofﬁcials before the altar. 
The novice attendant of the practice hall ofﬁce announces: May the practitioners congratulate the new administrative ofﬁcials. 
The novice attendant then announces: May the new administrative ofﬁcials thank the practitioners. 
Next, leading the practitioners, the training faculty ofﬁcials express congratulations to the new administrative ofﬁcials. 
Again, the practice hall bell is tolled and the new primary seat ofﬁcial is escorted to his quarters and is congratulated there, in similar manner. 
May the retired dual order ofﬁcials escort the remaining former training faculty ofﬁcials and the former administrative ofﬁcials to their respective retirees’ halls. 
All the new ofﬁcials and the former ofﬁcials together, carrying incense in their sleeves, visit the abbot’s ofﬁce to express their thanks. 
The abbot then invites all appointees to his ofﬁce for a small mid-morning snack. 
There will also be a meal reception at the abbot’s ofﬁce, for which a meal of rice mixed with sprouts is prepared, and the west hall ranking ofﬁcial as well as the retired ofﬁcials are invited to participate. 
Those functionaries in the lesser posts of miscellaneous duties visit the ofﬁce of the practice hall on a different day after the new dual order ofﬁcials are settled, and express their wish to retire from their respective posts. 
He gives the copy of the list of the appointees’ names to the attendant of the practice hall ofﬁce. 
According to the will of the compassionate abbot, I invite the following members to the respective administrative posts as follows. 
The remaining proceedings are identical as before. 
We, So-and-so and others, have assisted you, our master, for some time. 
Now we are obliged to express our intent to resign, wishing to pursue the practice of the path with the practitioners. 
We earnestly wish that in your compassion you grant us relief, sir. They burn incense, perform three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth, and withdraw. 
The director of practitioners’ affairs burns incense and serves tea. 
After they ﬁnish drinking tea, he stands, burns incense again, and says: 
Going through the list of names and positions one by one, the director of practitioners’ affairs greets each appointee, steps forward to perform a prostration with unopened sitting cloth toward them as a group, and shifts his position. 
I shall now request them to burn incense and perform prostrations, sir. 
When the abbot takes his seat, the new appointees burn incense and perform in unison three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth. 
After seeing off the director of practitioners’ affairs, the new and old assistants exchange their positions for the transfer of the duties. 
(In the Xianshun Regulations, a unique case is mentioned, in which the abbot himself escorts the appointed practitioner assistants to their quarters, and they are in turn obliged to see off the master after performing a prostration with unopened sitting cloth. 
The novice attendant of the practice hall ofﬁce leads both the new and former abbot’s assistants on a round through the practitioners’ quarters. 
The old members return to the abbot’s ofﬁce early in the evening and together with the new members perform a prostration to thank their master. 
After three days, the abbot sends a note to the practice hall ofﬁce to let the former assistants return to the practitioners’ quarters. 
As usual, he is given a reception with tea, sweet hot water, and a small snack. 
Even if the missing items can be resupplied, this necessarily causes an expenditure of the temple’s funds. 
In order to solve this problem, it is necessary for the treasury ofﬁce to keep a central inventory book, in which household items and amounts from all the quarters are recorded, and the records must be examined from time to time by the abbot and administrative head. 
Anything damaged must be repaired, through the temple’s funds, but missing items must be compensated for by the quarter. 
It is hoped that this matter should be given careful scrutiny. 
The Abbot’s Special Serving of Sweet Hot Water for the New and Former Dual Order Ofﬁcials The abbot’s guest reception assistant instructs the guest reception attendant to prepare the crepe-wrapped board with an incense burner and candle stands, and goes to the primary seat ofﬁcial’s quarters to convey the invitation to both the former and new training faculty ofﬁcials. 
The statement is identical to the above. 
The rest of the retired ofﬁcials of the east and west orders who are participating in this special reception are seated at the right and left ends of the main section, respectively. 
The incense offering assistant sets up the seat name tablets beforehand, and at the appointed time, begins to drum. 
Next day, after the morning rice gruel, the abbot invites the former and new ofﬁcials for tea, and later the administrative head also invites them for the same. 
At midmorning, the administrative ofﬁce prepares a snack for them, and thereafter for the next three days the ofﬁce continues to have rice gruel and rice meals delivered to the former ofﬁcials at their quarters. 
The Practice Hall Ofﬁce’s Special Serving of Tea and Sweet Hot Water for the Former and New Practitioner Assistants 1135b After a meal of rice mixed with sprouts is served at the abbot’s ofﬁce, the director of practitioners’ affairs sends his attendant to invite both the former and new practitioner assistants for tea. 
(The manner is identical with that of the administrative ofﬁce’s serving.) It is preferable, however, that this serving of tea be conducted prior to the abbot’s special serving of sweet hot water. 
Thus, in order to invite the former and new practitioner assistants for the special serving of tea, the practice hall ofﬁcial may have to wait until the abbot’s special serving of tea for the new primary seat ofﬁcial is completed. 
Those who are invited here are obliged to express thanks the next morning. 
This evening, after the serving of sweet hot water is completed at the abbot’s ofﬁce, we will conduct a special serving of sweet hot water at the administrative ofﬁce. 
I earnestly request you to grant us your honorable presence. 
The new training faculty ofﬁcials’ seats are set in the ﬁrst section (i.e., front right of the hall), the former faculty ofﬁcials in the second section , the former administrative ofﬁcials in the third section , and the estate management ofﬁcial and treasury administrative ofﬁcial in the fourth section . 
Additional seats are prepared for the new administrative ofﬁcials as a group in the main section, but only the new director of practitioners’ affairs is supposed to take a seat as participant. 
Finally, returning to mid-hall, he burns incense on behalf of the special participant and takes his seat, requesting the serving. 
The guests then take off their robes and settle themselves on their seats for the evening meal. 
Your spotless term has been fulﬁlled. 
Ushering them into the practice hall from the rear entrance, he ﬁrst escorts the former primary seat ofﬁcial and next the former head administrative ofﬁcial to their respective seats on the raised platform. 
The Abbot’s Meal Reception for the Former and New Dual Order Ofﬁcials The abbot conducts a special ascent to the Dharma hall and expresses his thanks by referring to the names of the former and new dual order ofﬁcials one by one. 
The guest master attendant then invites the other associate ofﬁcials, old and new, for the same reception, and simultaneously extends the invitation to the retired ofﬁcials as honorable participants. 
The seats are arranged and the name tablets set up in the reception hall. 
As each guest ﬁnds his seat and stands beside it, the abbot’s incense offering assistant and the guest reception assistant together go around the hall, requesting the guests to take their seats. 
During the meal, the incense offering assistant leaves his seat to burn incense and deliver monetary gifts. 
When the meal is over, he and the other assistant retrieve the tables. 
(The propriety is identical with that of the special serving of sweet hot water.) With three drumbeats, the former and new dual order ofﬁcials leave their seats and perform the formal propriety of two prostrations with opened sitting cloth and three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth to express their thanks. 
The assistant instructs the guest reception attendant to prepare the crepe-wrapped board with an incense burner, a candle stand, and an incense box. 
(The format, previously given, is identical with that of the special serving of tea for a renowned, virtuous primary seat ofﬁcial.) The guest reception assistant 189 visits the primary seat ofﬁcial’s quarters, and after burning incense and performing a prostration, says: 
After the noon meal, the venerable master abbot wishes to hold a special serving of tea at the practice hall in honor of your reverence. 
The guest reception master then informs the practitioners by posting the signboard indicating the serving of tea, and also invites the administrative ofﬁcials and practitioners to participate. 
(The ceremonial proceedings are identical to those of the special serving on the four major days of annual festivity . 
The only difference is that no incense table is placed by each head monk at the four raised platforms, nor is the propriety of making a round in the hall for invitation conducted.) When the serving of tea is over, the teabowls are retrieved from the seats of the abbot and the primary seat ofﬁcial. 
At the ﬁrst opening of the sitting cloth he says: Today I am honored by this special serving of tea. 
The primary seat ofﬁcial goes out of the hall, passing behind the altar of the guardian bodhisattva, and turns right to the outer hall. 
The abbot escorts him and returns to his place to take the teabowl. 
The practitioner assistant burns incense , then takes down the teabowl from the altar. 
After three drumbeats, the practitioners leave their seats. 
The primary seat ofﬁcial waits for the abbot at the lower left section of the Dharma hall and thanks him for the serving of tea. 
Today, at the end of the noon meal, a special serving of tea is scheduled at the practice hall. 
I earnestly appeal to your compassion to grant us your honorable presence. 
After burning incense, he invites him for the serving of tea: Today, at the end of the noon meal, a special serving of tea is scheduled at the practice hall in honor of your reverence and the practitioners. 
Next, he instructs the attendant of the practice hall ofﬁce to inform the practitioners about the invitation and post the signboard indicating “tea serving.” When the metal gong located at the kitchen hall is struck to signal the serving of tea, the primary seat ofﬁcial of the front hall should make a round through the practice hall, inviting the practitioners for the serving of tea. 
Format of the Letter of Invitation The front hall primary seat ofﬁcial, Bhikṣu So-and-so, has the honor of holding a special serving of tea at the practice hall after the noon meal. This is especially intended for the primary seat ofﬁcial of the rear hall and the practitioners. This invitation is also extended to the administrative ofﬁcials as honorable participants. Date and month Respectfully prepared by So-and-so Format of the Envelope Letter of Invitation for The Primary Seat Ofﬁcial of the Rear Hall as well as the Practitioners Respectfully sealed by So-and-so 8. 
Composed and calm, with warmth, he inspects whatever is needed in their quarters and requests the treasury ofﬁcials to supply it. 
The Serving of Tea on the Occasion of the Transfer of Duties Between the Former and New Dual Order Ofﬁcials While awaiting the completion of the abbot’s special serving of tea for the new primary seat ofﬁcial, those who have been newly appointed to the dual order ofﬁces visit their respective former ofﬁcials with due dignity, carrying incense in their sleeves. 
After the noon meal, in honor of your reverences, tea is served at the ofﬁcials’ quarters. 
The seats of the ofﬁcials on the right and left front of the hall are to be placed respectively by the participants from the two orders. 
The next day, the host ofﬁcial instructs the practice hall attendant to invite the former ofﬁcial for the serving of a snack, so as to complete the proceeding of ofﬁcial transfer between the former and new ofﬁcials. 
In the administrative ofﬁce, curtains must be hung and the main seat should be set at the rear of the hall, while participants should be seated in the right and left sections of the hall. 
On the next day, there should be the serving of a snack. 
The west order ofﬁcial, however, ends the serving of a snack according to the rank of the guest reception ofﬁcial, whereas, the east order ofﬁcial should end it according to the rank of the director of practitioners’ affairs. 
As to the procedure of ceremonial transfer between the former and new practitioner assistants, the director of practitioners’ affairs must always be invited to participate in the serving of tea as well as servings of simple food. 
The Serving of Tea on the Occasion of Leaving and Joining Quarters When someone joins the retirees’ hall, he must report it to the master of the practitioners’ quarters and post a signboard indicating the serving of tea. 
Requesting the master of quarters to stay at the main seat, the person who serves tea takes his temporary seat at the guest position. 
He stands, burns incense, bows to every member, returns to take his seat again, and the serving of tea and retrieval of the teabowls are carried out. 
The master of the quarters stands and expresses thanks before the incense burner. 
The next day, he requests the practitioner in charge of tea to report to the master of the quarters and post the signboard indicating the serving of tea. 
After the noon meal, striking the small wooden sounding block in the practitioners’ quarters, the practitioner in charge of tea stands to the right of the entrance to the quarters, greets the practitioners, and proceeds to the incense burner to bow. 
The master of the quarters takes the main seat and the practitioner in charge of tea takes a seat to the right of the main seat with some space in between. 
After seating himself in an easy manner, he stands, burns incense, bows, and returns to take his seat again. Thereupon, the serving of tea is carried out. 
The master of the quarters and the other practitioners rise and give thanks for the tea before the incense burner, see off the person who sponsored the tea reception, and depart. 
When someone is appointed to be a training ofﬁcial and leaves the practitioners’ quarters, he requests the practitioner in charge of tea beforehand to report it to the master of the quarters and to post the signboard indicating the serving of tea. 
They are seated face to face across the middle section of the room and the serving of tea is carried out. 
The head ofﬁcial of the quarters comes before the incense burner to express thanks for the tea and see off the newly appointed training ofﬁcial as he departs. 
When someone joins the quarters, he is obliged to sponsor the serving of tea . 
The practitioners are further informed of the serving of tea by signboards posted at each of the quarters. 
The training ofﬁcial requests the alms-serving master beforehand to prepare hot water and arrange the teabowls, while the treasury ofﬁcial provides tea and candles. 
(The remaining propriety is identical with that of the ﬁrst day of each month and mid-month day.) Format of the Signboard for the Serving of Tea Such-and-such quarters have become congested, and it is not possible for all to be seated for the serving. 
Today, therefore, the serving of tea will be conducted at the practice hall after the noon meal. 
Date and month Respectfully prepared by So-and-so Format of the Envelope Ofﬁcials of This Temple Renowned Elders of the Zen World Local Practice Associates Honorable Practice Hall Practitioners VIII. 
The Ceremonial Incense Offering by the Dual Order Ofﬁcials through the Proceeding of Pairs from the East and West Orders In general, whenever the dual order ofﬁcials are scheduled to offer incense in successive pairs from both orders, it is signaled by the sound of the cymbals. 
It is not correct, however, to say that the primary seat ofﬁcial who once held a position of abbot should also burn incense before the dual order ofﬁcials. 
Today, the monastic residents gathered together in a large temple have multiplied to as many as hundreds or a thousand in number. 
exhausts the temple’s granary, and burning wood for cooking has stripped the mountainside into a barren wasteland. 
Moreover, coming from all directions, they gather together as if returning to as if already owning the place. 
Because of this, people have served the Buddha’s disciples just as they served the master. 
Despite the numbers of resident practitioners, rarely fall into indolence. 
If this were not the 199 case, many a legal dispute would have been raised over a square foot of land or a peck of grain. 
How could it be otherwise, other than foolishness on their part, that donate plots of land for us to expand our residential quarters, or that they sacriﬁce their suppers in order to feed more of us? 
We practitioners are fed here and reside here. 
But for what reason? 
Indeed, for what reason? End of Fascicle Four 200Fascicle Five Chapter VII II. The Proceedings for the Rite of Śrāmaṇera Ordination 1. Ordination Procedure: 
He then takes the certiﬁcate and a crepe-wrapped board to the sponsoring master , and also to the dual order ofﬁcials for their review. 
At each ofﬁce he burns incense and performs three prostrations. 
Today, however, is usually set up in the Buddha hall facing the Buddha statue, or the seats are arranged to face each other. 
If the in the Dharma hall, a Buddha image, fragrant ﬂowers, incense, and candles should be placed there in due accordance with the tradition. 
Now, the following section refers to the case of the event taking place in the practice hall, simply because it is more convenient to accommodate seating space for a larger number of practitioners.) The candidates for the rite of ordination must ﬁrst request the director of practitioners’ affairs to determine: 
1) the ordination master , 2) the master of ceremonial chanting , and 3) the master of ceremonial instruction . 
The evening before the day of ordination, the candidates have their heads shaved; a small knot of hair is left on the top of the 1137a head. 
(This small topknot is called cūḍā in Sanskrit and zhouluo in Chinese, meaning “a little knot.”) A seat and table for the ordination master should be placed symmetrically a little distance away from the abbot’s seat , and on the table are incense, candles, a portable incense burner, and a pair of sound-making ferrules . 
The chair and table of the master of ceremonial chanting should be placed to the right of the guardian bodhisattva’s altar, opposite the seat of the ordination master. 
On this table there should be a stand-set bell . 
The master of ceremonial instruction escorts the candidate novices, whose heads have been shaved, from the novice attendants’ hall as cymbals are played . 
The group stops at the shrine of local spirits, the patriarchs’ hall, and the Buddha hall to offer incense and perform three prostrations at each place. 
Only then do the ordination master and the other two ceremonial masters enter the hall, where they perform three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth before the altar of the guardian bodhisattva and then take their respective places. 
The ordination master enquires of him, “Have all the practitioners assembled?” The ceremonial master replies, “Yes, they have assembled, sir.” The ordination master asks, “Are all the practitioners in accord and harmonious?” The ceremonial master replies, “Yes, they are, sir.” The ordination master asks, “Being settled in full accord, what do they expect to accomplish?” The ceremonial master replies, “To participate in the rite of ordination for the candidate novices who have shaved their heads and received the precepts under oath, sir.” The ordination master concludes, “So be it.” Thereupon, the master of ceremonial instruction folds his sitting cloth and escorts the novices who are to receive the rite of head-shaving into the hall, while ringing his hand-bell. 
The novices perform three prostrations toward the altar of the guardian bodhisattva, three prostrations before the ordination master, and then kneel. 
Thereupon, the master of ceremonial chanting rings the large standing bell and recites: 
The Perfected One thus established the rules of injunction and expounded them every half-month in order to explain the beneﬁt of those injunctions. 
Veneration to all the buddhas with a deep bow. 
The ultimate goal is the yonder shore. 
May the Buddha open the subtle and secret Way and preach it widely to the people of the world.) Having completed his recitation, he once again speaks to the ordination master, requesting: 
May your reverence exhort for the sake of those who have shaved their heads and are ready to receive the precepts under oath. 
The master rises from his seat and all the practitioners stand in unison after him. 
There is the incense of the moral precepts , the incense of meditative concentration , the incense of transcendent insight , the incense of the resulting state of liberation , and the incense of the insight that recognizes the realization of this state of liberation , all of which, as one, permeate the entire world just as light illuminates from beyond the horizon of the clouds. 
It is offered to the immeasurable numbers of buddhas in all directions, to the immeasurable numbers of Dharmas in all directions, and to the immeasurable numbers of Sanghas in all directions. 
May all sentient beings also accomplish this quiescence as well. 
“Veneration to the Luminous Pure Dharma Body Vairocana Buddha, and so on.” (The master and practitioners complete the prayer of calling the ten sacred names of the buddhas.) When the practitioners take their seats again, the master of ceremonial instruction takes the portable incense burner and instructs the candidate novices, saying: 
You should request the master to grant you the rite of ordination in your own words. 
If you cannot do so, follow along reciting the words as I say them. 
In general, whenever “So-and-so” appears, you should replace it with your own name. 
Venerable , may you record my request in your mind. I, So-and-so novice, now request you to be the master on my behalf to ofﬁciate in the rite of head-shaving and receiving the precepts. Venerable, I pray, as my master, may you ofﬁciate in the rite of having my head shaved and receiving the precepts. As I depend on your ofﬁciating, I may be able to accomplish the rite of head-shaving and receiving the precepts. 
The ordination master then says: 
O novices, sons of good families… , the fountainhead of the mind is totally quiescent and the ocean of dharmas is profoundly deep. 
Whoever is astray in it will forever sink down and be lost, whereas whoever is enlightened of it will realize liberation outright. 
If one wishes to propagate the supreme path to others, there is no better way than that of renunciation. 
The path is vast and wide like empty space; it is clean and pure like the moon brightly shining. 
When one’s practice of the path is assisted by proper conditions, such as authorized with the rules of the precepts, the goal of the path is not really far distant because such conditions initially help each one overcome distracting thoughts and eventually realize the state of transcendence. 
It was for this reason that Śākyamuni Buddha, the Great Sage, renounced his princely status together with his golden wheel, left the palace during the night, took off his precious garment of universal rule, and cut off his hair in the forest. 
No Buddha of the three periods ever has taught or will teach that a layperson can realize the ultimate path. 
Nor could any of the past patriarchs, were they engaged in an ordinary life of impurity, ever have succeeded in delivering others. 
Therefore, was directly transmitted from one Buddha to another only through their own hands, and the patriarchs transmit it only through patriarchs. 
Hence, no heavenly demon could do anything but look on with folded arms and the heretics were eventually converted, and whosoever renounced his secular life and received ordination could discharge the four kinds of indebtedness toward his respective benefactors (i.e., rulers, parents, teachers and associates, and patron donors) and carry out his task of delivering sentient beings from suffering to liberation. 
After renunciation, one’s conduct ought to be beyond the ordinary sense of obligation, subject neither to worshiping kings and rulers nor to worshiping one’s parents. 
you may leave this place for a short while to reﬂect upon your indebtedness to the rulers of the land as well as upon the parental virtue by which you have been brought up. 
The master of ceremonial instruction signals by ringing his hand-bell and leads them out of the hall. 
Facing north, the novices in unison perform three prostrations to express thanks to the ruler of the land and another three prostrations to express thanks to their parents. 
Immediately, they change into their practitioners’ garments, return to the altar of the guardian bodhisattva, and perform three prostrations. 
The ordination master takes up a pitcher, sprinkles water on the head , moistening the hair with his ﬁnger, and shaves it off with a knife. 
You have thoroughly understood that the world is impermanent. 
The verse is chanted three times, and the candidates step back and perform a prostration toward the master. 
The last remaining knot of hair is called cūḍā and can be cut off only by the sponsoring master of the candidate novices. 
I shall now remove the knot of hair on your behalf. 
Three times the master chants the verse as the practitioners follow in unison. 
The master, holding up the kaṣāya robes in his hand and uttering a word of insight, places a robe on the head of each candidate, and intones the verses to be recited when donning the robe: 
How great is the robe that embodies liberation, The robe that is a formless ﬁeld of merit! 
This is repeated three times, with the practitioners following in unison. 
The ordination master says: 
O sons of good families, the Dharma is like a great ocean: the more you dive into its depths, the deeper it becomes. 
You have already renounced the secular world; hence, you must ﬁrst accept the threefold refuge and the ﬁve precepts . 
Qualiﬁed by these steps, you may be allowed to approach and join the authentic sangha. 
Next, you are obliged to accept the ten śrāmaṇera precepts (śrāmaṇera-saṃvara; shamishijie), ﬁt for the life of novices, through which you are entitled to share in whatever beneﬁt, material or spiritual, belongs to the sangha. 
Now I shall call for the presence of the Three Treasures on your behalf so that they may witness our ceremonial conduct. 
May those enlightened ones who have accomplished the ten ﬁnal stages and the three tenfold preliminary stages of the bodhisattva as prescribed in the sacred scriptures brought back from the ocean storehouse (i.e., the Mahayana sutras, such as the Flower Ornament Sutra, etc.), those who have attained the ﬁve saintly fruits of discipleship and those who are advancing toward each of the four higher saintly states (catvāraḥ pratipannāḥ; sixiang), may they all descend to manifest themselves in response to my prayer and witness the conduct of the following rites. 
O sons of good families, if you wish to have the precepts conﬁrmed upon you, you must ﬁrst repent and be cleansed of your faults and ﬂaws, just as cloth must be washed before it is dyed. 
Now, you must repent with utmost sincerity by following along with my recitation of the verse of repentance: 
Whatever evil karma I have committed in my past lives, Rooted in beginningless forces of desire, hatred, and delusion, All a result of my acts of body, speech, and mind, I now repent of all of it completely, without remainder. 
The ordination master says: 
O sons of good families, the Dharma has already cleansed your actions of body, speech, and mind. You are now obliged to take refuge in the Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha. 
I take refuge in the Dharma, the most honorable that transcends the profane. I take refuge in the Sangha, the most honorable among all human assemblies. Now, having already taken refuge in the Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha, I declare that the Perfected One who realized the ultimate truth and supreme enlightenment is my master, and I now take refuge in him. From this moment onward, I call the Buddha my teacher and will not take refuge in any other evil, wrong teachers and heretics. 
The ordination master says: 
O sons of good families, you have already forsaken the evil teaching and taken refuge in the right teaching. 
If you wish to know the rules of the precepts and maintain them, you must vow to keep the set of ﬁve rules: 
As long as I live , I will not commit an act of killing, I will not commit an act of stealing, I will not commit an act of sexual indulgence, I will not commit an act of lying, I will not commit an act of becoming intoxicated. 
Answer me: 
Answer me again: 
The ordination master says: 
O sons of good families, the foregoing set of ﬁve rules is the initial step to enter the path of enlightenment and the foremost cause to escape from the cycle of the threefold evil courses of life. 
Next, you must accept the ten rules of the precepts prescribed for aspiring novices. 
Whoever observes these rules under his master’s guidance and receives the same beneﬁt from the sangha is an authenticated novice worthy of becoming a practitioner. 
you are most obliged to accept the ten rules of the precepts: As long as I live, I will not commit an act of killing, I will not commit an act of stealing, I will not commit an act of sexual intercourse, I will not commit an act of lying, I will not commit an act of drinking, I will not rest or sleep on a high and wide bed, I will not wear hair ornaments, necklaces, anointments, or perfume, I will not watch a performance of theatrical singing and dancing, I will not carry any gold, silver, coins, or precious stones, I will not partake of food at any unauthorized time. 
Answer me: 
O sons of good families, having now committed yourselves to the foregoing precepts under oath, you must uphold them reverentially in practice. 
The precepts and disciplines you have acquired are dedicated to the Three Buddhist Treasures, and they become seeds sown in the rich ﬁeld of merit. 
You must always keep your mind respectful toward those who rank higher, middle, or lower in their respective places and exert effort in the practice of the path, so that you may discharge your indebtedness to your parents. 
Refrain from wearing colorful clothes, as clothes are only for the purpose of covering the body. 
Do not be indulgent in seeking tasty food, the purpose of which is only to sustain your life. 
Speak with dignity and correctly. 
Refrain from speaking of others’ faults. 
If people are in a dispute, you must talk to each party and encourage them to reconcile. 
There should be a normative distinction between men and women. No vegetation should be destroyed at random. 
You should not befriend anyone who is unwise, nor should you venerate anyone who is not holy. 
You should not take food other than at the prescribed time, nor should you speak unless it is proper and appropriate. 
Be diligent in ﬁnding meaning, and study the past to know new things. 
When sitting, keep yourself in a state of meditation. When standing, occupy yourself with chanting sacred scriptures. 
You must close up the three evil paths but open the gate that leads to nirvana. 
Placing yourself among those engaged in practice, you must enhance your right actions and your mind of enlightenment and never retrogress. 
If you apply your mind in these ways, you are a true disciple of the Buddha. 
The novices perform three prostrations to the ordination master and again kneel, left knee up and right one down, with palms joined together. 
The merit accrued from the foregoing rites of head-shaving and receiving the precepts under oath is dedicated to the dragon and heavenly protectors of the Dharma, the supernatural gods presiding over the temple buildings. 
May the abbot of the temple always be the ferry or bridge to help people across the ocean of suffering. 
May the management ofﬁcials become the pillar and foundation stones of the religious tradition for a long time to come. 
May the practitioners who have gathered in this hall equally ride the ship of prajñā insight. 
May the ordained novices equally reach the yonder shore of enlightenment, discharge all of the four kinds of indebtedness, and deliver people who transmigrate through the three realms of existence. 
May all sentient beings of the Dharma world equally realize the ultimate knowledge . 
Veneration to all buddhas, bodhisattvas, mahāsattvas, and Mahāprajñāpāramitā presiding in the ten directions and the three times. 
On completion of this recitation, the ordination master takes his seat. 
The master of ceremonial chanting rings the standing bell and recites the following verses in praise of the Buddha: 
Abiding in this world like pure extended space, Like a lotus that is untouched by water; Yet the purity of mind even surpasses it, I salute him with a deep bow, the Highest and Most Honorable One. 
I am determined to realize enlightenment and uphold my mind to strive for the path, without ever retrogressing. 
They then turn toward the guardian bodhisattva’s altar and again perform three prostrations. 
The ordination master and the other two masters perform three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth before the altar of the guardian bodhisattva and leave the hall. 
When the practice hall attendant tolls the hall bell three times, the abbot leaves the hall, and the practitioners descend from their sitting platforms. 
Post-ceremonial Activities The primary seat ofﬁcial leads the practitioners to the abbot’s ofﬁce in order to express congratulation. 
If there are a great number of practitioners, the abbot must receive their congratulations at the Dharma hall, where the guest master’s attendant has beforehand set up an area with incense, candles, an incense burner, ﬂower vases, a screen, and a chair. 
As assigned, we have completed the rite of ordination, conferring the precepts to the newly ordained novices. 
Though we tried hard, due to our lack of cultivation in matters of propriety we fear that it may have taken much longer than the venerable expected. 
Next, the primary seat ofﬁcial and the practitioners step forward to burn incense and perform prostrations, some opening their sitting cloths, some not, and some are excused from either formality. 
Next, the abbot’s ofﬁcial assistant and disciples burn incense and perform three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth, proceed forward without folding up their sitting cloths, and express congratulation to the master, saying: 
Once again they perform three prostrations and proceed forward to enquire of the abbot’s well-being. 
They then perform another three prostrations and fold up their sitting cloths. 
So-and-so and others have been allowed to fully receive your reverend’s tradition and with good fortune have been authorized to wear the kaṣāya robe. 
Thus, freed from the toil of worldly matters, we are able to sever ourselves from the net of attachment. 
Once again they perform three prostrations, step forward, and say: On this day and this auspicious moment, we respectfully wish that all is well and felicitous with the abbot, master of the temple, who sponsored our ordination. 
They settle into the novice quarters and await another occasion when they will be authorized to ascend the Dharma platform to receive the precepts of the Mahayana tradition. 
We are most grateful for the protection and assistance bestowed upon us. 
The Newly Ordained Novices Join the Practice Hall 1138c After completing the rite of ordination and the conferment of the śrāmaṇera precepts, the newly ordained novices notify the abbot of the date on which they wish to take the next step of joining the life of the practitioners in the practice hall. 
On the appointed day, after the moment when the director strikes with the to signal completion of the ﬁrst serving of rice gruel at the early morning meal, the ceremonial leader escorts the newly ordained novices into the hall, where they line up before the altar of the guardian bodhisattva. 
So-and-so and others have been granted permission to join the community of the practice hall. Today, we come to present ourselves here by following the honorable practitioners. 
Stepping back, they perform another three prostrations and fold up their sitting cloths. 
Lining up before the abbot, they bow in unison toward him, and turn to proceed on a round through the hall, starting from the seat of the primary seat ofﬁcial. 
After that, they return to the hall to conduct the rite of opening their assigned space in the hall and chant along with the practitioners. 
Ascent to the Platform to Receive the Mahayana Precepts under Oath It is said that all the buddhas of the past, present, and future realized the path through renouncing the secular world. 
All the patriarchs who transmitted the seal of the Buddha mind through successive generations are, without exception, homeless mendicants . 
Because they strictly maintained the codes of the Vinaya discipline and prevailed well in the three worlds, it goes without saying that the vow to maintain the precepts and discipline is the prerequisite for the practice of Zen and for the pursuit of the path. 
Unless one dissociates oneself from transgression and prevents oneself from engaging in unethical conduct, how could anyone become a Buddha or a patriarch? In order to receive the precepts under oath, a candidate should prepare three kinds of robes, an almsbowl, and new clean garments. 
If he has nothing new, he may substitute used ones which have been washed thoroughly and cleaned for the occasion of completing the rite of ascending the Dharma platform. 
Wearing the same attire as did the Buddha, upholding the same body of precepts and disciplines as did the Buddha, and enjoying the practical consequences as did the Buddha—all this is not at all a minor matter and must not be taken lightly. 
If someone uses another’s robes and bowl on loan or lets someone else use his own, even though he may ascend the platform and receive the precepts under oath he has not really received them at all, and though he has become a practitioner in external form but has not been endowed with the precepts internally, he is thus like someone who has placed himself at an empty gate and eats up the donor’s gifts for nothing. 
Those who have already received the precepts attributed to the path of śrāvakas must receive the Mahayana precepts of the path of bodhisattvas. 
This is the gradual procedure to enter the religion. 
Steadfast Adherence to the Precepts After receiving the the precepts, one must be determined to uphold the rules at all times—even to the extent of being willing to die for the Dharma rather than live without it. 
The four grave offenses or “defeats” ; 2. 
The ninety offenses requiring expiation ; 6. 
The seven offenses concerned with the ways for settling legal disputes ; 9. 
The forty-eight minor offenses of the Mahayana precepts prescribed in the same sutra . 
In addition, one must read these sources and thereby become well informed about the offenses in detail, so as to know what a given case might be. 
One must not partake of improper food . 
alcohol, spicy vegetables, and animal ﬂesh. 
One should not partake of these kinds of food.) Nor should one partake of any food at a restricted period of time . (No food is permitted other than rice gruel at breakfast and rice at the midday meal. 
One should most carefully stay away from them. 
When one strives with one’s vow to realize a degree of purity in upholding the precepts, the Buddha-Dharma manifests itself in that person of its own accord. 
If there is no sheepskin in one’s possession, how is it possible to think of transmitting beautiful wool to anyone else? 
Therefore it is said in the sacred scripture that one must make an effort to keep one’s precepts spotlessly clean as if protecting a bright pearl with all one’s strength. 
It is said in the Collection of Middle-length Discourses (Madhyama Āgama; Zhongahanjing) that items that must be kept in one’s possession or anything that helps in the practice of the path are called “tools for the path” as well as “tools for enhancing the good Dharma.” In the Sutra on the Bodhisattva Precepts such necessary items are deﬁned as “tools to help people and to accord with the Way.” 1. 
Three Kinds of Robes In general, there are three kinds of robes: 
(These are called “triple robes.” Hence, it is wrong to call the robe made of seven strips of cloth, the undergarment , and the loincloth together the “triple robes.” The large robe is again of three kinds: 
The Buddha is said to have stayed one day in front of Indra’s rock cave , and observed that the rice ﬁeld spread out below was neatly marked by ridges into precise patterns. 
Thus, he is said to have explained to Ānanda that the robes of the past buddhas were all like that ﬁeld, and thereupon suggested to him that his disciples should model their robes after the pattern. 
The Record of the Rising Splendor of the Tradition gives an explanation as follows: 
The rice ﬁeld demarcated by ridges holds water and nourishes good rice seedlings, which eventually nurture the human body and life. 
The Dharma robe as symbolized by the rice ﬁeld is moistened by water which gives four kinds of beneﬁts and raises rice seedlings comprising three kinds of good results (i.e., freedom from greed, hatred, and delusion). 
The Sitting Cloth This item is called niṣīdana in Sanskrit and “a cloth on which one takes seat as he wishes” in Chinese. 
In the Mūlasarvāstivādavinaya , it is transliterated as “nishidanna” and translated in Tang Chinese as “zuoju,” or “equipment for seating.” According to the Vinaya in Five Divisions , it is “equipment” for protecting the body from the ground, keeping the robes as well as the monastic bedsheet from becoming soiled, and hence it is prescribed that “each monk should carry his own cloth for sitting.” The Mahāsaṃghikavinaya provides further information about the size of the cloth, as follows: 
its length should be twice the length of the Buddha’s arm, and its width one and a half times . 
The Undergarment As prescribed for monks in the Vinaya discipline , there was only an ancient garment, the saṃkakṣikā . 
(This is called, in translation, “a cloth that covers the upper arm and shoulder,” and is also called “a cloth that covers the armpit.”) The size of this robe is long enough to cover the left upper arm and rightside armpit. 
Zhudaozu said in the Chronicle of the Wei Dynasty that the court ofﬁcials of the Wei did not consider it proper for Buddhist monks to keep their right shoulder and arm exposed, and thus a one-shoulder garment, called piantan , was made which was then patched on to the regular saṃkakṣikā, [thus covering the whole upper torso]. 
(That the garment we have today is open in the back but connected at the collar is a legacy of this Wei court order.) 4. 
The Loincloth According to the Great Tang Dynasty Record of the Western Regions , nifuxie; (here, xie is abbreviated from sanggeqie) was called in Tang Chinese qun. 
It was called chui because the loincloth looks like such a vessel without its lid.) 5. 
The One-piece Garment According to oral tradition, the priests of long ago felt that it was inconvenient that some predecessors had an undergarment but no loincloth while others had a loincloth but no undergarment. 
They were innovative in bringing about the present-day form of the one-piece garment by combining both into one. 
There was an episode in which Puhua, begged for a one-piece garment made of wood . 
Dayang left a pair of leather shoes and a one-piece garment . 
The Almsbowl 1139b This is called boduoluo in Sanskrit and yingliangqi in Chinese, [meaning a vessel that can be used according to an individual’s need as to quantity]. 
It is also called boyu, which is a compound of Chinese and Sanskrit syllables (i.e., bo for pātra and yu, which means “bowl” in Chinese]. 
The World-honored One recollected that the buddhas of the past all invariably carried their respective bowls to receive alms, and wondered to himself what kind of receptacle he should use now in order to receive alms from the two merchants. 
At that moment, the four guardian gods of the heaven at once brought four golden vessels before him. 
The Worldhonored One, however, did not accept them, because no person who had renounced the world could keep such precious items. 
In the meantime, Vaiśravaṇa, the guardian king of the northern heaven, spoke to the other three, saying: 
“As I recollect, a long time ago, the guardian generals of the blue sky brought us four stone-carved vessels that can be used to receive food. 
At that moment, a god, Vairocana by name, reminded them that they should not use these stone-carved bowls for receiving food but exclusively for offering alms to the Perfectly Enlightened One. 
In this period of ours, a perfected being , Śākyamuni by name, has appeared in this world. 
It should be best that these four stone-carved vessels should be presented to that Tathāgata.” As instructed, the guardian kings of the four corners of heaven presented the four stone-carved bowls to the Buddha. 
He stacked them one upon another on his left palm and compressed them from above with his right hand, thereby producing a single bowl with four corners for touching the mouth. 
Meritorious conduct of my past lives produced many results, Whereby the mind of compassion and purity has arisen within me. 
Because of this, the four guardian kings of the heavens, Immaculate and steadfast, had come to offer me the bowl I need. 
According to the Pewter Staff Sutra , the Buddha is said to have told his disciples that they should keep a staff topped by pewter because all the buddhas of the past, present, and future have kept and will keep . 
The staff in question is also called a “wisdom staff” or “staff of virtue,” because it symbolizes the source of insight and practice and their merit. 
Mahākāśyapa asked the Buddha, “Why does the cane have pewter rings on top?” The Buddha replied, “Xi symbolizes lightness. 
Relying on this staff, its holder can remove his deﬁlements and escape from this triple world. 
Xi symbolizes insight. 
Because it awakens its holder to the ultimate nature of the triple world as suffering and empty, xi symbolizes separation. 
That is to say, its holder is to be freed from the ﬁve kinds of desires.” The pewter-topped staff equipped with two edges, each holding three rings, is said to have been produced by Kāśyapa Buddha, while a staff equipped with four edges holding twelve rings is said to have been innovated by Śākyamuni Buddha. 
The tip of this stick is protected by an iron point in order to make it durable. 
The Dusting Brush According to the Vinaya scriptures, the disciples suffered from insects and hence were allowed to make dusting brushes . 
According to the Mahāsaṃghika-vinaya, the Buddha is said to have permitted his disciples to make brushes out of thread, torn cloth, grass, and bark. 
But they were prohibited to use any brush made of animal hide, such as that of a cat, cow, or horse, as well as one decorated with a gold or silver handle. 
They are a “a tool that assists the concentration of the mind and the discipline of practice.” In the Soapberry Tree Sutra , the following story is related: 
Once upon a time there was a ruler named Boliuli. 
He said to the Buddha, “Since my country is small and located in a remote region, I have always felt insecure. 
The Dharma storehouse is so deep and wide that it is impossible for a person to practice everything. 
Please, teach me the essentials of the Dharma.” The Buddha replied, “If you want to annihilate your mental deﬁlements, make a set of prayer beads by piercing a hole through one hundred and eight soapberry tree seeds, string them together with a thread, and carry this with you at all times. 
And if you feel no mental and bodily disturbance, then you will be able to leave your life and be reborn in the Yāma Heaven, . 
When you reach the number of one million times, you should be able to remove the one hundred and eight delusion-bound karmas and thereby realize the fruit of eternal bliss.” The king replied that he would practice as instructed. 
The Water Jar This is called kuṇḍikā in Sanskrit, and ping in Chinese. 
One ought to always keep a clean jar ﬁlled with water wherever one goes, to use for washing one’s hands. 
one of earthenware, which holds drinking water, and a second made of either copper or iron, which holds water for washing. 
The Water Filter In the Record of the Rising Splendor of the Tradition it is said that although this is a small tool, the beneﬁt it provides is exceedingly great because it protects lives. 
In China, however, Buddhist practitioners seldom carry such an item. 
According to the Mūlasarvāstivāda-vinaya, the One Hundred and One Formal Acts of Resolution mentions ﬁve kinds of water ﬁlters : 
(This is made of silk cloth three by three feet or three by two feet, and usable in ﬂexible sizes, smaller or larger, in different circumstances. 
The cloth must be made of the ﬁnest silk threads closely woven, so that it does not tiny insects. 
A woven silk cloth or coarse hempcloth, if used, does not serve the purpose of protecting life.) 2. 
A jar for mendicancy, faping . 
(Yijiao here does not mean a corner of the kaṣāya robe but simply a thickly woven silk cloth that is picked up by its corner. 
It is used by placing it over the mouth of a jar or over a bowl into which water is poured, thereby ﬁltering the water.) The Venerable Zongze, Cijiao Dashi (author of the Monastic Regulations of the Zen Garden) collected the sources about water ﬁlters from sutras and Vinaya texts and composed thirty-one verses on the subject. 
Because of the abundance of descriptions he did not record them all, but in the end concluded that the so-called ﬁlter cloth could not [produce an ample enough quantity of ﬁltered water] for the use of a multitude of people. 
In the ﬁrst year of Chongning , the Venerable Zongze built a large washbasin by the side of the well in front of the kitchen hall of Hongjiyuan Monastery. 
Even when water was poured into the upper basin , no overﬂow occurred, and as many as ﬁve practitioners could easily wash their feet [at the same time]. 
A similar system was built for the rear room of the bath hall. 
When the Venerable Zongze later on resided at Changlusi, he installed a similar water-ﬁltering system at the side of each well in that temple, in more than twenty places. 
Unless water is ﬁltered at a temple at all times, the transgression [of “killing tiny insects” by the resident practitioners] comes to be the responsibility of the head of the temple. 
The Precept Knife In the Outline of the History of Zen Practitioners, it is said that a small knife, called a “moral preservation knife” , is also a tool necessary for the practice of the path, because it symbolizes the severance of all evils. 
The Traveling Pack In earlier days, practitioners wore hats when traveling and carried within them scriptures, a tea set, and so on. 
Robes and garments were packed in two parcels, one carried in front and the other on the back. 
The certiﬁcate container and the precept knife were inserted in the parcels. 
Today, however, we use two pieces of indigo-colored cloth to pack the parcels. 
First, we use one of the cloth pieces to wrap garments and so on into a parcel and is then wrapped in oil paper. 
Next, the other piece is used to rewrap the parcel into a square package, then a small chain is placed around 227 it, and a hook attached to the top. 
The ordination certiﬁcate is placed in a sack which is carried hanging around the neck in the front. 
The kaṣāya robe is tightly wrapped in a handkerchief and placed in a hip parcel which is carried on the lower torso, while socks and shoes are placed in a sack that is carried on the back. 
A walking stick is carried in the right hand, and when we meet other practitioners on the road, we hold our hands together, the right hand over the left to greet each other as we pass by. 
At the resting place , he unties the pack, removes his socks and shoes, washes his feet, changes his garment, and dons his kaṣāya robe before meeting the guest reception ofﬁcial. 
(According to the Vinaya texts, bhikṣus may stay wherever there is Dharma and food. 
They may also stay where there is Dharma but no food. 
They ought not, however, to stay where there is no Dharma even if there is food.) According to the Ancient Regulations, when a practitioner arrived at a monastic temple, he ﬁrst met with the guest reception ofﬁcial, and then visited the practice hall ofﬁce to complete a ceremonial proceeding, thereby establishing his residency and securing an assigned space and a desk space for reading scriptures . 
“We, new arrivals, request an interview.” Thereupon, the guest reception ofﬁcial invites them into his ofﬁce. 
On this day, we respectfully wish that the venerable Zen master and guest reception ofﬁcial enjoy every blessing in daily life. 
It is very fortunate for this temple to receive each of the venerables coming from such a long distance. 
After this, the visitors stand, give thanks for the tea, and return to the transient quarters, while the guest reception ofﬁcial pays a return visit to them. 
The ceremonial leader receives him, and when all in unison greet him, the guest reception ofﬁcial says: 
Though this is a belated return, I wish that the venerables, honorable Zen masters, enjoy every blessing in daily life. 
I am especially obliged to thank you for the visit you made just a short while ago. I am most grateful, sirs. The reply is: The manner of decorum was already expressed at the time of our meeting. 
The Visit to Honor and Venerate the Abbot If the new arrivals wish to pay respect to and venerate the abbot, they must visit the ofﬁce of the abbot’s assistants after the evening session is completed to meet with the ofﬁcial assistant, where they exchange the same propriety as before. 
The assistant ofﬁcial invites them to sit and enquires in detail about the purpose of their visit. 
At once, the assistant goes to the abbot and informs him of the guests’ wish. 
If the request is granted, the assistant dispatches the guest master of the abbot’s ofﬁce to visit the practitioners the next morning, while the early morning bell is being tolled, to report to them that their meeting with the abbot will be arranged. 
With the ceremonial leader as head, the guest practitioners assemble to wait for the abbot. 
May your reverence sit cross-legged. He turns to the incense burner, offering incense with his left hand, and then steps back to perform the formal greeting [of two prostrations with opened sitting cloth and three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth] in unison with the others. At the ﬁrst opening , he says: 
I, So-and-so, and the others have for some time heard that your reverence maintains high standards in the practice of the Way. 
We are most grateful today to have an opportunity to see your countenance. 
The group then completes the greeting with three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth. 
When all take their seats, the assistant ofﬁcial burns incense and serves tea, while the abbot enquires of their home regions, their previous names, and the temples where they were in residence for the last summer retreat. 
Each question must be answered with reference to actual facts, and one should refrain from speaking too much. 
Rising from their seats, proceed to burn incense and express their thanks: It has been an important reception that the venerable has granted us. 
Our reverence to you, sir. Subsequently, they visit the abbot’s assistant’s ofﬁce to express their thanks: Arranging the meeting must have taken much effort, for which we are especially grateful. 
No sooner have myself, So-and-so, and the others returned from greeting and venerating you as a group and individually than we have received your courtesy return. We are most grateful for your presence once again. 
The ceremonial leader moves to the higher-ranking side to receive and escort the abbot’s assistant into the quarters. 
After greeting him in unison with the others, he says: 
Though it was our duty to come together to venerate you at your quarters, on the contrary we are receiving your second visit. 
We only regret very much that we have not been able to express our thankfulness earlier to you, sirs. Nowadays, many of those who travel for training and learning do not stay in the transient quarters . 
Wherever they go they try to stay at the resident quarters of a temple ofﬁcial by ﬁnding someone who comes from the same native province as them. 
The standard of conduct of earlier days is no longer followed. 
When the abbot receives a renowned guest visitor, he should escort him afterward to the guest quarters to express his thanks. 
Moreover, the abbots of the ﬁve major monastic establishments are not required to make a return visit to express such propriety. 
Between breakfast and the noon meal, the guests are invited to [partake of] refreshments, and that evening to a special serving of sweet hot water; the guests must wear their robes on this occasion. 
After burning incense and expressing a general greeting concerning the weather, they take their seats, and the practitioner assistant invites them to drink sweet hot water. 
They must perform the formality of two prostrations with opened sitting cloth and three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth. 
When the abbot is in attendance he must burn incense, and if he participates in the serving of sweet hot water, he must perform the utmost propriety for the occasion. 
Next morning, after the morning gruel, the guests are invited to a tea reception. 
After the duration of an overnight stay, we respectfully wish that the venerable master, head of the temple, enjoy every blessing in his daily life. 
I, So-and-so, and the others have been given a favorable reception and we are most grateful. 
We especially express our appreciation for this occasion, and we are most grateful. 
The abbot sees them off, following after them for two or three steps. 
I, So-and-so, and the others, consider the matter of life and death to be of prime importance and are concerned with the nature of impermanence and the swiftness of change. 
Because we have heard of for some time the high standards the venerable holds in the practice of the path, we have come to join your community. 
When their request is granted, they perform a prostration with unopened sitting cloth and obtain from a note of his approval. 
The practitioner then takes the document to the ofﬁce of the abbot’s assistants to register his name, saying: 
The assistant ofﬁcial in due order dispatches a note marked with the guest’s name to the practice hall ofﬁce. 
To obtain a permit for temporary absence from the monastery, one must wait until half a month has passed. 
In the Ancient Regulations, the duration of the application for a temporary travel permit was always limited to a period of half a month, and beyond this period one had to follow the same procedure again to reestablish one’s residency and to abide by the rules of the practice hall. 
In case of the sickness or death of one’s parents or religious teachers, the duration of a practitioner’s absence is not bound by the above rule. 
In general, it is customary to show one’s reverence for the path of his teacher to place a chair in the reception hall. 
When interviewing new arrivals, the abbot must take his seat in a mid-position and request them to burn incense and perform prostrations with opened sitting cloth . 
While sitting near the chair, he bids the new arrivals to drink tea. 
Even today, this is still practiced in the northern regions . 
Mistaking certain wrong examples as standard, they regard them as ancient tradition and perpetuate them, thus creating the wrong effect. 
If one tries to usurp a rank equal by surpassing his own rank, he likely invites ridicule by outsiders. 
The path of reverence toward one’s teacher has been in total jeopardy. 
Being respectful toward one’s teacher is identical to being respectful to the Dharma. 
When the Dharma is respected, the standard of the monastic institution improves. 
In the western countries , the way students attend their teachers is comparable to the way they respect their rulers and parents. 
I am simply afraid that our are no match for this standard, and we must learn from them. 
Either at the beginning of the ninth month, before the winter months, or in the new year season, the group of new members choose someone known for administrative skill or well experienced in monastic affairs as their ceremonial leader. 
On the scheduled day, with the appointed member as their leader, they go to the reception hall and line up in front of it. 
May we request your venerable to take a seat cross-legged. The abbot utters an instructive word, and the ceremonial leader replies. 
Next they thank the assistant ofﬁcial. 
The following morning they attend a tea reception at the abbot’s ofﬁce and thereafter formally request his permission for residency. 
Waiting while the document of approval is sent to the practice hall ofﬁce, they will be escorted to join the members of the practice hall. 
The procedure of joining or returning to the hall is as mentioned above, and the abbot returns his propriety when they come to thank him for granting their residency. 
Senior practitioner So-and-so Senior practitioner So-and-so Date Reported by So-and-so Ofﬁce of the Assistants V. 
Led by the ceremonial leader, all the invited new arrivals meet the ofﬁcial, perform a prostration with unopened sitting cloth, and greet him with an enquiry about the weather and his well-being. 
They are then invited to take their seats and ﬁnish drinking tea. 
I, So-and-so, and the others have received approval from the abbot. 
Thereupon, the ceremonial leader leads the group of practitioners into the practice hall from the right side of the front entrance, where they line up in front of the altar of the guardian bodhisattva. 
burns incense and, in unison with the group, performs three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth. 
He makes a round through the hall from the higher section through the lower section of the hall, returns to the front of the altar, and bows [together with the others]. 
The director of practitioners’ affairs enters the hall and, after burning incense, proceeds to take a position in the higher section of the hall. 
An attendant carries the certiﬁcate on a crepe-wrapped board, and the director instructs the attendant to return the certiﬁcate . 
The same attendant ushers the new residents to the practitioners’ quarters and strikes the wooden sounding block located within the quarters three times. 
The master of the quarters receives them as they enter the quarters and exchanges a prostration with unopened sitting cloth and an enquiry about the weather and their well-being. 
May you in your compassion help us in this matter. The master of the quarters replies: Welcome to the venerables who have arrived here. 
It is a pleasure, moreover, to secure the path of quiescence and solitude together with the venerables. 
Immediately the new residents perform a prostration with unopened sitting cloth and move toward the east while the master of the quarters moves toward the west . 
The master of the quarters leads the new residents to line up before the altar of Guanyin to bow. 
On this day, we respectfully wish that the venerable Zen master of the quarters enjoys every blessing in daily life. 
By the abbot’s compassion, I, So-and-so, and the others have been directed to be close to the various ofﬁces and we earnestly request your assistance. 
Nowadays, in many cases this kind of meeting does not occur and only a message is sent, or it is said that the propriety of prostration should only be conducted at the quarters of the primary seat ofﬁcial. 
However, all this is wrong; the dual order ofﬁcials should pay a return visit to the new residents when they express thanks to them by performing a prostration in return. 
Day and month Reported by So-and-so, Practice Hall Ofﬁcial (The report sent to the assistant’s ofﬁce is in actuality the same report received by the abbot’s ofﬁce; the abbot’s name is omitted to show reverence. The report sent to the ofﬁces of the front hall primary seat ofﬁcial, the ofﬁce of the abbot’s assistants, and the practitioners’ quarters should provide information concerning the year of ordination and the native province [of each new member], but this is not the case with the report that is sent to the other ofﬁces.) 2. 
Simpliﬁed Procedure for Establishing Residency 1141b As soon as the abbot has granted residency, the assistant ofﬁcial sends the document of approval to the practice hall ofﬁce. 
We are most grateful. 
It would be fortunate, however, if I could obtain your pardon for any of its shortcomings. 
The practice hall attendant strikes the small wooden sounding block inside the quarters three times. 
The master of the quarters receives the new residents. 
The propriety is the same as before. 
Establishing Residency by the West Hall Primary Seat Ofﬁcial If a renowned practitioner from one of the major monastic establishments wishes to obtain residency, he is obliged to express his intent clearly along with the formal statement. 
He will be invited on that day or another day to a tea reception to meet with the dual order ofﬁcials and the retired ofﬁcials. 
The west hall primary seat ofﬁcial of Such-and-such Temple has not abandoned us and has come to stay with us in order to guard the path of quiescence and solitude. 
As soon as this propriety is completed, he proceeds to the abbot’s ofﬁce, carrying an incense case, to express his thanks. 
Escorted in by the practice hall attendant, he visits the ofﬁces of the dual orders and the retired ofﬁcials in order to return his thanks to them. 
On the following day, the abbot invites him to a special meal and tea reception. 
I, So-and-so, have come here especially to take refuge, because the matter of life and death is of prime importance. 
I am most grateful for your acceptance of my request to be included in the residency record. 
We shall follow the standard propriety of this temple in escorting you to your quarters, sir. 
When the exchange of a bow with the dual order ofﬁcials has been completed, he pays a visit to the abbot’s ofﬁce, carrying an incense case in his sleeve, and expresses his thanks to him for the individual quarters to which he has been assigned. 
The practice hall ofﬁce attendant escorts him on making rounds through the administrative ofﬁces and the various quarters of the training ofﬁcials to express his thanks. 
The primary seat ofﬁcial burns incense and serves tea for these ofﬁcials. 
the abbot sends a message to the guest resident, saying that the temple community as a whole will escort him to his quarters. 
The person burns incense and performs prostrations with opened sitting cloth. 
If he is of lower rank than the abbot, if he formerly attended him as his assistant, and so on, he is obliged to receive the propriety prescribed for such relations. 
Establishing Residency through an Interview Requested by Casting Incense When a new arrival is unable to present himself at the proper time, either because of certain unavoidable conditions or due to not having received a message to forego his intended visit, he is allowed to approach the abbot whenever possible. 
Upon seeing the abbot, he casts an incense case to the ﬂoor and says: 
Picking up the incense case, he requests permission for residency. 
If the abbot grants permission, the assistant ofﬁcial sends the document of approval to the practice hall ofﬁce. 
The following procedure is identical as before. 
If the residency chart is already ﬁnalized, he is obliged to request the practice hall ofﬁce to place his name in the chart. 
Or if there are numerous residents, he is to be placed at the end of the ordination order. 
The Propriety of Giving Thanks for the Granting of Residency In the Ancient Regulations, those who were permitted to join the practice hall were obliged to conduct the propriety of giving thanks at once for the residency granted to them. 
they would have to wait till either one of three later occasions to do so, namely, before the winter solstice, before the new year, and before the summer retreat. 
Zen Master Fozhao moved from Yuwang to Jingshan , accompanied by Quanguyun as his assistant at his inauguration as abbot. 
Fozhao, therefore, settled the case by ruling that the propriety of giving thanks for permission for residency should be accomplished before either the summer or winter season of each year. 
Prior to the time of the propriety, the assistant ofﬁcial examines the “Record of the Ordination Year” of the practice hall ofﬁce, and assigns one of the eldest in ordination seniority among the new arrivals to be the ceremonial leader and another as co-leader. 
(In earlier days, a person who was once the assistant to the abbot of a major temple was customarily chosen as the ceremonial leader. 
Often, however, the sense of harmony was disturbed by competition and disputing which temple was of higher or lower status. 
According to the original regulations, even an assistant ofﬁcial of the abbot, having returned to the practitioners’ quarters, was obliged to follow the rules of the quarters as one of its residents. 
It is probably best for the abbot to endeavor to follow the system of ordination seniority.) The ceremonial leader must learn various proprieties by obtaining the small chart. 
Grouping the practitioners in several subgroups consisting of three members, and assigning one in each group as the sub-leader, he instructs them in detail to memorize set statements and to learn the manner of conduct to precisely execute their movements foward and backward, turning and bending, so that no embarrassing gap would result in the actual performance . 
Those newly approved residents are each requested to contribute money for the purchase of incense and to be ready for the performance of the propriety of giving thanks for the approval of their residency. 
Reported by So-and-so Attendant Practice Hall Ofﬁce The practice hall attendant posts this notice in front of the practitioners’ quarters, collects the incense money, and delivers it to the abbot’s ofﬁce through his assistant. 
The assistant ofﬁcial consults with the abbot to determine the date of the occasion. 
Those newly returned brethren are requested tomorrow after breakfast to visit the abbot’s ofﬁce to express thanks for the granting of their request for residency. 
The assistant ofﬁcial hands over a pack of large-grain incense to the ceremonial leader, who in turn hands it to his co-leader to hold. 
The ceremonial leader leads the new residents to their positions as indicated by the chart. 
He accompanies the assistant ofﬁcial to escort the abbot into the hall and, returning to his position, bows in unison with the others. 
May I request you to sit cross-legged. Stepping back with his left foot, he turns and passes to the right of the incense table, returns to his place, and bows in unison with the others. 
The co-leader then takes the pack of incense out of his sleeve and hands it to the leader. 
The ceremonial leader receives it in his sleeve with a small bow; with his hands clasped over his chest, he steps toward the incense table, burns incense with his left hand, returns by the same route as before, and bows in unison with the others. 
Leading the ﬁrst three members, he and the others open their sitting cloths; the abbot stretches out his hand, signaling [by this gesture that they are] excused from full propriety. 
So-and-so and the others, due to good fortune from past lives, have been permitted to reside under your protection. 
As before, he steps back, goes around the right end of the incense table, returns to his place, and, after a bow, again opens his sitting cloth. 
The ceremonial leader stands, folding his sitting cloth, steps forward again and says: 
The ﬁrst three practitioners bow, turn to the left, and go around to the end of the line. 
Their statements and manner of conduct are identical to the preceding. 
The ceremonial leader remains in place next to the assistant ofﬁcial and watches each group as they complete the propriety. 
When his co-leader reaches his former position, he joins him and, leading all the members, they bow in unison and withdraw. 
The ceremonial co-leader heads the procession, while the ceremonial leader brings up the rear. 
He enters the quarters from the right-hand side of the entrance, turns around toward the lower-ranking section of the quarters, and directs the members to form lines, as many as are needed according to their number. 
He then turns to enter the quarters, escorting the abbot. 
All members step forward or back, maintaining their lines and adequate distance between themselves with due attention to each other. 
Though this is another moment, we respectfully wish that the venerable master, head of the temple, enjoys every blessing in daily life. 
We, Soand-so, and the others, are obliged to express our thanks through veneration to you for the residency you have granted us. 
The ceremonial leader moves to the higher-ranking side outside the entrance and remains there, while the co-leader leads the members by turning around toward the higher-ranking section of the quarters. 
The ceremonial leader says: 
We, So-and-so, and the others, are fortunate that we have acquired our residency with your assistance. 
Next, the dual order ofﬁcials are escorted into the quarters. 
At this moment, we respectfully wish that the primary seat ofﬁcial, the administrative ofﬁcial, and all the other Zen masters enjoy every blessing in daily life. 
The co-leader leads the group members, turning behind the altar of Guanyin Bodhisattva, to stand before the incense burner. 
We, So-and-so, and the others, are very much obliged to you for your thoughtful guidance, and hence express here our special thanks. 
On the appointed day, it is necessary for the guest reception master of the abbot’s ofﬁce and the attendants of the practice hall ofﬁce to rise early and prepare the notice of return propriety by copying the originals and posting them in front of the practitioners’ quarters. 
Day and month Message upon instruction So-and-so, Attendant of the Guest Reception Master 249 The Venerable Primary Seat Ofﬁcial and the Administrative Ofﬁcial will visit the leader of those practitioners who acquired their current residency for the sake of the return propriety after the morning rice gruel. Day and month Message delivered So-and-so, Attendant of the Practice Hall Ofﬁce 8. The Abbot’s Special Tea Reception for New Residents (See also the similar reception given by the dual order ofﬁcials, chapter VI, part VII, section 1.) The guest reception assistant prepares the invitation for the tea reception by copying the list of the ordination dates, ranking, and names of the new residents . On the appointed day, as early as the time of morning bathing, a table, brushes, and an inkslab should be set up in the sky-lit hall , . 
The new residents are requested to line up and inscribe under their respective names, “So-and-so has respectfully received the invitation.” As to those renowned senior practitioners who once held positions in other temples, the day before the guest reception master must deliver to them letters of invitation prepared according to their ordination dates and request them to place their signatures on the sheets with their names. 
The assistant ofﬁcial instructs the guest reception master to draw up copies of the name tablets marked “special serving” for each guest, according to their ordination seniority, either in terms of the quadruple seating arrangement or that of the sextuple seating arrangement . 
If there is any disagreement, the eldest in ordination age among the renowned practitioners from a major temple must be recommended to take that seat. 
On the appointed day, after the noon meal, the new residents are called to assemble by the signal of drumming. 
The incense offering and guest reception assistants conduct the proceedings of the reception for the leftand right-side sections of the seated guests, respectively, greeting the guests one by one and bidding them to take their seats. 
Incense is burned to signal the invitation for the guests to offer incense, to signal the drinking of tea, and to signal the presence of the main guest. 
This is identical with the propriety of the small reception to serve sweet hot water held on the four annual celebration days. 
The main guest of the reception leads his colleagues in expressing thanks for the reception [by performing the formal propriety of two prostrations with opened sitting cloth and three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth]. 
We, So-and-so, and the others, are obliged to express our thanks for today’s reception especially served for us. 
On this day at this respectful moment, may the venerable master of the temple enjoy every blessing in daily life. Returning to the line of his colleagues, he performs three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth in unison with the others and withdraws. 
The next day, the administrative ofﬁcial instructs the attendant of the guest reception master to prepare the letters of invitation for tea, according to the ordination dates and names but without titles or ranks, and waits for the invitees in front of the practitioners’ quarters to obtain their signatures indicating acceptance of the invitation, “So-and-so has respectfully accepted the invitation.” The invitees assemble at the administrative reception hall, where the primary seat ofﬁcial is the main participant. 
The wooden sounding block located in the hall is struck to signal commencement of the reception. 
Again, on the following day, the primary seat ofﬁcial and the other training faculty ofﬁcials obtain the signatures of the invitees in the same manner as before. 
In the case of four or six training ofﬁcials, divided into two groups, they conduct the proceedings in making rounds to bow; in the case of three or ﬁve training ofﬁcials, the primary seat ofﬁcial burns incense and takes a position in the center, standing. 
In the Ancient Regulations, this propriety continued for three days, but today it is completed within a day in most Zen temples. 
The seating tablets and the drum may be borrowed from the abbot’s ofﬁce. 
The training faculty and administrative head, keeping a seat vacant for the abbot, mutually serve as the main participants. 
(The only difference is that when the invitees express their thanks, they are, without fail, obliged to move away from their seats, turn toward the host and bow, and then offer the word of thanks. 
He also posts a tablet indicating the zazen practice in front of the practice hall and at the practitioners’ quarters to inform the practitioners. 
The alms-serving master is 253 obliged to set up incense and light candles within the practice hall. 
At the moment when they all enter the hall, the wooden sounding block is struck a third time, somewhat softly. 
Thereupon, the second master of the quarters closes the entrance to the quarters and strikes the wooden sounding block located in front of the primary seat ofﬁcial’s quarters three times. 
The ﬁrst strike is made when the abbot leaves his quarters, the second when he reaches midway, and the third when the abbot enters the practice hall. 
The primary seat ofﬁcial burns incense in front of the altar of the guardian bodhisattva and makes a round through the hall, from the lower-ranking section to that of higher ranks, and then takes his place, sitting cross-legged. 
Next, after notifying the abbot, three strikes are made in a similar manner as before on the wooden sounding block located at the abbot’s quarters. 
The abbot enters the hall, burns incense, and makes a round of the hall from the higher-ranking section to the lower ranks, and sits cross-legged at his place. 
After zazen practice, the practitioners gradually arise from their places in order to rest. 
Some may leave their quilts in the hall and do not act as the others do. 
Or some may return to their seats after a while and leave their kaṣāya robes [at their places] as the others do, yet do not participate in the zazen session but remain outside the hall. 
In either case, such people must be caught and reprimanded. 
Only the primary seat ofﬁcial is allowed to come or go from his seat by passing in front of the abbot. 
The abbot and the training ofﬁcials leave the hall, while the practice hall attendant stands to the extreme right near the entrance and bows toward them . 
Nor is there the regular Zen discourse but zazen practice scheduled on a regular day after the Zen discourse should be held as usual. 
The abbot and the primary seat ofﬁcial make a round through the hall. 
Once a practitioner has completed a rotation shift, he starts again from the beginning. 
Inscribed on both sides by Abbot So-and-so with his signature. 
The tablet is to be passed to the next person early the next morning. 
Recently, the number of practitioners in charge of the hall has increased so that they form large groups. 
They chew fruit seeds and gather for idle talk and laughter, perpetuating such behavior and making it an evil custom, and they disturb the quiet of Zen practice. 
The Manual of Zazen Practice Generally speaking, a bodhisattva who seeks the insight of prajñā should raise the mind of great compassion, issue forth the universal vow , engage himself in the ardent practice of samādhi, and resolve to liberate sentient beings. 
He does not seek liberation merely for himself but renounces all causes of trouble and brings myriads of thoughts to rest, so as to unify body and mind and make no distinction between motion and stillness. 
He must measure each meal as to its adequacy and regulate hours of sleep and rest, prepare a thick seat cushion in a quiet environment and sit in the full cross-legged position or in the half-lotus position. 
The left hand is placed on the right hand and the thumbs of both hands touch. 
The body is held straight in sitting, with and the nose and abdomen vertically aligned. 
The tongue rests on the upper palate, the lips and teeth are ﬁrmly closed, and the eyes remain slightly open so as to avoid falling asleep. 
When a practitioner realizes the state of concentration, he acquires the utmost superior power. 
In ancient times, those practitioners who were well trained in the practice of zazen always kept their eyes open while abiding in deep concentration. 
Zen Master Yuantong of Fayunshan is said to have scolded his students who sat with eyes closed. 
There is a deep meaning, therefore, in the expression, “Wherever there is a dark hill there lies a cave where devils abide.” One must not delve into thoughts that arise, whether good or bad. 
As soon as a thought arises, he must become aware of it. 
He must always be aware of what arises in the sphere of consciousness without losing clear discrimination, and without becoming dull or scattered. 
A myriad of years is nothing but one moment of thought, which is neither discontinuous nor continuous. 
This is the essential Way of Zen practice. 
The taste of insight into the Dharma nourishes one’s spirituality, a quiescent state of everlasting illumination. 
Waking and sleeping are, as it were, identical, and life and death are as one. 
Nevertheless, it is often the case that when the path is lofty, one’s wayfaring is more likely to be even more intensely disturbed by devils in thousands of situations. 
If once, however, you can manage to bring right mindfulness into your present consciousness, no obstacle can disturb or delay anything, just as it is explained in the Śūraṃgama-sūtra, in the Tiantai Practice of Śamatha and Vipaśyanā by Zhiyi , and in the Manual of Practice and Realization by Guifeng . 
If one analyzes devilish disturbance in detail, one becomes aware that everything arises from one’s own mind and not from outside . 
When the power of samādhi and prajñā becomes superior, devilish obstruction disappears of its own accord. 
When you are ready to emerge from dhyāna, you should move your body slowly and arise from your seat with ease and grace, never abruptly and roughly. 
Among all forms of practice, samādhi is regarded as the best. 
If one does not engage in meditation and concentration , one is bound to become totally lost in the triple world of existence, dallying in external causes. 
When the water is moving, it is difﬁcult to look for pearls. 
The water of samādhi is clean and transparent and reveals the pearl of the mind of its own accord. 
Thus, it is said in the Sutra of Perfect Enlightenment that the insight of prajñā, free from obstruction and spotlessly clean, arises on the basis of Zen concentration . 
The Lotus Sutra also says that one should practice “mind concentration” in a tranquil environment and settle himself at ease, immovable like Mount Sumeru. 
This means that it is always on the basis of the condition of quiescence that you may transcend the state of an ordinary person as well as that of a holy person. 
In the past, those who passed away while sitting crosslegged or while standing must have been ﬁrm in the power of concentration. 
He also posts a tablet indicating the zazen practice in front of the practice hall and the practitioners’ quarters. 
At dusk, incense is burned and candles are lit in the practice hall. 
The wooden sounding block located in front of the practitioners’ quarters is struck to signal [the practitioners to assemble]. 
After the ﬁrst strike, the practitioners enter the hall; at the second strike, the training ofﬁcials enter; and at the third strike, the primary seat ofﬁcial enters. 
In some temples, it is against the regulations to not wear the kaṣāya robe for the occasion of Zen sessions. 
When the cooking of the evening rice gruel has been completed, the practice hall attendant notiﬁes the primary seat ofﬁcial: 
He passes behind the altar of the guardian bodhisattva and to its right, reaches the front entrance, takes down the tablet, and strikes the practice hall bell three times, at which time all practitioners bow in unison while remaining in their seats. 
Thereupon the practitioners descend from the raised sitting platform and pull out their bedding to a half-open position. 
Because of that, the abbot led all the members of the temple to assemble for the Zen session. 
At the drum signal, they proceeded to approach the abbot. 
[There is an episode related to this.] Because the region of Fenzhou was very cold, the honorable Shanzhao canceled this type of evening session , and the phrase, “the release from the Zen session” , derived from it. 
The Evening Zen Session 1143c Today, in monastic institutions where numerous practitioners reside, the “evening Zen session” is still practiced with the original meaning. 
This is called the “great Zen practice session” and it is nearly identical to a regular Zen session. 
The only difference, however, is that the primary seat ofﬁcial does not burn incense after entering the practice hall but proceeds directly to his place and waits for the abbot to enter and sit cross-legged at his seat. 
The practice hall attendant strikes the wooden sounding block at the primary seat ofﬁcial’s quarters three times, and the practitioners turn around to face each other while sitting cross-legged on their seats. 
The primary seat ofﬁcial descends from his seat, leaves the hall through the rear entrance, reenters the hall through the front entrance, burns incense before the altar of the guardian bodhisattva, makes a round through the hall as usual, and then returns to his place and sits cross-legged. 
If the abbot conducts the evening session, the practice hall bell is not rung; the guest reception master of the abbot’s ofﬁce makes three drumbeats, signaling the abbot to leave the hall. 
The primary seat ofﬁcial, leading the practitioners, follows him to the Dharma hall or to the abbot’s reception hall. 
When he takes his seat on the chair, the assistant ofﬁcial, the dual order ofﬁcials, and the east and west hall ofﬁcials each step out individually from their regular positions and bow (prior to the beginning of his exhortation). 
If there is no evening session, the practice hall attendant goes before the primary seat ofﬁcial and, after a bow, says: 
During a period when a series of Zen sessions is conducted, it is better to alternate days with a session with days having no session, so that the junior members can learn the proceedings. 
In the evening, when the wooden sounding block in front of the practitioners’ quarters is struck three times, they leave their quarters and return to the practice hall. 
Next, the abbot enters, burns incense, and makes a round. 
When an extended session of zazen is requested , the abbot reenters the hall from the rear entrance and settles on his seat without making a round through the hall. 
When the sound of the primary seat ofﬁcial opening his pillow is heard, the practitioners make ready to take their nightly rest. 
Next morning, the practitioners are awakened by three strikes of the wooden sounding block. 
The practitioner assistant for the guardian bodhisattva pulls around the hall towel rack to surprise late risers. 
When the practitioners ﬁnish washing and return to the hall, the primary seat ofﬁcial enters ﬁrst, burns incense, and makes a round through the hall. 
Next, the abbot enters, burns incense, and makes a round in the same way. 
At the signal of four drumbeats (i.e., the fourth watch of the night and the ﬁfth point, 2:40 A.M.), the abbot leaves the hall. 
The rest of the training ofﬁcials and the practitioners leave the hall a moment later through the rear entrance, change their garments and hats, and, after a rest, return and wait on their bed spaces. 
Sometimes the primary seat ofﬁcial returns to the hall and once again makes a round through the aisles of the hall. 
When the hall bell has ceased ringing, the metal gong located at the kitchen hall is sounded to signal the time to fold up the bedding . 
The practitioners may then leave the hall as they wish. 
Contemplation of the buddhas or scriptures should be simultaneously practiced . 
With a bow, the practitioner burns incense, performs nine prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth , and folding up the sitting cloth, steps forward and says: 
As I, So-and-so, regard the matter of life and death of primary importance and am concerned with the swiftness of transformation, I earnestly request the venerable master in his compassion to grant me special instruction with words of expediency. 
When it is over, he steps forward to burn incense and once again performs nine prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth. 
This is called the propriety of “giving thanks for causes and conditions” . 
The practitioner is also obliged to drop in at the assistant ofﬁcial’s ofﬁce to thank him. 
The Propriety of Partaking of the Morning Rice Gruel and the Noon Meal In the early morning, after the metal gong located at the kitchen hall has been struck to signal the release from morning silence, and later, at mealtime while awaiting the sound of the kitchen hall metal gong, the practitioners go to their respective places in the practice hall where their almsbowls are kept and take them down. 
They then enter the practice hall, bow before the altar of the guardian bodhisattva, and proceed, with palms joined together, to their respective seats. 
With your back to the raised sitting platform, ﬁrst use your right hand to pull up your left sleeve and hold it by the left armpit, and then use your left hand to pull up the right sleeve and hold it by the right armpit. 
Then, supporting your weight on both hands placed on the board behind you, shove your sandals below the board and then ﬁrst bend in your left foot and pull in the right foot next, proceeding to carry your whole body backward a foot or so across the wooden board. 
Then sit cross-legged, spread the kaṣāya robe to cover the knees, neither revealing the undergarment nor letting it hang down over the platform. 
In the Ancient Regulations, the abbot came to the practice hall every day. 
At breakfast, he ﬁrst sits in the outer hall, and when the practice hall bell is rung, he enters the hall. 
Attending the Special Tea and Sweet Hot Water Reception The propriety involved in the tea and sweet hot water reception by the abbot and the dual order ofﬁcials is a rather serious matter for a number of reasons. 
One must not be negligent about it. 
Once invited, one must be on time to attend the event. 
Anyone who does not attend due to negligence is certainly not entitled to live under the same roof. 
The Request for Universal Participation in Tasks of Labor The rule of “universal participation in the task of labor” is meant to equalize the work contribution of individuals, whether higher or lower in rank. 
In general, wherever a number of people live together, there should necessarily be things accomplished on the basis of all members’ cooperative effort. 
At the sound of the wooden ﬁsh-shaped gong or the drumbeat, every member tucks up his sleeves with a strip of cloth over his arms and assembles at the designated place for the task of labor. 
Except for the guard of the practitioners’ quarters, the practice hall guard, and the sick and aged, every practitioner is equally required to participate in such tasks. 
“A day of no work is a day of no eating.” VII. 
Introduction Zen Master Wuliangshou said , Escaping from worldly dust and leaving human convention, shaving the head and wearing the kaṣāya robe, and pursuing the path by sojourning in various monastic institutions, one must clearly know the rules and disciplines of these institutions. 
Since wrong behavior easily becomes an established custom through repetition and learning, it is very difﬁcult to reform. 
Because such fault and sickness are so frequently observed in everyday life, it has ﬁnally led to the compilation of those paradigmatic rules of Baizhang as models. 
In order to escape from the about these rules, it is necessary to put each of these rules into practice immediately, and only after strict adherence to each can one claim that one has pursued the nature of the self, clariﬁed the forms of the mind, understood the problem of life, and grasped the nature of death. 
The practitioners who renounce and are constantly traveling can bequeath their rules to those who have not renounced . 
For many householders are not inferior physically or mentally to those who have left the householder life, and they are equally obliged to discharge their indebtedness to the buddhas and patriarchs. 
The Rules for Morning Proceedings As to the rules of conduct among the practitioners, you should not go to sleep before others do, nor should you get up after others have. 
Before the timekeeping bell signals three o’clock in the morning, you must arise energetically and put your pillow at the foot of the bed space. 
Pull yourself together and sit straight with the whole body, so as not to create wind which may disturb your neighbors. 
“Even if my life should end at this very moment, may I immediately be reborn in the Pure Land.” Then, go out to the washstand, lifting the hanging screen [of the practice hall] softly. 
You must not make noise by dragging your sandals or gargling loudly. 
When one lifts the hanging screen to go out of the entrance of the hall, one should not let his hand drop until it is all the way down. 
The water tray for washing one’s face must be gently handled, and one should not use too much hot water. 
Dip the right ﬁngers in dentifrice and rub the left side of the mouth, then dip the left ﬁngers in dentifrice and rub the right side of the mouth. 
Do not dip your ﬁngers in the dentifrice again; it should be cautioned that one’s mouth odor may be transmitted to others [in this way]. 
When rinsing the mouth, lean forward with your head down and after taking the water, spit it out with both hands downward; it is cautioned that it may splash over nearby buckets that are being used by others. 
You must not wash the head. 
There are four disadvantages for yourself and others : 
Do not make noise by blowing your nose, splashing water onto your face, loudly , or deﬁling the washing trays by spitting. 
Washing the face at three o’clock in the morning is for the primary purpose of religious practice. 
and stamping with the sandals are most annoying to the practitioners who are seriously engaged in practice. 
While washing your face do not ﬁght others for towels, nor should you use the towel to wash your head. 
When entering the practice hall through the higher-ranking section, step into the hall with the left foot ﬁrst; conversely, when entering from the 267 lower-ranking section, step into the hall with the right foot ﬁrst. 
Then ascend the raised sitting platform, fold up your bedding halfway, and sit upon it cross-legged. 
When changing your garment, you must put the new one on over the old one, keeping yourself covered while taking the old one off. 
You must not expose any part of your body while changing clothes, nor should you create a breeze by moving hurriedly. 
If you wish to burn incense and venerate the Buddha, you should do so while the timekeeping bell is being rung. 
Carry the kaṣāya robe in your sleeve, leave the hall by the rear entrance, and don the robe outside. 
How great is the robe of liberation; Formless yet the ﬁeld of every merit. 
Oṃ siddhāya svāhā . To fold up the kaṣāya robe, ﬁrst pull the grip portion and untie the ring. 
You should not hold the robe in your mouth or use your chin to pull the robe. 
When venerating the Buddha at the shrine hall , you must not occupy the central part of the ﬂoor lest you obstruct the abbot’s entrance into for the rite of veneration. 
Nor should you call the names of the buddhas out loud, nor should you walk beside someone who is performing the rite of veneration. 
You must take a place in the empty rear part of the hall. 
May the sound of this bell go beyond this Dharma world. 
May it be heard by all those who abide in the dark, ghostly world of iron prisons. 
May those who suffer in the three deplorable realms of existence be freed from it, Ending the perpetual warfare of sword-wheels. 
[At the end of morning zazen practice, at the time of “minor release of silence” , everyone must fold up their bedding and place the pillow within it. 
The way to fold the bedding is to ﬁrst ﬁnd the two front corners and stretch the quilt by hand straight in front. 
Then fold that one half into half, and next fold the other half which is closer to you into half. 
You must not extend the quilt into the neighboring space by folding it sideways, nor should you let any sounds escape when pulling the quilt, nor should you create any air movement by shaking it. 
You may either go to the practitioners’ quarters to have an herbal medicine drink, or engage in the practice of a “meditational stroll” in the hall, eventually returning to your almsbowl position by turning toward your upper shoulder . 
When entering the hall from the front entrance, you must step in from its southern corner; you are not allowed to approach from the northern corner or from the center. 
The Rules for Meal Proceedings As to meal proceedings, when the wooden ﬁsh-shaped gong is sounded signaling mealtime, no one is allowed to enter the hall. 
You may request a meal attendant to fetch your bowl and sit in the outer hall. 
Or, returning to the practitioners’ quarters, you may join the serving team. 
If you have already been seated, when your neighbors come to their seats, you are obliged to join your palms together. 
Unless one greets with respect the practitioners of the higher and lower seats as well as those across the aisle, there is no difference between a Buddhist gathering and of brahmans. 
Rise and stand straight for a moment, then turn again toward your upper shoulder , with both palms together, ready to take the bowl down. 
First, with your right hand release it from the hook, then with your left hand support it while turning around and bending down to place it on the ﬂoor. 
In this way, you can avoid colliding with your neighbor with your back hip. 
When the hall bell rings, everyone must descend to the ﬂoor to greet the abbot, who is entering the hall, and all bow in unison. 
No one, however, should move their hands to the right or left. 
The Buddha was born in Kapilavastu, Enlightened in Magadha, First preached in Vārāṇaṣī, Entered nirvana at Kuśinagara. 
As to the manner of “opening the bowl,” ﬁrst recite, with palms joined together, the following verse mindfully: 
1145a Thereupon, untie the knot of the wrapping cloth and take out the clean handkerchief to cover your lap and knees. 
The wrapping cloth must be folded into a triangular form, so that it may be placed on the board-edge without hanging over. 
First, unfold the tray sheet , pick up the bowl with your left hand, palm upward, and set it on the tray-sheet. 
Then using the thumbs of both hands, take out the nested bowls . 
Lay them out [from right to left], smaller to larger, and do not make a clattering noise while handling them, nor should your fourth and ﬁfth ﬁngers touch the bowls. 
Fold the drying cloth of the bowl into a small size, and place it together with the sack holding the spoon and chopsticks, laying these horizontally nearest your place (literally, “to the body”). 
When placing the utensils into the sack, you should put the spoon into the sack ﬁrst , but when removing them from the sack, take out the chopsticks ﬁrst, . 
The bowl-cleaning spatula must be laid vertically to the side of the second bowl, with its tip extending half an inch out from the tray sheet, so that alms [for the sake of the hungry ghosts] may be placed on it. 
Neither the spoon nor the chopsticks should be used for this offering, and it ought to be no more than seven grains of rice. 
Whenever food is received it is a general rule to make such an offering, but when food has not been received, it is not permissible to make an offering directly from the serving ladle. 
Join your palms together lightly graze your chest; do not let your ﬁngertips reach the mouth. 
Both hands cross each other at the ﬁngers, with the ﬁngertips almost sticking into their nostrils. 
In dragging the sandals and lifting up the entrance screen, there is no reﬁned cordiality whatsoever. 
Uttering sounds like and leaking breath, they look like heroes. When receiving food, you are obliged to hold the bowl with both hands and intone the following verse from memory: 
In order to request more or less , signal by keeping your right hand still or raising it slightly [to indicate that you have received enough]. 
Do not shake to the right or left. 
Second, reﬂect upon whether your virtue and practice have been perfected or are far from satisfactory, and partaking of the almsfood. 
Third, reﬂect upon whether your mind is prevented [from evil thoughts] and freed from wrongdoing, because such are caused by desire, and so forth. 
Fourth, reﬂect upon whether you regard food as good medicine and use it properly to treat illness and prevent emaciation of the physical form and strength. 
Fifth, reﬂect upon whether you are aware that it is for the sake of realizing the ultimate goal of the path that you receive this almsfood. Next, you must produce some alms and intone the following verse from memory: 
O host of hungry ghosts, I now make an offering of food for you; This food is offered widely in all ten directions, for all the hungry ghosts. 
Whether taking up the bowl or putting it down, you must not make noise either with the spoon or chopsticks. 
You should not cough or sneeze. 
If this naturally occurs, you should cover your nose with your sleeve. 
You must not scratch your head, because dandruff may ﬂy and fall into the bowls of neighboring practitioners, nor should you [put your ﬁnger in your] ear, nor make noise when chewing rice and drinking soup. 
You should not collect rice in the center of the bowl, nor should you take a large amount into the mouth , nor should you open your mouth in anticipation of the food, nor should you let food drop from your mouth, nor should you pick up and eat food with your ﬁngers. 
If there remains any vegetable sediment, leave it below the edge of the bowl. 
Do not create wind which might affect neighboring seats. 
Do not rest your hands on your knees. 
Request only as much food as you need. 
Wet food should not be placed in the primary bowl. 
Do not eat by pouring soup into the primary bowl and sifting rice from it. 
Do not eat rice by mixing it with side dishes in the primary bowl. 
While eating, pay attention always to your neighbors on each side, so as not to be too far behind in the proceedings. 
You must not start cleaning the bowl with the spatula before the second serving has been completed, nor should you make noise by sucking the tip of the spatula. 
Before the food is served, you should refrain from creating mental deﬁlement. 
Foolishly looking around in all directions, becoming depressed or angry; Thinking of food, swallowing saliva and thus coughing frequently; Pouring rice gruel, slurping soup, and stufﬁng food into the mouth; Opening the seat and spreading the bowl set, making noise everywhere toward all neighbors. 
As to the manner of washing the bowl, water is placed in the primary bowl and the smaller bowls are washed in due order in the bowl, but the spoon and chopsticks in it. 
[Wash the bowls using only the thumbs and ﬁrst two ﬁngers, keeping the fourth and ﬁfth ﬁngers extended after the bowl washing is done you may bend your fourth and ﬁfth ﬁngers. 
Do not gargle, as it makes noise, or spit water into the bowl. 
You must not wash the bowl while is boiling hot. 
Do not use this cloth to wipe sweat The residue water 273 must not be thrown onto the ﬂoor; , you must intone the following verse from memory: This water with which I have cleansed the bowls Tastes like ambrosia. 
I offer it to all the hungry ghosts, Wishing that they all be gratiﬁed by it. 
Oṃ mahorase svāhā . As for the manner of placing the smaller bowls back into the primary bowl, use the thumbs of both hands to pick up each bowl in due order and place them one after another into . 
After this has been completed, hold your palms together and recollect the verse that is recited at the end of each meal: 
Having ﬁnished the food, I feel the strength of my physical body, Whose majesty shakes the heroes in all directions and in the three times. 
Entering the quarters as well as coming to your seat is performed exactly as is done in the practice hall. 
Remaining in position, wait for the moment when the master of the quarters ﬁnishes burning incense, then bow to your neighbors, both higher and lower in rank. 
Drinking Tea and Reading Sutras at the Practitioners’ Quarters When practitioners take their seats to have tea in the practitioners’ quarters, they must be careful not to allow their robes to hang down. 
Nor should they talk and laugh with others with their heads close together. 
Do not greet others by a single raised hand, nor collect leftover tea. 
When ascending the raised sitting platform, you must not let your robe hang overboard. 
Some greet others with a single hand, but for what reason? 
After drinking tea, if you want to read sutras do not unfold the text scroll too widely but limit it to . 
You must not walk about in the quarters carrying the sutra in your hand, nor should you let its binding cord hang down, nor should you read it aloud, nor should you lean against the wallboard. 
It is advisable to leave the quarters early for zazen practice. 
Using the Lavatory When going to the lavatory, according to the Ancient Regulations, you must change into the robe made of ﬁve strips of cloth (wutiaoyi; namely, a simpliﬁed robe). Take a clean handkerchief and hang it over the left arm. 
Untie the string belt and hang it upon the bamboo rack, and take off the simpliﬁed robe and one-piece garment. 
Neatly fold them up and put them together with the handkerchief, marking the place. 
You must not engage in laughter and conversation, nor should you urge others in the lavatory to hurry across the doorway. 
Enter the lavatory carrying a water bucket in your right hand. 
When changing sandals, do not leave them in disarray. 
Place the bucket of water in front, and snap your ﬁngers three times in order to warn the hungry ghosts who feed upon feces. 
Squat down and maintain the right posture, do not groan nor spit saliva or nasal mucus, nor should you make conversation with another through the wall. 
The Ancient Regulations says: At the doorway, snap your ﬁngers lightly. 
When coming out of the lavatory, you must not leave the shoes in disarray. Do not pour water on both hands for cleansing. 
When the left hand is used for cleaning, cover the thumb and the two adjacent ﬁngers, and do not use many bamboo spatulas. 
1145c After using the spatulas, wash them with water and leave them in the space near the lavatory. 
Leave the water bucket where it was before. 
Using your dry hand, ﬁx your underwear and put on the under-robe. 
Open the door with your dry hand and come out, carrying the bucket with the left hand. 
You must not touch the door panel or the side of the door with your wet hand. 
Pick up a pinch of ash and then dirt with your right hand, not with your wet hand. 
You must not spit saliva to mix with the dirt. 
Wash the left hand and then use to wash the hand up to the elbow. 
In general, whosoever goes to the lavatory and does not intone the prescribed mantras will never be able to cleanse his deﬁlement, even upon reaching the subterranean depth of the golden layer by using as much as ten times the water in the Ganges River to wash his deﬁlement away. 
Therefore, one must maintain the mantras steadfastly and intone them seven times each on every occasion. 
Because of this practice, the ghosts and spirits always accompany him and protect anyone who intones them accordingly. 
Finally, cleanse your mouth with fresh water. Some Vinaya rules prescribe the method of cleansing after urination. 
As long as no signal is heard from the kitchen hall metal gong, you should not return to the practitioners’ quarters. 
Nor should you wash your clothing before the morning gruel. 
Nor should you open your storage box before the morning rice gruel, before the noon meal, or after the signal canceling the evening session. 
If it is an unavoidable situation, you must speak to the person responsible for the respective matter of concern. 
In the case of the practice hall, you must talk to the assistant ofﬁcial of the guardian bodhisattva. 
Nor should you read sutras or any kind of text in the practice hall. 
While engaged in a meditational stroll between the higherand lower-ranking sections, you must not take a direct passage through the hall. 
First, it is the space where the almsbowl is used; second, it is the space where the kaṣāya robe is placed; and third, it is the space toward where one’s head is directed during sleep at night. 
Nor should anyone open their storage box by squatting down on the ﬂoor. 
Nor should you descend from the raised platform by stepping on the board-edge. 
After going around outside the temple wearing grass sandals and the simpliﬁed robe made of ﬁve strips of cloth, no one is allowed to step into and walk about in the Buddha’s shrine hall or the Dharma hall [without ﬁrst changing their clothes]. 
You should not wear the practitioner’s sandals with bare feet. 
Nor should you walk hand in hand with another while explaining the secular truth as to its rightness and wrongness. 
Separating oneself from one’s parents and leaving one’s original teacher, What would one intend to accomplish by traveling afar to seek knowledge? 
Whoever has not settled with the matter of the religion of the Zen tradition, May not accomplish anything, even until they become white-haired. 
Movement must be conducted with gentle walking, For which one must learn Assaji’s majestic demeanor, Words must be spoken in a low voice, For which one must learn Upāli’s manner. 
One must not go to the shrine hall for no purpose, Nor should one step into the stupa compound to waste time. 
When washing your clothing after the noon meal, you must keep one shoulder covered. 
Nor should you soak the garment by pouring hot water directly from a jar. 
After using the bamboo poles and drying racks, they must be returned to their place. 
When the wooden sounding block is struck to signal the time for washing the feet, you must not compete with others to obtain a washbucket. 
If you have boils or sores that itch, you must wash your feet after the others ﬁnish, or go somewhere not directly within sight to do so. 
Each practitioner must act expediently to avoid any occasion that might incur disturbance in the minds of his fellow practitioners. 
You should return to the practice hall without waiting for the signal of the wooden sounding block when your work is done. 
Once the signal has been completed, no one is allowed to enter the hall. 
No one should remain standing outside the hall. 
Nor should anyone shout aloud or compete to obtain items such as gruel, rice, salt, vinegar, and so on. 
No one is allowed to return to the practice hall or walk through the corridors without wearing the regular robe. 
Nor should anyone wait for the signal of the wooden sounding block to leave the practitioners’ quarters. 
When the evening bell is tolled, each practitioner, with palms together, silently and mindfully recites this verse: 
279 Listening to the sound of the evening bell, we feel that deﬁlement is reduced, It increases far-reaching insight, inducing enlightenment, It helps us out of hell and the ﬁery pit. 
Let us aspire to realize buddhahood and help sentient beings. Everyone must ﬁrst return to his ﬂoor space to practice zazen. 
You must not scratch your head on the raised meditation platform, nor should you make noise by manipulating your prayer beads on the raised platform, nor should you exchange conversation with your immediate neighbors. 
If the practitioner next to you is not yet well cultivated, you must help him improve himself by way of skillful words, and never hold a sense of dislike toward him. 
After the bell to signal the end of zazen practice or the time to sleep, no one may use the front entrance for going or coming. 
Awaiting the moment when the primary seat ofﬁcial prepares his pillow, those who feel extremely tired go right to sleep. 
While sleeping, lie on your right side, not [on your back] facing straight upward, because this is called the dead man’s sleep. 
Wrap the kaṣāya robe in the handkerchief, and place it above your head . 
Today many practitioners place it below their feet, but logically this is not a convenient practice. 
The Rules for Bathing On bath day, carry your toiletries in the right hand, enter the bath hall from the lower-ranking section, and, after a bow, go to an empty space. 
Before taking off the one-piece robe, remove your underwear and wrap the loincloth around your body to prevent the bathing trousers from becoming loose. 
Then untie your underwear and place it in the wrapping cloth. 
Next, take off the one-piece robe and tie it together with the sash and the robe made of of ﬁve strips of cloth. 
When you hear the three drumbeats and enter the bath hall, Separate those clothes that directly “touched” the body from those that are “clean.” Wrap all your clothing into one bundle, turning it front and back, and then change into the wooden footwear. 
Do not enter the bathwater with bare feet. You should wait your turn to bathe at an empty spot in the lower-ranking section and must not occupy the space reserved for the training ofﬁcials and senior-ranking practitioners . Be careful not to pour hot water over another’s body. 
Do not dip your foot inside the bucket, nor urinate inside the bathing room, nor prop your feet up on the bucket, nor exchange laughter and conversation with others. 
Do not pour water over your body with a bucket while standing. 
Do not let the loincloth drop from your body. 
Do not dip your feet into the water bucket to wash them, nor use too much hot water. 
Those with itching sores must bathe last and not try to enter into the bath any earlier by hassling . 
Do not use the public washcloths for cleaning your head or face, because these are used for hand-cleaning after wearing the undergarment, and thereby you put the robe made of ﬁve strips of cloth on over it. 
After coming out of the bath, greet those on the right and left, ascend the raised platform, and sit cross-legged for a while facing the wall. 
Then, ﬁrst donning the robe and the one-piece robe, descend to the ground, take down your bathing trousers while bundling up the loincloth into it. 
This is because the wrapping cloth may have become wet. 
Holding the handkerchief in your left hand, greet the right and left, then leave the hall. 
Find the names of the donors and chant sutras or intone mantras as you wish, concluding with an invocation of merit transference. 
The Rules for Being at the Fireside During the winter months, when approaching the ﬁreside, you must ﬁrst sit on the ﬁreside board, then turn around to the back, and, sitting properly, greet the right and left. 
You must not play with the ﬁre shovels and pokers, 281 nor should you blow on the ﬁre or let ashes ﬂy up. 
Do not exchange conversation by putting your head together , and neither should food items be placed in the embers. 
Do not dry your sandals to the point of scorching, nor burn your shins or clothing. Do not expose your underwear by rolling up the one-piece robe. 
Do not spit or toss ﬁlth into the ﬁre. 
Conclusion of the Daily Rules of Conduct The rules of daily conduct as previously collected are concerned with the major events that take place in the lives of practitioners and are not intended to be heard by established senior practitioners. 
An Exposition on the Model Zen Principles of Conduct The following was written by Great Master Cijiao, the honorable Zongze : 
Ever since the coming of the patriarch from the west, the facility of the Zen monastic institution was destined to evolve fundamentally for the community of practitioners. 
The Normative Principles for the Community of Practitioners] Thus came to be the position of senior head ofﬁcial to teach the community of practitioners in the Zen religion. 
So did the position of primary seat ofﬁcial to provide model leadership for the community of practitioners. 
So did the position of the head administrative ofﬁcial to support the community of practitioners. 
So did the position of kitchen ofﬁcial to prepare daily provision for the community of practitioners. 
So did the position of maintenance ofﬁcial to engage himself in various tasks for the community of practitioners. 
So did the position of treasury ofﬁcial to keep accounts of revenues and expenditures on behalf of the community of practitioners. 
So did the position of secretarial ofﬁcial to deal with recording and correspondence for the community of practitioners. 
So did the position of guest reception ofﬁcial to receive and attend patron donors on behalf of the community of practitioners. 
So did the position of assistant to communicate requests and invitations between the abbot and the community of practitioners. 
So did the position of the master of the quarters to guard personal possessions, clothing, and almsbowls for the community of practitioners. 
So did the positions of bath master and water supply chief to provide sanitary bathing and laundry for the community of practitioners. 
So did the positions of charcoal supply chief and ﬁreplace chief to shield the community of practitioners from cold weather. 
So did the positions of alms campaign leader and fundraising master to make appeals for monetary and alms donation for the community of practitioners. 
So did the position of cleaning task chief to sweep and scrub on behalf of the practitioners. 
The community of practitioners has no worry whatsoever and can devote themselves singlemindedly to the pursuit of the path. 
Reﬂecting upon the assisting works of the multitude, shouldn’t we know and discharge our indebtedness? 
The practitioner should learn the propriety of the order of high and low, and be ﬁrmly in command of the decorum whether in movement or stationary. 
The practitioner should respect the external regulations and adhere to the inner rules. 
The practitioner should be harmonious, like milk and water, with the other practitioners in six ways (i.e., physical harmony, in sharing the same residence; verbal harmony, in the absence of disputation; volitional harmony, in sharing the same action; disciplinary harmony, in sharing the same practice; harmony of thought, in sharing the same understanding; and harmony of receiving beneﬁt, in sharing equal amounts). 
The practitioner should receive the food that is offered for the sake of realizing the goal of the practice. 
The practitioner should carefully use and look after the household items of his current quarters. 
The practitioner should examine his mind of understanding in reference to the ancient teachings under bright windows and on a clean desk. 
In dealings with his colleagues, the practitioner should be ﬁrm, like a mountain, regardless of whether it is a vase or a bowl that is missing. 
The practitioner should keep his mind calm as to his sickness and suffering, and willingly take the rice gruel and medicine. 
This is the way to discharge one’s indebtedness to the bath hall master and the water supply chief. 
The practitioner should keep his mouth shut, his hands together, and withdraw from the ﬁreside in order to let others have a chance [to warm themselves]. 
The practitioner should reﬂect upon whether his virtue and practice are deserving when receiving almsfood. 
The practitioner should bail water, carry used bamboo spatulas, and have a sense of shame and repentance. 
The practitioner should be easy to follow and simple to serve. 
Those who are endowed may realize the goal within one lifetime. 
The community consisting of these practitioners indeed constitutes the true treasure and most worthy ﬁeld of merit in this world. 
The Ofﬁcials’ Failure to Follow the Normative Principles] If the monastic institution is not reformed and if the wheel of the Dharma does not turn well, this is not the way for the senior master to teach the religion to the practitioners. 
If the three forms of karma are not well regulated, and if the four manners of conduct (i.e., walking, standing, sitting, and lying down) are not respectfully accomplished, this is not the way for the primary seat ofﬁcial to provide model leadership for the practitioners. 
If the practitioners feel no peace nor any sense of security, and if those who are demoralized do not leave, this is not the way for the director of practitioners’ affairs to please practitioners. 
If the food lacks the six kinds of tastes (i.e., sweet, hot, salty, bitter, sour, and mild), and if it is not served with the three qualities (i.e., plain, clean, and consistent), this is not the way for the kitchen ofﬁcial to prepare food for the practitioners. 
If the buildings and quarters are not well maintained, and if there is a lack of various kinds of household items, this is not the way for the maintenance ofﬁcial to provide the practitioners with secure accommodation. 
If the guest reception ofﬁcial disdains the poor, favors the rich, and entertains the laity while slighting his fellow practitioners, this is not the way for the guest reception ofﬁcial to assist the practitioners. 
If decorum and respectful appearance are absent and if the order of high and low is , this is not the way for the abbot’s assistant to help the practitioners communicate . 
If the inﬁrmary hall master does not learn how to care for and serve and if he disturbs the sick, this is not the way for the inﬁrmary master to the practitioners. 
If sufﬁcient hot water is not available and if hot and cold water is not supplied in good balance, this is not the way for the bath hall master and the water supply chief to help the practitioners cleanse their bodies. 
If the alms campaign leader and the fundraising master are not public-minded toward donations or have not done [their best to secure funds], this is not the way for them to serve the practitioners. 
The Practitioners’ Failure to Follow the Normative Principles] If the practitioners slight the senior master, the abbot of the monastery, ignore the Dharma, and follow their own natural inclinations in various circumstances, this is not the way for them to discharge their indebtedness to the abbot. 
If the practitioners covet fancy meals and humble dishes, this is not the way for them to discharge their indebtedness to the kitchen ofﬁcial. 
If the practitioners misuse writing brushes and inkslabs and show off their writing talent, this is not the way for them to discharge their indebtedness to the secretarial ofﬁcial. 
If the practitioners hoard things and if , this is not the way for them to discharge their indebtedness to the master of the quarters. 
If the practitioners anger easily and are difﬁcult to please, and if they do not follow the for their illness, this is not the way for them to discharge their indebtedness to the inﬁrmary hall master. 
If the practitioners to warm themselves and refuse others the opportunity to do so, this is not the way for them to discharge their indebtedness to the charcoal supply chief and the ﬁreplace chief. 
The Prime Importance of the Practitioners] In general, no matter how fast one may run about like a whirlwind thousands of times, there are always some cases in which it is just never enough. 
It is hoped that whoever is reared in the lion’s den will become a lion, and whatever grows under a forest of sandalwood trees may become another member of that forest. 
Five hundred years from now , let there be seen another grand gathering like that once held on Vulture Peak . 
The practitioners are the ﬁeld of merit [in which laypeople ﬁnd fortune by cultivating] and must be the object of people’s respect. 
When the practitioners are well respected, the Dharma is also well respected, but when they are slighted, the Dharma is also slighted. 
There is no exception in the law of cause and effect, from which no one can escape. 
The Way and Principles of Practitioners] Practitioners are the sons of the Buddha and no different from the saintly being, the Arhat , hence they are worthy of reverence from heavenly as well as human beings. 
The morning rice gruel and the noon meal of rice must be prepared to meet all dietary needs. 
The four kinds of alms and requisites (i.e., food and drink, clothing, bedding, and medicine) must always be provided without a shortage ever occurring. 
From the time of Śākyamuni, after two thousand years, the inherited shade still covers all his descendants. 
Of the world-illuminating light emitted from his forehead, not even a portion of its merit is ever exhausted despite all of our usages. 
You must simply learn how to serve your fellow practitioners and not worry about poverty. 
There is no difference between holiness and worldliness in the status of a Buddhist practitioner, which is universally accepted in all regions. 
It is true that this world is made up of all kinds of divisions, and yet how could it be right to discriminate against practitioners from different regions or treat them with disdain on account of such differences? 
The transient quarters are supposed to receive [guest practitioners] and be open to any traveling practitioner for three days. 
Serve them with due propriety. 
If one can transcend the mind of limitedness, there will be no limit to the reward of merit. 
Within the Zen school, the high and low harmonize their minds and try to put aside mutual deﬁciencies, if any. 
One must not expose family scandals. 
Even though their exposure may not harm anyone, such conduct reduces people’s trust and respect in the end. 
Such an action is comparable to parasitic worms infesting the body of a lion and consuming its ﬂesh from within. 
Indeed, neither non-human devils nor non-Buddhists could accomplish such destructiveness. 
If one wishes to prevent the decline of the path, to hold up the Buddhist sun for a long time, to increase the majestic luster of the tradition left to us by the patriarchs, and to assist the sacred tasks of the imperial court, one must make the foregoing rules of conduct one’s normative principles. 
The Prayer for Ailing Practitioners Should a practitioner become ill, those from the same native province and his religious colleagues gather at his bedside, set up incense, candles, and a Buddha image, and conduct a prayer of veneration for the Buddha with the following invocation: 
When water becomes transparent, there appears the autumnal moon. 
When an earnest prayer is applied, the meritorious ﬁeld of fortune manifests itself. 
Indeed, the true foundation of our refuge is the Buddha and his enlightenment. 
This morning, we have gathered for the sake of Venerable Bhikṣu So-and-so To clear up the wrongs he has suffered through many past lives And repent for the transgressions accumulated through innumerable transmigrations. 
Devoting our utmost sincerity to this end, we now request the holy assembly To venerate the buddhas by calling the sacred names and thereby accomplish a thorough puriﬁcation. 
The Luminous Pure Dharma Body Vairocana Buddha, and so on. 
We earnestly wish that the primordial mind may be puriﬁed, That the four material principles may become light and easy, Extending natural life as well as wisdom, That the physical body may become as ﬁrm as that of the Dharma body. 
Veneration to the buddhas in the ten directions and the three times, and so on. If the illness is very serious, a prayer directed toward Amitābha Buddha should be recited ten times. 
The Buddha Amitābha shines in golden luster, The sublimity of his features is beyond comparison. 
The white ūrṇa, curly hair sweetly rolling, appears on his forehead like Mount Sumeru, His blue eyes are transparent and clear like the four surrounding great oceans. 
In the illumination shed from his ūrṇa appear immeasurable myriads of buddhas, And innumerable bodhisattvas also appear within this illumination everywhere. 
This morning, we have gathered for the sake of Venerable Bhikṣu So-and-so, To clear up the wrongs he has suffered through many past lives And to repent the transgressions accumulated through innumerable transmigrations. 
Devoting our utmost sincerity to this end, we now request the holy assembly To venerate the buddhas by calling the sacred names and thereby accomplish a thorough puriﬁcation. 
May the honorable assembly call the name of Amitābha one hundred times, The names of Bodhisattva Avalokiteśvara and Bodhisattva Mahāsthāma each ten times As well as the innumerable bodhisattvas abiding in the great ocean of purity. 
If, however, it is unavoidable for him to come to the end of his life, may he swiftly realize the goal of rebirth in the Pure Land. 
Veneration to the buddhas in the ten directions and the three times. While chanting this prayer and the sacred names, practitioners must maintain their minds in purity and refrain from becoming entangled in worldly thoughts. 
The Words of the Will Venerable So-and-so, native of such-and-such province, became a Zen practitioner by receiving the ordination certiﬁcate in such-and-such year at such-and-such place. 
Day, month, and year Orally conveyed by Practitioner So-and-so, who is ailing 295 X. 
The attendant of the practice hall ofﬁce reports the to the primary seat ofﬁcial, the training and administrative ofﬁcials, and the abbot’s assistant. 
Along with the practitioner in charge of public proceedings, the practitioner who attended the ill person collects the contents of the sutra cabinet , the storage box [located in the practice hall], and all personal possessions, and prepares a record of them, numbering and sealing each item. 
This procedure must be handled jointly by the inﬁrmary hall master and the practitioner who attended the deceased. 
Even when the deceased has no bamboo case for his personal possessions, an equally dedicated funeral rite should be conducted for him. 
In the case that an administrative retiree who resided in the private quarters left behind many bamboo cases after his death, the deceased’s possessions, once sealed off, may be placed in that particular quarters but must be guarded by a practitioner assigned by the treasury ofﬁce. 
Unless the recently deceased practitioner had previously informed the abbot, the dual order ofﬁcials, or the retirees about the manner in which he wished his possessions to be distributed, or unless he left a written will in regard to the matter, no one can arbitrarily distribute his possessions to anyone or any place. 
(Zen Master Dachuan, while residing at Jingcisi, discovered that the primary seat ofﬁcial and the director of practitioners’ affairs had made forgeries concerning certain items that were entrusted by a deceased practitioner, and hence subsequently expelled them.) When an ailing practitioner closes his eyes , the inﬁrmary hall master at once notiﬁes the director of practitioners’ affairs and requests the attendants of his ofﬁce to prepare hot water. 
Bathing the body, they shave the head cleanly. 
The cloth used for drying the bathed corpse is to be distributed to those who bathed it, and the handkerchief used for shaving is to be given to the person who shaved the head. 
The Enlightened Spirit of Venerable So-and-so, Having Newly Entered Perfect Quiescence If the deceased is the distinguished west hall ofﬁcial, it may be written as: 
The Spirit of the Previous Abbot of Such-and-such Temple, So-and-so Title, Zen Master So-and-so In other cases, the title is given according to the ofﬁce held by the deceased. 
1148a Offering incense, candles, and various food provisions, the sacred assembly of practitioners chant the Mahākaruṇā-dhāraṇī before the shrine and thereby settle the deceased spirit through the invocation of merit transference. 
During the night, the candles are kept lit all night. 
The practice hall attendants prepare beforehand artiﬁcial funeral ﬂowers made of white paper, while the attendant of the deceased offers morning gruel and a noon meal every day. 
The administrative ofﬁcial serves tea and sweet hot water three times a day and burns incense. 
As the practice hall ofﬁce attendant rings his hand bell and walks ahead, the primary seat ofﬁcial leads the practitioners before the funeral shrine. 
This same rite is to be conducted three times a day. 
If the occasion coincides with the ﬁrst day of the month or mid-month days or with the imperial coronation day, the public conduct of the rite is excused and the funeral proceeding must also be postponed. 
Requesting Buddhist Funeral Rites Without fail, the abbot must be requested to conduct the rite of applying ﬁre . 
On a small white sheet of paper, the document must be written as follows: 
The funeral rite of applying ﬁre is to be ofﬁciated by the venerable master, abbot of this temple, as respectfully requested by the practice hall ofﬁcial, Bhikṣu So-and-so. The other funeral rites will be ofﬁciated as acknowledged in this note. If the deceased is the west hall guest ofﬁcial or a retired administrative ofﬁcial who resided in the individual quarters and left sizable personal possessions, the following additional rites may be conducted: 
serving tea and sweet hot water , turning around the portable shrine , turning around the remains , and so on. 
Since Venerable So-and-so entered ultimate quiescence, the rite of cremation has been scheduled on such-and-such date, for which I respectfully request the venerable to conduct the rite of “touching ﬁre.” The director of practitioners’ affairs then presents the note of request before withdrawing. 
The director prepares a record book of the funeral rites, as a reference to be consulted before making new requests of ritual conduct on the basis of the rotation system. 
While the primary seat ofﬁcial settles the price of each item, adjusting [the price when necessary,] the guest reception ofﬁcial and the assistant ofﬁcial write the names of the items on the board and list the prices below each item in accordance with . 
If there are numerous possessions, the prices of items may be reduced as a whole so as to beneﬁt more practitioners and thereby advance the fortune of the departed. 
Prayer Chanting the Night Before the Cremation The afternoon of the day before the funeral procession for the cremation is scheduled, the attendant of the practice hall ofﬁce must directly report to the abbot and the dual order ofﬁcials about the schedule and notify the practitioners by posting the signboard indicating “prayer chanting.” The treasury ofﬁce must also be requested beforehand to prepare a food offering and send workmen to set up the area for the funeral rite. 
Those practitioners from the same province as well as those related in Dharma lineage compose a word of tribute for the occasion and pay the treasury ofﬁce for a food offering. 
Three pieces of incense must be prepared for the funeral offering. 
After the cancelation of the evening session has been announced, the practice hall bell is rung to assemble the practitioners for the rite of prayer chanting before the funeral shrine. 
The administrative ofﬁcial burns incense and offers tea and sweet hot water to the shrine beforehand. 
The abbot burns incense upon arrival and takes his place at the higher main position of the east order. 
The designated ofﬁcial steps forward from his order to burn incense and, upon returning, bows. 
Next he bows before the abbot and, turning toward the east order ofﬁcials, bows and makes a round, passing in front of each of the east order ofﬁcials down to the last one, then bows . 
Making a round, he passes in front of each of the west order ofﬁcials down to the last one, and, if he is an incumbent ofﬁcial, passes through his vacated position, proceeds to the right of the funeral shrine, and stands there. 
The attendant of the practice hall ofﬁce carries a chain on a crepe-wrapped board to the ofﬁcial, and, after completing the rite of closing the door, places the chain over the doors of the shrine. 
We earnestly reﬂect that life and death alternate, just as hot and cold change one after another. 
When it comes, it is as swift as the lightning 301 that strikes across the entire sky, and when it departs is like the waves that cease to exist over the entire ocean. 
On this day, Venerable So-andso, who has just entered ultimate quiescence, totally exhausted the causes of life and abruptly departed from a lifelong dream, understanding that every psychophysical element is transitory and ultimately quiescent, and hence felicitous. 
The venerable practitioners have assembled at this place to pay tribute to the shrine and call the sacred names of the buddhas, so as to help the deceased’s spirit advance swiftly toward the Pure Land. 
With this prayer and sutra chanting, we dedicate the merit thereby accrued to the venerable practitioner So-and-so, who has just entered ultimate quiescence. 
We humbly wish that his spirit surpasses the pure sanctuary, that his karmas be free of worldly deﬁlement, that the lotus bloom opens its noblest blossom, and that the Buddha grant him the certiﬁcate of supreme destiny. 
I humbly request the practitioners once again to intone the prayer: Veneration to the buddhas in the ten directions and the three times, and so on. 
With this chanting, we dedicate the merit thereby accrued to the venerable practitioner So-and-so, who has just entered ultimate quiescence. 
When this is done, the abbot returns to his position at the higher end of the east order line and remains standing there. 
The Funeral Procession the procession to the funeral site begins, it is a general rule that the treasury ofﬁcial instructs the attendants in charge of the workmen to prepare ﬁrewood for the cremation and mobilize various workmen. 
After all preparations for the funeral procession have been completed, including musical instruments such as cymbals and drums, streamers, artiﬁcial ﬂowers to scatter, incense and candles, a portable shrine carriage, and so on, the night before the practice hall ofﬁce attendant reports that everything is ready to the abbot and the dual order ofﬁcials and also posts a signboard indicating the schedule for the funeral procession. 
The next morning, after the is struck with the mallet to signal that the ﬁrst serving of rice gruel has been completed, the director of practitioners’ affairs makes an additional strike and announces: 
After breakfast, you are requested to participate in the procession to accompany the deceased to the cremation site. 
Except for those who are on duty at the practitioners’ quarters and in charge of guarding the practice hall, everyone is equally required to participate. 
Straightening his posture by the board-edge of the primary seat ofﬁcial, he proceeds to make a round through the aisles of the hall up to the outer hall, and once again returns to the inner hall to bow toward the altar before going out. 
May I request the primary seat ofﬁcial and all practitioners to attend the service of sutra chanting at the inﬁrmary hall, scheduled to begin at the sound of the bell. 
At the sound of the practice hall bell, the practitioners assemble and the director of practitioners’ affairs intones a prayer. 
We are about to raise the shrine of the departed spirit and proceed to the place where the memorable rite of cremation will take place. 
Veneration to the Luminous Pure Dharma Body Vairocana Buddha, and so on. 
When this is done, the attendants play cymbals, lift the shrine, and carry it out to the temple gate. 
If the rites of serving tea and sweet hot water and turning the shrine around are scheduled, [the shrine at this point] should be turned around toward the temple buildings, and an incense table placed before it. 
The primary seat ofﬁcial stands before the shrine, while the practitioners line up in two parallel lines [with the shrine at the center]. 
The attendants stand outside the gate, greeting the practitioners with heads down and palms together, and then fall in behind the procession when all have passed by. 
Cremation When the procession reaches the “nirvana platform” , the head administrative ofﬁcial burns incense and offers tea. 
Next, the abbot offers incense, then returns to his position. 
Thus, the body is about to be cremated according to the tradition. 
It is wished that by burning the body which was instrumental to his propagation of the Dharma for a hundred years, his passage to reach the goal of nirvana will be helped unfailingly. 
Veneration to the Western Paradise, to Amitābha Buddha of Great Compassion and Commiseration, and so on. 
after ten repetitions of the prayer: 
In the foregoing prayer, we called upon the ten sacred names in order to help the deceased be reborn in the Pure Land. 
We earnestly hope that the wisdom mirror distributes its brilliance, the wind of truth disperses variegated colors, and the ﬂower of the enlightened mind will bloom in the bodhi garden and help the mind become cleansed of deﬁlement in the ocean of the Dharma-nature. 
Having offered three servings of tea and having burned incense over a single burner, we shall send its smoke on a cloud-journey. 
The head administrative ofﬁcial, at the moment when the prayer refers to “servings of tea” and “burning of incense,” steps forward to serve tea and burn incense, whereby he expresses the propriety of the temple community as a whole. 
Veneration to the buddhas in the ten directions and the three times. 
The practitioners from the same native province and Dharma lineage also chant sutras and conclude with the same invocation of merit transference. 
A signboard indicating this event is posted to notify the practitioners. 
The abbot and the primary seat ofﬁcial are seated side by side [with an arm-length’s distance in between] in the rear, while the dual order ofﬁcials are seated in two parallel lines facing each other. 
Just inside the hallway, a table is placed facing the rear of the hall, equipped with calligraphy brushes, an inkslab, a standing bell, scissors, and a simpliﬁed robe, as well as other necessary items. 
directly on the ﬂoor. 
The practice hall ofﬁce attendants report to the abbot, the dual order ofﬁcials, and the practitioner assistants when these preparations have been completed. 
They place the bamboo basket before the abbot and the dual order ofﬁcials in turn, so that each may inspect the seal. 
They then receive the key from the primary seat ofﬁcial, open the basket, take out the items one by one in numerical order, place them on the ﬂoor display area, and set the empty basket to the side, facing the rear. 
The ﬂoating cloud has dispersed, and there remains no sight of it whatsoever. 
The last remnant of a candle has been exhausted in extinguishing its own ﬂame. 
May the practitioners now intone [the ten sacred names of the buddhas] for the sake of the venerable practitioner So-and-so and assist his enlightened spirit to be reborn in the Pure Land. 
Veneration to the Luminous Pure Dharma Body Vairocana Buddha, and so on. After the prayer of the ten sacred names, the director of practitioners’ affairs once again rings the bell and says: 
Everyone is obliged to examine the items with regard to their being old or new, long or short, and so on, for after the sound of the bell ceases, no dispute is allowed. 
Respectfully stated. 
The director of practitioners’ affairs once again rings the bell, then holds up the deceased’s ordination certiﬁcate and cuts it horizontally across the name characters with the scissors, saying: 
The director of practitioners’ affairs takes off his kaṣāya robe and places it inside the bell, and dons the simpliﬁed robe. 
The attendants of the practice hall inform all the participants of the price by relaying the announcement. 
The attendant of the practice hall ofﬁce determines the name of the person who has made the winning bid. 
The guest reception ofﬁcial copies the name down and places it on the bulletin board, and the abbot’s assistant, referring to the name, issues a card and has the attendant in charge of meal proceedings give it to the person. 
The attendant then puts the item back into the basket. 
The merit hereby accrued from this auction and prayer is dedicated for the sake of the venerable practitioner So-and-so, who has just entered ultimate quiescence, toward the enshrinement of the transcendental abode of his realization. 
May I once again request the practitioners to intone the prayer: 
Veneration to the buddhas in the ten directions and the three times, and so on. 
Items that are not picked up by the bidders within a three-day period are priced appropriately for subsequent sale, and a record book, the “Funeral Revenue and Expenditure Account Book” , must be prepared. 
According to the Buddha’s own regulations, the meaning of distributing the robes is to create in the mind of the living the following thought: 
“It has become like this with him, and it will be like this with me as well.” Such a thought is expected to reduce one’s desire and attachment. 
This is the height of stupidity. 
must be deleted from the name tablet.) Sutra chanting should be performed three times a day. 
On the afternoon of the third day, the account book is to be displayed in front of the practice hall, making everything accountable to the practitioners. 
(If the formula used differs from the standard format, or if there is some point in question, it should be pardoned with due propriety and notice given above as well as below, and rectiﬁed on the strict basis of fact. 
Anyone who committed a transgression should be subject to the punishment of expulsion. 
The practice hall ofﬁce notiﬁes the practitioners beforehand and posts a signboard indicating the rite of sending the ashes to the tower. 
Escorting the ashes from the inﬁrmary hall to the memorial tower, they conduct the rite of “depositing the ashes” in the tower. 
After depositing the ashes, the administrative ofﬁcial seals the tower. 
The merit hereby accrued is intended for the sake of Venerable So-andso, who entered ultimate quiescence, and, on depositing his ashes in the tower, to enshrine the transcendental abode of his realization. 
The guest reception ofﬁcial calls for chanting the Śūraṃgama-dhāraṇīs and practitioners from the same province also conduct a service of chanting. 
The funeral shrine. 
For the abbot’s attendant to convey the master’s commands and carry his incense case. 
For three monetary gifts for the foregoing events. 
An expenditure of twenty guanwen for the inspection and sanction by the abbot and the dual order ofﬁcials of the contents of auction, of which the cost of two is received by the abbot’s ofﬁce. 
An expenditure of four hundred and forty-four guan and ﬁve hundred wen for the service of sutra chanting by the practitioners, of which Guanyin, Bodhisattva, the guardian bodhisattva , and the abbot each receive the amount of two guanwen; approximately four hundred regular practitioners each receive one guanwen; the practice hall attendants who participate in the chanting, the practitioners-in-absentia, and the recent arrivals, together numbering seventy-ﬁve, each receive one half, ﬁve hundred wen. 
Prepared by So-and-so attendant The practice hall ofﬁce Assistant of the guardian bodhisattva, So-and-so Guest reception ofﬁcial, So-and-so The maintenance ofﬁcial The kitchen hall ofﬁcial The treasury ofﬁcial The director of practitioners’ affairs The treasury ofﬁcial The administrative ofﬁcial The head administrative ofﬁcial The Buddha hall master The bath hall master The Tripiṭaka hall master The Tripiṭaka hall master The secretarial ofﬁcial The rear practice hall ofﬁcial The primary seat ofﬁcial Signed by all dual order ofﬁcials The abbot, signed The institution of the wooden board account record perhaps derived from the custom of earlier times to record whatever information was necessary for accomplishing ritual conduct on a wooden board, whereby it was shown that no arbitrary changes were allowed. 
This has become the practice of preparing a wooden board accounting record on the death of a practitioner of the Zen monastic community. 
At the auction, such possessions are assigned a monetary value, necessarily requiring a record of reference inscribed on a wooden board. 
Other than the amount expended for an event, the remaining money must be divided into three parts and seven parts, with the former amount of threetenths given to the temple’s general fund as overhead. 
315 (For example, in the case of one hundred guanwen, thirty guanwen would be turned over to the temple’s revenues. 
In the case of there being less than a hundred guan, no three-tenths overhead should be considered.) The remaining amount must be equally distributed to the practitioners. 
If remuneration for the practitioners’ service of chanting sutras is one hundred wen, one guan must be due for conducting a religious rite, and twice that amount is due to the abbot. 
(If a recently deceased retiree ofﬁcial left behind personal possessions such as a rice ﬁeld, rice crops, cottages, bedding, furniture, and so on, all these must be turned over to the temple. 
The Practitioners of the Zen Community The Annual Celebration Days and Calendar I. 
In the western regions (i.e., the Central Asian Buddhist countries including India), there are three seasons, one of which is established as the period of retreat, during which no one may leave or come to the monastery. 
The system of order is based on seniority determined by whether one’s learning of the Zen texts by heart , practice of cross-legged seated meditation and year of ordination earlier or later than another’s. 
For the duration of ninety days , practitioners in order to achieve some deﬁnite degree of merit in the practice of the path. 
In the thirty days [prior to the retreat period], each acquires the basic needs of life , enabling them to develop Zen insight internally and nurture their physical well-being externally, so that they can sustain peace of mind and body [through the subsequent period of concentration]. 
The ﬁve regions of the Indian continent are so vast that the weather in these regions varies between hot, cold, rainy, and dry and is never the same everywhere. 
Thus, the period of retreat begins in the fourth month in some provinces, in the ﬁfth month in others, and even in the twelfth month elsewhere, 1150b although it always begins on the sixteenth day of the month. 
It is sometimes called the “summer retreat” and at other times the “winter retreat , and it was on the basis of this retreat that the meaning of “ordination age” began to be used to refer to the years of a practitioner’s career. 
It is, however, a kind of baseless vulgar saying that [the expression, “so-and-so many years of winter retreat,” originally referring to the determination of a practitioner’s career in reference to his ordination age], was distorted to mean that examining the quality of a wax-made statue buried in the ice is to verify the impeccability of a person’s practice in terms of clean ice, and that burying a wax-made human form in the ground is the way to examine whether his practice has accomplished the goal or not. 
How could such distorted ideas have come from our traditional transmission? 
Moreover, what is practiced and experienced in our tradition cannot be fathomed even by a holy man [such as Laozi]. 
How much less could such an external object be a measurement of the state of religious transcendence or immanence? 
Today, in the Zen monastic institution, the inauguration of the summer retreat is set for the mid-month day of the fourth lunar month, and it ends on the mid-month day of the seventh lunar month. 
If the retreat is set to begin one day earlier, by performing a special ceremony, every retreat participant is enabled to fully concentrate on their intent, the fulﬁllment of their practice within the retreat period. 
this is not in accordance with the Vinaya, but they do not realize or understand the intended meaning of the rule hidden outside it. 
In China, winter begins at the beginning of the year and is regarded as being the start of the four seasons. 
It is important to coordinate the seasonal proprieties with those of secular society. 
Since it is the best method of conversion to follow such expediency, the beginning and end of the summer retreat, the winter solstice, and the new year have been institutionalized as the four major festival days [in Zen monastic communities]. 
Their ceremonial proprieties are well ordered; how glorious it is to regard them! 
The practice hall ofﬁce copies the number of practitioners from the residents’ “Ordination Record Book” and instructs an attendant to present this to the primary seat ofﬁcial, then to the abbot and the dual order ofﬁcials . 
posts it in front of the practice hall and sets up a table below it, equipped with an inkslab and brushes. 
For approximately three days, after the noon meal practitioners are advised to check the residency chart draft and correct any mistakes or wrong information about themselves. 
Therefore, in order to prepare the residency chart , a draft is ﬁrst made, and each member must examine whether his name and rank appear in it in the proper order of seniority. 
If, in effect, some do derogate others’ names and transgress the norms of the precepts, it is obvious that the director of practitioners’ affairs must deal with them by informing the primary seat ofﬁcial about the matter in detail and also by reporting it to the abbot. 
Format of the Residency Chart Draft (The ordination rank is to be written in red ink, while the name is to be written in black ink.) The Ordination Ages of Practitioners Name and Title Ordination Year of Regnal Era The Original Ordination The Immemorial Past The Venerable Eldest Senior Practitioner Ājñātakauṇḍinya Ordination The Venerable Master Abbot So-and-so Senior Practitioner Ordination, Such-and-such Year of the Zhiyuan Era So-and-so Senior Practitioner Ordination, Such-and-such Year of the Yuanzhen Era So-and-so Senior Practitioner Ordination, Such-and-such Year of the Dade Era So-and-so Senior Practitioner Ordination, Such-and-such Year of the Zhida Era The foregoing chart is prepared as presented to . 
It is feared that there might be some errors; should there be any, each of the venerable practitioners is advised to correct them. 
The Serving of Tea by the New Residents on Joining the Practitioners’ Quarters After establishing membership in the practitioners’ quarters, based on the preceding examples, the new residents donate funds to the quarters for the cost of a tea reception. 
The signboard reads as follows: 
They line up beforehand to the right of the quarters’ entrance and wait for the practitioners to leave the practice hall. 
Those who are serving tea stand in line and, after giving greetings, request the practitioners to take their seats. 
No more than nine practitioners should offer incense. 
Three practitioners step forward [to offer incense, and then] step back and turn around, mutually coordinating their movements in a precise and smooth manner. 
This is called “offering incense on behalf of the practitioners.” The small wooden sounding block in the hall is struck twice to signal that the serving of tea has been extended to every member in the hall. 
This is called the “commendation to drink tea” . 
When the wooden sounding block is struck once, the teabowls are retrieved and the practitioners all rise from their seats. 
The head ofﬁcial of the quarters steps forward to the incense burner and on behalf of all the practitioners thanks the practitioners who served the tea. 
Thereupon, the head ofﬁcial of the quarters returns to his place. 
The serving practitioners once again line up and bow. 
This is called “giving thanks for the guests’ presence.” As before, they step back, form a line, and bow . 
The wooden sounding block located in front of the quarters is struck three times, signaling the practitioners to give greetings harmoniously and leave the hall. 
The head ofﬁcial of the quarters instructs the tea master to invite those who served tea at the reception and serves tea for them. 
When all the new residents have completed their serving of tea on the occasion of joining the quarters, the head ofﬁcial invites them to the tea reception each day, designating their names on the basis of ordination seniority. 
The Issuance of Various Charts before the Summer Retreat Once the draft of the ordination chart is ﬁnalized, the practice hall ofﬁcial draws up the Śūraṃgama-dhāraṇīs ceremonial chart, the prayer chanting and practice hall rounds chart, the bed quilt space unit chart, the almsbowl seating position chart , and the ordination age tablet, all on the basis of ordination seniority. 
(The remaining charts are not affected by the size of the practice hall.) Excluding those head ofﬁcials who have individual quarters, the west hall guest ofﬁcial, the primary seat ofﬁcial, and the retired ofﬁcials who should be assigned to the head position of each section, the remaining practitioners are assigned to the seats of the sixteen sections according to ordination seniority. 
In the Ancient Regulations, one of the ofﬁcials of the retiree’s hall was assigned to a seat which was shared by another practitioner. 
Later, however, this double assignment was abolished because it created dispute and competition. 
The charts, all of which ought to be formulated according to ordination seniority, both original and corrected, must be presented together for inspection, ﬁrst to the primary seat ofﬁcial and then to the abbot. 
Only the almsbowl seating chart must be presented to all the ofﬁcials who have individual quarters. 
On the day of the ceremonial bathing of Śākyamuni, all the charts must be displayed in front of the Buddha hall. 
The quilt and almsbowl seating chart must be displayed beforehand, with a small bulletin board on which is written: 
Respectfully stated by the practice hall ofﬁcial on such-and-such day of such-and-such month. 
Special Serving of Sweet Hot Water for the Quarters’ Residents at the Beginning and End of the Summer Retreat (Including the Śūraṃgama-dhāraṇīs Prayer Service at Its Inauguration and Completion) At the beginning of the fourth month, or when the practitioners visit the abbot’s ofﬁce to express thanks for having been granted residency, the practice hall ofﬁcial should have already ﬁnalized the ordination chart and the head ofﬁcial of the quarters must have completed the following items on the basis of ordination seniority: 
The sutra cabinet assignment chart. 
The tea and sweet hot water propriety seat chart. 
The ordination seniority name list tablet. 
The chart of the positions of jars and bowls for serving tea and sweet hot water during the summer retreat. 
On the afternoon of the twelfth day, the practice hall ofﬁce attendants report to the abbot and the dual order ofﬁcials that the service of sutra chanting will be held at the practitioners’ quarters. 
A tablet announcing “sutra chanting” is posted at each quarters to inform the practitioners of the event. 
The preparation consists of setting up the tablets indicating seating, arranging alms offerings on the altar of the enshrined Guanyin image, placing incense burners and candle stands in both the higher and lower sections of the hall, and heating up the sweet hot water beforehand. 
First, the minor propriety of serving sweet hot water is conducted, for which the seating tablets must be reset. 
This reception is conducted especially for the ﬁrst master of the quarters, the second master of the quarters, and the Śūraṃgama-dhāraṇīs ceremonial leader , who are assigned to carry the jars and cups . 
The associate head ofﬁcial is invited as main participant. 
They take their seats when the head ofﬁcial of the 325 quarters, with a gesture of greeting, offers incense, and [they drink a cup of sweet hot water] when he offers incense and makes a gesture of greeting [a second time]. 
The associate head ofﬁcial of the quarters steps forward to the incense burner and expresses thanks for the sweet hot water. 
At the signal of three strikes of the wooden sounding block outside the quarters, all withdraw from their seats. 
The head ofﬁcial of the quarters stands outside to the right of the entrance, waiting for the abbot’s arrival. 
He receives the abbot and follows him into the hall, then burns incense and returns to his position at the end of the west order. 
As the head ofﬁcial of the quarters steps forward to burn incense, the Śūraṃgama-dhāraṇīs ceremonial leader intones the sacred verses and offers the invocation of merit transference. 
The propriety of the twelfth day of the seventh month (i.e., the last day of the summer retreat) is identical. 
Day and month Respectfully written by So-and-so, Guarding Bhikṣu The Practitioners’ Quarters Format of the Envelope Letters of Invitation To The Honorable Zen Masters, Resident Members of the Practitioners’ Quarters From So-and-so, Guarding Bhikṣu of the Practitioners’ Quarters 5. Inauguration of the Śūraṃgama-dhāraṇīs Prayer Service 1151b11 This ceremonial session must be inaugurated on the thirteenth day of the fourth lunar month. 
The practice hall ofﬁcial copies the ceremonial chart beforehand, referring to the records of the practitioners’ ordination seniority. 
He posts this chart along with all other charts in front of the Buddha hall on the day of bathing the statue of the infant Śākyamuni , and requests the secretarial ofﬁcial to compose a word of tribute. 
On the appointed day, the director of practitioners’ affairs copies sacred verse to include in the universal invocation of merit transference directed toward all beings. (The verse, composed by Zen Master Zhenxie Qingliao , is given below.) The verse is posted on the right and left pillars of the Buddha hall. 
The evening before the day , the practice hall ofﬁce attendants notify the practitioners: 1151c After breakfast tomorrow morning, the Śūraṃgama-dhāraṇīs prayer service is scheduled to be inaugurated at the Buddha hall. Every one, properly attired, is requested to attend the service of chanting sutras. A tablet announcing the sutra chanting is posted at each quarters of the temple. 
The next day, after the morning rice gruel, the dual order ofﬁcials and the abbot are informed when the preparations have been completed in the Buddha hall. 
Arriving at the altar of the Buddha hall, the abbot burns incense, offers tea and sweet hot water to the Buddha, and takes his place mid-hall. 
This same propriety is performed in the ceremonial proceeding for the prayer of imperial longevity and the commemoration of the Buddha’s birthday. 
On the other hand, the Śūraṃgamadhāraṇīs prayer service is essentially meant to be a prayer on the part of the practitioners for the successful completion of the summer retreat. 
He initiates the prayer service by intoning the esoteric verses, and upon completion utters the phrase “Mo-he” , with which the practitioners again accord in unison. 
The merit accrued from chanting the sutra is dedicated to the goal of absolute truth and absolute reality (bhūta-koṭi; shiji), and also thereby to enshrine the state of supreme enlightenment that follows the realization of buddha-nature . 
Veneration to the buddhas in the ten directions and the three periods , and so on. Each day, the practitioners take a short recess after the morning rice gruel. 
When the practitioners have changed into ceremonial robes, the practice hall ofﬁce attendant notiﬁes the dual order ofﬁcials and then the abbot. 
After that, the attendants begin striking each of the wooden sounding blocks located throughout the corridors of the temple three times. 
The kitchen metal gong is sounded three times when the abbot comes out . 
If [the abbot does not come out], the metal gong and the large bell should not be sounded; however, the practice hall bell and the Buddha hall bell should be tolled every day in any case. 
On the thirteenth day of the seventh lunar month, the ceremonial fulﬁllment of the Śūraṃgama-dhāraṇīs prayer service should be conducted . 
The Universal Invocation of Merit Transference The foregoing chanting of the sacred Śūraṃgama-dhāraṇīs has been intoned by the sacred assembly of bhikṣus. The merit thereby accrued is dedicated to the deva and nāga guardians of the Dharma, to the local earth spirits and the gods of the temple building, the creators of things. May those suffering in the three worlds of existence and of the eight kinds of diffculties be freed. May the four kinds of benefactors and the three worlds of existence be fully rewarded. 
The Word of Tribute for the Inauguration of the Śūraṃgama-dhāraṇīs Prayer Service Because iron is the essence of tempering and grinding, its edge can never become dull; and because the mirror borrows the luster of a wellpolished gem, its reﬂection can never become darkened. 
Therefore, our preceding sages manifested their capacities, sometimes suppressing and other times enhancing such qualities in order to shatter even the tiniest speck of delusion for the sake of sentient beings. 
The episode of Mātaṅgī and Ānanda tells how marvelously an illicit magical power was intimidated, and Śākyamuni and Mañjuśrī especially revealed the esoteric means of conversion. From analytical study of the forms of teaching and the method of introspection taught by the Buddha throughout his lifetime career, one may ﬁnd the doctrines and practices; and yet from the point of view of the esoteric revelation of practice and realization, there is neither realization distinct from practice, nor is there practice separate from realization. It reveals the absolute insight and terminates multiple illusions . 
An empty ﬂower has no stem. Abiding in right concentration, one restrains every inner movement. 
Still water creates no waves. 
In reﬂecting upon the descendants, it may be asked: 
Chanting the words left by our predecessors, we admonish ourselves. 
May we earnestly wish to reduce myriads of kalpas, as many as the sands of the Ganges River, into a single moment of thought, for there is no distance between now and then. 
May we also wish to identify all the lands of the ten directions as a single abode of existence, so that all may universally attain supreme enlightenment. 
At the great assembly of the disciples, where all in stern dignity gathered at Vulture Peak, the grand universe of three thousand great universes was embraced within a speck of dust, and the three different dimensions of time dissolved into a single moment of thought. 
Irrespective of whether one is mundane or transmundane, each individual’s wondrous enlightenment, reﬂecting each moment of great illumination, manifests myriads and myriads of bodies and surpasses all the ﬁfty-seven stages of realization. 
The use of a ﬁnger is meant to exemplify the truth that it is not the ﬁnger , and thus this ﬁnger also ceases to be simultaneously with its being [that which it points to]. 
While it resembles emptiness and contains it within, it is yet juxtaposed with emptiness, and thus emptiness are reciprocal. 
Since there has been no obstacle throughout the period of the retreat, may we earnestly hope that our practice of concentration and insight prevails over the gates of all senses and intellect, and that the transcendent faculty arises as often as it may [within phenomenal faculties] and thereby lead them equally to enter into the ultimate state of the śūraṃgama samādhi. 
The Tablet of Ordination Ages Ofﬁcials of the practice hall ofﬁce, the assistant ofﬁce, and the practitioners’ quarters get together beforehand to draw up the tablet of ordination ages by copying . 
In the afternoon of the fourteenth day, these tablets must be placed in the higher-ranking section of the outer practice hall, in the lower-ranking section of the Dharma hall, and in the practitioners’ quarters. 
Each ofﬁce sets up a table equipped with an incense burner and candle stands as well as various alms offerings. 
The Minor Propriety of Serving Sweet Hot Water at the Abbot’s Ofﬁce At the occasions of the four annual celebration days, according to ancient custom, traditionally three kinds of reception are held at the abbot’s ofﬁce for serving hot sweet water. 
The ﬁrst reception prescribes the “dual division seating arrangement” . 
This reception is held for the east and west hall high-ranking ofﬁcials, with the primary seat ofﬁcial as a participant. 
The second reception consists of the “quadruple division seating arrangement” . 
1) the training ofﬁcials are to take their seats at the ﬁrst section [in the abbot’s reception hall; 2) the administrative ofﬁcials take their seats at the second section ; 3) the retired west order ofﬁcials are seated at the third section ; 4) the retired east order ofﬁcials are seated at the fourth section . 
The ofﬁce of assistant ofﬁcials prepares a draft chart beforehand for each occasion and presents it to the abbot before establishing the ﬁnal seating arrangements. 
In the afternoon, three crepe-wrapped tables are placed in a line in the reception hall , and the three formal seat arrangements, drawn up as No. 
3, are displayed in the lower section of the reception hall. 
The abbot requests the venerable’s presence at a special serving of sweet hot water this evening at the reception hall, sir. 
For those other training ofﬁcials and subfunctionaries, as well as some renowned practitioners, the attendant of the guest reception master at the abbot’s ofﬁce is sent to invite them respectively with the following words: 
The abbot wishes the venerable to be present at a special reception for serving sweet hot water to be held at the reception hall before the evening session, sir. 
Curtains are hung in the reception hall, the seat name tablets placed, the candles lit, incense burned, and after all this is done, the guest reception master’s attendant notiﬁes the assistant ofﬁcial and then the abbot, before drumming. 
When the guests assemble for the ﬁrst type of reception, they are greeted by the assistant ofﬁcial. 
They are led before the abbot, exchange bows with him, go to their respective seat positions designated by the seating tablets, and remain standing. 
Both the incense offering assistant and the guest reception assistant, dividing the two areas of serving, proceed to stand before each of the guests, greet each one with a bow, and, after requesting them to take their seats, return to their places. 
The incense offering assistant steps forward to offer incense, and upon returning to his place once again, he and the guest reception assistant go around to each of the guests to bow and burn incense on their behalf. 
Thereupon, the abbot’s ofﬁce wooden sounding block is struck twice to signal the completion of the serving of sweet hot water. 
Next, the incense offering assistant steps forward to burn incense on behalf of the participant. 
With the signal of a strike on the wooden sounding block the cups are retrieved, and at the signal of ﬁve drumbeats the guests are obliged to leave. 
The proprieties of the three types of reception are identical. 
The proprieties of the serving of tea and sweet hot water were the major and most common tradition in Zen monastic temples. 
But because disruptive quarrels, concerning whether the seats are too high or too low and so on, frequently occurred among guests in recent years, has mostly been abandoned. 
This propriety is said to be regarded as a practice that should be widely encouraged in the future. 
Prayers Given at the Shrine of the Local Spirits on the Four Annual Celebration Days In general, on the afternoon of the day before annual celebration days, various alms offerings are solemnly set out at the shrine of the local spirits, and incense, candles, a table, incense burner, and water jar are arranged there. 
The practice hall ofﬁce attendants post a wooden tablet announcing the scheduled prayer chanting to notify the practitioners. 
The manner of striking the wooden sounding blocks located throughout the corridors of the temple is identical with that of the three monthly days ending in eight . 
The abbot ﬁrst visits the patriarchal shrine hall and then the Buddha hall to burn incense and perform three prostrations, at which time the kitchen hall metal gong is sounded three times and the large bell is tolled. 
When the abbot arrives he offers incense and returns to his place. 
He leads the prayer chanting and concludes with the appropriate invocation of merit transference . 
We humbly pray for their protection, so that the present retreat may be fulﬁlled without interruption. 
As this day begins the fulﬁllment of another year of Buddhist ordination, we rejoice that there has been no problem throughout the ninety-day period, and peace and ease have prevailed with us. 
As this is the day when the sun begins its return course, it is the beginning of the birth of ten thousand classes of beings. 
Veneration to the buddhas of the ten directions and the three periods, and so on. 
The Administrative Ofﬁce’s Special Serving Serving of Sweet Hot Water for the Primary and the Practitioners on the Four Annual Celebration Days When the prayer chanting has concluded, a special serving of sweet hot water should be conducted at the practice hall. 
The head administrative ofﬁcial must prepare a note of invitation for this reception beforehand (format given below), and after the noon meal he visits the front hall primary seat ofﬁcial, accompanied by the guest reception attendant carrying a crepe-wrapped board equipped with an incense burner and candle stand. 
Burning incense and performing a prostration with unopened sitting cloth, the ofﬁcial says: 
May the venerable, with due compassion, be present at this reception. 
The head administrative ofﬁcial presents the written invitation to the primary seat ofﬁcial, who, in turn, instructs the tea master of the practitioners’ quarters to give it to the alms-serving master, to be posted on the wall of the lower-ranking section of the outer practice hall. 
We are prepared to serve this evening at the practice hall especially in honor of the primary seat ofﬁcial and the resident practitioners. 
I earnestly wish that the venerable master, with due compassion, be present at this occasion. 
When each ofﬁcial has been individually invited, the seat assignment tablets are displayed in front of the outer practice hall. 
When the prayer chanting is over, a series of drumrolls (identical to the noon meal signal) takes place. 
The ofﬁcial then goes out of the hall, passing to the right of the altar of the guardian bodhisattva, receives the abbot, and escorts him into the hall. 
Thereupon, the head administrative ofﬁcial, beginning from the primary seat ofﬁcial’s seat, makes a round through the inner hall, the outer hall, and the higherand lower-ranking sections, then returns to in front of the altar and bows. 
The practitioners then take their seats. 
The head administrative ofﬁcial burns incense, proceeds to the outer hall in both sections, returns to the altar, and places his incense case on it. 
Immediately he approaches the main guest, the primary seat ofﬁcial, and bows, then, moving back to the right of the altar, goes before the abbot and bows. 
He makes another round through the hall with his head down, goes to the outer hall, and then returns to the mid-inner hall, bows , and remains standing there. 
Then turning back to the right of the altar, he proceeds to the altar of the guardian bodhisattva and performs three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth. 
Despite the humble quality of this serving, the venerable has granted us his compassionate presence on this day. 
On this day and at this respectful moment, we wish that the venerable master of the temple may enjoy every blessing in daily life. 
Stepping back, he and the east order ofﬁcials complete the formal greeting with three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth. 
They then immediately turn around and withdraw by passing behind the right side of the altar, go out to the outer hall, and take their places in line. 
The primary seat ofﬁcial comes out after them and expresses his thanks to the head administrative ofﬁcial by performing a full prostration with unopened sitting cloth, and once again returns to his special seat from the side of the higher-ranking section. 
“May the practitioners take their bowls down.” An attendant carries in the evening meal set on a table for the abbot and the primary seat ofﬁcial respectively, while the practitioners open their almsbowls. 
(The west order ofﬁcials, however, do not take their bowls down; they will be provided with a meal by the kitchen ofﬁce.) When the evening meal has been served and is completed, the practitioners withdraw at the signal of three drumbeats. 
(According to the notices put up by various groups, each member visits the meeting sponsored by each regional group.) There is no difference in these proceedings for any of the four annual celebration days, the only exception being that on the winter solstice day, after the serving of sweet hot water, some fruit and an evening meal will be served. 
It is earnestly wished that all practitioners, with due compassion, be present at this occasion. 
Date and month Respectfully stated by So-and-so Bhikṣu of the Administrative Ofﬁce 4. 
if an announcement excusing it is posted on the bulletin board in the outer practice hall. 
The assistant ofﬁcial notiﬁes the abbot that his ascent to the Dharma hall is in order, instructs the attendants to inform the practitioners, and posts the tablet with the notice. 
a propriety with the west hall ofﬁcial of a prostration with unopened sitting cloth; Next, a propriety to respond to the head administrative ofﬁcial for the propriety of two prostrations with opened sitting cloth and three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth; Next, a propriety to respond to the primary seat ofﬁcial and the practitioners for their performance of two prostrations with opened sitting cloth and three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth; The head administrative ofﬁcial who has returned to his ofﬁce receives the primary seat ofﬁcial accompanied by the practitioners, and exchanges the propriety of three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth with the primary seat ofﬁcial and the practitioners; The primary seat ofﬁcial returns to the practice hall, waiting at the higher-ranking section of the outer hall, and receives the rear hall primary 343 seat ofﬁcial’s visit accompanied by the practitioners, who arrive at the lowerranking section of the outer hall, and exchange the propriety of three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth; After this is done, all members take their places as prescribed by the chart of prayer chanting service in the outer hall. 
The primary seat ofﬁcial leads the practitioners into the hall and, while making a round through the hall, each takes his place at his prescribed position. 
The primary seat ofﬁcial then leaves his place, burns incense before the altar, performs three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth, and makes a round through the inner and outer halls before returning to his place. 
The primary seat ofﬁcial’s return greeting to the practitioners, and the propriety of three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth is in order. 
The practitioners then perform three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth; Next, the head administrative ofﬁcial enters the hall, burns incense before the altar, performs three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth, immediately makes a round through the hall, and then stands at his place by the altar’s board-edge. 
The head administrative ofﬁcial’s return greeting to the practitioners and the propriety of three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth is in order. 
the abbot enters the practice hall, burns incense, performs three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth, then immediately makes a round through the hall and returns to his place. 
The abbot’s exchange of greeting with the practitioners and the propriety of three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth is in order. 
The practitioners are required to perform in unison the propriety of three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth. 
When the abbot descends from the rostrum seat, the attendants promptly bring incense, candles, tables, incense burners, and water vases into the Dharma hall and ﬁnish setting up the tables in a straight line. 
The west hall ranking ofﬁcial steps forward to perform prostrations. 
Having been granted an opportunity to serve the venerable during this year’s retreat, I am obliged to pray for nothing but the safe fulﬁllment of my duty with the assisting power of the Dharma, sir. 
Stepping back, he completes his greeting with three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth, to which the abbot responds with a single prostration. 
Next, the primary seat ofﬁcial, leading the practitioners, burns incense, and the retired ofﬁcials and residents of the various quarters all follow the primary seat ofﬁcial and burn incense in due order. 
When the ofﬁcials step back, the abbot sits down cross-legged and the assistant ofﬁcials and his disciples burn incense and perform [the same set of] prostrations. 
Next, the ceremonial leader, representing the group of novice attendants, burns incense and performs prostrations. 
Next, the lay carpentry leader, leading the foremen, clerical workers, sedan chair bearers, various workmen and so on, all pay homage to the abbot. 
The primary seat ofﬁcial, leading the practitioners, visits the administrative ofﬁce and exchanges with the head administrative ofﬁcial the propriety of three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth. 
The rear hall primary seat ofﬁcial, leading the practitioners, returns to the lower-ranking section of the practice hall and takes his place, while the front hall primary seat ofﬁcial takes his place in the higher-ranking section. 
The primary seat ofﬁcial enters the inner hall, leading the practitioners in a partial round, then stops at his place and remains standing there; . 
The primary seat ofﬁcial goes before the altar, burns incense, performs three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth, and immediately makes a round through the hall before returning to his place. 
The practitioners then perform three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth. 
the head administrative ofﬁcial enters the hall, burns incense, performs prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth, immediately makes a round through the hall, and stands at his place by the altar’s board-edge. 
The practitioners once again perform three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth in unison. 
(The direct disciples of the abbot must leave the hall from the rear entrance without fail to avoid congestion. 
The venerable master abbot’s exchange of the propriety with the practitioners is in order. 
Those who are well versed regard this rule as correct.) The head administrative ofﬁcial shifts his position and goes out of the hall, followed by the assistant ofﬁcial and the new arrivals. 
The assistant ofﬁcial returns to the inner hall and with the gesture of a bow bids the practitioners to sit, and the practitioners take their seats. 
The assistant ofﬁcial proceeds to the incense burners in mid-hall, burns incense in the higherand lower-ranking sections of the inner hall as well as in the outer hall, returns the incense case to its place, and, stepping back a little, makes a bow toward mid-hall, toward the higherand lowerranking sections, and toward the outer hall, then returns to stand mid-hall. 
With the signal of two strikes of the practice hall bell, the serving of tea is completed. 
With the signal of one strike of the bell, the teabowls are retrieved, and with the signal of three strikes, the assistant ofﬁcial goes out of the hall and the practitioners leave the hall as well. 
At each quarters, a chair and an incense table should be set up, and 347 the resident practitioners should receive him outside the entrance. 
The abbot begins his rounds at the ﬁrst quarters located in the eastern corridor and proceeds to the incense table set at each quarters. 
On this day, although it is our duty to make a congratulatory visit to the venerable, we have instead received your gracious visit. After placing incense , he further says: 
Following a few steps behind the abbot, he returns to the incense table and stands at its right side with palms together, bowing until the procession completely ends. 
He then brings up the rear of the procession making rounds through the quarters. 
In this way, the residents of each quarters follow in the procession, and all ﬁnally arrive at the Dharma hall. 
The proceedings are identical for all four annual celebration days. 
Appointed Discourse or Holding a Zen Dusting Brush on the Four Annual Celebration Days At the supplementary session, the abbot announces: 
The next day, after the noon meal, the incense offering assistant instructs an attendant of the guest reception master to carry a walking cane, a tablet, and a Zen dusting brush, and a workman to carry a crepe-wrapped board equipped with an incense burner and a candle stand. 
Due to his compassionate wish, the abbot instructed us, So-and-so and others, to respectfully forward the tablet of “appointment of preaching” and a Zen dusting brush to the venerable here and invite the venerable to preach for the sake of the practitioners this evening. 
The abbot is especially obliged to encourage them before they leave. 
The primary seat ofﬁcial turns to his place and says: 
In ancient days, different seats were set up for such an occasion but today it is more customary to use the seat. 
Next, the appointed preachers visit the assistants’ ofﬁce to request the use of the drum for the evening, and instruct the tea attendant to invite the guardian bodhisattva’s assistant and some well-versed Zen specialists to their tea reception. 
This evening, we are scheduled to give an exhortation and shall be in need of an assistant to burn incense on our behalf and also some Zen conversants to exchange dialogue with us. 
The practice hall ofﬁce attendants set up a screen and seat for the abbot on the left side of the Dharma seat. 
The propriety is identical to that of the supplementary session. 
The abbot enters and immediately goes to stand at his prepared seat. 
The appointed preacher then steps toward the abbot and bows; next, he bows to the head administrative ofﬁcial and continues to bow to each member of the order. 
Next, he goes to stand before his own order and bows to each member. 
May the practitioner assistant request the abbot to sit cross-legged. 
The appointed preachers, carrying incense cases in their sleeves, visit the abbot’s ofﬁce together to give thanks for the opportunity, and receive the serving of sweet hot water. 
The next day, the abbot invites them for tea. 
An alternative is that the west hall ofﬁcial is invited to preach on the second evening. 
During the supplementary session the abbot may request him to preach with due praise for his capacity. 
In recent days, the propriety of giving thanks has become so conventional and overburdened with too many niceties that it is rather detestable to hear, and invites ridicule from knowledgeable practitioners. 
Generally, the appointed preaching is meant to be a gift of the Dharma. 
If one is obliged to speak on matters of time and propriety, it should be enough just to mention names as a whole or to give brief accounts. 
The Abbot’s Special Serving of Tea for the Primary Seat Ofﬁcial and the Practitioners on the Four Annual Celebration Days On the appointed day, after breakfast, the guest reception assistant copies the invitation for tea reception , and visits the primary seat ofﬁcial’s quarters, accompanied by his attendant carrying a crepe-wrapped board equipped with an incense burner and candle stand. 
He presents the notice of invitation to the ofﬁcial and posts it in the higher-ranking section of the outer hall, while his attendant extends the invitation to all other training ofﬁcials and the other quarters, and requests the head administrative ofﬁcial as the main participant. 
The tablet indicating “tea serving” is posted . 
At the signal of the kitchen hall metal gong, the guest reception assistant enters the practice hall, burns incense before the altar of the guardian bodhisattva, and performs three prostrations with fully opened sitting cloth. 
He makes a round through the hall, stops at mid-hall to bow, and leaves the hall. 
This is called “the invitation for tea by making a round through the practice hall” . 
The seating position tablets must be arranged in the outer hall. 
The primary seat ofﬁcial is seated opposite the abbot , while the head administrative ofﬁcial is seated symmetrically to the right of the abbot, at a distance of an arm’s length. 
(The propriety is identical with that of the special serving of sweet hot water by the administrative ofﬁce.) The primary seat ofﬁcial approaches the abbot and expresses his thanks for tea through the formality of two prostrations with opened sitting cloth and three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth. 
At the ﬁrst opening of the sitting cloth, he says: 
I am most grateful for the honor of such a special reception of tea conducted at this hall on my behalf. 
1154b Stepping back, he begins to perform three prostrations with unopened sitting cloth; however, the abbot is supposed to excuse him , to which he duly responds with a single prostration with unopened sitting cloth. 
The primary seat ofﬁcial turns around, passes behind the altar to its right, and leaves the hall. 
The assistant ofﬁcial burns incense to give thanks for the presence of the participants. 
The [practice hall] bell is tolled, the cups are retrieved, and, as before, drumming signals a recess. 
The primary seat ofﬁcial ﬁrst goes to the Dharma hall and waits for the abbot’s arrival to express his thanks. 
Format of the Reception Notice of Tea Serving The Venerable Abbot, master of the temple, will conduct a special serving of tea at the practice hall today after the noon meal, especially for the sake of the primary seat ofﬁcial and the practitioners, to express the propriety of Such-and-such celebration day. 
The practitioners assemble at the signal of drumming. 
The Front Hall Primary Seat Ofﬁcial’s Reception of Tea for the Rear Hall Primary Seat Ofﬁcial and the Practitioners On the third day of the annual celebration, the primary seat ofﬁcial prepares a notice of invitation , and visits the quarters of the rear hall primary seat ofﬁcial and the abbot’s ofﬁce in order to convey his invitation for a tea reception. 
The proceedings of serving tea and the propriety of ceremonial conduct are identical with those of the special tea serving by the administrative ofﬁce. 
The only difference is that the seats of the administrative ofﬁcials must be placed. 
Format for the Invitation for Tea The front hall primary seat ofﬁcial, So-and-so Bhikṣu, has respectfully scheduled the tea reception at the practice hall today after the noon meal, especially for the sake of the rear hall primary seat ofﬁcial and the practitioners, to express the propriety of the celebration day. This invitation is extended to the administrative ofﬁcials to be present at this occasion as main participants. Date and month Respectfully prepared by So-and-so Format of the Envelope Letter of Invitation To The Venerable Rear Hall Primary Seat Ofﬁcial and the Practitioners Respectfully sealed by So-and-so 9. 
Upon descending this high seat, we shall make a round through the practice hall and have a cup of tea. 
The new arrivals and the assistant ofﬁcial follow the line of the practitioners in the procession, and upon reaching the back of the guardian bodhisattva’s altar, the new arrivals stand at their positions facing the back of the altar and the assistant ofﬁcial. 
The practice hall bell is rung seven times and the abbot enters the hall, burns incense, and makes a round through the hall before returning to his place. 
The administrative ofﬁcials enter the hall and line up in front of the altar to bow, then turn toward the abbot and bow before him. 
They then make their round beginning from the raised sitting platform of the primary seat ofﬁcial. 
The new arrivals and the assistant ofﬁcial, following the administrative ofﬁcials, leave the hall. 
The incense offering assistant then returns to mid-hall and bows, requesting the practitioners to take their seats. 
When the practitioners have settled in meditation posture, he proceeds to burn incense [on the respective incense burners set] at both the higherand lower-ranking sections of the inner hall and in the outer hall, ﬁrst at its lower section and then its higher section. 
He then returns to the mid-hall position, and the practice hall bell is struck twice to signal the serving of tea. 
A single sound of the bell signals the retrieving of the cups, and three sounds of the bell signal the abbot’s departure from the hall. 
The assistant ofﬁcial’s ceremonial conduct is the same as before. 
The Abbot’s Tea Reception at the Novice Attendants’ Hall After the serving of tea at the practice hall on one of the four annual celebration days, the assistant ofﬁcial and guest reception master together visit the novice attendants’ hall to serve tea. 
The guest reception master has beforehand requested the ceremonial master to post a tablet announcing the tea serving, and to inform the residents of the attendants’ hall. 
Prior to the occasion the abbot’s ofﬁce sends tea to the kitchen hall, water is boiled and cups set out, and the kitchen ofﬁcial is invited to participate. 
The assistant ofﬁcial takes his seat at the main position, because he is conducting the serving of tea on behalf of the abbot, while the kitchen ofﬁcial sits to his right, separated by an arm’s length. 
Immediately afterward, both ofﬁcials visit the abbot’s ofﬁce to express their thanks for the tea. 
The Serving of Tea by the Head Administrative Ofﬁcial and the Training Ofﬁcial at the Attendants’ Hall When the abbot’s tea reception ends, the administrative ofﬁcial visits the attendants’ hall to serve tea. 
The conduct of this propriety is identical to that of the assistant ofﬁcial. 
The guest reception master of the administrative ofﬁce conveys the message: The administrative ofﬁcial has excused the return propriety. 
The ceremonial master’s promise of a return visit as a gesture of thanks when seeing off the administrative ofﬁcial, as well as the latter’s message excusing the return propriety is also identical.) IV. 
a ceremonial procession, sutra chanting, prayers for peace and security by the resident practitioners. 
New Year’s greeting messages to government ofﬁcials, patron donors, and the major monastic temples. 
Seventeenth Day: The Memorial Day of Baizhang. 
Fifteenth Day: 
Third Lunar Month First Day: The practice hall ofﬁce issues the draft of the “Record Book.” 1155a The Spring Memorial Day or “Clear and Bright Day” : 
The administrative ofﬁce instructs the practitioners to clean the patriarchal hall, the patriarchal commemorative towers, and the patron donors’ family shrines; to solemnly arrange due offerings; and to conduct the service of sutra chanting. 
A signboard is posted, prohibiting any act of harvesting from the temple’s hills and forests and its tea and bamboo ﬁelds. 
Fourth Lunar Month First Day: Closing of the transient quarters. 
Thirteenth Day: Setting up the area for the Śūraṃgama-dhāraṇīs prayer service. 
Fifteenth Day: The inauguration of the summer retreat. Depending on the weather conditions, this is the time to take down the heavy warm screen at the hall entrance and put up the light cool one. 
Fifth Lunar Month Fifth Day: The Duanwu Festival Day. Early in the morning, the administrative ofﬁcial burns incense in the practice hall and serves sweet ﬂag tea. 
The abbot’s ascent to the Dharma hall and inauguration of the prayer session for the growth of rice seedlings in the ﬁeld. 
The practice hall ofﬁce issues the list of sutras to be chanted at the various quarters. 
The abbot visits the quarters, hermitages, and commemorative towers, and each of these ofﬁces conducts a tea reception throughout the day. 
Mosquito nets are set up in the practice hall. 
Sixth Lunar Month First Day: The rising of heat; the primary seat ofﬁcial excuses the striking of the wooden sounding block located at the outer practice hall to signal zazen practice. 
Entering the hottest time of summer, the practice hall ofﬁcial airs out and arranges the hall mats. 
The charcoal supply master or the managing treasury ofﬁcial prepares charcoal balls. 
Seventh Lunar Month First Ten Days: The practice hall ofﬁcial issues the list of sutras to be chanted at the various quarters on Ullambana Day. 
Donations are collected from the practitioners prior to the day and a box of cooked rice for offering is prepared. 
Thirteenth Day: Completion of the Śūraṃgama-dhāraṇīs prayer service. 
Fifteenth Day: 
Eighth Lunar Month First Day: Opening the transient quarters (the guest reception ofﬁcial has had the mats of the quarters aired out beforehand). 
The practice hall mosquito nets are taken down. 
Ninth Lunar Month First Day: The primary seat ofﬁcial again begins to strike the wooden sounding block to signal zazen practice at the practice hall. 
The practice hall ofﬁcial arranges for repair of the window screens of the practice hall with glue and paper. 
The cool summer screen at the hall entrance is taken down and the warm winter screen is put up. 
The administrative ofﬁcial burns incense in the early morning and serves herb tea for the practitioners. 
Tenth Lunar Month First Day: The opening of the hearth in the practice hall and granting of the group interview. Fifth Day: The Memorial Day of Bodhidharma. 
Eleventh Lunar Month Twenty-second Day: The Imperial Councilor’s Memorial Day. 
Winter Solstice Day: The administrative ofﬁce beforehand purchases fruit to be served to the practitioners. 
The abbot’s ofﬁce serves light refreshments for the residents prior to the winter season. 
Twelfth Lunar Month Eighth Day: The Commemorative Day of the Buddha’s Enlightenment. The administrative ofﬁce beforehand prepares special rice gruel cooked with red beans. 
Only when conversion became less than perfect did the discipline of interpersonal propriety and of musical harmony become necessary. 
Even a peasant’s spontaneous singing accompanied by rhythmic striking of the ground is better than the most skilled performance of musical instruments, and better also is the taste of a wine fermented in a simple cask than those of wine products fermented in ﬁve different stages. 
The founding father of our religion in India initially revealed such spontaneous conversion in which, insofar as it is concerned with the wondrous enlightenment originally within each person, there is no difference whether one is saintly or worldly. 
Since actual things that are equally real rather have purity and deﬁlement, the insight of nondifference does not depend on [the depth or shallowness of an individual’s] practice and realization, nor does it refer to effcacy and usage. 
And yet those who have no insight are dazed and stupeﬁed like someone who is deaf and dumb. 
His teaching became the literature of the three baskets , and his practice was meditation and concentration (dhyāna and samādhi). 
His career promoting the method of conversion continued for forty-nine years before [his parinirvāṇa). 
The Sanskrit term ghaṇṭā means a bell, whether made of clay, wood, copper, or iron, that when struck creates a sound—a metallic bell, a stone bell, a cymbal, a drum, a wooden post and mallet, a wooden sounding block, or a conch shell. 
If great concentration is always maintained and if transcendent function always remains quiescent, while hearing one does not hear, and while being aware one has no awareness. 
Thinking thus, one strikes a sound object and the mysterious wind should suddenly arise (i.e., spontaneous transformation). 
Is this not the veritable capital city of purity and peace? 
The Large Bell The large bell has its origin in assisting commands in monastic temples. 
When tolled in the early morning, it breaks the long night and warns those who linger in sleep. 
When tolled in the evening, it creates awareness of dark ignorance and reveals the state of delusion. 
It is better to draw its wooden striker leisurely rather than hurriedly, because the longer the sound lasts the more desirable it is. 
When tolled, there should be three cycles, each consisting of thirty-six tolls, altogether making one hundred and eight. 
May the sound of this bell reach beyond the Dharma world, so that it may be heard by all those who suffer, imprisoned in gloomy darkness. 
May their hearing and the sound be puriﬁed and may they realize total comprehension. 
May all sentient beings thus realize perfect enlightenment. After chanting this, he should call the name of Guanyin Bodhisattva . 
If he calls the name before each time he tolls the bell, the beneﬁt will be very great. 
The Practice Hall Bell Whenever the practitioners are to assemble , the practice hall bell is tolled. 
This bell is tolled seven times to signal the abbot’s entrance into the practice hall to meet with practitioners. 
The practice hall ofﬁcial is in charge of this. 
The bell is tolled seven times to call the practitioners to assemble at the Buddha hall, but the tolling of this bell must be coordinated with the tolling of the practice hall bell without fail. 
The hall master is in charge of this matter. 
At sunrise, many buddhas manifested themselves along with it and esoterically exhorted and revealed the twelve categories of sutras. 
“Whenever a bell is tolled, all evil paths and all suffering ceased to be.” Again, in the Chronicle of Jinling [written in the Yuan period , it is said that there was a man who died a sudden, violent death and went down to the place of the underworld ruler. 
This man told him that he was formerly the ruler of the Southern Tang but because Song Jiqiu mistakenly killed those of Hezhou who had surrendered, this suffering had been imposed upon him. 
When he listened to the sound of bells, his suffering ceased temporarily. 
The man, thus instructed, returned to this world and reported the matter to the ruler. 
“This is presented to the eminent ancestor ruler, Emperor Xiaogao, so as to help him be liberated from darkness and suffering.” 5. 
The Large Metal Gong The large metal gong is struck for three long rounds on two occasions during the day, as part of the breakfast and noon meal proceedings. 
After the ﬁsh-shaped wooden gong is sounded, the metal gong is struck three times to signal the beginning of the meal and then struck continuously in diminishing intervals. 
This is called “the long metal gong” . 
On occasions of prayer chanting and the Śūraṃgama-dhāraṇī prayer session, the metal gong should be sounded three times for each occasion, to warn against ﬁre and candle ﬂames. 
The Small Blocks The abbot’s ofﬁce, the administrative ofﬁce, the quarters of the primary seat ofﬁcial, and the other quarters each keep their own small wooden sounding blocks , and at the time of the release from silence in the early morning, all these blocks are struck simultaneously for one long round. 
The practitioners’ quarters have small wooden sounding blocks in both the inner and outer areas. 
The wooden sounding block located outside should be struck three times at the time of the practitioners’ greeting each day, and at the time of regular zazen practice as well as zazen practice prior to the evening session. 
It is also sounded before the practitioners’ return to their quarters. 
On the occasions of servings of tea and sweet hot water, the small wooden sounding blocks are also struck for a long round . 
The block located inside the quarters is struck three times on the occasion of the establishment of residency, two times when cups are delivered to the hall for tea or sweet hot water, once when the cups are retrieved, and three times when the practitioners leave the practice hall. 
In case of the minor propriety of serving sweet hot water, it is sounded for one longer round. 
The Fish-shaped Wooden Gong On the occasions of breakfast and the noon meal, the ﬁsh-shaped wooden gong is struck for two long rounds with diminishing intervals. 
Tradition holds that the ﬁsh is always awake, day and night, and therefore carving a ﬁsh form out of wood and striking it every day is intended to warn against human ignorance and indolence. 
The assistant of the the guardian bodhisattva signals the practitioners to leave the practice hall by making a single sound . 
“We have clearly understood the Dharma of the Dharma King. 
That Dharma of the Dharma King is indeed like this.” Śākyamuni Buddha then descended the rostrum seat. 
The small hand bell is always carried by the practice hall ofﬁce attendant and is used to punctuate the beginning and ending of chanting or intoning by the practitioners. 
For the ascent to the Dharma hall, the drum should be sounded for three consecutive rounds. 
(First, three light beats are made to signal the beginning; next, with a stick in each hand, beat the drum so as to gradually shorten the intervals between strikes, reciprocating heavy and light beats, so that the sound is harmoniously lengthened, arising and receding repeatedly, tremulous and reverberant like the resounding of spring thunder. 
The ﬁrst round consists of striking with a long interval and lengthened reverberation; the second round is begun with a short and halting stroke, a little faster but with a level continuity in its sounding; the third round is a somewhat mufﬂed sounding throughout and ends at the 1156b moment the abbot ascends the rostrum seat. 
The end signal is three beats made with both sticks simultaneously.) One round of drumbeats signals the supplementary session, a series of ﬁve beats signals the general exhortation, and three beats signals the practioners’ visit for individual instruction; these drumrolls are done with somewhat longer intervals between strikes. 
The tea reception is signaled by a long round of drumming; the assistant ofﬁcial is in charge of this. 
The noon meal is signaled by three rounds of drumbeats identical to the manner of announcing the abbot’s ascent to the Dharma hall, but this can be shortened and abruptly ended . 
A long roll of drumbeats signals the mobilization of all members for a task of labor. 
The drum signal for night watches is three equal beats in the early evening, the number increasing according to the number of the hour. 
The drum signal for bathing is communicated by four different rounds, reﬂecting the different groups of bathers, and each round gradually culminates in accordance with the number of practitioners who have already bathed. 
One should never let these methods of communication lapse. 
It is said in the Sutra of Golden Splendor that Bodhisattva Ruciraketu dreamed of a golden drum during the night. 
Its form was elegant and great, and it emitted brightness in all directions like the sun. 
Within this illumination, he saw all the buddhas of the ten directions, on seats of lapis lazuli under a tree bearing numerous jewels, surrounded by hundreds of thousands of disciples listening to their preaching. 
A man who looked like a brahman struck the drum with a piece of aspen wood and uttered in a loud voice some verses that conveyed the meaning of repentance. 
When Bodhisattva Ruciraketu awakened from the dream, he went to the Tathāgata and told of the golden drum and the verses of repentance of which he had dreamed. 
Also, in the Śūraṃgama-sūtra, the Buddha is said to have asked Ānanda, “Ānanda, moreover, do you hear in this Jetavana Monastery the sound of the drum that conveys the time of meals, and the sound of the bells that call the monks to assemble? 
As the drums and bells resound from one preceding moment to another subsequent moment in continuity, what do you understand [with these sounds]? 
Do the sounds come to your ears, or do your ears go to the origin of the sounds?” End of Chapter IX: 
The Monastic Sound Instruments 

The Causes of His Birth 131b The Buddha was once staying at Bamboo Grove Monastery in Kalandaka’s garden near Rajagrha. 
One day he rose early, dressed himself in his robe, and, with a group of bhiksus , carried his alms bowl to the city of Rajagrha to collect alms. 
At that moment, a gatha was heard in the air: 
The Buddha’s body is like a golden mountain, Walking with the gait of an elephant king. So serene and dignified are his features, His face resembles the full moon. Surrounded by a group of bhiksus, He is proceeding to the city. When the World-honored One had just stepped on the threshold of the gate while he was entering the city, there occurred various miraculous events: 
the blind recovered their sight, the deaf gained their hearing, the dumb could speak, and the paralyzed could walk; those who were confined in prisons gained liberty and those who bore grudges and hatred became merciful; calves were released spontaneously from their tethers and returned to their mothers; all animals—elephants, horses, cows, and so on—trumpeted, neighed, and mooed aloud with great delight; all birds—parrots, mynas, cuckoos, peacocks, and the like—caroled merrily in con­ cord; all ornaments—rings, bracelets, hairpins, earrings, and all kinds of precious things—clinked melodiously of themselves in their cases; and all musical instruments sounded naturally. 
At that moment, the earth became clean of itself, free of all sorts of filth, debris, rubble, brambles, and poisonous plants; and it 3quaked in six ways—when the east rose up the west sank down, when the west rose up the east sank down, when the south rose up the north sank down, when the north rose up the south sank down, when the center rose up the four sides sank down, when the four sides rose up the center sank down, and it all rolled round and round. 
At that moment, another stanza was heard from the air: 
The whole earth depends On the four seas, With the countries, cities, and mountains As its ornaments. When the World-honored One trod on the earth, It quaked in six ways, Like a boat upon the seas Blown by a blast of wind. 
i3 ic When the Buddha entered the city, his divine powers caused all the people to dance with delight, like water in the great sea agitated by the wind. 
All the people uttered the following stanza: 
Of all pleasures in this world, None surpasses that of the Buddha entering the country. When the earth quakes in six ways, All rubble is removed without rem n a n t. Those who are imperfect in sense organs Become perfect and complete. All sorts of musical instruments Produce lovely songs by themselves. 
4The Causes of His Birth At that time the World-honored One walked to the main road, where there were two children, one of whom was the son of an agrakulika and the other the son of a kulika . 
These two children were playing on a heap of sand. 
The first one was named Jaya and the second one Vijaya. 
When the two of them saw the Buddha marked on his body with the thirty-two characteristics, the first child put a handful of sand, as if it were cooked rice, into the Buddha’s alms bowl. 
Endowed with great compassion by nature Is this person adorned with a round light Who is free from birth and death. Now I remember him with one heart. As I remember the Buddha in my mind, I offer him this handful of sand. 
When Jaya had offered the sand, he made a vow, saying, “May I become a cakravartin by the merit of this good root, so that I can make extensive offerings to the Buddhadharma.” The Buddha knew his mind and saw that his right vow would give rise to a superior and wonderful fruit in a future life. 
As the Buddha, the Tathagata, was the field of blessedness, he accepted the sand with a mind of compassion. 
With a smile, he emitted rays of different colors, blue, yellow, red, and white, either from the top of his head or from below his knees. 
The rays issuing from below his knees radiated to the eight hells. Those who were suffering in the cold hells felt warmth, and those in the hot ones enjoyed coolness. 
When the light shone upon their bodies, they were freed from all pains and afflictions. 
These beings had doubts in their minds: 
“Now we are free from suffering, but shall we stay here or be born somewhere else?” At that moment the World-honored One, wishing to arouse good thoughts in them, produced a metamorphic figure and sent it to those beings. 
Upon seeing the metamorphic figure, they thought 132a in their minds, “Now we shall not be bom in other places but are simply liberated from suffering by the power o f this person.” But the figure made them understand that their retribution in the hells had been dissolved and that they would be bom , at the termination o f their existence in the hells, in the world of men or in the heavens, where they could realize right views. 
The rays issuing from the top of the Buddha’s head radiated to the Four Heavenly Kings and up to the highest Akanistha heaven. 
In the rays the Buddha expounded the Dharma of suffering, impermanence, voidness, and non-ego, and he also uttered the following stanza: 
Be strenuous to become a homeless recluse, To tally with the Buddha-dharma. Destroy the army of rebirth As an elephant shatters a dwelling house. If a man practices the Buddha-dharma Diligently and without indolence, He will be free from birth and death And gain the cessation of all pain. The Buddha’s light was able to shine upon the whole great chiliocosm and then return to his body. 
If the Buddha wished to recall past deeds, the light would enter his back; if he wished to predict future events, it would enter his front; if he wished to predict birth in the hells, it would enter his feet; if he wished to predict birth among animals, it would enter his ankles; if he wished to predict birth among the hungry ghosts, it would enter his toes; if he wished to predict birth among mankind, it would enter his knees; if he wished to predict the birth of an iron cakravartin king, it would enter his left palm; if he wished to predict the birth of a golden cakravartin king, it would enter his right palm; if he wished to predict birth in the heavens, it would enter his navel; if he wished to predict the enlightenment of a sravaka (a direct disciple of the Buddha), it would enter his mouth; if he wished to predict the enlightenment of apratyekabuddha , it would enter the white curl between his eyebrows; and if he 6The Causes of His Birth wished to predict the enlightenment of a bodhisattva (a being destined for full Buddhahood), it would enter the protuberance on his head. 
Each time the light returned from the great chiliocosm, it would first encircle the Buddha three times before it entered the appropriate spots of his body according to circumstances. 
Now as the Buddha smiled, the light, not without reason, entered his left palm after having encircled him three times. 
On seeing this event, Ananda, with his hands put palm to palm, uttered the following stanza: 
Being free from unrest and arrogance, The Buddha turns evils into superior causes. He never smiles without a reason, Exposing his snow white teeth. He knows by his wisdom What others are delighted to hear. With his supreme, brilliant light, He can dissolve others’ doubts. 
There is cause for the Tathagata, the Worthy and Omniscient One, to wear a smile. 
Ananda, did you see the child putting a handful of sand into my alms bowl?” Ananda said in reply, “Yes, I did.” The World-honored One said again, “A hundred years after my nirvana, this child will be born in the city of Pataliputra with the name of Asoka. 
He shall be a cakravartin king ruling over one of the four continents and take delight ip believing the right Dharma. 
He will build eighty-four thousand stupas to enshrine the Buddha’s relic bones for the benefit of many people.” The Tathagata then uttered the following stanza: 
After I have entered nirvana, There will be born to the Maurya family A king of men named Asoka, Enjoying wide fame for taking delight in the Dharma. With stupas containing my relic bones He will adorn Jambudvipa. Such will be the reward of the merit Gained by offering sand to the Buddha. 
The Buddha then took the sand and handed it to Ananda, saying, “Mix this sand with cow’s dung and spread it over the place where the Buddha used to walk in meditation.” Ananda then daubed the ground with the mixture as he was told. 
Now in the city of Pataliputra there was a king by the name of Candragupta whose son was Bindusara; and Bindusara’s eldest son was Susima. 
At that time, a daughter of most elegant features, the best ever known in the country, was born to a Brahman in the city of Campa. 
A physiognomist said in prediction, “This girl will become a queen and give birth to two sons. 
The first son will become a cakravartin king ruling over one of the four continents, and the second one will be a recluse and attain enlightenment.” The Brahman was greatly delighted to hear this prediction. 
With a desire to gain wealth and nobility, the Brahman took his daughter to the country of Pataliputra, adorned her with all kinds of ornaments, and sent word to King Bindusara, “My daugh­ ter is most elegant in features, the best ever known in the country. 
I offer her to the king to be his consort.” The king accepted his offer and kept the girl in his harem. 
His other consorts in the harem, however, considered the matter among themselves, saying, “This girl is the most elegant in the country. 
If the king sees her, he will certainly be attracted by her beauty and will love us no more.” Thinking in this way, the royal consorts ordered the girl to serve the king as his barber. 
Once the king ordered a shave, and while the girl was shaving him he fell asleep. 
When he woke up he was pleased with the girl and said to her, ‘Whatever you wish to have, you may declare it.” Then the girl said to the king, “I wish to have enjoyment with Your Majesty.” The king said, “As you are a barber and I am a king, how 8The Causes of His Birth can I enjoy you?” The girl replied to the king, “I am the daughter of a Brahman and not a barber. 
My father, a Brahman, intended me to be the king’s consort.” The king inquired, “Who has made you a barber?” “The royal consorts,” was the reply. 
The king said again, “You need not do this job any more.” And he took the girl to 132c be his consort. 
Shortly afterwards she became pregnant, and ten months later she gave birth to a son. 
As the king thought that he had no sorrow, he named his son Asoka . 
As his second son was born at a time when he was without sorrow, he named the child Vitasoka . 
Asoka was rough and coarse in appearance, and his father did not like him. 
At that time, King Bindusara wished to know through physiognomy which of his sons was competent to succeed him on the throne. 
So he summoned a heretical physiognomist named Pingalavatsajiva, to whom he said, “Venerable teacher, I wish to know through physiognomy which of my sons is competent to succeed me as king after my death.” Pingalavatsajiva said in reply, “If Your Majesty wishes to read the future of the princes, we should go to the Golden Palace.” King Bindusara then took the princes to the Golden Palace. 
Asoka’s mother said to him, “Today His Majesty wishes to read the future of the princes. 
You may go to join them.” Asoka said, “As the king does not like me, why should I go?” His mother said, “Just go.” Asoka said in reply, “I shall go as you order me. 
But please ask somebody to send my food to that place.” When Asoka was leaving the city of Pataliputra, he met a minis­ ter of the court by the name of Radhagupta, who asked Asoka, “Where do you intend to go?” Asoka said in reply, “Today the king is at the Golden Palace in order to read the future of the princes. 
I am going there.” Radhagupta then handed his good old elephant to Asoka so that he could ride to the Golden Palace. 
After arriving at that place, Asoka sat down on the ground among the other princes, who all had various kinds of food and drink contained in golden and silver vessels. 
Asoka’s mother prepared rice and cream, which she put in an earthenware vessel and sent to him. 
King Bindusara said to the physiognomist, “You should read the future of the princes one by one to see who is competent to be king after my death.” The physiognomist pondered over the matter in his mind, thinking, “If I say Asoka is competent to be king, the king will certainly kill me, because he does not value him.” Having considered the matter in this way, the physiognomist said to the king, “For certain reasons I shall not mention any name in my physiognomic reading.” The king said, “Good.” Then the physiog­ nomist said, “The prince who has the best animal for riding will be competent to be king.” The king said, “Go on with your prediction.” The physiognomist said again, “The prince who is sitting on the best seat will be competent to be king.” The king said again, “Go on with your prediction.” The physiognomist said again, “The prince who has the best food and drink contained in the best vessels will be competent to be king.” When the princes heard these words, each of them thought that he had the best animal for riding, the best seat, and the best food and drink contained in the best vessels, and that he should be king. 
But Asoka thought in his mind, “Now this physiognomist i33a refuses to mention any name in his physiognomic reading. 
If the one who has the best riding animal will be competent to be king, then I have the best riding animal. 
I have the great earth as my seat; and I eat rice and cream, the best of foods. 
My vessel is made of earth, and what I drink is water. 
So far as I can see, I shall be king.” The physiognomist paid a visit to mother, who asked him, “Who will become king after the demise of His Majesty?” He said in reply, “Asoka.” mother then said to the physiog­ nomist, “If the king inquires any more about who is competent to be king, you should go to a distant place and not stay here. 
But you may come back when Asoka becomes king.” So the physiognomist went far away to some other country. 
At that time, a country named Taksas'ila, which was under the rule of King Bindusara, attempted to rebel against his suzerainty. 
King Bindusara said to Asoka, ‘You may assemble the four divi­ sions of troops and march to that country.” But no weapons or 10The Causes of His Birth provisions were given to him. 
Thus Asoka, commanding the four divisions of troops, went to punish Taksasila. 
Upon hearing that Asoka was coming, the people of Taksasila came out half a yojana to decorate the road and sprinkle scented water over the ground to receive Asoka, to whom they said, “We come to welcome you, O Prince, not to fight with you, nor do we harbor any enmity against His Majesty the great king. 
But the minister sent by the king is governing our country in a bad way, and we wish that he be recalled.” Then the people offered various gifts to Asoka and welcomed him to their country, as has been extensively related. 
Asoka was again sent by the king as an envoy to the country of Kasi. 
In the country of Kasi there were two warriors, who said to their king, “We two are strong enough to level a mountain. 
When Asoka comes we need not serve him as his subjects.” At that moment, the heavenly beings voiced a warning, saying, “Asoka will be a cakravartin king to rule over one of the four continents. 
You should not go against him.” Now Susima, the eldest son of King Bindusara, was returning from the royal gardens to the city of Pataliputra when he met on the way the king’s prime minister, who was bald, coming out of the city. 
To joke with him, Susima patted him on his bald crown. 
The prime minister thought, “Even now he dared to pat me on the head. 
Should he become king, he would certainly hurt me with a sword. 
It befits me to take measures to prevent him from becoming king.” Thus he ordered five hundred ministers to leave Susima, and he announced that Asoka would be a cakravartin king ruling over one of the four continents and that all of them should serve i33b him together. 
He even agitated the people of Taksasila to rebel against the king, refusing to be his subjects any more. 
King Bindusara dispatched Susima to subjugate the rebels, but when he reached that country he could not suppress the revolt. 
At that time Asoka returned home, and King Bindusara, who was seriously ill and on his deathbed, ordered a messenger to instruct Asoka to go back to Taksasila, while asking Susima to return home speedily, saying, “I intend to hand over state affairs to him.” The ministers smeared Asoka’s body with the yellow juice of ginger to make him look as if he were sick, and they also boiled laksa and kept the juice in a bowl, which they put someplace, while announcing that Asoka was ill. 
When King Bindusara was approaching his end, the ministers dressed Asoka and took him to the king, to whom they said, “T h is is a prince. 
When Susima returns, we shall restore the throne to him.” Upon hearing these words, the king was greatly enraged. 
Asoka said, “If I am the legal king, let the heavenly beings crown me right now.” When he had said so, the heavenly beings immedi­ ately put a celestial crown on his head. 
At this sight, the king was all the more furious and died with hot blood oozing from his mouth. 
Then Asoka ascended the throne; and after ascending the throne he appointed Radhagupta as his prime m in ister Susima was very angry to hear that Asoka had ascended the throne after the death of the king, and he wished to punish Asoka with his troops. 
Asoka, in his city, mobilized a great num­ ber o f soldiers to guard the four gates of the city. 
He ordered two strong and valorous generals with groups of soldiers to guard the southern and western gates; he ordered his prime minister Radhagupta with a group of soldiers to guard the northern gate; and he himself, commanding a group of soldiers, guarded the eastern gate. 
Radhagupta made by different expedients various kinds of devices at the eastern gate of the city; he had figures of Asoka and his soldiers carved out of wood and had ditches dug in the ground in which smokeless fires were kept burning under coverings that were camouflaged by dry earth scattered over them. 
12The Causes of His Birth Susima and his troops intended to attack the northern gate, but Radhagupta said to him, “Don’t attack me. 
You should attack the eastern gate. 
If you can kill King Asoka, I will surrender to you.” Listening to his suggestion, Susima directed his army to attack the eastern gate, where, seeing that none of the wooden figures was moving, he marched straight forward, fell into the fire pits, and burned to death. 
After Susima’s death, his army commander, Bhadrayudha by i33c name, a brave and powerful man, led his army of more than a thousand soldiers to become Buddhist monks to practice the Way; and they attained arhatship . 
King Asoka administered state affairs, but his five hundred ministers disdained him. 
Once he said to his ministers, “Pull up flower and fruit trees to protect thorns and brambles.” The ministers said in reply, “No! 
We should pull up thorns and brambles to protect flower and fruit trees.” But Asoka repeated that they should pull up flower and fruit trees to protect thorns and brambles. 
Three times his ministers disobeyed him. 
In a fit of anger, Asoka drew his sword and beheaded the five hundred j ministers. 
Another time, King Asoka took five hundred maids of honor to the rear garden, where there was a tree with profuse flowers and foliage called an asoka tree. 
On seeing this tree, King Asoka said, “I am glad that this tree bears the same name as I.” As Asoka was physically rough and coarse, the maids did not wish to go near him. 
While he was sleeping in the garden, the maids, intending to displease him, plucked all the flowers and leaves of the tree, leaving it bare. 
When Asoka woke up and saw the bare tree, he asked the maids, “Who stripped this tree so completely?” The maids said in reply, ‘W e did it.” In a fit of anger, King Asoka wrapped all the maids in bamboo screens and burned them to death. 
As he was so wicked, the people of the time called him Candasoka . 
The prime minister Radhagupta told King Candasoka that he should not personally beat or kill but should order somebody else to do it. 
Thus the king recruited an executioner. 
There lived then in a village in the mountains a man good at weaving clothes, who had a son called by his father Girika. 
This young man was so fearsome that he was capable of doing unrighteous deeds and always scolded his parents. He beat everyone, male or female, in the household and would kill or hurt all living creatures. 
His trade was fishing and hunting, and as he did so much slaughtering, he was also called by the people Candagirika. 
i34a When the king was searching for a cruel person, [his mes­ senger] came upon this man. 
The messenger said to him, “The king wishes to govern the people by means o f killing. 
Can you do the job?” The man answered, “I could kill everybody in the whole of Jambudvipa, if I were asked to do so.” The messenger reported to the king what the man had said, and the king ordered that he be brought to his presence. 
By order of the king, the messenger went to the man’s place and told him, “The king has asked you to come.” The man said to the messenger, “Just wait a moment. 
I must go to see my parents.” Then he went to inform his parents that King As'oka wished to govern the people by means of kill­ ing, that he had asked him to do the job, and that he was willing to go. 
But his parents would not permit him to go; and so in a fit of rage, he murdered his parents. 
Then he returned to the mes­ senger, who asked him, “Why are you so late?” The man said in reply, “Because my parents would not allow me to go, I finished them off.” When the man came to the palace, he told the king that if he wished to punish people, he should build a prison with a gate well decorated to look most magnificent, so that anybody who saw it would be delighted with it. 
He also asked the king to issue a strict order that nobody should be allowed to come out once he had entered the prison. 
The king said, “Very good.” Candagirika then went to Kukkuta Monastery, where a bhiksu was reciting a scripture in which the events in the hells were related, such as cauldrons with boiling water, furnaces with burning charcoal, mountains planted with knives, trees bearing swords, and other painful implements of punishment. 
Those who were bom in the hells were punished according to the sins they had 14The Causes of His Birth committed. 
Such hellish things were extensively related in the Scripture o f the Five Divine Lictors. 
Upon hearing these words, Candagirika made all the implements of torture that were used in the hells. 
In the country of Sravasti, there was a merchant who went to sea with his wife; a son was bom to them while they were at sea, and the child was thus named Sagara . 
After voyaging to and fro for twelve years, they encountered five hundred pirates, who killed the merchant and seized his property. 
Later he became a Buddhist monk, and on his wanderings he reached the country of Pataliputra. 
One day he got up early, dressed himself properly, and went into the country with alms bowl in hand to collect food. 
As he did not know the place, he entered the prison to beg for alms, because he saw that its gate was so nicely decorated. 
Inside the prison he saw all kinds of imple­ ments of torture and intended to withdraw. 
But Candagirika got hold of him and said, “You shall suffer death and cannot go out.” Being frightened, the monk cried and wept with tears flowing down. 
Candagirika said to him, “Why are you crying like a child?” The monk replied, “It is not because I value my body, but because it is difficult to attain emancipation. 
It is difficult to renounce one’s home, but this I did. 
It is difficult to live during the time of Sakyamuni Buddha, but I am living in it. 
I have not gained the true Dharma of all Dharmas, and that is why I am anxious and worried.” Candagirika said to the monk, “I have been instructed by the great king that nobody should be allowed to leave this prison once he has come into it.” The monk said with tears, ‘You must allow me one month’s extension.” “Not one month, but seven days may be allowed,” was the reply. 
Considering that he was approach­ ing his death, the monk zealously practiced the Dharma with great energy for the full seven days. 
At that time, a prince had a talk with a palace maid, and King Asoka, being irritated by the sight, had the two of them sent to the prison for punishment. 
Candagirika put them in an iron mortar and pounded them with a pestle. 
Greatly terrified by the sight, the 134b monk uttered the following stanza: 
The Great Master, the Buddha compassionate, The Leading Recluse, has rightly said that This material form is like a bubble, Unsubstantial and not ever-abiding. This fair and graceful body— Where is it after its destruction? Thus one should give up What the ignorant take pleasure in. I should realize that on this occasion. 
Candagirika said to him, “The night is over and the day is dawning. 
You should know that the time of suffering is approaching.” The monk said in reply, I do not know what you mean by saying that the night is over and the day is dawning. 
But I do realize that the night of ignorance is over and the sun of wisdom is appearing. 
By the light of the sun of wisdom, I see that nothing has reality in this world. 
Thus I intend to edify the world with the Dharma of the Buddha.” He also told Candagirika, “Now you may do whatever you please with this body of mine.” At that time, the warden of the prison, being a merciless man and having seen nothing of the world, relentlessly put the monk into an iron cauldron, poured pus, blood, feces, urine, and other filthy things into it, and built a big fire with much fuel to boil the monk in the cauldron. 
But when the fuel was exhausted, the body of the monk was not damaged at all. 
On seeing that the monk’s shape was not changed, the warden beat and scolded the jailors angrily, ‘W hy don’t you add more fuel to the fire?” The warden then personally added fuel to the fire, but it would not burn. 
Meanwhile he saw that the monk was sitting cross-legged on a lotus flower in the cauldron. 
After seeing this phenomenon, the warden immediately went to report to the king. 
16The Causes of His Birth Upon hearing this matter, the king, followed by his people, went to see it. 
At that moment the monk instantly came out of the iron cauldron by his supernatural powers and rose up into the air like a king goose hovering in the air in eighteen different ways. 
King Asoka was delighted to see the monk as conspicuous as a mountain appearing in the air, and he uttered the following stanza: 
I do not know about this: Who are you in fact? You should tell me the truth And let me know you now. If I know the truth, I shall be a disciple of yours. 
134c The monk then thought in his mind, “This king is now capable of accepting the Buddha’s words. 
He will build many stupas to en­ shrine the Buddha’s relics, so that all people can gain the benefit of the Dharma.” Having thought so, he wished to reveal the Buddha’s merits and uttered the following stanza: 
I am a disciple Of the best debater of the highest grade. The inexhaustible power of the right Dharma Regards nothing as a real being. The Buddha is a bull king among men Who can control himself and regulate others. It is he who has liberated me From the prison of the three realms of being. 
“The king was also predicted by the Buddha, A hundred years after my nirvana, there will be a king by the name of Asoka in the city of Pataliputra. 
He will be a cakravartin king and rule over one of the four continents, and he will construct eighty-four thousand stupas for the enshrinement o f my relics. 
The prison to be built by the king, in which numerous people will be killed, will be like the hells. 
He will finally demolish it and impart freedom from fear to all living beings.’ The great king should now comply with the Buddha’s wishes.” He then uttered the following stanza: 
Thus the great king of men Should have a mind of pity For all living beings And grant them freedom from fear. 
King Asoka, fixing his mind on the Buddha and putting his hands palm to palm, uttered the following stanza in penitence: 
I take refuge in the Buddha, the Dharma, And his disciples in the Sangha . May you, the son of the ten powers, Treat me with patience. All the evils that I have done I shall confess to you. Now I shall cultivate my mind with diligence And with a mind of deep veneration. 
i35a When King Asoka was about to leave the prison, Candagirika said to him, with his hands joined palm to palm, “Your Majesty is aware that I have been instructed not to allow anybody to go out of this prison once he has entered it.” The king said to him, “Do you intend to kill me?” ‘Yes,” was the reply. 
The king asked him, “Which of us came in first?” Candagirika said in reply, “I came in first.” Then the king told the jailors to arrest Candagirika, put him 18The Causes of His Birth in the lakuca house, and set it on fire. 
He also ordered people to demolish the prison so as to impart freedom from fear to all living beings. 
With the intention of building numerous Buddha-stupas, the king arrayed his four divisions of troops and went to the Drona Stupa constructed by King Ajatasatru. 
In this way he took out the relics from seven stupas one after another. 
Then he went to a village named Ramagrama, where stood the first stupa ever built. 
He intended to break it also and take out the relics. 
The Naga king then invited Asoka to the Naga palace and said to him, “This is the stupa to which I always make offerings. 
May Your Majesty preserve it.” King Asoka consented, and then the Naga king sent him back to Ramagrama. 
Considering that the Naga king protected that stupa with twice the usual attention because it was the first one ever built in the world, Asoka realized that he could not obtain the relics contained therein and returned to his own country. 
King Asoka made eighty-four thousand precious cases and put the relics in all of them. 
He also made eighty-four thousand vases, banners, and canopies and gave them to the Yaksas , ordering them to erect stupas at all places on earth and even over the great seas. 
He also announced that if any country in one of the three categories—the small, the medium, or the large ones— paid the sum of one crore of taels of gold, one royal stupa would be built there. 
Now as the country of Taksasila paid thirty-six crores of taels of gold, its people said to King Asoka, “May Your Majesty give us thirty-six cases.” Upon hearing these words, the king wondered how, since he intended to build numerous stupas at all places, this country could be allowed to obtain so many cases of relics. 
Thus he said expedi­ ently to the people of that country, “Now I shall exempt you from thirty-five crores of taels of gold.” And he also declared, “From now onwards, all countries, whether they have more or fewer stupas, will not have to pay me any more gold.” King As'oka then went to the great virtuous arhat Yasas, to whom he said, “I wish to complete the construction o f all of the eighty-four thousand stupas in one moment in one day.” And he uttered the following stanza: 
I took from the first seven stupas The relics of the World-honored One. A king of the Maurya family am I, Constructing stupas in one day, Eighty-four thousand in number, As brilliant as white clouds. Having erected eighty-four thousand stupas, King As'oka sup­ ported and protected the Buddha-dharma, so much so that the people o f the time called him Dharmasoka. 
All the people uttered the following stanza: 
135b The great holy king of the Maurya family, Knowing that the Dharma is of great benefit, Dotted the world with many stupas And gave up his ill fame on earth. Having gained the good name of a Dharma King, By the Dharma he has achieved happiness. End of Fascicle One o f the Biographical Scripture ofK ingA soka The above was translated by Samghapala, a sramana (Buddhist monk) of Funan, on the twentieth day of the sixth month in the eleventh year of Tian-jian of the Liang dynasty at the Shou-guang Hall in Yang-du. See Baochang’s New Catalogue of Chinese Buddhist Texts. 
The Causes of Seeing Upagupta When King Asoka had constructed eighty-four thousand relic stupas, he was very glad, and together with his ministers he went to Kukkuta Monastery. 
Upon arriving at the monastery, he went to the abbot to salute him with his hands joined palm to palm and said, “The Buddha, who was the All-seer, predicted that I would receive my present reward as a result of my offering a handful of sand to him. 
Was there any other person to whom the Buddha said anything in prediction?” The chief bhiksu of the time was named Yasas, who answered King Asoka in the affirmative. 
Before the World-honored One entered nirvana, there were a Naga king named Apalala and a potter as well as a candala Naga king. 
After having converted them, the Buddha came to the coun­ try of Mathura. 
In Mathura he told the Elder Ananda, “A hundred years after the nirvana of the Tathagata, there will be in this country of Mathura a perfumer by the name of Gupta, who will have a son named Upagupta. 
Being a Buddha without the charac­ teristic marks on his body, Upagupta will edify the people in a most excellent way and perform a Buddha’s functions after my nirvana.” He also said to Ananda, “Do you see yonder green forest?” Ananda replied, ‘Yes, I see it.” The Buddha said, “There is a mountain over there called Urumanda. 
A hundred years after the nirvana of the Tathagata, a monastery with the name Natabhatika will be built on the mountain; it will be the best place for meditation.” The World-honored One then uttered the follow­ ing stanza: 
Among all the learned disciples, The best in wisdom, As the World-honored One prophesied, Is the one named Upagupta. This great virtuous one in this world Will widely perform the Buddha’s functions. 
i35c King Asoka inquired of the abbot Yasas, “Has Upagupta been born or not?” The great virtuous Yasas said in reply, “He has been born and is now on Urumanda Mountain. 
He is free from all passions, and various arhats are following him to gather up and save all suffering beings in the world. 
Thus he is preaching the Dharma, as the All-wise One, to Devas, human beings, and Asuras as well as Nagas and divine beings.” At that time, the Elder Upagupta, surrounded by eighteen thousand arhats, was at Natabhatika Monastery. 
King Asoka uttered the following stanza to his ministers: 
I intend to go to that country Where stands the mountain Urumanda, To see the Great Virtuous One With the name of Upagupta. Through diligent cultivation to end his passions, He has reached the stage of an arhat in perfection. 
The ministers said to King Asoka, “Let Your Majesty just send a messenger to tell the people there to ask Upagupta to come to the king.” But the king said in reply, “He is an arhat. 
There is no need for the king to come here.” Thus the king built ships to welcome Upagupta and repaired all the roads leading to the country of Mathura. 
At that time, Upagupta and his eighteen thousand arhats embarked for Pataliputra with the intention of converting the king to the teach­ ings of the Buddha. 
A subject of King Asoka said to him, “It is for the sake of converting Your Majesty that Upagupta is coming to this country. 
It befits Your Majesty to know that the Buddha-dharma is com­ parable to a ship, by which you will be able, as you have cultivated goodness, to ferry across the sea of the three realms of existence and reach the other shore of non-action. 
Early tomorrow morning, Upagupta will walk to Your Majesty.” Being delighted to hear these words, the king untied his string 136a of pearls, worth a crore of taels of gold, and awarded it to the man. 
He also ordered the man to make an announcement with the beating of a drum, so that all people in Pataliputra might know that Upagupta was coming on the following day. 
The man was also instructed to utter the following stanza: 
Those who wish to enjoy the bliss of riches, Be born in the heavens, or achieve the causes of liberation, Should all go to see That person Upagupta. One who did not see the Buddha— The most honored one among bipedal beings, Who was compassionate by intrinsic nature, The great master free from passions— Should go with offerings To see the person named Upagupta. 
King Asoka made all his people hear this stanza and also ordered them to mend and decorate the roads. 
He went out of the city to a distance of half a yojana, together with his subjects, holding flowers and playing various musical instruments, to welcome Upagupta. 
On seeing that Upagupta had already come ashore at a distance, surrounded by eighteen thousand arhats standing in a group shaped like a crescent moon, King Asoka alighted from his elephant and walked to Upagupta. 
With one foot on board the ship and the other one on land, he carried Upagupta in his hands onto the ship, where he prostrated himself, with his knees, elbows, and head touching the floor, at the feet of the monk, like a big tree collapsing on the earth. 
After kissing the monk’s feet, he knelt before him, put his hands palm to palm, and gazed at him with admiration while he uttered the following stanza: 
Upagupta, the Most Virtuous One, stroked Asoka’s head with his right hand and uttered the following stanza: 
Although Your Majesty is now free from obstacles, You should still practice non-slackness. It is rare to meet the Three Treasures, 24The Causes of Seeing Upagupta 136b To which offerings should always be made. The World-honored One transmitted the Dharma-pitaka To you, to me, and to others. The Buddha-dharma you should constantly guard, In order to convert all living beings. 
King Asoka said in reply, “I have done what the World-honored One predicted.” And he also uttered the following stanza: 
Offerings have I made to the relics O f the World-honored One and to his statues. Stupas have been built at all places, Decorated with gems and jewels. The only thing I cannot do is to renounce My home for the pure life of a recluse. 
Upagupta said, “It is excellent, really excellent that Your Majesty has done such things, which are worthy of being done by a king. 
Offering a large amount of gifts to Upagupta, King Asoka brought him to the city and carried the Most Virtuous One to a high seat. 
Your body is soft and smooth, Like silk and cotton. 
My rough and coarse body Has touched Your Reverence. Upagupta then uttered the following stanza: 
I have offered the best gift To the Buddha, the World-honored One. It was unlike the sand You presented to the Tathagata. King Asoka again uttered the following stanza: 
I had the mind of a child, To offer sand to the World-honored One Who was the field of blessedness. Thus I have become a king. 
Your Majesty met the field of blessedness In which grew the seeds of giving alms. Hence you gained the reward O f wonderful happiness. Having heard this stanza, the king felt greatly pleased and uttered the following stanza: 
Formerly I offered sand to the World-honored One, The field of great blessedness. Now I have gained incomparable happiness, Being a quarter of a cakravartin king Who, upon hearing of this event, Will not make offerings to the Tathagata? 
i36c At that time, King Asoka worshipped at Upagupta’s feet and said, “Most Virtuous One, I wish to make offerings to all the places where the Buddha walked, stood, sat, or lay. 
I also wish to mark the places to let the people of the future know where the Buddha, the Tathagata, walked, stood, sat, or lay, so that they may be converted to the teachings of the Buddha.” Then he uttered the following stanza: 
I intend to make offerings To all places where the Tathagata Walked, stood, sat, or lay, So that I may be free from the pains of rebirth. I also wish to make images of the Tathagata 26The Causes of Seeing Upagupta Walking, standing, sitting, or lying, To provide people of the future With a chance of seeing the Buddha. 
Upagupta said in reply, “It is excellent, Your Majesty, really excel­ lent! This intention of yours is most difficult to realize. 
Now I shall show you the places of the four postures of the Tathagata, the World-honored One, so that you can make images for the purpose of converting all living beings.” At that time, King Asoka arrayed his four divisions of troops, holding flowers and playing music, and went with Upagupta to those places. 
Upagupta took King Asoka to the Buddha’s birth­ place in the wood of Lumbini, and said with his right hand pointing to the place, “King Asoka, this is the Buddha’s birthplace.” And then he uttered the following stanza: 
This is the first place of the World-honored One, Where he walked seven steps after he was born. With pure eyes he observed the four quarters And made a Lion’s Roar, saying, “This is my last birth From a mother’s womb.” King Asoka prostrated himself on the ground to worship the place where the Tathagata was born and uttered the following stanza with his hands joined palm to palm: 
One who has seen the Buddha Possesses great merits. 
In order to engender a mind of deep faith in King Asoka, Upagupta asked him, “Do you wish to see a heavenly being who saw the Buddha walking seven steps after he was born and heard the Lion’s Roar?” The king said in reply, “Most Virtuous One, I do wish to see him.” Upagupta said, “The heavenly being is residing on the branch that Mahamaya was holding when the Tathagata was bom .” Then he pointed to the place and uttered the following stanza: 
If there is any heavenly being Residing in this wood, Who has seen the World-honored One And heard his Lion’s Roar, May he appear in person To engender Asoka’s conviction. 
137a The heavenly being then appeared in person and stood with hands joined palm to palm before Upagupta, to whom he said, “Most Virtuous One, what do you wish me to do?” Upagupta said to King Asoka, “This heavenly being saw the Buddha at the time of his birth.” With his hands joined palm to palm, King Asoka uttered the following stanza to the heavenly being: 
You saw the Buddha when he was born With a dignified body o f a hundred blisses. His features resembled a lotus flower, Loved and admired by the whole world. You also heard the Lion’s Roar Right in this great wood. The heavenly being uttered the following stanza in reply: 
I have seen the Buddha’s body, Brilliant with golden hues, Walking seven steps in air, The supreme one among all bipeds. The Lion’s Roar I also heard, Honored by heavenly beings and mankind. The king inquired, ‘W hat were the auspicious signs when the Tathagata was born?” The heavenly being answered, “It is not possible for me to relate all the wonderful things in full. I can tell only a few things briefly.” Then he uttered the following stanza: 
Emitting a light of golden color, Shining upon this blind world, 28The Causes of Seeing Upagupta He was adored by men and beings in heavens, And the earth quaked with the sea and mountains. 
King Asoka offered a hundred thousand taels of gold to the birth­ place of the Tathagata, where he constructed a stupa. 
Upagupta took King Asoka to the abode of a recluse in Kapilavastu and pointed to the place to show the king. 
It was at this place that the Bodhisattva, as an infant with a lovely body well adorned with the thirty-two physical marks, was shown to / King Suklodana. 
On seeing that place, King Asoka prostrated himself on the ground to worship it. 
Sakyavardhana was a place of divine beings. 
When the Bodhisattva went there to pay homage to the divine beings, they declined to accept his worship but / saluted him. 
When King Suklodana witnessed this event, he re­ marked, “This son of mine is the Deva of Devas.” Thus he was called Devatideva. 
Upagupta said again, “This is the place where the Brahman physiognomist read the features of the Bodhisattva.” He also said, “This is the place where a recluse predicted the Bodhisattva’s future, saying that the child would become a Buddha.” He also said, “This is the place where Mahaprajapatl fostered the Bodhi­ 137b sattva.” He also said, “This is the place where the Bodhisattva studied books.” He also said, “This is the place where the Bodhi­ sattva learned the arts of riding an elephant, a chariot, and a horse.” He also said, “This is the place where the Bodhisattva fully mastered different arts and crafts.” He also said, “This is the place where the Bodhisattva turned the Wheel of the Dharma.” He also said, “This is the place where he amused him­ self with sixty thousand maids of honor.” He also said, “This is the place where the Bodhisattva felt sorry at the sight of an aged man, a sick person, and a corpse.” He also said, “This is the place where the Bodhisattva practiced meditation and other methods for getting rid of desire and evils under a jambu tree. 
Here he gained enlightenment and insight and entered the first stage of dhyana , in which he was freed from rebirth and enjoyed bliss. 
While the Bodhisattva was sitting in medita­ tion the sun passed the meridian, but the shadow of the tree under which he was sitting did not move, whereas the shadows of other trees shifted as the sun moved. 
At this sight, King / Suklodana prostrated him self on the ground to worship at the Bodhisattva’s feet. 
Ten thousand heavenly beings of that place attended the Bodhisattva and followed him going out of the city of Kapilavastu at midnight.” Again, there was the place where the Bodhisattva took off his precious crown and sent his horse and the groom Chandaka back home. 
The following stanza was uttered: 
His precious crown and pearls were forsaken, Together with his horse and Chandaka, Whom he sent back to his homeland. Proceeding alone without a guard, To cultivate himself with effort, He entered the mountains to learn the Way. At this place the Bodhisattva gave his silk garment to a hunter in exchange for his robe and became a homeless recluse. This was the place where Bhargava invited the Bodhisattva. 
This was the place where King Bimbisara offered half of his kingdom to the Bodhisattva. 
At this place there was a recluse, Whose name was Udraka Ramaputra. Going away after hearing his dharma, The King of Men had no more teachers. At this place he practiced asceticism for six years. 
The following stanza was also uttered: 
For six years of ascetic life, I did what was hard to do. Knowing that austerity was not the Way, I gave up the recluse’s practice. 30The Causes o f Seeing Upagupta This was the place where the Bodhisattva accepted the mill? 
congee prepared with milk collected from sixteen cows and offered by the two maids Nanda and Nandabala. 
The following stanza was uttered: It was at this place that the Bodhisattva Took Nanda’s offering of milk congee. The Great Hero, whose words were supreme, From here went to the Bodhi tree. At this place the Naga king Kalika eulogized the Bodhisattva, as was stated in the following stanza: 
“By this way he will go To the Bodhi tree.” i37c At that time, King Asoka worshipped at the feet of Upagupta and, with his hands joined palm to palm, said to him, “I wish to see the Naga king who has formerly seen the Tathagata walking like an elephant king, going by this way to the Bodhi tree.” Upagupta then went to the abode of Kalika and uttered the following stanza while he pointed at the Naga king: 
The most eminent of all Naga kings, May you appear in your true form, As you saw the Bodhisattva Going from here to the Bodhi tree. 
Then the Naga king Kalika appeared in his physical form, stood before Upagupta with his hands joined palm to palm, and said, “Most Virtuous One, what do you wish me to do?” Upagupta said to King Asoka, “This is the Naga king Kalika, who praised the Bodhisattva when he was going by this way to the Bodhi tree.” King Asoka put his hands palm to palm and uttered the following stanza to the Naga king Kalika: 
You have seen the Buddha, the World-honored One, Whose light was of a golden hue. None was comparable to him in this world. His face was like the full moon in autumn. Of the great merits of his ten powers Please say just one portion. 
The Naga king Kalika said in reply, “It is impossible for me to relate all this in full, but I will tell you briefly. May Your Majesty listen to me.” Then he uttered the following stanza: 
When the Bodhisattva walked on the earth, It quaked in six ways. The great sea and mountains Issued a light brighter than the sun. After having constructed a stupa at the place of the Naga king, King Asoka went away to other places. 
Upagupta then took King Asoka to the Bodhi tree and pointed to it, saying, ‘Your Majesty, this is the place where the Bodhi­ sattva, accompanied by compassion, conquered the army of Mara and attained the supreme perfect enlightenment.” He also uttered the following stanza: 
It was here that the Lord of Full Completion Vanquished the army of the King of Destruction, Tasted the ghee without compare, and attained The supreme enlightenment of perfection. King Asoka offered a hundred thousand taels of gold to the Bodhi tree, and, after constructing a stupa at the spot, went away to other places. 
Upagupta again spoke to the king, saying, “This is the place where the Buddha received from the Four Heavenly Kings four alms bowls, which he merged into one.” He said at another place, “This is the place where the Buddha accepted food offered by the two merchants Trapusa and Bhallika. 
From here the Buddha went to the country of Varanasi.” There was also the place where the heretic named Upajeta praised the Tathagata. 
32The Causes of Seeing Upagupta 138a Upagupta also took King Asoka to Mrgadava, the park of recluses, and pointed to it, saying, “This is the place where the World-honored One turned thrice the Wheel of the Dharma of the twelve nidanas .” And he also uttered the follow­ ing stanza: 
At this place he turned three times The Wheel of the Dharma of the twelve nidanas, Created by the Dharma of truth, To save all beings from the pains of rebirth. This was the place where one thousand heretics became Buddhist monks. 
There was another place where the Buddha preached the Dharma to King Bimbisara, who thereupon realized correct views. 
At another place the Buddha preached the Dharma to eighty thousand heavenly beings and numerous Brahmans and house­ holders of the country of Magadha, who thereupon realized correct views. 
There was another place where the Buddha preached the Dharma to the heavenly king Sakra together with eighty thousand heavenly beings, who thereupon realized correct views. 
There was another place where the World-honored One returned to earth with numerous heavenly beings after having preached the Dharma to his mother and spent the summer retreat at her abode in heaven. 
Upagupta then took King Asoka to Kusinagara, where the Buddha entered nirvana. 
He raised his hand to show the king, saying, “Your Majesty, this is the place where the Tathagata entered complete nirvana after having done what ought to be done.” And he also uttered the following stanza: 
Heavenly beings and Asuras, Yaksas, Nagas, and other deities, And all beings in the world Having been fully edified, The great zealous one of compassion Entered nirvana, the state of completion. Upon hearing these words, King Asoka fainted and fell to the ground. 
When cold water was sprinkled on his face, he recovered his senses and stood up from the ground. 
After offering a hundred thousand taels of gold to the place of the Tathagata’s nirvana for the construction of a stupa, he worshipped at the feet of Upagupta and said to him, “As it has been predicted by the World-honored One that I should be his great disciple, I intend to make offerings to his relics.” Upagupta said in reply, “Excellent! 
Excellent! 
The king’s mind is very good!” Upagupta then took King Asoka to the Jeta Grove and pointed to it with his right hand, saying, “Your Majesty, this is the stupa of Sariputra, to which you should make offerings.” King Asoka inquired of Upagupta, ‘W hat were the merits and wisdom of Sariputra?” Upagupta answered that Sariputra, being second only to the Buddha, was a general of the Dharma who always followed the Tathagata to turn the Wheel of the Dharma. 
He was the foremost in wisdom among all disciples of the Buddha. 
The wisdom of all people in the world, the Tathagata excepted, was less than one-sixteenth of his wisdom. 
The unequalled Wheel of the Right Dharma Was turned for the world by the Buddha. Sariputra followed him to turn the Wheel For the world’s benefit. Who can talk about this person And about the sea of his wisdom and merit? 
i38b Greatly pleased, King As'oka offered a hundred thousand taels of gold to the stupa of Sariputra and uttered the following stanza with his hands joined palm to palm: 
/ I worship Sariputra With a mind o f veneration. Great wisdom removes distress And gives the world illumination. 
Upagupta then showed King Asoka the stupa of Maudgalyayana and said, ‘Your Majesty, this is the stupa of Maudgalyayana, to 34The Causes of Seeing Upagupta which you should make offerings.” The king inquired what the merits and divine powers of this person were. 
The elder monk said in reply, “The Buddha said that he was the foremost in possessing supernatural powers among all his disciples. 
He could agitate with his toe the supreme Dharma hall of the heavenly king Sakra, and he could subdue the Naga kings Nanda and Upananda.” Then he uttered the following stanza: 
In divine powers Maudgalyayana Was the foremost, as the Buddha said. He could shake with his toe / The supreme hall of Sakra. Two Naga kings he subdued, Nanda and Upananda. His merits and divine powers Were a sea that was fathomless. 
Supreme divine powers Save one from the distress of rebirth. I am worshipping now The renowned Maudgalyayana. 
Upagupta pointed to another place and said, “This is the stupa of Mahakasyapa, to which offerings should be made.” King Asoka inquired about the merits of this person, and the elder said in reply, “The Buddha said that he was the foremost in contentment with few desires and in the practice of eight kinds of asceticism. 
The Buddha once shared his seat with him and covered him with the Buddha’s own robe. 
He converted suffering beings and up­ held the Dharma-pitaka.” also uttered the following stanza: 
The supreme field of great blessedness Practiced contentment with few desires And upheld the Buddha’s Dh&rma-pitaka To save all suffering beings. The Buddha shared his seat with him And covered him with his robes. Nobody could relate in full The great sea of his merits. King Asoka again offered a hundred thousand taels of gold to the stupa of Mahakasyapa and uttered the following stanza with his hands joined palm to palm: 
138c He always stayed in caves, In contentment, with few desires, Free from distress and enmity, Having gained the fruit of liberation. For his power of peerless merits, I pay him homage. 
A minister asked King Asoka, “Vakula was also an arhat like the others. 
Why did you offer only twenty cowries to his stupa, where­ as you offered gold to the other stupas?” King Asoka said, ‘You should listen to me.” The lamp of wisdom Can dispel darkness. 
Caring about one’s own corporality Does little benefit to the world. Thus cowries I present As an offering to this stupa. At that moment, the twenty cowries moved from the stupa to the feet of King As'oka. 
The minister was greatly surprised at the sight, and he said, “As this arhat had the mental power to 36The Causes of Seeing Upagupta live with few desires, he refused to accept alms even after his nirvana.” Upagupta then took Ring Asoka to the stupa of Ananda and said, ‘Tour Majesty, this is the stupa of Ananda, to which offerings should be made. 
He was the attendant disciple of the Tathagata and could remember the Buddha’s sayings. 
The Buddha said that among his disciples Ananda was the foremost in hearing his sayings.” Then he uttered the following stanza: 
This elder Ananda, Honored by men and heavenly beings, Always keeping the Buddha’s bowl, Possessed the mind of intelligence. He heard as much as the great sea; What he spoke were words of subtlety. Understanding the Buddha’s meanings, Comprehending all the Dharma, Being the storehouse of merits, He was praised by the World-honored Buddha. King Asoka offered one crore of taels of gold to the stupa of Ananda, and his minister asked him, “Why did you present the largest offering to this stupa?” Ring Asoka replied, “Listen to me.” The Dharmakaya of the World-honored Buddha Is pure without parallel. 
By his power the Dharma is abiding; Thus I offer the best gift to him. As the water in an ox track Is not comparable to the great sea, The water of the wisdom of Ananda Is not comparable to the sea of the Buddha’s wisdom. In the Sutras the Buddha ascended the throne Together with him. That is why I offer the best gift to him today. 
He worshipped at Upagupta’s feet and uttered the following stanza: 
In my present human life, I did not lose the fruit of a good deed. It is by the power of my previous merits That I have become a king of sovereignty. Through what was falsity, I gained the Dharma of reality. Relic-stupas of the World-honored One Adorn this mundane world. 
The Causes of Making Offerings to the Bodhi Tree King Asoka offered a hundred thousand taels of gold each to the place where the Buddha was born, the place where he attained enlightenment, the place where he turned the Wheel of the Dharma, and the place where he entered nirvana. 
In the Bodhi tree, how­ ever, he felt the most faith and joy, and he pondered that as this was the place where the World-honored One had attained supreme perfect enlightenment he should offer the best gems and jewels to the tree every day. 
King Asoka’s first lady, Tisyaraksita by name, was angry about it. 
“If the great king loves me, why should he give all the best gems and jewels to the Bodhi tree?” She called in a candali maid and said to her, “The Bodhi tree is what 139b I hate. 
Can you destroy it for me?” The maid said in reply, “Yes, I can, but you must pay me in gold.” The lady said, “Let it be so.” The candali maid cursed the tree with incantations and bound it with a cord, and so the tree withered away gradually. 
Someone reported it to the king, saying, “The Bodhi tree is dying away gradually.” And he uttered the following stanza: 
Under the Bodhi tree the Buddha sat, Becoming omniscient in the world And gaining the wisdom of all knowledge. But the tree is now dying. Upon hearing these words, the king fainted and fell to the ground. 
He recovered himself after his ministers sprinkled water on him for a long while. 
Sobbing and shedding tears, he uttered the following stanza: 
When I see this king of trees, It is like seeing the Tathagata. If it withers away, My life will also expire. 
On seeing that the king was so anxious and worried, the lady said to him, “If I cannot revive the Bodhi tree, then I also cannot please Your Majesty.” The king said in reply, “If you can revive the Bodhi tree, then you are not a woman. 
Because this is the place where the Buddha attained supreme perfect enlightenment.” The lady called the candali maid and said to her, “Can you restore the tree to grow as before?” The maid replied, “If the root o f the Bodhi tree is not dead, I can rejuvenate the tree to grow again.” Then the candali maid unloosed the cord with which she had bound the tree and dug a ditch around it. 
Every day she poured milk into the ditch to irrigate the tree, and in a few days it gradually revived and became alive as it was before. 
The people reported it to the king, saying, ‘Your Majesty has done a great meritorious deed. 
The Bodhi tree is growing again.” Upon hearing these words, the king was very happy, and he went to the Bodhi tree and gazed at it without blinking. 
Then he uttered the follow­ ing stanza: 
Beginning from King Bimbisara, To the kings of different times, None of them could perform These two supreme causes: To water this tree of enlightenment With milk of good color and fragrance. I also present gifts To the holy monks of the five sects. 
King Asoka filled a thousand golden, silver, and lapis lazuli bottles with scented water and carried different kinds of food, drink, and flowers to bathe the tree with the scented water contained in the 40Making Offerings to the Bodhi Tree i 39c thousand bottles. 
At that time the king also observed the Eight Precepts. 
After receiving the Eight Precepts, he ascended the audience hall with a thurible in his hand and invited the monks of the four quarters, saying, “May all the disciples of the Worldhonored One in the four quarters come here to take me in to the teachings of the Buddha!” And he also uttered the following stanza: 
The supreme sons of the Sugata Are free from desires and practice dhyana] Upon them the Asuras rely; May they come to take me in. In the country of Kasmlra, In the great and secluded woods, There live many arhats; May they come to take me in. The sons of the Tathagata rejoicing in dhyana Live at Lake Anavatapta, Beside rivers, and in caves on the hills; May they come with pity for me. The sons of the Tathagata with good words Live in the halls of sariras With minds of compassion free from worries; May they come to take me in. 
When King Asoka had uttered this stanza, three hundred thou­ sand bhiksus, of whom a hundred thousand were harmonious arhats and two hundred thousand were learners, and numerous zealous ordinary people, gathered together, but nobody among the Sangha took the chief seat. 
King Asoka said to the Elder Yasas, who possessed the six supernatural powers, “Why is it that nobody is sitting on the first seat?” The Elder replied, “Because it is the seat for the chief Elder.” The king said again, “Is there anybody even higher than Your Reverence?” The Elder replied, ‘Yes. 
The Buddha said that among his disciples the foremost in preaching, like the roar of a lion, was the person surnamed Bharadvaja and named Pindola. 
The chief seat is for him.” Upon hearing these words, King Asoka was so excited that his hair stood on end like kadamba flowers. 
He said, “Most Virtuous One, is there any bhiksu who saw the Buddha before he entered nirvana and is still living now?” The Elder replied, Y es, the person who is surnamed Bharadvaja and named Pindola saw the Buddha.” The king then inquired, “But can I see him today?” The Elder said in reply, Y ou will see him in a moment; he is coming now.” The king was greatly pleased to hear these words and uttered the following stanza: 
A great benefit I shall gain, And I shall be converted in a peerless way By seeing one of great virtue; Pindola is his name. 
140a King Asoka put his hands palm to palm and looked at the air without moving his eyes for a moment. 
Then Pindola, followed by innumerable arhats surrounding him in a group shaped like a crescent moon, descended from the air like a king goose and sat on the first seat. 
At that time, King Asoka saw the arrival of Pindola Bhara­ dvaja; and all the bhiksus from the ten quarters stood up from their seats. 
He saw that Pindola had silvery hair and that the skin o f his forehead as well as his eyebrows were hanging down over his face in the manner of a pratyekabuddha. 
Upon seeing him the king prostrated himself, like a big tree falling to the ground, to worship Pindola. 
He kissed the monk’s feet, 42Making Offerings to the Bodhi Tree knelt before him with his hands joined palm to palm, and looked at him shedding tears, while he uttered the following stanza: 
The earth has the sea as its garment, With mountains as canopies for its adornment. Having done away with my foes, I, Asoka, owned this earth, Which made me delighted with pleasure. Even more am I delighted today, To meet you, a great virtuous man. As I see you today, I feel doubly happy in my mind. 
I saw the Tathagata several times, The peerless and unparalleled one Who possessed the thirty-two marks, Whose face was like the autumnal full moon, Whose pure voice dissolved affliction, Entering the samadhi of non-disputation. 
King Asoka inquired again, “Where and how did Your Reverence see the Buddha?” The Elder said in reply, ‘Your Majesty, the World-honored One stayed at first in the city of Rajagrha with a following of five hundred passion-free arhats. 
The passion-free Mahamuni Was followed by passion-free arhats. When they were staying there, I could see him by good chance. Just as you see me today, I saw the Buddha in the same way. 
i40b “Again, Your Majesty, the World-honored One, in order to subdue the heretics, once manifested in the country of Sravasti various supernatural powers and appeared as numerous metamorphosed Buddhas with dignified physical marks and signs, ascending one heaven after another up to the Akanistha heaven. 
I was also present on that occasion and witnessed the different divine trans­ formations of the Buddha.” Then he uttered the following stanza: 
There were many heretics, Practicing different erroneous ways. The World-honored One subdued them With his supernormal powers. I saw the Buddha at that time, Giving the world happiness. 
“Again, Your Majesty, after staying for the summer retreat in the Thirty-three heavens to preach the Dharma to his mother, the World-honored One, surrounded by heavenly beings, descended to the country of Samkasya. 
As I was then among the congregation, I saw the heavenly beings, and I saw the bhiksunl named Utpalavarnika transforming herself into the form of a cakravartin king possessing all of the seven kinds o f treasures.” He then uttered the following stanza: 
After his rainy season retreat in Heaven, The Buddha descended from there. As I was among the congregation, I had the chance to see the Buddha. 
“Again, Your Majesty, once Sumagadha, daughter of Anathapindada, invited the Buddha and five hundred arhats. 
The Buddha went by his divine power to the country of Pundravardhana, while I, carrying a mountain, also went through the air to the country by divine power. 
On that occasion the Tathagata instructed me, saying, You must not enter nirvana so long as my Dharma abides in the world.’ ” Pindola then uttered the following stanza: 
At the invitation of Sumagadha, The Buddha went there by divine power. 44Making Offerings to the Bodhi Tree I followed him to the land of Pundra, Raising a mountain high by my own power. The Buddha instructed me on that occasion To live in the world so long as the Dharma abides. That was the condition upon which I was able to see the Buddha. 
“Again, Your Majesty, when you were a child in a previous life, you offered sand with a childish mind to the Buddha, while I offered him cooked rice, when he entered the city of Rajagrha to collect alms. 
Radhagupta rejoiced at the event. 
The Buddha made a prediction, saying, ‘A hundred years after my nirvana, this child will become a cakravartin king with the name of Asoka, rule over one of the four continents, and be a Dharma King. 
He will construct eighty-four thousand Dharmaraja stupas for the enshrinement of relics.’ I was then among the congregation.” He then uttered the following stanza: 
The king was then a child, When with folded hands he offered sand. I was there at that moment And witnessed the event. King Asoka again inquired of Pindola, “Where does Your Reverence live?” He replied with the following stanza: 
North of Lake Anavatapta, On the mountain Gandhamadana: I live at that place With my fellow monks. 
140c Sixty thousand arhats Follow and surround me. I and my congregation Are free from the bane of passion. “Again, Your Majesty, why are you so inquisitive about these matters? You should now quickly offer food to the monks. 
When the monks have taken their meal, I will talk with you again.” The king said in reply, “Yes, I shall do as you advise. 
In order to remember the Buddha, I should go to see the Bodhi tree. 
After seeing the Bodhi tree, I shall offer a meal of different kinds of food and drink to the monks.” King Asoka said to a bhiksu named Sarvamitra, “I am going to offer a hundred thousand taels of gold and a thousand golden, silver, and lapis lazuli water pots to the monks. 
Make an an­ nouncement in the assembly in my name that this offering is made to the monks of the five sects.” At that time King Asoka’s son Kunala was by the right side of the king. 
As the prince was in fear of his father, he dared not speak but raised two fingers to show to the announcer bhiksu that he would offer twice as many gifts as his father. 
Upon seeing that Kunala was going to present twice as many gifts as his father, the whole assembly laughed merrily. 
Make an announce­ ment in my name that the gifts are offered to the monks o f the five sects.” Kunala then raised four fingers to show to the bhiksus. 
Greatly enraged, the king said to the minister Radhagupta, “Now I am performing meritorious deeds. 
Who is so ignorant of worldly deco­ rum as to compete with me?” On seeing that the king was getting angry, Radhagupta saluted him at his feet and told him who dared to compete with him in the performance of meritorious deeds by uttering the following stanza: 
Who dares to compete with the king In the act of merit making? 
Make an announcement in my name to the assembly that I offer everything to the monks of the five sects.” And he also uttered the following stanza: 
Everything in my palace, Excepting my treasures, But including attendants and courtiers, I offer to the monks. The monks of the congregation Are fields of blessing. I and my prince Shall gain merits. 
i 4ia After having presented alms to Pindola and all the monks in the assembly, King Asoka constructed a wall around the Bodhi tree. 
He personally climbed up to the top of the wall and poured four thousand water pots of scented water to irrigate the tree, which started to grow as before. 
And he uttered the following stanza: 
Having been watered by the king, the Bodhi tree started to grow as before, with green and pliant branches and leaves, and it unfolded new buds, to the great delight of the king and his minis­ ters and people. 
Food and drink were then offered to the monks. 
In the assembly there was a monk of great virtue by the name o f Yasas, who said to the king, “This assembly of monks is truly to be adored and respected. 
You should make offerings to it without a mind of discrimination.” King Asoka served food to the monks with his own hands, from the highest in order to the last one. 
At the end of the order there were two novices who made joy buns out of cooked rice and threw them to each other for fun. 
King Asoka was amused to see them and thought that the two novices were playing like children. 
The king went again to serve the chief monk with food and gradually came to the presence of Yasas, who said to him, ‘Your Majesty should not harbor any feeling of disbelief towards any monk in the assembly.” The king consented, but he told the Elder Yasas that two novices were having fun with cooked rice. 
Yasas said in reply, “Those two novices are arhats, having gained free­ dom of mind and wisdom.” The king was greatly delighted to hear this. 
When the king saw these things, he asked, “What is the use of these things?” They replied, “Since Your Majesty wishes to present us with separate gifts of robes after offering food to the monks, we intend to dye the new robes.” Upon hearing these words, the king thought in his mind, “I was just thinking within my mind and did not say anything. 
How did these persons come to know my mind?” Then he prostrated himself on the ground to worship at the feet of the two novices and uttered the following stanza to them: 
I, king of the Maurya clan, And my courtiers and men Have done deeds of merit And gained great benefits. 
i4 ib King Asoka said to the two novices, “On your account, I shall offer three robes to each of the monks in the assembly.” So, after having 48Making Offerings to the Bodhi Tree performed meritorious deeds for the monks of the five sects, King Asoka also presented three robes to each of them, besides offering four hundred thousand taels of gold to them. 
He also paid a large amount of gold and silver to redeem his land, palace attendants, and ministers, as well as himself and Kunala. 
The Causes of Vitasoka King Asoka had a mind of deep faith in the Buddha-dharma. 
After constructing eighty-four thousand stupas, he convened an assem­ bly of monks of the five sects, to whom he offered food and drink. 
There were in the assembly three hundred thousand arhats, twice as many learners, and innumerable zealous ordinary people, in whom the king had double faith. 
At that time, King Asoka’s younger brother, Vitasoka, believed in the dharma of the heretics, and he said, “None of Sakyamuni’s disciples has attained emancipation. 
Because they always take delight in a pleasurable way of life and dread asceticism.” King Asoka said to his younger brother, “Do not fix your faith in the wrong place. 
You should believe in the Buddha-dharma.” At another time when King Asoka went out hunting, his younger brother saw a hermit in the mountains who was scorching himself with heat from five directions while earnestly practicing asceticism. 
“I spread grass on the ground,” answered the hermit. 
If they have desire in their minds, how could they cherish the notion of detesting and forsaking desire?” And he uttered the following stanza: 
The hermit in the wood of mortification, Living upon fruits, roots, and flowers, Breathing air without taking foul nutrition, Cannot quell his carnal desire. Sons of Sakyamuni Buddha Eat milk foods and butter, Wear robes of many types, And never give up one piece. If they could keep their senses under control, Mount Vaidurya would be able to float. 
i4 ic King Asoka’s younger brother also said that the Sakya disciples were cheating the king into performing meritorious deeds. 
Upon hearing these words, King Asoka, trying to employ some expe­ dient, said to his minister, “My younger brother believes in the heretics. 
We should try to employ some expedient to convert him to the Buddha-dharma.” In reply to the king, the minister said, “What does Your Majesty wish me to do?” The king told him, “Now I am going to the bathroom to take a bath. 
I shall take off my crown and garments. 
You may dress my younger brother in my costume and ask him to ascend the throne.” The minister said in reply, ‘Yes.” King Asoka then went to the bathroom to take off his orna­ ments, and after the king had entered the bathroom, the minister said to his younger brother, ‘You would have been king if it had not been for Asoka. 
Now you may try to put on this crown and the royal garments and ascend the throne.” Having said so, the minister dressed the prince in the king’s garments and caused him to ascend the throne. 
The minister then reported to King Asoka, saying, ‘Your ser­ vant has carried out the order of Your Majesty.” King Asoka came 50Making Offerings to the Bodhi Tree to see his younger brother, who was wearing the crown and sitting on the throne, and said to him, “So you have assumed kingship even when I am not dead!” In a fit of rage the king called in the executioner, a fellow dressed in dark blue with dishevelled hair and holding a bell in his hand. 
Having come into the presence of the king, the executioner paid homage to him and said, “What do you wish me to do?” The king said, “I have discarded this younger brother of mine. 
You may kill him.” When the king had said this, a group of people holding weapons in their hands came up to surround the prince. 
At that moment the minister saluted the king’s feet and said to him, “This is Your Majesty’s younger brother, and I beg Your Majesty to have patience and not to be angry with him.” King Asoka said to the minister in reply, “I shall be patient with him for seven days. 
As he is my younger brother, I shall give him the kingdom temporarily, allow him to be king for seven days, and provide him with various musicians and maids o f honor for his amusement. 
All people should come to pay respects to him.” Standing at the gate with a knife in hand, the executioner announced to the king every day, “One day has passed. 
There will be six days more!” So on the sixth day, he announced that there remained only one more day. 
On the seventh day, the royal ornaments, crown, and garments were returned to King Asoka. 
The minister and other people took Vitasoka to see the king, who asked him, “During the seven days of your kingship, how did you enjoy the pleasant music and various kinds of amuse­ ment?” In reply, the king’s brother uttered the following stanza: 
He who has seen the beauties, Heard the melodies, And tasted the delicacies May answer your inquiries. 
142a The king said again, “I gave you the kingdom so that you were king for seven days, and you enjoyed all kinds of amusement to your heart’s content, while numerous people came every day to pay homage and express good wishes to you. 
How can you say that you did not see, hear, or taste anything delightful?” In reply, the prince again uttered the following stanza: 
In the last seven days I neither saw nor heard anything, Nor did I smell or taste flavor. I could not feel the touch Of the ornaments I was wearing, Or of the charming maids who were attending. As I was thinking of dreadful death, I lost the sensations of these things. The songs of the nautch girls dancing, The palaces and bedding, The land and all the treasures, Aroused in me no pleasure. 
In the same way, the homeless bhiksus meditate on the impermanence of the countless births and deaths on the basis of the twelve entrances. 
How can they have any passions? 
They also meditate on the pains of the hells and of the animals cruelly killing one another, on the hungry ghosts suffering from hunger and thirst, and on men always rushing about without ease to all places for a living, and also on the pains of the heavenly beings at the stage of decadence. 
All beings in these five ways of existence are 52Making Offerings to the Bodhi Tree suffering mentally and physically without happiness. 
The bhiksus also consider that all the five skandhas are impermanent, pain­ ful, void, egoless, and unsubstantial, just like an empty village without inhabitants. 
As the five skandhas are void and with­ out an ego, the world is burning with the fire of impermanence. 
Since the Buddha’s disciples always contemplate in this way, how can they have any passions?” And he also uttered the following stanza: 
Just for a single day You pondered on the fear of death Without joy and pleasure Nor with a mind of attachment. The disciples o f the Buddha Contemplate birth and death every day. How can they have joy and pleasure And harbor minds of delusion? On their food and garments, 142b As well as on their bedding, They meditate upon how to gain liberation, Free from mental attachment. 
King Asoka employed this good expedient to convert Vltasoka to the Buddha-dharma, and Vltasoka, with folded hands, said to the king, ‘Your Majesty, I now take refuge in the Tathagata as well as his Dharma and the Sangha.” And he also uttered the following stanza: 
I take refuge in the Buddha, Whose face resembles a lotus flower, A shelter for divine and human beings. I also submit to the pure Dharma and the Sangha. 
It was for the sake of converting you to the Buddha-dharma that I adopted this expedient.” Vitas'oka offered various kinds of flowers and incense with the performance of music to the Buddha-stupas, and he also pre­ sented different kinds of food and drink as alms to the monks. 
Then he went to Kukkuta Monastery, where the Elder Yas'as, an arhat possessing the six supernatural powers, was residing. 
Upon arriving at the monastery, he sat face to face with Yasas, wishing to hear the Dharma from him. 
With his supernormal powers, Yasas perceived that Vltasoka had done good deeds in his previous lives and that this was his last birth with a corpo­ real body, as he would attain arhatship. 
The Elder preached the Dharma and praised the renunciation of home life. 
After hearing the Dharma, Vltasoka wished to renounce his home life and said to Yasas with folded hands, ‘You have preached the Dharma and Vinaya well. 
May I renounce my home to be a fully ordained monk? 
I wish to lead a life of celibacy according to the Buddha-dharma.” Yasas said in reply, “Good man, you may go back to ask King Asoka whether he permits you to renounce your home.” Vltasoka returned to King Asoka and said to him with folded hands, “May Your Majesty allow me to renounce the home life, as I wish to lead a life of celibacy accord­ ing to the Buddha-dharma.” And he also uttered the following stanza: 
The king’s will is an iron hook. 
Do not stop me from leaving home. The king is the lord of the earth, And should allow me to leave my hearth. For this world the Buddha is a ray, And I wish to go along his Way. 54Making Offerings to the Bodhi Tree Upon hearing these words, King Asoka embraced his younger brother’s neck and said with tears and sobbing, “Vitasoka, do not i 42c conceive such an idea. 
Because the monks wear coarse and shabby clothes, eat what is given by others, and sleep under trees. 
Now stop thinking about becoming a monk.” Vitasoka said in reply, “Your Majesty, I wish to become a monk not out of hatred, or craving, or poverty, or to evade some enemy. 
It is simply because I see that this world is full of pain and continual rebirths without emancipation, and I see that the Buddha-dharma is the only right path leading to freedom from rebirth without fear. 
So I wish to become a monk with pleasure.” King Asoka sobbed more piteously when he heard these words. 
Vitasoka then uttered the following stanza: 
Rebirth is like a rope hanging, Man is on it always swinging. 
King Asoka then said to his younger brother, “Before becoming a monk, you have to practice begging for alms.” In the royal garden at the back of the palace, there was a big tree, under which grass was spread on the ground to provide a place for Vitasoka to stay. 
An earthen bowl was given to him so that he could beg alms from the palace. 
With begging bowl in hand, he went to the palace, where he obtained different varieties of the choicest food. 
The king became angry with the palace attendants and said to them, “Why do you give the best food to the mendicant? 
From now on you should give him coarse food.” Thus wheat was cooked and kept for a night and then given to him when it had turned sour. 
Vitasoka accepted the food and ate it without feeling disgusted. 
At this sight, King Asoka said to him, “Stop taking this food. 
I permit you to become a monk; but after becoming a monk, you should often come to see me.” Then Vitasoka went to the Kukkuta Monastery, and when he reached there, he thought that if he became a monk at that place the people and environment would distract his mind from cultivating the Way, and that he should go to become a monk at some distant place. 
So he travelled to the country of Videha, where he became a monk and engaged himself in meditation vigorously until he attained arhatship. 
Having attained arhatship, the Elder Vitasoka enjoyed the bliss of emancipation and thought that as he had made an agree­ ment with the king to see him often after becoming a monk, he should fulfill his promise. 
143a Then he travelled by easy stages to the country of Pataliputra. 
Early in the morning, the Elder Vitasoka dressed himself and went to the city with his begging bowl to collect alms. 
Then he stood up and gazed at him with his hands joined palm to palm without feeling weariness. 
He uttered the following stanza with tears of emotion: 
All living beings are happy To live in a harmonious family. But you renounced your home To live a life quiet and calm. Now I understand your mind. With no amount of wisdom are you content. 
At that time, the minister Sugupta saw that Vitasoka wore a robe made of cast-off rags. 
He carried an earthen bowl, went from house to house to collect alms, and without distinguishing in his mind accepted whatever food, coarse or fine, was given him. 
He said to King Asoka, “Vitasoka is content, with few desires, and has accom­ plished what he aimed to achieve. 
56Making Offerings to the Bodhi Tree He, always practicing alms-begging, Wearing cast-off rag clothing, Living beneath a tree, Has a mind in constant samàdhi. His mind is broad without leakage; His body is free from malady; Leading a righteous life, He is always cheerful. King Asoka was greatly pleased to hear these words, and he uttered the following stanza: 
You abandoned the Maurya clan, The kingdom of Magadha, Precious jewels of every kind, And the best enjoyment of the five desires. You rejoice at the four noble truths, Free from arrogance, pride, and distress, Practicing the Way with great diligence. My country is glorified by your eminence. The supreme Dharma, the ten powers You are qualified to possess. 
After the meal, his eating bowl was washed and put aside. 
King Asoka sat before him to listen to his preaching, and in the course of preaching, Vitasoka uttered the following stanza: 
King Asoka and five hundred courtiers, together with the people of the country, surrounded Vitasoka respectfully with folded hands to send him off. 
The courtiers and people uttered the following stanza: 
King Asoka, the elder brother, Sends off the younger one with respect. The supreme fruit of renunciation Is now fully realized. 
143b In order to reveal his merits, the Elder Vitasoka soared into the air, and all the people saw his departure. 
King Asoka and the multitude, folding their hands palm to palm, witnessed the event with fixed gaze, and uttered the following stanza: 
Then the Elder Vitasoka repaired to a borderland, and upon reaching there he fell so seriously ill that his head was covered with boils. 
The king, hearing about it, dispatched attendants and physicians to cure him. 
When he was a little better some time later, both the physicians and the attendants were sent back. 
As he needed only milk for his nourishment, he went for convenience of begging alms to live at a place where there were many cows. 
One man who followed the heretical 58Making Offerings to the Bodhi Tree dharma worshipped a naked god painted in the shape o f the Tathagata and paid homage to it at its feet. 
A Buddhist disciple saw this matter and reported it to Kang Asoka. 
After hearing it, the king ordered that the man be brought into his presence. 
Now within the domain of King Asoka, all the Yaksas in the air up to the height of half a yojana were under his control, and all the Nagas one yojana below the earth also belonged to him. 
Upon hearing the order of the king, the Yaksas in an instant brought the heretical disciple and his picture into the presence of the king. 
Being greatly enraged by the sight, he had all the heretics of Punyavardhana killed; and one hundred eight thousand heretics i 43c were slaughtered in one day. 
There was another heretical follower who accepted a heretical dharma, worshipped a naked god painted in the shape of the Tathagata, and paid it homage at its feet. 
When King Asoka heard about it, he again ordered his men to arrest that man and his relations, all of whom were put in a house, which was then set on fire. 
The king also issued a decree, saying, “If anyone can get the head of a Nirgrantha, I shall award him a piece of gold.” At that time, the Elder Vltasoka came to a place where cows were reared and spent one day there. 
As he had been sick for many days, his hair and beard were long, his nails were sharp, and he was wearing a coarse garment without color or brilliance. 
A cow­ herd woman thought in her mind, “Here comes a Nirgrantha to our house.” And then she said to her husband, ‘You can kill this Nirgrantha and send his head to King Asoka, and you will surely get a gold coin.” The husband, hearing this, unsheathed his sword and went to Vltasoka with the intention of decapitating him. 
The elder, reflecting that nowhere could one escape from one’s retribu­ tion, faced death as it befell him. 
His head was then sent to King Asoka by the man wishing to win the reward of gold. 
When the king saw that the hair on the head was of an attractive variegated color, he had a suspicion in his mind and inquired of the physicians and attendants about it. 
They said to the king, “This is the head of Vltasoka!” Upon hearing these words, the king fainted and fell to the ground. 
When water was sprinkled on him, he recovered and got to his feet after a long while. 
A minister said to the king, “Even a man who is perfectly free from passions is not spared from this suffering. 
It befits Your Majesty to grant freedom from fear to living beings.” Asoka fol­ lowed this advice and issued an order that no Nirgranthas should be killed any more. 
Then the bhiksus had a doubt about it and inquired of Upagupta, “What deed did Vltasoka commit in the past, that he suffered this retribution of being murdered by another?” Upagupta said in reply, “Elders, listen. 
In the past there was a hunter who killed many herds o f deer. 
In the great forest there was a spring where the hunter spread his net and tied the rope beside the water. 
In this way he killed many deer every day. 
That was a time when the Buddha was not yet born in the world. 
One day apratyekabuddha took his meal beside the water. 
After taking his meal, he bathed and went to sit underneath a tree. 
All the deer, smelling the fragrance of the pratyekabuddha, did not go to the waterside. 
When the hunter came and did not see any deer, he i44a traced the footmarks and came to the pratyekabuddha. 
On seeing him, the hunter thought in his mind, ‘It is because of this man sitting here that the deer did not come.’ Thereupon he killed the pratyekabuddha with a knife. 
You should know, Elders, that that hunter of bygone days was today’s Vltasoka. 
As he had killed many deer every day in the past, he suffered various ailments in his present life. 
His murder of the pratyekabuddha caused him to suffer pains of every description in hells for innumerable years. 
He was always killed each of the five hundred times he was born as a human being. 
This was his last birth; but even though he had attained arhatship, he was still murdered by a man.” The bhiksus again asked Upagupta, “But how did this person come to be born into a great clan and attain arhatship?” Upagupta said in reply, “Formerly, when he became a monk in the Dharma of Kasyapa Buddha, he loved to give alms and often advised lay supporters to offer various kinds of food and drink to the Sangha. 
There was then a stupa containing the Buddha’s hair and nail 60Making Offerings to the Bodhi Tree relics, to which he offered incense, flowers, banners, and canopies, as well as different kinds of musical performances. 
It was because of this karma that he was born into a great clan. 
And for a hundred thousand years he constantly practiced celibacy with a right vow, on account of which he attained arhatship.” The Causes of Kunala Ring Asoka constructed eighty-four thousand stupas in one day, and on that day his wife Padmavati gave birth to a son with regular features and particularly beautiful eyes. 
No one saw him but loved him. 
A palace attendant reported to the king that by the merits of the king, his wife had given birth to a son. 
The king was pleased to hear this news and uttered the following stanza: 
I am today Greatly pleased. My clan of Maurya Is well known to all. May my son in the palace Increase the Dharma! Thus the child was named Dharmavivardhana . 
Then he was carried in to be shown to the king, who was glad to see him and uttered the following stanza: 
Beautiful are the eyes of my son, Created by merits previously done. Bright and very brilliant, Resembling utpala flowers, These eyes of merit Adorn his features. His face is regular and dignified, Like a full moon in the season of autumn. 
King Asoka assembled his ministers and said to them, “Have you ever seen eyes such as those of this child?” The ministers said in reply, “We have really never seen such eyes among human beings. 
But in the Snow Mountains there is a kind of bird called a kunala whose eyes resemble the eyes of this child.” And they uttered the following stanza: 
On top of the Snow Mountains, At the place of precious flowers, The birds called kunala 144b Stay in their nests. The eyes of this child Resemble those of the bird. 
The king then ordered, “Bring that bird here.” The Yaksas in the air up to the height of half a yojana heard the king’s words, and the Nagas one yojana below also heard his words. 
In an instant, the Yaksas brought a bird to the king, who compared its eyes with the eyes of his son and found no difference between them. 
Thus he gave the child the name of the bird and uttered the following stanza: 
The king of men on the earth Uses the name of kunala, With most beautiful eyes, As his son’s name, So that on this earth, His fame will spread far. 
When Kunala had grown up, he was given a lady named Kancanamala to be his wife. 
Once King Asoka brought him to Kukkuta Monastery, where lived an elderly monk by the name of Yasas, an arhat possessing the six supernatural powers. 
At that moment Yasas foresaw that before long Kunala would lose his eyes. 
So he said to the king, ‘W hy do you not ask Kunala to do his own deeds?” King Asoka said to Kunala, “The Most Virtuous One asks you to do what you should do. 
You should meditate on this.” And he also uttered the following stanza: 
Ordinary people have upside-down views, Giving rise to what is wrong. Kunala then sat alone at a quiet place in the palace to meditate that the eyes and other sense organs were painful and imperma­ nent. 
King Asoka’s chief wife Tisyaraksita went to Kunala and saw that he was sitting alone. 
When she saw his eyes, a surge of lustful desire arose in her mind and she embraced him with her arms while she uttered the following stanza: 
A strong fire of love Is burning in my heart, Like flames licking a dry vine. Come, you, to satisfy my mind. When Kunala heard these words of hers, he plugged his ears with his hands and uttered the following stanza: 
At this place of mine, No such words should be said. You are a mother to me, And I am a son to you. Passions of this illegal kind Should be put far away. Why should you for this matter Open the gate to the evil way? 
I fixed my mind of love upon you, But you have no love in your mind. Since you dislike me, You will soon be wiped out. Kunala said in reply: 
I would rather die For the Dharma of purity than live. I would not stay in life With a mind of obscenity. One who has an evil mind Loses the good Dharma of Devas and men. If the good Dharma becomes imperfect, On what will one’s life depend? 
There was then in the north a country named Taksasila, which rebelled against King Asoka’s orders. 
When the king heard about it, he intended to go there himself, but his ministers said to him, “Kunala should be ordered to go. 
There is no need for you to go yourself.” King Asoka summoned Kunala and said to him, “You should go to that country.” Kunala replied to the king, “So be it.” King Asoka also uttered the following stanza: 
At this moment, I heard him saying, “So be it.” Though he is my son, He is also my heart. As I remember him in my mind, He is more lovely to me. King Asoka then had the roads repaired. 
All corpses were removed and all aged and sick people were ordered to keep out of sight. 
The king rode in the same carriage with Kunala to see him off. 
At that time, a Brahman physiognomist foresaw that Kunala would soon lose his eyes. 
On seeing that the king was gazing at his 66The Causes of Kunala son’s eyes without paying attention to anything else, he uttered the following stanza: 
Why should they be lost? All the people in this country, When they see Kunala’s eyes, Feel pleased, As if enjoying heavenly bliss. If they see him lose his eyes, They will all be distressed. i 45a Kunala then gradually proceeded to the country of Taksasila. 
The people of that country, hearing about it, went out half a yojana to repair and decorate the road. 
They placed water everywhere in anticipation of the coming multitude. 
The people uttered the fol­ lowing stanza: 
The people of Taksasila Hold water in precious jars And other offerings To greet Prince Kunala. 
When the prince arrived, the people folded their hands and said to him, “We do not come to meet you to fight, nor do we bear any grudge against the great king. 
But the minister sent by the king to our country governs the state unjustly, and we wish him to be dismissed from office.” Then the people presented offerings to Prince Kunala and welcomed him to their country. 
King Asoka then fell seriously ill; he vomited out of his mouth, and filthy fluid oozed from his pores. 
All the best physicians failed to cure him. 
King Asoka said to his ministers, “Recall Kunala. 
I shall consecrate him king and hand over the throne to him. 
Now I shall cling to this life no more.” Tisyaraksita thought in her mind, “If Kunala becomes king, I shall certainly be put to death.” With this reflection in her mind, she said to King Asoka, “I can cure the king and get rid of the disease. 
There is no need to send for any more physicians.” So the king listened to her words and refused to see any physicians. 
Tisyaraksita said to the physicians, “If there is anybody outside, male or female, who is suffering from the same disease as the king, you may bring that person in.” There was then in the country of the Abhlras a man suffering from the same trouble as the king. 
The sick man’s wife consulted a physician and told him the symptoms of her husband’s illness. 
The physician said in reply, “Bring the man here. 
I wish to see him and write out a prescription for him.” Thus the woman brought the patient to the physician, who then sent him to the king’s wife. 
The king’s wife put the sick man in a secluded place, had his abdomen cut open, and extracted both his “raw” and his “ripe” viscera. 
In his ripe viscus there was a big worm, and when it moved upwards vomit was ejected out of the mouth. 
Excrement was discharged below when it moved downwards. 
If it moved sideways, filthy fluids oozed from the pores. 
The king’s wife ground some mallika and placed it beside the worm, but it did not die. 
She then put some pippall beside it, and it still did not die. 
She again placed some dry ginger near the worm, and it still did not die. 
But it died instantly when she placed some garlic beside it. 
i45b The king’s wife reported this matter to the king, saying, “The king should now eat some garlic, which will cure the disease.” The king said in reply, “Being a Ksatriya, I should not eat garlic.” The lady said, “For the sake of your body and life, it should be taken as medicine.” So King Asoka ate some garlic, and the worm was then killed and his disease was cured. 
Thus he became as fit and lively as before. 
After having bathed, King Asoka said to his wife, “What­ ever you desire to have now, I shall grant you as you wish.” The king’s wife said to him, “May the king allow me to be king for seven days.” The king said to his wife, “If you become king, you will certainly kill me.” His wife said again, “After seven days, I shallThe Causes of Kunala return the kingship to you.” Thus King Asoka granted her the request. 
In the letter, there was written the following stanza: 
I am now very powerful, My prestigious name, fearful. As Kunala, the prince, Has committed an offence, Now I order you people To extract his two eyes. To perform this matter now You should take action in haste. When the royal lady had written this letter, she needed to impress it with the king’s dental marks. 
King Asoka was then sleeping, and as the lady wished to seal the letter she went close to the king. 
The king woke up with a start. 
The lady asked the king, “Why are you frightened and startled?” The king said in reply to the lady, “I had an inauspicious dream in which I saw a vulture attempting to extract Kunala’s eyes. 
This is why I was startled with fear.” The lady said in reply, “The king need not be worried. 
Prince Kunala is now quite safe and sound.” In the second watch, the king had another dream; and he was again wakened from sleep with a start. 
He said to the lady, “I had another dream as ominous as the first one.” The lady asked, ‘W hat was it?” The king said in reply, “I saw that Kunala had long hair, a beard, and sharp nails; and he was unable to speak.” The lady said, “He is safe and sound. 
Do not worry about him.” Afterwards when King Asoka fell asleep, the lady stealthily had the letter impressed with the king’s teeth and had it sent to the people of Taksasila. 
At that time, King Asoka again dreamed that all his teeth had fallen out. 
When he had taken a bath early the next morning, he summoned as a life-and-death matter a physiognomist and told him everything he had seen in his dream, saying, “You should read the meaning o f my dream.” The physiognomist said in reply, “If anyone has had such a dream, his son will lose his sight. 
If anyone dreams that his teeth have fallen out, His son will lose his sight. 
Since one’s son has lost his eyes, It is the same as losing one’s son. 
145c When King Asoka heard these words, he stood up facing the deities of the four quarters with folded hands and implored their protec­ tion with vows, saying: 
I take refuge single-heartedly in the Buddha, In the pure Dharma, and in the Sangha. All the recluses of this earth Are most eminent in the world. May all saintly monks Extend protection to Kunala. When the messenger arrived with the letter in the country of Taksasila, the people of the country, upon seeing the letter, hid it away and did not give it to Kunala. 
They had affection for him and did not wish to cause resentment in his mind. 
The people also reflected, “Since the great King Asoka is so fearful that he has neither esteem nor confidence even in his own son and wishes to extract his eyes, how can he treat us without malignance?” And they uttered the following stanza: 
Now as regards this Kunala, He is no different from a great recluse. O f all living beings He is the benefactor. But to him the great king Asoka Has no mind of compassion, 70The Causes of Kunala Let alone to any other beings. He will spare none from cruelties. 
Upon receiving the letter, Kunala said to the people, “If anyone can extract my eyes, he may do so at his own discretion.” The people then called in a candala and said to him, “Extract Kunala’s eyes.” The candala said with folded hands, “I cannot do that. 
Why?” If a man could erase The full moon’s brilliant light, He might extract the eyes From your face, a moon that is bright. 
Kunala took off his precious coronet and said to the candala, “If you can extract my eyes, I shall give this to you.” There was another man of abominable features marked with the eighteen marks of ugliness, who said, “I can extract your eyes.” At that moment Kunala remembered what the most virtuous Yasas had told him, and he uttered the following stanza: 
This is a true saying. 
146a I always remember and ponder That everything is impermanent. This was taught by my teacher, And I should deeply keep it in mind. I do not fear the pain, As I have seen that nothing is everlasting. In compliance with the king’s order, You may extract my eyes. 
Kunala then said to the ugly man, “You may gouge out one of my eyes and place it in my palm, as I wish to see it.” When that ugly man was about to take out Kunala’s eye, numerous people angrily scolded him and uttered the following stanza: 
His eyes are pure and without stain, Like the moon in the air. You are extracting his eyes, As one might pull a lotus from a pond. Numerous people wailed and wept piteously, while the ugly man took out Kunala’s eye and put it in his hand. 
Accepting his eye in his hand, Kunala uttered the following stanza to it: 
Originally, in former times, You could see all colors. But at this moment now, Why can you not see them? Formerly you caused the seer To have a mind of attachment; Now I see that you are not real, But false and unsubstantial Like a bubble on water That is void and without entity. You are simply powerless And not independent. 
When Kunala was meditating on the impermanence of all dharmas, he attained the fruition of a srota-dpanna. 
After having gained the fruit, he said to the ugly man, ‘You may gouge out my other eye as you like.” The ugly man then cut out the other eye and placed it in Kunala’s hand. 
Although he had lost his eyes of flesh, he obtained the Eye of Wisdom; and then he uttered the following stanza: 
have gained it now. The king has abandoned me; I am no more the king’s son. As I have gained the Dharma, I am a son of the Dharma King. Now I have freely fallen From the palace of suffering, And also freely ascended To the palace of the Dharma King. 
Knowing that it was Tisyaraksita who wanted to extract his eyes, Kunala uttered the following stanza: 
When Kunala’s wife Kancanamala heard that Kunala had lost his eyes, she went to her husband out of anxiety about him. 
At a place where there was a crowd of people, she saw Kunala, who had lost his eyes and was bleeding. 
Thus she fainted and fell to the ground, and people sprinkled water on her to restore her to consciousness. 
She wept and uttered the following stanza: 
146b Your eyes were bright and lovable; When I saw them formerly they were pleasurable. Now they are apart from your body; They cause in my mind a great worry. Kunala said to his wife, “Do not weep. 
As I have done the deeds, I am receiving the retribution.” He also uttered the following stanza: 
All sorts of unions Are bound to end in separation. This matter you should know. There is no need to weep with lamentation. 
Kunala and his wife then returned to King Asoka’s palace from the country of Taksasila. 
As the two of them had never before, since their birth, walked on the ground, they were so weak and feeble that they could not bear the hardship o f their labor. 
Kunala was good at playing the lute as well as singing and playing wind instruments. 
They followed the original road and begged for food to sustain their lives. 
Gradually they reached their own country and intended to enter the palace gate, but the gatekeeper did not allow them to go in. 
Since they could not get in, they withdrew and lodged in a carriage shed and stable. 
In the third division of the night, Kunala played his lute and started singing a song with the words, “My eyes are lost, but the four noble truths have I seen.” And he also sang the following song: 
If a man possessing wisdom Sees the twelve entrances With the lamp of wisdom, He may be free from rebirth. The sufferings of the three realms of being Are the sufferings of one’s own mind. As for all faults of the three realms of being, One should perceive them now. If one wishes to acquire supreme bliss, One should ponder on the twelve entrances. 
74The Causes of Kunala Now the song that is being sung And the sound of the lute Sound like my son. 
King Asoka called in a man , “The voice I heard seemed to be that of Kunala; it was so melodious and yet so sad and sorrowful. 
That voice distracted my mind, as an elephant is rest­ less with an uneasy mind when it has lost its son but hears its son’s trumpeting. 
You may go to see whether it is Kunala or not. 
If it is Kunala, then bring him here.” Under the king’s order, that man went to the carriage shed and stable, where he saw a man who had lost both eyes and whose skin was tanned by the sun; he did not recognize the prince. 
He went back to report to the king, saying, “The person Your Majesty i 46c ordered me to see is a lonely blind man, staying with his wife in the carriage shed and stable. 
He is not Kunala.” Upon hearing these words, King Asoka felt distressed and pondered over the matter. 
And then he uttered the following stanza: 
I saw in a dream before That Kunala had lost his eyes. Now this blind man Must be Kunala without doubt. Go there again To bring him to this place. As I am thinking of my son, My mind is not at ease. 
What is your name?” Kunala replied with the following stanza: 
My father is named Asoka-vardhana, With the surname of Maurya. The whole great earth Is under his control, And I am his prince, By the name of Kunala, Sumamed Dharmaraja Buddha. I am the son of the Dharma King. The messenger then brought Kunala and his wife to the palace. 
King Asoka saw that Kunala had been exposed to wind and sun­ burned and was dressed in a garment made of grass and rags, and that his appearance had changed beyond recognition. 
With a doubt arising in his mind, King Asoka asked him, “Are you Kunala?” “Yes, I am,” was the reply. 
When King Asoka heard this, he fainted and fell to the ground. An attendant saw what had happened to the king and uttered the following stanza: 
When the king saw that Kunala Had no eyes in his face, A painful feeling burned in his heart. He fell down from his sofa. The attendant then sprinkled water on the king to make him recover his consciousness. 
The king then returned to his seat and carried Kunala and sat him on his lap, weeping and shedding tears and stroking his head and face, while he recollected his features of bygone days. 
And he uttered the following stanza: 
The lightning of hatred Has broken my heart. 
You just tell me who it was And I shall not bear a mind of malice. 
Having committed an atrocity, Why do you not sink into the ground? You did not perform what was right But committed a great misdeed. Since you have done evil, I abandon you forever, Just as a good-deed performer Would give up filthy lucre. When King Asoka, with a fire of hatred burning in his heart, saw Tisyaraksita, he again uttered the following stanza: 
At this moment now I wish to extract her eyes And use an iron saw To dismember her limbs, To break her body with an axe, To cut out her tongue with a knife, To sever her neck with a sword, To bum her frame in fire, Or to force her to drink poison To do away with her life. King Asoka said such things intending to punish Tisyaraksita. When Kunala heard these words, he had a mind of deep compas­ sion and uttered the following stanza: 
147b What Tisyaraksita has done Are nothing but evil deeds. 78The Causes o f Kunala Now may the great king Not kill her for that reason. None of the great virtues Can surpass forbearance. As the World-honored One has said, It is the first and foremost. 
He also issued an order to kill that man of Taksasila. 
Long, long ago in the past, there was in the country of Varanasi a hunter who killed many deer in the Snow Mountains. 
Once when he went to the Snow Mountains a thunderbolt crashed in the sky, and five hundred deer, being frightened by the bolt, fled into a cave. 
Upon seeing this group of deer, the hunter caught every one of them. 
Then he thought in his mind, ‘If I kill all of them, their flesh will become rotten. 
I have no other choice but to extract both eyes from each of them, so that they will neither die nor run away, and I can gradually slaughter them afterwards.’ Having reflected in this way, he gouged out all their eyes. 
Elder, what do you think? 
That hunter was Kunala in a former life. 
Because he had extracted the eyes of the deer, he was always bom in hells for innumerable years. 
When he was released from the hells and was born in the human world, his eyes were always extracted for five hundred lives. 
His present life is the last residue of his retribution.” The bhiksu inquired again, “What was the cause of his being bom into an eminent clan with a pair of handsome eyes and gaining arhatship?” “Elder, listen,” said in reply. 
“Long, long ago in the past at a time when the span of human life was forty thou­ sand years, a Buddha, a fully enlightened one, by the name of Krakucchanda appeared in the world. 
There was then a king by the name of Subhavyuha, who constructed a stupa with the four precious substances for that Buddha, the World-honored One. 
After the king’s demise, his younger brother, who did not believe in the Buddha, secretly took away the jewels and gems with which the stupa was built, leaving only the earthwork and the wooden structure behind. 
All the people who saw that the stupa was damaged cried with regret and annoyance. 
i47c “The son of a householder asked the people, W hy are you crying with regret and annoyance?’ They said in reply, ‘Originally the stupa for the World-honored One had the four precious sub­ stances, but now they are destroyed and gone! 
Thus we are crying with regret and annoyance at the sight.’ The son of the householder restored the stupa with the four precious substances as it was before and enlarged it so that it was broader and higher than it was at the beginning. 
He also made a golden image and placed it in the stupa. 
After having done this, he made a vow, saying, ‘As Krakucchanda is the teacher of the world today, may my future teacher be the same as this Buddha now.’ You should know, bhiksu, that that son of a householder was Kunala. 
As the result o f his mending and repairing the stupa of Krakucchanda Tathagata, he was born into a prominent clan in this life. 
Because he made an image of the Tathagata, his body in the present life is most handsome and graceful. 
And as he vowed to meet a good teacher, he now has Sakyamuni as his teacher and realizes the four noble truths.” The Causes of Offering Half an Amra Fruit to the Sangha Having acquired firm faith, King Asoka asked the bhiksus, “Who has made the largest amount of offerings ever to the cause of the Buddha-dharma?” The bhiksus said in reply, “The Elder Anathapindada gave the largest amount of offerings.” The king asked again, ‘W hat amount of offerings was he able to give to the cause of the Buddha-dharma?” The bhiksus said in reply, “He spent a hundred crores of taels of gold.” Having heard this, King Asoka reflected, “If the Elder Anathapindada could spend a hundred crores of taels of gold, I should also spend a hundred crores of taels of gold in alms giving.” King Asoka constructed eighty-four thousand stupas and offered one hundred thousand taels of gold each to the place where the Buddha was born, the place where he attained the Way, the place where he turned the Wheel of the Dharma, and the place where he entered nirvana, and also to each of the places where the various arhats entered nirvana. 
He also convened a great assem­ bly of the four groups of Buddhist followers. 
He offered food at the same time in one day to three hundred thousand monks, of whom one-third were arhats and two-thirds were learners and zealous ordinary people. 
Again, King Asoka, retaining only his treasures, offered all his land, palace attendants, ministers, and Kunala, as well as himself, to the Sangha. 
He also presented four hundred thousand taels of gold in alms to the Sangha and paid an enor­ mous amount of gold to redeem his land and his own person. 
Later, he offered ninety-six crores of taels of gold to the Sangha in alms. 
When King Asoka was afflicted with a serious illness, he was very sad and worried. 
Upon hearing that the king was ill, the minister Radhagupta, who was the king’s friend and rejoiced at his good deed of offering sand as alms in a previous life, went to the king’s place and saluted him at his feet. 
And then he uttered the following stanza: 
i48a Your face formerly resembled a lotus, That no dust or filth could stain. All enemies of great strength Could never get sight of the king, Who was like the hot sun at the meridian Upon whose rays nobody could gaze. How is it that today You are shedding tears and sadly sobbing? King Asoka answered with the following stanza: 
Now I am sad and worried, Not for the sake of my life or wealth But because I shall leave the group of saints— For this I am sad and worried. All the disciples of the World-honored One Have achieved various kinds of merits. With different sorts of food and drink, I make daily offerings to them. As I remember this matter, I cannot help shedding tears. 
“Moreover, Radhagupta, formerly I desired to offer one hundred crores of taels of gold to the Three Treasures, but my intention was not fulfilled. 
Now I intend to present forty crores of taels of gold in alms to satisfy my original intention.” After due considera­ tion, he wished to send forty crores of taels of gold to Kukkuta Monastery. 
At that time, Kunala’s son Sampadin was the crown prince. 
The minister said to the prince, “King Asoka will pass away very soon, and yet he wishes to send forty crores of taels of gold to 82Offering H alf an A m r a Fruit Kukkuta Monastery. 
As all kings depend on wealth for their power, the prince should order the treasure keeper not to allow the gold to be taken out.” Thus the prince issued the order accordingly, and the edict of King Asoka was not put in force. 
But golden vessels were provided for the king to take his meal. 
After taking his meal, he ordered that the golden vessels be sent to Kukkuta Monastery. 
Thus golden vessels were withheld, and silver ones were allowed for his use. 
After taking his meal, the king again ordered that the silver vessels be sent to Kukkuta Monastery. 
So silver vessels were withheld, and iron ones were provided for the use of the king. But after taking his meal, he again ordered that they be sent to Kukkuta Monastery. 
Then iron vessels were also withheld, and earthenware vessels were allowed for his use. 
Then King Asoka had nothing more in his possession except half an amra fruit in his hand. 
As King Asoka was greatly distressed in his mind, he summoned his ministers and people and said to them all harmoniously, “Who is now the lord of this earth?” The ministers rose up to salute him and said with folded hands, “Only heaven and nobody else is the lord.” Then King Asoka shed tears that rolled down like rain, and he uttered the following stanza: 
I have no more free control over anything. 
This is the only thing you should do for me. 
Send this half an amra fruit to Kukkuta Monastery and announce my words, saying, ‘King Asoka worships at the monks’ feet. 
Formerly I possessed the land of the whole of Jambudvlpa, but now I have only half an amra fruit. 
This is my last alms, which I hope the monks will accept. 
Although this is a small thing, the beneficial merit of offering it to the monks is great.’ ” And he also uttered the following stanza: 
Under the king’s order, the messenger sent the half an amra fruit to Kukkuta Monastery. 
Before the elder monk he offered it to the Sangha and uttered the following stanza with his hands joined palm to palm: 
148c The whole earth is under the one umbrella Of the king’s rule without hindrance, Like the brilliant light of the sun Shining upon all places. Of his fancied good deeds The merit has come to the end, As the sun, sinking down into the earth, Has no more brilliant light. With worship and veneration, He offers half an amra fruit As a sign of his merit’s termination; It is his last gift. At that time, the Elder assembled the bhiksus and said to them, “Now you should cherish a mind of fear. 
Just as the Buddha has said, it is fearful to see impermanence manifested in other per­ sons. 
Whoever could bear it without a feeling of abhorrence and abandonment? 
He has nothing more than an amra. All treasures on the great earth Were under his protection. This King Asoka of today Gives half an amra in alms. Ordinary beings of all realms of existence Are proud of the force of their merit and virtue. 
When the monks received King Asoka’s half an amra fruit, they crushed it into pulp and mixed it in soup, which was then served to all members of the Sangha. 
King Asoka said to Radhagupta, “Who is the king now?” Radhagupta, saluting him at his feet, said with joined hands, “Heaven is the lord of earth, and nobody else is.” King Asoka, who was then supported by some people, looked around at the four quarters and said toward the place of the monks with his palms joined together, “With the exception of my treasures, I now offer the great earth and even the great sea, together with every­ thing else, to the Sangha.” And he also uttered the following stanza: 
Water is the garment of the earth; The seven jewels adorn its surface, Which supports all living beings As well as all the mountains. Now I give up all these things As alms to the monks. 149a From the monks I shall gain the fruit; Thus I am giving them these things as gifts. By the blessing of this alms-giving, I do not seek the place of Sakra, Nor to find pleasure in the heaven of Brahman, Nor to be the lord of all parts of the earth. 
Holding this document in his hand, he joined his palms toward the place of the monks and said to them, 86Offering H alf an A m r a Fruit “I offer this great earth and everything to the Sangha.” After having said so, he passed away. 
Then the ministers adorned a hearse with multicolored silk as an offering for the body of the king. 
After making the offering, they intended to perform the ceremony of enthronement by sprinkling sea water upon the head of the crown prince. 
Radhagupta said to the ministers, “The whole great earth has been offered to the Sangha by the great King Asoka.” The ministers said in reply, “Then what shall we do?” Radhagupta replied, “Formerly King Asoka desired to offer one hundred crores of taels of gold as alms to the Buddha, the Dharma, and the Sangha. 
When he had given ninety-six crores of taels of gold, he wished to complete the round figure, but the ministers did not agree with him. 
As the king was discontented, he offered the whole great earth as alms to the Sangha.” Then the ministers took out forty crores of taels of gold to redeem the great earth and performed the ceremony of enthronement by sprinkling sea water upon the head of Prince Sampadin. 
Sampadin’s son was Brhaspati, Brhaspati’s son was Vrsasena, Vrsasena’s son was Pusyavarman, and Pusyavarman’s son was Pusyamitra. 
When Pusyamitra ascended the throne, he assembled the ministers , “By what expedient means can I make my name everlasting?” The ministers said in reply, “Your Majesty’s surname is derived from King Asoka, who constructed eighty-four thousand stupas so that the Buddha-dharma did not perish; and his name is still well known. 
Your Majesty should now construct eighty-four thousand stupas.” The king said in reply, “The great King Asoka possessed a great divine power unsur­ passed by anyone. 
Is there any other means for me to keep my name known forever?” There was then a Brahman, an adept in incantation but an ordinary person not believing the Buddha-dharma, who said to the king, “There are two causes that may make one’s name everlast­ ing. 
The first is to do evil and the second to perform good deeds. 
The great King Asoka constructed eighty-four thousand stupas; but if Your Majesty were to destroy them now, your name would be everlasting.” When King Pusyamitra intended to destroy the Buddhadharma, he arrayed his four divisions of troops and went to Kukkuta Monastery. 
Upon arriving at the gate of the monastery, he heard the roar of a lion. 
Being greatly frightened, the king returned to the country of Pataliputra. 
In this manner he went to Kukkuta Monastery three times, and each time the same thing happened to him. 
i49b When he returned to that country, he assembled the monks of that monastery and said to them, “Now I intend to destroy the Buddha-dharma. 
Each of you should tell me of his own case.” All the monks said together, ‘W e all protect the stupas.” Then the king executed the Elder monk and killed all the other monks. 
At that time, the country of Sakala was under the king’s domain. 
He said to the people of that country that anyone who could get the head of a bhiksu would be rewarded with golden money. 
A man who intended to get his head said to the king, “There is a bhiksu in that monastery. 
I wish to take his head and send it to Your Majesty.” Having heard this, the king desired to take the head of the bhiksu himself. 
At that moment the bhiksu was absorbed in the intense contempla­ tion of perfect cessation; and by the power of the contemplation, he was invulnerable to knife, stick, fire, and poison. 
Since he could not kill the bhiksu, the king went away to some other place and reached the country of Kosthaka. 
In that country there was a Yaksa deity who was guarding the Buddha’s tooth relic. 
The Yaksa reflected, “The Buddha-dharma is going to perish. 
But as I am observing the precepts, I can no longer kill any living creature. 
I have a daughter, whom the Yaksa Krmisa originally wished to marry. 
But as he often committed evil deeds in former times, I did not give my permission. 
Now, for the sake of protecting the Buddhadharma I should give her to him in marriage.” 88There was another powerful Yaksa who always protected King Pusyamitra. 
Owing to his power nobody could injure the king. 
The deity who guarded the Buddha’s tooth relic led away to the South Sea the Yaksa who protected the king; and at that moment the Yaksa Krmisa brought a great mountain and pressed it on King Pusyamitra and his four divisions of troops, who all died instantly. 
Thus that mountain was named Sunihita . 
Since King Pusyamitra was killed, the great Maurya clan died out. 
The Causes of the Buddha’s Prediction Concerning Upagupta When the Buddha wished to enter nirvana, he converted the Naga kings Apalala and Gopalacandala; and after having done so, he came to the country of Mathura. 
In that country he told Ananda, “One hundred years after my nirvana, there will be in this country of Mathura a perfumer by the name of Gupta whose son Upagupta will be a Buddha without the special marks. 
He will perform the i49c functions of a Buddha and teach many people to achieve arhatship. 
Into this cave, which is eighteen cubits long and twelve cubits broad, he will ask each of his disciples to put a chip four inches long and thereby eventually fill up the cave. 
Ananda, you should know that after me Upagupta will be the foremost in edifying his dis­ ciples. 
Ananda, do you see that green mountain in the distance?” Ananda said in reply, “I see it, World-honored One!” The Buddha said, “That mountain is named Urumanda. 
One hundred years after the Tathagata’s nirvana, the bhiksu Sanakavasin will build a monastery on that mountain and preach the Dharma to edify Upagupta, who will become a monk. 
In the country of Mathura there will be two brothers named Nata and Bhata. 
Being the sons of a wealthy person, they will be donors for the construction of the monastery on Mount Urumanda. 
Thus the monastery will be named Natabhatika. 
The Buddha said to Ananda, “You should not wonder at this matter. 
Even long ago in the past when he was bom in an evil path , he already benefitted many people. 
Again, beside Urumanda Mountain on its three sides, there were in the past five hundred pratyekabuddhas on one side, five hundred recluses on another side, and five hundred monkeys on the third side. 
Among the monkeys there was a chief monkey who went to the pratyeka­ buddhas. 
Being delighted to see them, he picked fruits and flowers from the trees and offered them to the pratyekabuddhas. 
The pratyekabuddhas were sitting cross-legged, and the monkey paid homage to them one by one. 
After having worshipped them, the monkey sat erect at the last seat after the monks, and he did so every day. 
When all of the pratyekabuddhas entered nirvana, the monkey did not know it and made offerings to them as be­ fore. 
When he saw that the pratyekabuddhas did not accept his offerings, he dragged their clothes and pulled their feet, but the pratyekabuddhas did not move. 
Then the monkey realized that all the pratyekabuddhas were dead. 
He cried and wept sorrowfully, and went to the recluses. 
“The five hundred recluses were lying on thorns and thistles, and the monkey, imitating the recluses, also lay on thorns and thistles. 
He also imitated the recluses by lying on ashes and 150a earth and scorching himself with heat from five directions as the recluses did. 
When they had gone away after scorching them­ selves, the monkey quenched the piles of fire with water and hid the ashes away. 
He pulled up the thorns and thistles on which the recluses had lain and threw them away. 
He also cleared away the ashes on which they had lain. 
The recluses grasped the branches of trees to suspend themselves in the air. 
The monkey loosened their hands and made them drop to the ground. 
He often taught the recluses how to behave themselves in the four respectinspiring forms of demeanor in walking, standing, sitting, and lying. 
After having taught them this, he sat upright before them to practice concentration and said to them, ‘All of you should sit like this.’ The five hundred recluses then sat together with him in meditation. 
Having no teacher to preach the Dharma to them, the recluses meditated on the thirty-seven classified ways leading to enlightenment and attained the path of the pratyekabuddha. 
Having attained the path, they reflected, ‘It is owing to this 92The Buddha’s Prediction Concerning Upagupta monkey that we have attained the holy path.’ Thus they offered incense, flowers, food, and drink to the monkey. 
When the monkey came to the end of his life, the pratyekabuddhas cremated his body with fragrant wood.” The Buddha said to Ananda, “That monkey was Upagupta. 
Even in an evil path of existence, Upagupta did great benefit for many people. 
One hundred years after my nirvana, he will again perform great beneficial deeds on Mount Urumanda.” At that time, the World-honored One said to Ananda, “Hold a corner of my robe.” Then the World-honored One lifted Ananda’s physical body into the air, and they went together to the country of Kasmira. 
Upon arriving there, said to Ananda, “Do you see the many mountains and forests here?” Ananda said in reply, “I see them, World-honored One!” He again told Ananda, “One hundred years after my nirvana, there will be in this coun­ try of Kasmira the bhiksu Madhyantika, who will establish the country of Kasmira in this land.” Then the Buddha gradually proceeded to the city of Kusinagara. 
When the time of his nirvana arrived, he told the Elder Mahakasyapa, “Now I wish to enter nirvana. 
You should collect the Dharma-pita/ea, to make it last one thousand years in order to absorb and convert all living beings.” Mahakasyapa said to the Buddha, “World-honored One, I shall act according to the instructions of the World-honored One.” The Buddha then thought of Sakra. 
Being aware o f the Buddha’s mind, Sakra, the Lord of Devas, came to the Buddha. 
The World-honored One told Sakra,“Kausika, you should protect / and maintain the Dharma-pitaka.” Sakra said to the Buddha, “World-honored One, I shall do so.” The World-honored One then thought of the Four Heavenly Kings, who, knowing the mind of the Buddha, came to the Buddha. 
The Buddha said again to the Four Heavenly Kings, “After my nirvana, the four of you should protect and maintain the Dharma-pitaka. 
Even in the future, during the times of the three wicked kings, you four together should protect and maintain the Dharma-pifcz&a.” The Four Heavenly Kings said to the Buddha, “We shall do so, World-honored One!” At that time, having entrusted the Dharma-pifo&a to Mahakasyapa and Sakra as well as to the Four Heavenly Kings, the World-honored One returned to the country of Mathura, gradually proceeded to the twin sala trees in the city of Kusinagara, and told Ananda, “The time of my nirvana is approaching. 
Make a bed for me to the north of the twin sala trees. 
At midnight tonight I shall enter perfect nirvana.” And he also uttered the following stanza: 
Old age and sickness are the shore From which I have crossed the sea. Intending to enter the land of no sorrow, I give up this body as a raft. Rebirth is like the sea, With fearful old age as its water. Sakyamuni is the bull king Who has crossed the sea of rebirth, Like a man depending upon a raft 150b Who safely reaches the other shore. 
After the Buddha’s nirvana, eight stupas were erected to preserve his relics. 
The ninth stupa contained a water pot and the tenth one was a stupa of embers. Thus a stanza was uttered as follows: 
Eight stupas were as tall as mountains, Relics were preserved underneath. The ninth one was a stupa of the water pot, And the tenth one a stupa of embers. 
f Sakra, the Lord of Devas, and the Four Heavenly Kings offered all kinds of incense and flowers as well as different kinds of music to the relics, and he said, “The World-honored One entrusted us with the Dharma-pifa&a and entered nirvana. 
Now we should comply and protect the Buddha-dharma.” Then Sakra said to Dhrtarastra, 94The Buddha’s Prediction Concerning Upagupta “You should protect the Buddha-dharma in the east.” He said to Virudhaka, “You should protect the Buddha-dharma in the south.” He said to Virupaksa, “You should protect the Buddha-dharma in the west.” And he said to Kuvera, <rYou should protect the Buddhadharma in the north.” The World-honored One said, “After my death three wicked kings will come to live among you. 
If they destroy the Buddhadharma, you should defend and protect it.” Then the Buddha entered nirvana along with innumerable arhats. 
A sorrowful voice was heard in the air, uttering the follow­ ing stanza: 
What a pity that the disciples of the Buddha Have all entered nirvana. Today in this world Everything is empty and void. The shadow of ignorance darkened the lamp of the right Dharma. 
All the arhats of great virtue entered nirvana. 
Nobody was there to guard and protect the Buddha-dharma any more, and [it seemed that] the right Dharma of the Tripitaka would not last long. 
At that time, Sakra and the Four Heavenly Kings as well as countless divine beings went together to Mahakasyapa. 
Upon arriving there they worshipped at Kasyapa’s feet and said, “The World-honored One has entrusted the Bharma-pitaka to you, Most Virtuous One, and to us. 
Most Virtuous One, you should now protect the Buddha-dharma together with us. 
All the Buddhadharma should be collected and must not be allowed to disperse. 
Now the Buddha-dharma, supported and accepted by divine beings and men, will stay in the world for one thousand years for the sake of absorbing and converting all living beings.” Then Kasyapa struck a bell; and by his supernatural power i 50c the sound issued from his mouth, telling all people in Jambudvipa about it. 
There were then five hundred arhats staying at Kusinagara. 
Kasyapa said to the Elder Aniruddha, “Now who is ab­ sent from the assembly of arhats?” Aniruddha said in reply, “Gavampati is now at the Sirisa Palace in heaven. 
He is absent at the moment.” The most virtuous Kasyapa asked the bhiksus, “Who is the youngest person in this assembly?” The arhat Purna said in reply, “I am the youngest one.” Mahakasyapa said to him, “Can you accept the instructions of the Sangha?” Purna answered, “I can.” Kasyapa said again, “Good man, it is excellent, truly excellent, that you can accept the instructions of the Sangha. 
Now you may go to the Sirisa Palace in heaven, to Gavampati, and tell him, ‘Mahakasyapa and the monks summon you to come down. 
_ / Purna then went to the Sirisa Palace and said to Gavampati, “Kasyapa and the monks who are living in perfect harmony in Jambudvipa have a function of the Sangha that requires you to go down in haste.” Gavampati said in reply, “Good man, you should say the Buddha and the monks instead of Kasyapa and the monks. 
Because, the Buddha having entered nirvana, the heretics and the like might despise the Buddha-dharma, and moreover some evil bhiksus might try to cause a schism in the Sangha. 
The heretics might say, ‘Since the Buddha has entered nirvana, the Dharma has also completely disappeared, and the bhiksus know nothing of it.’ Formerly when the Buddha was in the world, his light of wisdom made the world bright and brilliant. 
Now he is dead, and the world has become dark. 
What is the use of my going there?” He also uttered the following stanza: 
The whole world is now empty; Nowhere is delightful anymore. Without the Tathagata to preach the Dharma, There is nothing to be done in Jambudvipa. Now I wish to stay here To enter nirvana. 96The Buddha’s Prediction Concerning Upagupta “Now you may return there and tell them my mind, saying, ‘Gavampati worships Mahakasyapa and the monks,’ and repeat the above stanza.” The whole world is now empty; Nowhere is delightful anymore. 
Without the Tathagata to preach the Dharma, There is nothing to be done in Jambudvipa. Now I wish to stay here To enter nirvana. i5 ia After having said these words, Gavampati entered nirvana. 
When Purna returned to Jambudvipa, he uttered the following stanza: 
Superior Sangha of great virtues: The venerable Gavampati Said with veneration: “Since the Buddha has entered nirvana, Today I shall also Enter nirvana. Just as when the great elephant died, His son followed suit.” At that time Mahakasyapa made a rule: 
From then onward all monks should live in harmony to collect the Dharma-pito&a. 
Until this function was completed, none of the bhiksus should enter nirvana. 
And he also uttered the following stanza: 
From today onward All monks should live in harmony. As long as the Dharma-pita/ea is not collected, None should enter nirvana. When the five hundred arhats were living in harmony, Maha­ kasyapa informed the Sangha, saying, “This Elder Ananda has always followed the Tathagata. 
He is getting old now, and all monks should respect him.” He also uttered the following stanza: 
This Elder Ananda Received and upheld what the Buddha said. He is sharp-witted and has intelligence And always followed the Tathagata’s steps, Understanding the Buddha-dharma with a pure mind Thus we should respect him, As he is beneficial to all monks And is praised by the One with Ten Powers. At that time, Mahakasyapa said to the bhiksus, “If we collected the Dharma-pitaka at this place, many monks would come here in crowds and would certainly weep with grief, which would disturb our Dharma function. 
We should go to the country of Magadha, where the Buddha attained enlightenment, to collect the Dharmapitaka.” Kasyapa and the five hundred arhats then went to the city ofRajagrha, while Ananda, supported by the Elder Vrjiputra, travelled to the country Vrji. 
When they arrived there the four groups of devotees of that country were sad and grieved to hear that the Buddha had entered nirvana. 
Having seen this, he went to Ananda, and upon reaching there, he uttered the following stanza: 
You should go under a tree To fix your mind on nirvana. While Gautama was sitting in meditation, Very soon he attained nirvana. i5ib At that time, the Elder Ananda, under the edification of Vrjiputra, spent the whole day in walking and sitting to wash his mind of the five covers. 
He did so from the first till the fifth watch in the night; and when Venus appeared, he went out to wash his feet. 
Having washed his feet, he returned to the monastery and intended to lie 98The Buddha’s Prediction Concerning Upagupta down with his right side on the bed. 
Before his head touched the pillow, he freed himself from all passions and attained arhatship. 
Then he went to the city of Rajagrha where Kasyapa and the five hundred arhats had also arrived. 
At that time, Ajatasatru, son of Vaidehi, on hearing that Kasyapa and five hundred arhats were coming, decorated the road and prepared different kinds of offer­ ings to welcome Mahakasyapa. 
King Ajatasatru had formerly achieved the rootless faith caused by the Buddha; for when he saw the Buddha coming to him, he prostrated himself from a lofty storied house; but the Buddha took hold of him by his supernatural powers. 
This time, while he was riding on an elephant, he also prostrated himself at the sight of Mahakasyapa; and Mahakasyapa also took hold of him by his supernatural powers. 
Kasyapa said to King Ajatasatru, “The Tathagata could utilize his supernatural powers without a pre­ liminary thought, but a sravaka must premeditate before he can utilize his supernatural powers. 
If you prostrate [from such a height] without my being prepared, you might lose your life. 
From now on never do it again.” The king said in reply, “I shall do as you say.” King Ajatasatru worshipped at Kasyapa’s feet and said to him with his hands joined together, “Most Virtuous One, when the World-honored One entered nirvana, I did not see him. 
If you, Most Virtuous One, intend to enter nirvana, you must come to see me.” Kasyapa answered, “Let it be so.” And he also said to the great king, “We wish to collect the Buddha-dharma in this city.” The king said in reply, “From now on till the end of my life, I shall offer robes, food and drink, medicine, and bedding to the Sangha. 
The monks may stay at Bamboo Grove Monastery.” Then Kasyapa reflected, “This monastery is broad and big and the bhiksus might cause a disturbance to our function. 
There is a grotto by the name of Pippalayana. 
We should go there to collect the Dharma-pitaka.” Then Kasyapa and the five hundred arhats went together to Pippalayana Grotto. 
After arriving there, and having properly arranged their lodgings, he said to the bhiksus, “In the future the bhiksus may lose their correct minds. 
We should work together to collect the Udana and Gdtha before midday, and after midday we shall collect the other Dharmas.” Then the five hundred arhats took their seats according to order, and on each seat was spread a nisidana . 
i5 ic All the monks thought in their minds which of the three pitakas they should collect first. 
Mahakasyapa said, ‘W e should first collect the Sutras.” The monks said again, ‘W ho can recite the Sutras?” Kasyapa said in reply, “The Elder Ananda is the foremost among the well-instructed disciples. 
All the Sutras were received and retained by him. 
We should ask him to recite the Sutras.” Kasyapa then said to Ananda, “You should now recite the Sutras; and we, the assembly, shall collect them together.” And he uttered the following stanza: 
You, Elder Ananda, should know That this Dharma-pitaka Was created by the Tathagata, And that it subsists through your effort. You uphold the Buddha’s Dharma-pifa&a, Like a bull carrying a heavy burden. The Tathagata, possessing the ten powers, Is the peerless and great brave one. He could put an end to the three realms of being; And the Buddha-dharma is as fine as clarified butter. 
At that time, the Elder Ananda said in reply, “Let it be so.” Then he rose from his seat, and standing before the presiding Elder and looking at all the monks, he uttered the following stanza: 
In this auspicious assembly of monks, The World-honored One alone is absent. The mind of purity is unadorned, Like the sky without the moon. 100The Buddha’s Prediction Concerning Upagupta The Elder Ananda worshipped the monks one by one, beginning with the presiding Elder. 
After worshipping them, he ascended the high seat and thought, “Some Sutras I heard personally from the Buddha and some I did not. 
But now I shall say, ‘Thus have I heard’ to all of them.” The most virtuous Kasyapa said to Ananda, “Elder, you should tell us where the Sutras were spoken.” And he uttered the following stanza: 
All the great wise ones request You, a son of the Buddha, to tell us At which place the Buddha’s First Sutra was spoken. 
Thus have I heard: Once the World-honored One was staying at the Deer Park of the recluses in the country of Varanasi. 
The Buddha told the bhiksus about the noble truth of suffering, and so on.” Such as this was extensively related. 
At that time, the Elder Ajnatakaundinya reflected, “Among this assembly I am the person who heard this Sutra spoken to me and my companions. 
The Buddha-dharma that has been trans­ mitted uninterruptedly is the Dharma I heard at the beginning.” Thus a sad and regretful feeling arose in him, and upon seeing this sight Ananda also felt sad and regretful. 
He came down from the high seat, sat on the ground, and uttered the following stanza: 
152a The three realms of beings are powerless, Like the moon’s reflection in the water, Or illusion, or the trunk of a banana tree. But with the power of wisdom, One may know everything in the world. Thus one should forsake birth and death And try to realize nirvana, Like a tree falling in a gale. At that time, all five hundred arhats left their seats and sat on the bare ground. 
Kasyapa said to the bhiksus, “How is the Sutra recited by Ananda?” Then the five hundred arhats entered samadhi, and after emerging from samadhi, they said, “Such is the Sutra! 
We shall ask him to collect the Vinaya as we wish.” Then Kasyapa said to Upali, “Elder, you should recite the Vinaya, as we wish to collect it.” “Let it be so,” was the reply. 
After the collection of the second Dh axma-pitaka was com­ pleted, Mahakasyapa again thought, “We ourselves should recite the Mother of Wisdom .” Kasyapa then said to the bhiksus, “What are the Mother of Wisdom? 
They are the four objects of meditation, the four right efforts, the four supernatural powers, the five sense organs, the five spiritual powers, the seven branches of enlightenment, the eight­ fold right path, the four unhindered wisdoms of eloquence, the wisdom of non-disputation, and the wisdom of vows, which should all be collected. 
The Dharmakaya, the theory of discipline, calm­ ness and tranquillity, and doctrinal views are teachings of the Mother of Wisdom.” Thus the most virtuous Kasyapa concluded the collection of the Dharma-p ita&a. 
And he uttered the following stanza: 
We have collected the Dharma, the Sutras, For the benefit of the world. The things said by the Buddha of the ten powers Were immeasurable. The darkness of ignorance in the world Can be dispelled by the lamp of the Dharma. 102The Buddha’s Prediction Concerning Upagupta At that time, the Elder Ananda thought, “When the Buddha, the World-honored One, was about to enter nirvana, he said to those who had violated minor rules that might be given up. 
I should now tell the monks.” Then before the presiding elder he said with hands joined palm to palm, “I personally heard the Buddha saying that thenceforward if anyone violated the minor rules, he might give them up and not pretend to observe them. 
If the monks agree, we may give them up together. 
When there are no more minor offenses, all the monks may live in peace and happiness.” Then the most virtuous Kasyapa said to Ananda, “Did you ask the World-honored One which are minor rules that might be given up and which are not minor rules that might not be given up? 
Among the five sections , do they belong 152b to the fifth or the fourth section?” Ananda said in reply, “I really did not ask. 
Because all the great bhiksus in the presence of the Buddha did not ask about it, and as I was the youngest person, and had nothing to feel guilty or shameful about in my mind, I did not ask about it. 
Moreover, as the Buddha was about to enter nirvana, I was feeling sad and sorry, and thus I did not ask about it.” Mahakasyapa then said to Ananda, “You are guilty of a duskrta offense, as you offered muddy water to the Buddha when the Tathagata asked for water from you at the time of his approaching nirvana.” Ananda said in reply, “I was the youngest person and had nothing to feel guilty or shameful about in my mind. 
At that time five hundred carts had just crossed the Krakustha River. 
I fetched the water shortly after the carts had gone away, and thus the water was muddy.” Kasyapa said again, “When the Tathagata needed water, why did you not hold the bowl toward heaven, so that heavenly beings would have certainly poured water into it? 
Why did you fetch muddy water to offer to the Buddha? 
Therefore you have committed a duskrta offense. 
Again, the World-honored One had a new robe, as yellow as gold in color. 
Why did you tread on it with your feet?” Ananda said in reply, “I did not do so out of shamelessness, but because nobody else was there . 
Thus I stepped on it with my foot.” Kasyapa said again, ‘W hy did you not hold the robe toward heaven? 
Heavenly beings would have come to hold it. 
Therefore you have committed a duskrta offense. 
Again, at that time the Buddha said to you that if a man had cultivated the four supernatural powers, he could live for a kalpa or less than a kalpa, and he let you know that the Buddha, the Tathàgata, had already achieved the four super­ natural powers. 
Why did you not ask the Buddha to stay in the world for a kalpa or less than a kalpa?” Ananda said in reply, “Most Virtuous Kàsyapa, I was not shameless. 
At that time the king of Maras bewitched my mind, and thus I failed to ask the Tathàgata to stay.” Kàsyapa said, “That is also a duskrta offense, Again, why did you show the Tathàgata’s physical mark of a well-retracted male organ to women?” Ananda said in reply, “It was not out of shamelessness that I showed the physical mark of a well-retracted male organ to women. 
At that time the women were full of lustful desire, and if they saw the Tathàgata’s physical mark of a wellretracted male organ, they would feel disgusted with their female form and wish to gain the male form. 
That is why I showed it to them.” Kàsyapa said, “You have committed a duskrta offense for which you should make a confession.” At that time, Kàsyapa said to the bhiksus, “We should now recite the seven rules for settling disputes and other minor offenses.” Among the bhiksus some said that the regulations to be learned by the monks and nuns were minor rules; others said that the four dharmas were minor rules; i52c some others said that the ninety rules were minor rules; still others said that the thirty rules [concerning confiscation and expiation] were minor rules; and some others even said that the two rules concerning uncertain cases of infringe­ ment were minor rules. 
Some of them said, “If only the four grave prohibitions and the thirteen rules [concerning temporary expul­ sion] were reserved while all the other rules were abandoned, the heretics would say that the Dharma of the sramana Gautama is motley and variegated. 
When the Buddha was in the world, the Dharma was harmonious and in unison, and when he passed away, the Dharma also disappeared. 
After the Buddha’s nirvana, all 104The Buddha’s Prediction Concerning Upagupta his disciples acted on their own discretion; those who wished to observe the rules observed the rules, and those who wished to abandon the rules abandoned the rules.” The Buddha said these words, “If a bhiksu cannot observe the disciplinary rules with a whole mind, he should observe them with a right mind. 
If he has received the disciplinary rules, he should not abandon them but should accept and observe all that the Buddha has spoken. 
If a bhiksu accepts and observes what was spoken, the good Dharma will increase without retrogression.” Therefore all the disciplinary rules spoken by the Buddha were accepted and observed. 
The Causes of the Transmission of the Dharma-pitaka by the Five Disciples of the Buddha The World-honored One transmitted the Dharma-pitaka to Maha­ kasyapa and entered nirvana; Mahakasyapa transmitted it toA n an da and entered nirvana; Ananda transm itted it to Madhyantika and entered nirvana; Madhyantika transmitted it /_ _ /_ to Sanakavasin and entered nirvana; Sanakavasin transmitted it to Upagupta and entered nirvana; and Upagupta transmitted it to Dhltika. 
When Upagupta was edifying his disciples in the country of Mathura, each of them was asked, at the time of becoming an arhat, to throw a chip four inches in length into a cave twelve cubits broad and eighteen cubits long. 
made a vow that when the cave was filled with chips he would enter nirvana; i53a and when the cave was full of chips, he did enter nirvana, after having handed over the Dharma to his disciple Dhltika, who was the last disciple to throw a chip into the cave to make it full. 
Upagupta said to Dhitika, “Formerly the Buddha handed over the Dharma-pitaka to Mahakasyapa, Mahakasyapa handed it over to Ananda, Ananda handed it over to Madhyantika, and Madhyantika handed it over to my upadhyaya. 
Now I hand this Dharma-pitaka over to you.” Having handed down the Dharmapitaka, he entered nirvana seven days later. 
Both heavenly and human beings passed the news from place to place throughout Jambudvipa. 
One hundred thousand arhats came harmoniously together to make offerings, and the number of learners and upasakas and upasikas was uncountable. 
At the time of entering nirvana, rose into the air in the postures of walking, standing, sitting, and lying down, with water coming out of the upper part of his body and fire from the lower part in eighteen transformations. 
All the heavenly beings and people in the world were delighted. 
Then he performed jhapita of himself with the chips . 
At that time one thousand arhats entered nirvana with him. 
Then Dhltika received and protected the Dharma-pitaka. 
The Causes of Kasyapa The causes of the nirvana of the Elder Mahakasyapa: 
At that time the Elder Kasyapa had all the Sutras, the Vinaya, and the Abhidharma recited. 
With the wisdom of vows he understood the Tnpitaka, achieved the body , and realized the samadhi of cessation. 
With the all-comprehensive four unhindered wisdoms of eloquence, he collected the Dharmapitaka with five hundred arhats. 
The Dharma as spoken by the Buddha was handed down to various superior persons one by one, so that it might spread to all places for constant reading and reciting and not be lost, for the benefit of all people. 
He often thought, “I am getting advanced in age, but old age and death are the law of impermanence.” He also thought in this way: “I have received according to my ability what the Buddha has spoken. 
My good friends have received the Sutras, and thus the sons of the Dharma have been bom. 
What I have done at present for requiting the Buddha’s kindness is only a small repayment for the Buddha’s favors. 
Who can fully repay all the kindness of the Buddha? 
All my fellow students are har­ monious in the Dharma, and I have been carrying myself too long to receive and gather up the world. 
I am too tired from carrying myself for so long, and as this stinking body is extremely tired, my time of nirvana is approaching.” He also uttered the following stanza: 
108The Transmission o f the D haim a-pitaka We should widely teach the World-honored One’s Dharma words In all places. 
The shameless ones are expelled; Those having a sense of shame are accepted. I have done what is beneficial to me. My time of nirvana is coming. 
Mahakasyapa then went to Ananda and said to him, “The Worldhonored One handed over the Dharma-pitaka to me and then entered nirvana. 
Now I wish to enter nirvana and hand over the Dharma-pitaka to you. 
You should accept and uphold it. 
In due time a son will be bom to a merchant in the city of Rajagrha, and as the child will be born covered with a sana garment, he will be called Sanakavasin. 
Sanakavasin will sail on the great sea, and later he will have faith in the Dharma o f the Worldhonored One, to whom he will always make offerings. 
You should edify him to become a monk and transmit the Buddha’s Dharmapitaka to him.” Mahakasyapa then handed over the Buddha’s Dharma-pitaka 153b to the Elder Ananda. 
“My World-honored One had great compassion. 
He did what was hard to do, and his edification was all-round and pervasive. 
By his countless merits he created his most recent body. 
The relics of the World-honored One are wor­ shipped at all places. 
I should enter nirvana, and you ought to know that there is nothing else for me to do.” He also uttered the following stanza: 
To the relics of the World-honored One I have already made offerings. It was from him That the samadhi of enlightenment was bom. To the one who did what was hard to do This is my last offering. Mahakasyapa went by his supernatural powers to the four caityas at the places where the Buddha was born, where he at­ tained enlightenment, where he turned the Wheel of the Dharma, and where he entered nirvana. 
With utmost veneration he wor­ shipped and made offerings to them. 
He did the same at the eight relic stupas. 
He also entered the Naga palace to make offerings [to the Buddha’s tooth relic], like a lion king entering a lake that was terrorless, deep, large, unruffled, pure, and undefiled. 
After having made offerings to the Buddha’s tooth relic there, he came out as quickly as the Naga king could appear in the air and instantly reached the palace of the Trayastrimsa heaven, where Sakra and the other heavenly beings were glad to make offerings to him. 
After having received the offerings, he intended to enter nirvana at that place. 
Upon seeing the signs of the matter, Sakra said to Kasyapa, “As you are mindful of pure practices, you have always lived in the mountains. 
What is your intention in coming here? 
This is a lonely place where you have nobody to depend upon.” At that time, the Elder Mahakasyapa said to Sakra, “Kausika, I take pleasure in looking at the Buddha’s tooth relic and the Buddha’s heavenly crown as well as his mani , pdtra (alms bowl), and other things. 
This is my last time to make offerings to them.” He also uttered the following stanza: 
To say that my suffering is ended, I have come here. To see the signs of the Buddha, I have come here. 
Sakra and the other heavenly beings, hearing Kasyapa’s words, felt sad and sorry, and out of respect for him they handed the Buddha’s tooth relic with both hands to Kas'yapa, who received it respectfully and looked at it without blinking. 
He offered mandarava flowers, bakula flowers, and small particles of ox head sandalwood to the tooth relic. 
Mahakasyapa said to Sakra and one 110The Transmission of the Dharma-pita&a thousand heavenly beings, “You should practice non-slackness.” Then Mahakasyapa suddenly disappeared from the summit of Mount Sumeru and returned to the city of Rajagrha. 
At that time, the Elder Kasyapa handed over the Buddha’s Dharma-pifo&a to Ananda, and then Ananda followed behind Kasyapa every day. 
Ananda said to Kasyapa, “Do not enter nirvana!” Kasyapa then told Ananda, “You and I may enter each i 53c by his own way.” Ananda rose early in the morning, and having dressed him­ self in his robes he took up his begging bowl and entered the city to beg for food. 
first, delightful name; second, delightful listen­ ing; third, delightful appearance. 
People were never tired of look­ ing at him and never tired of listening to him speaking on the Dharma. 
Kasyapa also rose early in the morning, and having dressed himself in his robes, he held his begging bowl and entered the city to beg for food. 
He thought, “I promised that at the time of entering nirvana, I would go to see King Ajatasatru.” Kasyapa then went to the royal palace and said to the gatekeeper, “I am here, wishing to see the great king. 
You may go into the palace to inform the king about it.” The gatekeeper said in reply, “The king is now sleeping. 
